Google 



This is a digital copy of a book that was preserved for generations on library shelves before it was carefully scanned by Google as part of a project 

to make the world's books discoverable online. 

It has survived long enough for the copyright to expire and the book to enter the public domain. A public domain book is one that was never subject 

to copyright or whose legal copyright term has expired. Whether a book is in the public domain may vary country to country. Public domain books 

are our gateways to the past, representing a wealth of history, culture and knowledge that's often difficult to discover. 

Marks, notations and other maiginalia present in the original volume will appear in this file - a reminder of this book's long journey from the 

publisher to a library and finally to you. 

Usage guidelines 

Google is proud to partner with libraries to digitize public domain materials and make them widely accessible. Public domain books belong to the 
public and we are merely their custodians. Nevertheless, this work is expensive, so in order to keep providing tliis resource, we liave taken steps to 
prevent abuse by commercial parties, including placing technical restrictions on automated querying. 
We also ask that you: 

+ Make non-commercial use of the files We designed Google Book Search for use by individuals, and we request that you use these files for 
personal, non-commercial purposes. 

+ Refrain fivm automated querying Do not send automated queries of any sort to Google's system: If you are conducting research on machine 
translation, optical character recognition or other areas where access to a large amount of text is helpful, please contact us. We encourage the 
use of public domain materials for these purposes and may be able to help. 

+ Maintain attributionTht GoogXt "watermark" you see on each file is essential for in forming people about this project and helping them find 
additional materials through Google Book Search. Please do not remove it. 

+ Keep it legal Whatever your use, remember that you are responsible for ensuring that what you are doing is legal. Do not assume that just 
because we believe a book is in the public domain for users in the United States, that the work is also in the public domain for users in other 
countries. Whether a book is still in copyright varies from country to country, and we can't offer guidance on whether any specific use of 
any specific book is allowed. Please do not assume that a book's appearance in Google Book Search means it can be used in any manner 
anywhere in the world. Copyright infringement liabili^ can be quite severe. 

About Google Book Search 

Google's mission is to organize the world's information and to make it universally accessible and useful. Google Book Search helps readers 
discover the world's books while helping authors and publishers reach new audiences. You can search through the full text of this book on the web 

at |http: //books .google .com/I 



<m6il 












/ 







h 



/^. ^// 



PBINCIPLES 



OF 



MORALS AND LEGISLATION 



BENTHAM 



Kottbon \ 

MACMILLAN AND CO. 



PUBLISHERS TO THE UNIVERSITY OF 



C^ry^^ I 



AN INTRODUCTION 



/^:^'^^piy^^ , 



M^c....J&€^/J/f 



TO TKB 



PRINCIPLES 



OF 



MORALS AND LEGISLATION 



BT 



JEREMY BENTHAM, ESQ^ M.A. 

Bew^wr of Lincoln's Inn 
And late of Queen's College, Os^/brd 






AT THE CLARENDON PRESS 

MDOOOLXXVI 






^ A.' '^ L-)] 



r I. 



I «> 



)^7b 



NOTE. 

The First Edition of this work was printed in the year 1780; 
and first published in 1789. The present Edition is a careful 
reprint of * A New Edition, corrected by the Author/ which 
was published in 1823, 

319252 












* • • 

'■to * o 

• « * • « 

• • • • 



• • • • 
• « • 






1 • 



• • 



••• 



■ « 
• • • 



* 



m • 



« • 



' 



PREFACE. 

The following sheets were, as the note on the opposite page 
expresses, printed so long ago as the year 1780. The design, 
in pursuance of which they were written, was not so extensive 
as that announced by the present title. They had at that time 
no other destination than that of serving as an introduction to a 
plan of a penal code in terminisy designed to follow them, in the 
same volume. 

The body of the work had received its completion according 
to the then present extent of the author's views, when, in the in- 
vestigation of some flaws he had discovered, he found himself 
unexpectedly entangled in an unsuspected corner of the meta- 
physical maze. A suspension, at first not apprehended to be 
more than a temporary one, necessarily ensued : suspension 
brought on coolness, and coolness, aided by other concurrent 
causes, ripened into disgust. 

Imperfections pervading the whole mass had already been 
pointed out by the sincerity of severe and discerning friends ; 
and conscience had certified the justness of their censure. The 
inordinate length of some of the chapters, the apparent inutility 
of others, and the dry and metaphysical turn of the whole, sug- 
gested an apprehension, that, if published in its present form, 
the work would contend under great disadvantages for any chance, 
it might on other accounts possess, of being read, and conse- 
quently of being of use. 

But, though in this manner the idea of completing the present 
work slid insensibly aside, that was not by any means the case 
with the considerations which had led him to engage in it. 
Every opening, which promised to afibrd the lights he stood 
in need of, was still pursued : as occasion arose, the several 
departments connected with that in which he had at first en- 
gaged, were successively explored ; insomuch that, in one branch 
or other of the pursuit, his researches have nearly embraced the 
whole field of legislation. 



vi Preface, 

Several causes have conspired at present to bring to light, 
under this new title, a work which under its ■ original one had 
been imperceptibly, but as it had seemed irrevocably, doomed to 
oblivion. In the course of eight years, materials for various 
works, corresponding to the different branches of the subject of 
legislation, had been produced, and some nearly reduced to shape : 
and, in every one of those works, the principles exhibited in the 
present publication had been found so necessary, that, either to 
transcribe them piece-meal, or to exhibit them somewhere where 
they could be referred to in the lump, was found unavoidable. 
The former course would have occasioned repetitions too bulky 
to be employed without necessity in the execution of a plan un- 
avoidably so voluminous : the latter was therefore indisputably 
the preferable one. 

To publish the materials in the form in which they were 
already printed, or to work them up into a new one, was there- 
fore the only alternative : the latter had all along been his wish, 
and, had time and the requisite degree of alacrity been at com- 
mand, it would as certainly have been realised. Cogent con- 
siderations, however, concur, with the irksomeuess of the task, 
in placing the accomplishment of it at present at an unfathomable 
distance. 

Another consideration is, that the suppression of the present 
work, had it been ever so decidedly wished, is no longer altogether 
in his power. In the course of so long an interval, various inci- 
dents have introduced copies into various hands, from some of 
which they have been transferred, by deaths and other accidents, 
into others that are unknown to him. Detached, but considerable 
extracts, have even been published, without any dishonourable 
views, (for the name of the author was very honestly subjoined 
to them,) but without his privity, and in publications undertaken 
without his knowledge. 

It may perhaps be necessary to add, to complete his excuse for 
offering to the public a work pervaded by blemishes, which have 
not escaped even the author's partial eye, that the censure, so 
justly bestowed upon the form, did not extend itself to the matter. 

In sending it thus abroad into the world with all its imper- 
fections upon its head, he thinks it may be of assistance to the 
few readers he can expect, to receive a short intimation of the 



Prefaet. vii 

chief particulars, in respect of which it fails of corresponding 
with his maturer -views. It will thence be observed how in som^ 
respects it fails of quadrating with the design announced by its 
original title, as in others it does with that announced by the 
one it bears at present. 

An introduction to a work which takes for its subject the 
totality of any science^ ought to contain all such matters, and 
such matters oiUy, as belong in eommon to every particular 
branch of that science, or at least to more branches of it than 
one. Compared with its present title, the present work fails in 
both ways of being conformable to that rule. 

As an introduction to the principles of morals, in addition to 
the analysis it contains of the extensive ideas signified by the 
terms jpleaswre^ pai/n, motive, and disposition, it ought to have 
given a similar analysis of the not less extensive, though much 
less determinate^ ideas annexed to the terms emotion, passion, 
appetite, virtue, vice, and some others, including the names of 
the particular virtues and vices. But as the true, aaid, if he 
conceives right, the only true ground-work for the development 
of the latter set of terms, has been laid by the explanation of 
the former, the completion of such a dictionary^ so to style it, 
would, in comparison of the commencement^ be little more than 
a mechanical operation. 

Again, as an introduction to the principles of legislation in 
general, it ought rather to have included matters belonging ex- 
clusively to the cvvU branch, than matters more particularly ap- 
plicable to the penal: the latter being but a means of compass- 
ing the ends proposed by the former. In preference therefore, 
or at least in priority, to the several chapters which will be 
found relative to ptmishment, it ought to have exhibited a set of 
propositions which have since presented themselves to him as 
affording a standard for the operations performed by govern- 
ment, in the creation and distribution of proprietary and other 
civil rights. He means certain axioms of what may be termed 
memtal pathologT/, expressive of the counection betwixt the feel- 
ings of the parties eonoemed, and the several classes of incidents, 
which either call for, or are produced by, operations of the 
ittiiure above mentioned K 

^ For example. — It U tpone to lose than simply not to 0wio.-^J lots foUU 



viii Preface. 

The consideration of the division of offences, and every thing 
else that belongs to offences, ought, besides, to have preceded the 
consideration of punishment : for the idea of punishment pre- 
supposes the idea of offence: punishment, as such, not being 
inflicted but .in consideration of offence. 

Lastly, the analytical discussions relative to the classification 
of offences would, according to his present views, be transferred 
to a separate treatise, in which the system of legislation is con- 
sidered solely in respect of its form : in other words, in respect 
of its method and terminology. 

In these respects the performance fails of coming up to the 
author's own ideas of what should have been exhibited in a 
work, bearing the title he has now given it, viz. that of an 
IrUroduction to the Principles of Morals and Legislation. He 
knows however of no other that would be less unsuitable : nor 
in particular would so adequate an intimation of its actual 
contents have been given, by a title corresponding to the more 
limited design, with which it was written : viz. that of serving 
as an irdroductimk, to a penal code. 

Yet more. Dry and tedious as a great part of the discussions 
it contains must unavoidably be found by the bulk of readers, 
he knows not how to regret the having written them, nor even 
the having made them public. Under every head, the practical 
uses, to which the discussions contained under that head ap- 
peared applicable, are indicated : nor is there, he believes, a 
single proposition that he has not found occasion to build upon 
in the penning of some article or other of those provisions of 
detail, of which a body of law, authoritative or imauthoritative, 
must be composed. He will venture to specify particularly, in 
this view, the several chapters shortly characterised by the 
words SensihUity, ActionSy Intentionalityy Consciousness, Motives, 
DispositionSy Consequences. Even in the enormous chapter on 

the lighter by hdng divided. — The suffering, of a person hwrt in graiification 
of enmity, is grecUer than the grati^cation product by the same cause. — 
These, and a few others which he will have occasion to exhibit at the head 
of another publication, have the same claim to the appellation of axioms, 
as those given by mathematicians under that name ; since, referring to 
universal experience as their immediate basis, they are incapable of demon- 
stration, and require only to be developed and illustrated, in order to be 
recognised as incontestable. 



Preface^ ix 

the division of ofiPences, which, notwithstanding the forced com- 
pression the plan has undergone in several of its parts, in manner 
there mentioned, occupies no fewer than one hundred and four 
closely printed quarto pages ^, the ten concluding ones are 
employed in a statement of the practical advantages that may 
be reaped from the plan of classification which it exhibits. 
Those in whose sight the Defence of Usury has been fortunate 
enough to find favour, may reckon as one instance of those ad- 
vantages the discovery of the principles developed in that little 
treatise. In the preface to an anonymous tract published so 
long ago as in 1776 *, he had hinted at the utility of a natural 
classification of offences, in the character of a test for distin- 
guishing genuine from spurious ones. The case of usury is one 
among a number of instances of the truth of that observation. 
A note at the end of Sect. xxxv. Chap. xvi. of the present 
publication, may serve to show how the opinions, developed in 
that tract, owed their origin to the difficulty experienced in the 
attempt to find a place in his system for that imaginary offence. 
To some readers, as a means of helping them to support the 
fatigue of wading through an analysis of such enormous length, 
he would almost recommend the beginning with those ten con- 
cluding pages. 

One good at least may result from the present publication ; 
viz. that the more he has trespassed on the patience of the 
reader on this occasion, the less need he will have so to do on future 
ones : so that this may do to those, the office which is done, by 
books of pure mathematics, to books of mixed mathematics and 
natural philosophy. The narrower the circle of readers isj 
within which the present work may be condemned to confine 
itself, the less limited may be the number of those to whom the 
fruits of his succeeding labours may be found accessible. He 
may therefore in this respect find himself in the condition of 
those philosophers of antiquity, who are represented as having 
held two bodies of doctrine, a popular and an occult one : but, 
with this difference, that in his instance the occult and the popular 
will, he hopes, be found as consistent as in those they were 
contradictory; and that in his production whatever there is of , 

* The first edition was published in 1 789, in quarto. 
^ A Fragment on Government, &c., reprinted 1822. 



X Preface. 

occoltness hae been the pure result of sad necesaity, aud in no 
respect of choice. 

Having, in the course of this advertisement, had such frequent 
occasion to allude to idifferent arrangements, as having been sug-* 
gested by more extensive and maturer views, it may perhaps 
contribute to the satisfaction of the reader, to receive a i^ort 
intimation of their nature : the nether, as, -without such expla- 
nation, references, made here and there to unpublished works, 
might be productive of perplexity and mistake. The following 
then are the titles of the works by the publication of whi^ his 
present designs would be completed. They are exhibited in the 
order which seemed to him best 6tted for apprehension, and in 
which they would stand disposed, were the whole assemblage 
ready to come out at once : but the order, in which they will 
eventually appear, may probaUy enough be influenced in aome 
degree by collateral and tempoarary considerations. 

Part the ist. Principles of legislaticm in matters of ctvfZ, 
more distinctively termed privaite distributive, or for shortness, 
distributive, law. 

Part the 2nd. Principles of legislation in matters of penal 
Iww, 

Part the 3rd. Principles of legislation in matters of pro- 
cedwre: uniting in one view the iyriwijnial and c»t»Z branches, 
between which no line can be drawn, but a very indistinct one, 
and that continually liable to variation. 

Part the 4th. Principles of legislation m matters of reward. 
Part the 5th. Principles of legislation in matters of ptMie 
distributi/ae, more concisely as well as &jniliarly termed consti'' 
tutional, law. 

Part the 6th. Principles of legislation in matters of political 
tactics: or of the art of maintaining order in the proceedings of 
political assemblies, so as to direct l^em to the end of their in- 
stitution : viz. by a system of rules, which are to the constitu- 
tional branch, in some respects, what the law of procedure is 
to the civil and the penal. 

Part the fth. Principles of legislation in matters betwixt 
nation and nation, or, to use a new though not inea^iressive ap-^ 
pellation, in matters of international law. 

Part the 8th. Principles of legislation in matters (£ finance. 



Tffface. 



XL 



Part the 9th. Principles of legislation in matters. of poUticcd 
economy. 

Part the loth. Plan of a body of law, complete in all its 
branches, considered in respect of its form; in other words, in 
respect of its method and terminology; including a view of the 
origination and connexion of the ideas expressed by the short 
list of terms, the exposition of Which contains all that can be 
said with propriety to belong to the head of universal jv/ris- 
.prud€nce\ 

The use of the principles laid down under the aboye several 
heads is to prepare the way for the body of law itself exhibited 
m terminis; and which to be complete, with reference to any 
political state, must consequently be calculated for the meridian, 
and adapted to the circumstaiuces, of some one such state in 
particular. 

Had he an unlimited power of drawing upon tmbe, and every 
other condition necessary, it would he his wish to postpone the 
publication of each part to the completion of the whole. In 
particular, the use of the ten parts, which exhibit what appear 
to him the dictates of utility in every line, being no other than 
to furnish reasons for the several corresponding provisions con- 
tained in the body of law itself, the exact truth of the former 
can never be precisely ascertained, till the proviaons, to which 
they are destined to apply, are themselves ascertained, and that 
i/n termims. But as the infirmity of human nature renders all 
plans precarious in the execution, in proportion as they are ex- 
tensive in the design, and as he has already made considerable 
advances in sevei-al branches of the theory, without having made 
correspondent advances in the practical applications, he deems it 
more than probable, that the eventual order of publication will 
not correspond exactly with that which, had it been equally 
practicable, would have appeared most eligible. Of this irregu- 
larity the unavoidable result will be, a multitude of imperfec- 
tions, which, if the execution of the body of law in tenmnis had 
kept pace with the development of the principles, so that each 
part had been adjusted and corrected by the other, might have 
been avoided. His conduct however will be the less swayed by 

^ Such as obligation, right, power, possession, title, exemption, immunity, 
inmohise, privilege, nullity, validity, (md the like. 



xii Preface, 

this inconvenience, from his suspecting it to be of the number of 
those in which the personal vanity of the author is much more 
concerned, than the instruction of the public : since whatever 
amendments may be suggested in the detail of the principles, by 
the literal fixation of the provisions to which they are relative, 
may easily be made in a corrected edition of the former, succeeding 
upon the publication of the latter. 

In the course of the ensuing pages, references will be found, 
as already intimated, some to the plan of a penal code to which 
this work was meant as an introduction, some to other branches 
of the above-mentioned general plan, under titles somewhat 
different from those, by which they have been mentioned here. 
The giving this warning is all which it is in the author s power 
to do, to save the reader from the perplexity of looking out for 
what has not as yet any existence. The recollection of the 
change of plan will in like manner account for several similar 
incongruities not worth particularising. 

Allusion was made, at the outset of this advertisement, to 
some unspecified difficulties, as the causes of the original suspen- 
sion, and unfinished complexion, of the present work. Ashamed 
of his defeat, and unable to dissemble it, he knows not how to 
refuse himself the benefit of such an apology as a slight sketch 
of the nature of those difficulties may afford. 

The discovery of them was produced by the attempt to solve 
the questions that will be found at the conclusion of the volume : 
Wherein consisted the identity and completeness of a law 1 What 
the distinction^ and where the sepa/rationy hetuoeen a penal and a 
civil law ? What the distinction, and where the separation, he- 
tween the penal and other branches of the law 1 

To give a complete and correct answer to these questions, it 
is but too evident that the relations and dependencies of every 
part of the legislative system, with respect to every other, must 
have been comprehended and ascertained. But it is only upon 
a view of these parts themselves, that such an operation could 
have been performed. To the accuracy of such a survey one 
necessary condition would therefore be, the complete existence of 
the fabric to be surveyed. Of the performance of this condition 
no example is as yet to be met with any where. Common law, 
as it styles itself in England, jvdida/ry law, as it might more 



preface. xiii 

aptly be styled every where, that fictitious composition which 
has no known person for its author, no known assemblage of 
words for its substance, forms every* where the main body of the 
legal fabric : like that fancied ether, which, in default of sensible 
matter, fills up the measure of the universe. Shreds and scraps 
of real law, stuck on upon that imaginary ground, compose the 
furniture of every national code. What follows 1 — ^that he 
who, for the purpose just mentioned or for any other, wants an 
example of a complete body of law to refer to, must begin with 
making one. 

There is, or rather there ought to be, a logic of the wiUy as 
well as of the underataTiding : the operations of the former 
faculty, are neither less susceptible, nor less worthy, than those 
of the latter, of being delineated by rules. Of these two branches 
of that recondite art, Aristotle saw only the latter : succeeding 
logicians, treading in the steps of their great founder, have con- 
curred in seeing with no other eyes. Yet so far as a difference 
can be assigned between branches so intimately connected, what- 
ever difference there is, in point of importance, is in favour of 
the logic of the will. Since it is only by their capacity of directing 
the operations of this faculty, that the operations of the under- 
standing are of any consequence. 

. Of this logic of the will, the science of law, considered in re- 
spect of its form, is the most considerable branch, — the most 
important application. It is, to the art of legislation, what the 
science of anatomy is to the art of medicine : with this difference, 
that the subject of it is what the artist has to work wiihy instead 
of being what he has to operate ujpon. Nor is the body politic 
less in danger from a want of acquaintance with the one 
science, than the body natural from ignorance in the other. One 
example, amongst a thousand that might be adduced in proof 
of this assertion, may be seen in the note which terminates 
this volume. 

Such then were the difl&culties : such the preliminaries : — an 
unexampled work to achieve, and then a new science to create : 
a new branch to add to one of the most abstruse of sciences. 

Yet more : a body of proposed law, how complete soever, would 
be comparatively useless and uninstructive, unless explained and 
justified, and that in every tittle, by a continued accompaniment, 



xiv Preface, 

a perpetual commentaTy of reasovui^: wliich reasons, tliat tbe 
comparative value of sucb as point in opposite directions may 
be estimated, and the conjunct force, of such as point in the 
same direction, may be felt, must be marshalled, and put under 
subordination to such extensive and leading ones as are termed 
principles. There must be therefore, not one system only, but 
two parallel and connected systems, running on together, the one 
of legislative provisions, the other of political reasons, each afford- 
ing to the other correction and support. 

Are enterprises like these achievable ? He knows not. This 
only he knows, that they have been undertaken, proceeded in, 
and that some progress has been made in all of them. He will 
venture to add, if at all achievable, never at least by one, to 
whom the fatigue of attending to discussions, as arid as those 
which occupy the ensuing pages, would either appear useless, or 
feel intolerable. He will repeat it boldly (for it has been said 
before him), truths that form the basis of political and moral 
science are not to be discovered but by investigations as Severe 
as mathematical ones, and beydnd all comparison more intricate 
and extensive. The familiarity of the terms is a presumption, 
but it is a most fallacious one, of the facility of the matter. 
Truths in general have been called stubborn things : the truths 
just mentioned are so in their own way. They are not to be 
forced into detached and general propositions, unincumbered 
with explanations' and exceptions. They will not compress 
themselves into epigrams. They recoil from the tongue and 
the pen of the declaimer. They flourish not in the same soil 
with sentiment. They grow amoug thorns ; and are not to be 
plucked, like daisies, by infants as they run. Labour, the in- 
evitable lot of humanity, is in no track more inevitable than 
here. In vain would an Alexander bespeak a peculiar road for 
royal vanity, or a Ptoliemy, a smoother one, for royal indolence. 
There is no King^s Road, no StadthoJder^s Gate, to legislative, 
any more than to mathematic science. 

^ To tiie SiggregBibe of them a common denomination has since been 
allotted — the rationale. 



CONTENTS. 



CHAPTER I. 



OF THE FBGCNCIFLE OF UTILrTY. 



Mankind goyemed by pain and plecuure 
Principle of utility, what 
A principle, what 



PAGE 

I 

2 

2 



UiUity, what ....... 

Interest of the eommanUy, what .... 

An (Mtwn conformable to the principle of utility^ what . 

A measure of government conformable to the principle of tUUity 

what ....... 

Laws or didaUs of utUity, what .... 

A partisan of the principle of utility, who 

Ought, ought not, right and wrong, &c., how to be underatood . 

To prove the rectitude of this principle is at once unneceasary and im 

possible ....... 

It has seldom, however, as yet, been consistently pursued 

It can never be consistently combated .... 

Course to be taken for surmounting prejudices that may have been 

entertained against it ..... . 



2 
2 



3 

3 
3 
3 

4 
4 

4 



CHAPTER n. 



OF PBINGIPLES ADYEBSB TO THAT OF UTILITT. 

All other principles than that of utility must be wrong 
Ways in which a principle may be wrong 

Asceticism, origin of the word 

Principles of the Monks .... 



8 
8 
8 
8 



XVI 



Contents. 



PAGE 

Principle of asceticism, what . . . . . • 9 

A partisa/n of the principle of asceticism, who . . . '9 

This principle has had in some a philosophical, in others a religions 
> origin ...... . . 9 

It has been carried farther by the religious party than by the philo- 
sophical ....... . lo 

The philosophical branch of it has had most influence among per- 
sons of education, the religious among the yulgar . . . lo 
The principle of asceticism has never been steadily applied by either 
party to the business of government . . . . 1 1 

The principle of asceticism, in its origin, was but that of utility 

misapplied . . . . . . . c 12 

It can never be consistently pursued . . . . • ^3 

TTie priTiciple of sympathy wnd (mtipathy, wh&t . . .13 

This is rather the negation of all principle, than any thing positive . 16 
Sentiments of a partisan of the principle of antipatiiy . . .16 

The systems that have been formed concerning the standard of right 

anfi wrong, are all reducible to this principle . . '17 

Various phrases, that have served as the characteristic 

marks of so many pretended systems . . .1 

I, Moral Sense . . . . . .1' 

3. Cimmon Sense i; 

3. Understanding . . . . . . i' 

4. BtUe of Right . . . . . . i * 

5. Fitness of Things . . . . . . i^ 

6. Law of Nature . . . . . .18 

7. Law of Beason, Might Reason, Natural Justice, Natural 

Equity, Good Order . . . . .18 

8. Truth . . . . . . .18 

9. Doctrine of Election . . . . .18 
10. Repugnancy to Nature . . . . .18 

Mischief they produce . . . . .18 

Whether utility is actually the sole ground of all the appro- 
bation we ever bestow, is a different consideration 19 
This principle will frequently coincide with that of utility . .18 
This principle is most apt to err on the side of severity . . 20 
But errs, io some instances, on the side of lenity . . .21 
The theological principle, what — not a separate principle . .21 
The principle of theology how reducible to one or another of 

the other three principles . . . .22 

Antipathy, let the actions it dictates be ever so right, is never of itself 
a right ground of action . . . . . ,22 



ContenU, xvii 



CHAPTER III. 



OF THE POUE SANCTIONS OR SOURCES OP PAIN AND PLEASURE. 

PAGE 

Connexion of this chapter with the preceding . . . .24 

Four sanctions or sources of pleasure and pain . . • ^4 

1. The physical sanction . . . • ^5 

2. The political . . . . . • ^5 

3. The moral or popular . . • ^5 

4. The religious . . . . . . • ^5 

The pleasures and pains which belong to the religious sanction, maj 

regard either the present life or a future . . . • ^5 

Those which regard the present life, from which soever source they 

flow, differ only in the circumstances of their production . .26 

Example . . . . . . . .26 

Those which regard a future life are not specifically known . • ^7 

The physical sanction included in each of the other three . • - ^7 

Use of tiiis chapter . . . . . • ^7 



CHAPTER IV. 

VALUE OP A LOT OP PLEASURE OR PAIN HOW TO BE MEASURED. 

Use of this chapter . . . . . 29 

Circumstances to be taken into the account in estimating the value of 
a pleasure or pain considered with reference to a single person, 

and hy itself . . . . . . ' "^9 

— considered as connected with other pleasures or pains . 29 

— considered with reference to a number of persons . . '30 
Process for estimating the tendevusy of any act or event . . y> 
Use of the foregoing process . . . • • • 3^ 
The same process applicable to good and emi, profit and miscMrf, and 

all other modifications of pleasure and pain . . • 3^ 

Conformity of men's practice to this theory . . •3^ 

CHAPTER V. 

PLEASURES AND PAINS, THEIR KINDS. 

Pleasures and pains are either, i. Simple; or 2. Complex . • 33 

The simple pleasures enumerated . . . .• • 33 

b 



• • • 

XVlll 



Contents, 



cquiiitiofit or of 



The simple pains enumerated . . 

Analytical view, why none given 

1. Pleasures of «en«e enumerated . 

2. Pleasures of wealth, which are either of a 

possession « • 

5. Pleasures of sJcUl 

4. Pleasures of amity 

5. Pleasures of a good name 

6. Pleasures of power • 

7. Pleasures of piety 

8. Pleasures of benevolence or good-wUl 

9. Pleasures of malevolence or iU-roiU 

10. Pleasures of the memory 

11. Pleasures of the imaginaiion 

1 2. Pleasures of e3q>e<^ation . 

13. Pleasures depending on association 

14. Pleasures of relief 

1. Pains of privation 
These include, i. Pains of desire 

2. Taidb of disappointment 

3. Pains of regret 

2. Pains of the senses 

No positive pains correspond to the 
sense 

3. Pains of awkwardness . 

No positive pains correspond to the pleasure 

— nor to those of wealth 

Is this a distinct positive pain, or only a pain 

4. Pains of enmity . 

5. Pains of an ill-name 

The positive pains of an ill-name, and the pains of privation, 
opposed to the pleasures of a good name, run into one 
another . 

6. Pains of piety . 

No positive pains correspond to the pleasures of power 

The positive pains of piety, and the pains of privation, 

opposed to the pleasures of piety, run into one 

another . • 

7. Pains of benevolence 

8. Pains of malevolence 

9. Pains of the memory 

10. Pains of the imagination 

11. Pains of eo^ec^af ion 

12. Pains of association 
Pleasures and pains are either self-regarding or extra-regarding 



FAGB 

33 



pleasure of the sexual 

of novelty 
of privation ? 



34 
34 

34 
34 
35 
35 
35 
35 
36 

3^ 
36 
36 
36 
37 
37 
37 
38 
38 
38 
38 

38 
39 
39 
39 
39 
39 
39 



39 
40 

40 



40 
40 

40 

40 
40 

41 
41 
41 



Contents, 



XIX 



PAGE 

Pleasures and pains of amity and enmity distinguislied from 

l^ose of benevolence and malevolence . . • A^ 

In what way the law is concerned with the above pains and pleasures . 41 

Complex pleasures and pains omitted, why . . .41 

Specimen. — Pleasures of a country prospect . . •4' 



CHAPTER VL 



OF ClRCtlMSTANCBS INFLUENCING SENSIBILtTY. 



Pain and pleasure not uniformly proportioned to their causes 
Degree or quantum of sensibility, what 
Bias or quality of sensibility, what 
Exciting causes pleasurable and dolcyrific 
Circumstances infiuendng sensibility^ what 
Circumstances influencing sensibility enumerated 
Extent and intricacy of this subject 

1. Health .... 

2. Strength .... 

Measure of strength, the weight a man can lift 
Weakness, what 

3. Hardiness 
Difference between strength and hardiness 

4. Bodily imperfection 

5. Quantity and quality of knowledge 

6. Strength of intellectual powers 

7. Firmness of mind 

8. Steadiness 

9. Bent of inclinations 

10. Moral sensibilUy . 

11. Moral "biases 

12. Religious sensibility 

13. Rdigious biases . 

14. Sympathetic sensibility 

15. Sympathetic biases 

16. 1 7. Antipathetic sensibiUty and biases 

18. Insanity .... 

19. Habitual occupatUms 

20. Pecuniary circumstances . 

21. Connexions in the way o£ sympathy 

22. Connexions in the way of antipathy 

b2 



45 

43 

43 

44 

44 

44 

45 

45 
46 

46 
46 
46 

47 
47 

47 

48 

48 

49 
49 
49 

50 
50 

50 
50 
50 
51 
5^ 
51 
5« 
53 
55 



XX 



Contents. 



J3. Bjydical frame of body . . . * . 

JI4. Radical frame of mind . 

Idioaynerctsyf what ..... 

This distinct from the circumstance of frame of body . 

Whether the soul be material or immaterial makes 
difference ..... 

-* and from all others ...... 

Yet the result of them is not separately discernible 
Frame of body indicates, but not certainly, that of mind 
Secondary influencing circumstances 

25. Sex 

26. Age 

27. Bank 

28. Education 

29. Climate . 

30. Lineage . 

31. Oovemm^erU 

32. Beligious profession 
Use of the preceding observations 
How &r the circumstances in question can be taken into account 
To what exciting causes there is most occasion to apply tiiem . 
Analytical view of the circumstances influencing sensibility 

Andlytieal view of the constituent articles in a man's 
cuniary circumstances .... 



no 



PAGE 

56 
56 
56 

56 

57 

57 

57 

58 

58 

69 
60 

60 

61 

62 

63 

63 
64 

65 
66 
68 



pe- 



. 69 



CHAPTEE VIL 



OF HITMAN ACTIONS IN GENERAL. 



The dema/nd for punishment depends in part upon the tendency of 
the act ....... 

Tendency of an act determined by its con««9t^nce8 

Material consequences only are to be regarded 

These depend in part upon the intention 

The intention depends as well upon the understanding as the will 

In an action are to be considered, i. The act, 2. The circumstances 
3. The intentionality, 4. The coMciousness, 5. The motives 
6. The disposition ...... 

Acts positive uid n^ative ..... 

Acts of omission are still acts .... 

Kegative acts may be so relatively or absoltUely 



70 
70 
70 

71 
71 



71 

7« 
72 

72 



Contents, xxi 



PAGE 

Negative acts may be espressed positivdy ; and vice vena . .72 

Acts external and iidermi^ . . . 

Acts of discourse, what . , . . . 

External acts may be transitive or intransitive , 

Distinction between transitive acts and intransitive, recog 
nised by grammarians .... 

A transitive act, its commencement, fermvnation, and intermediate 
progress ....... 

An intransitive act, its commencement, and termination 

Acts transient and continued ..... 

Difference between a continued act and a repetition of acts 
Difference between a repetition of acts and a habit 
Acts are indivisible^ or divisible, and divisible, as well with regard to 
matter as to motion ..... 

Caution respecting the ambiguity of language . 
Circumstances are to be considered .... 

Circumstances, what ...... 

Circumstance, archetypation of the word 
Circumstances, material and immaterial 
A circumstance may be related to an event in point of causality, in 
four ways, viz. i. Production. 2. Derivation, 3. CollcUeral eon- 
nexion. 4. Conjunct irifiuence . . . . • 77 

Example. Assassination of Buckingham . . . -7^ 

It it not every event that has circumstances related to it in all those 

ways .... . - - • 79 

Use of this chapter . . . . . .80 



CHAPTER VIII. 



OP INTENTIONALITY. 



73 
73 
73 

73 

74 
74 
74 
74 
75 

75 
76 

76 

76 

77 
77 



Becapitulation . . . . . . . .83 

The intention may regard, I. The act : or, 2. The consequences . 82 

Ambiguity of the words voluntary and involuntary . .82 

It may regard the act without any of the consequences . . 83 

— or the consequences without regarding the act in all its stages . 83 

— but not without regarding the ^r»^ stage . . . • ^3 

An act unintentional in its first stage, may be so with 
respect to i. Quantity of matter moved: 2. Direction: 
3. Velocity . . . . . '83 

A consequence, when intentional, may be directly so, or dbli^dy . 84 



xxu 



Contents, 



PAGE 

When directly, ultimately so, or medicUely . . > .84 

When directly intentional, it may be exclusively bo, or inexduswdy . 85 
When inexclusiyely, it may be conjunotivdy, disjunctively, or indis- 

eriminately so . . . . . . .85 

When disjunctively, it may be with or wUhout preference . . 85 

Difference between an incident's being unintentional, and 
di^unetivdy intentioTial, when the election is in favour 
of the other . . . . . .85 

Example . . . . . . . .85 

Intentionality of the act with respect to its different stages, how far 

material • . . . . . . • ^7 

Goodness and badness of intention dismissed . . . • ^7 



CHAPTER IX. 



OP CONSCIOUSNESS. 



Connexion of this chapter with the foregoing . 

AcU (idoised Biid unadvised ; coYisciousness, whsLt . 

XJnadvisedness may regard either existenix, or materiality 

The circumstance may have been present, past, or future 

An unadvised act may be heedless, or not heedless 

A misadvised act, what, — a missv/pposal 

The supposed circumstance might have been material in the way 

eiiAier oi prevention or oi compensation 
It may have been supposed present, past, or future 
Example, continued from the last chapter 
In what case consciousness extends the intentionality from the act to 

the consequences ...... 

Example continued ...... 

A misadvised act may be, rash or not rash 

The intention may be good or bad in itself, independently of the 

motive as well as the eventual consequences 
It is better, when the intention is meant to be spoken of as being good 

or bad, not to say, the motive .... 

Example • ...... 

Intention, in what cases it may be innocent 

Intentionality and consciousness, how spoken of in the Roman law 

Use of this and the preceding chapter 



89 
89 
89 
89 
89 
90 

90 

90 
90 

91 
92 

92 
92 

93 
93 
94 
94 
95 



QytitenU. 



XJIW 



CHAPTEE X. 



OF MOTIVES. 



§ I. Different senses of the word Motive. 

Motives, why considered . . , 

Purely tpecalciive motives have nothing to do here 

Motives to the will .... 

Figurative cmd unfigurative senses of the word 

Motives interior and exterior . 

Motive in prospect — motive in esse 

Motives immediate and remote . 

Motives to the v/nderstanding how they may influence the iciU 



PAGB 

97 

97 
98 

98 

99 

99 
100 

lOI 



§ 2. No Motives either constantly good or constantly bad. 

Nothing can act of itself as a motive, but the idea of pleasure or pain loi 
No sort of motive is in itself a &a(2 one . . .102 

Inaccuracy of expressions in which good or had are applied to motives 102 
Any sort of motive may give birth to any sort of (wrf . . . I03 

Difficulties which stand in the way of an analysis of this sort . .103 



§ 3. Catalogue of Motives corresponding to that of Pleasures 

and Pains, 



Physical desire corresponding to pleasures of sense in general . 
The motive corresponding to the plea^svres of the palate 
Sexual desire corresponding to the pleasures of the sexual sense 
Curiosity, &c. corresponding to the pleasures of curiosity 
None to pleasures of sense ..... 
Pecuniary interest to the pleoMives of wealth 
None to the pleasures of skill ..... 
To the pleasures of amity, the desire of ingratiating one^s self 
To the plea,8ures of a good name, the love of reputation 
To the pleasures oi power, the love of power 
The motive belonging to the religious sanation 
Oood-wUl, &o. to the pleasures of sympathy 
lUrwiUt &c. to the pleasures of antipathy 
8df-preservation, to the several kinds of pains 
To the pains of exertion, the love of ease 
Motives can only be had with reference to the most frequent com 
plexion of their effects ...... 



105 

105 
106 

107 

107 

107 

107 

107 

108 

no 

III 

112 

114 

"5 
117 

118 






XXIV 



Contents. 



How it is that motives, such as lust, avarice, &c., are constantly had 
Under the above restrictions, motives may be distinguished into good, 

had, and indifferent or neiUral .... 
Inconveniences of this distribution . 

It is only in individual instances that motives can be good or bad 
Motives distinguished into social, dissocial, and self-regarding 
— social, into pu/rdy-social, and semi-social 



PAGS 

ii8 

no 
"9 

I30 
121 



§ 4. Order of pre-eminence among Motives. 

The dictates of good-will are the surest of coinciding with those of 
utUitp ....... 

Laws and dictates conceived as issuing from motives 

Yet do not in all cases ..... 

Next to them come those of the love of reputation 

Next those of the desire of amity 
►DiflBculty of placing those of religion . 

Tendency, they have to improve 

Affcerwards come the self-regarding motives : and, lastly, that of 
displeasure ....... 



121 
121 
121 
122 
124 
124 
126 

127 



§ 5. Conflict among Motives, 

Motives impelling and restraimng, what 
What are the motives most frequently at variance 
Example to illustrate a struggle among contending motives 
Practical use of the above disquisitions relative to motives 



127 
128 
128 
129 



CHAPTER XI. 



OF HUMAN DISPOSITIONS IN GENERAL. 

Disposition, what ' . . . . . . .131 

How far it belongs to the present subject . . . .131 

A mMC^ievou8 disposition ; a men^onoKS disposition ; what . • 132 

What a man's disposition is, can only be matter of presumption . 132 

It depends upon what the act ajTpears to be to him . . '132 

Which position is grounded on two facts: i. The correspondence 

between intentions And consequences . . . • ^33 

2. Between the intentions of the same person at different times . 1 33 

A disposition, from which proceeds a habit of doing mischief, 

cannot be a good one . . . . • '33 



Contents. 



XXV 



PAGE 

The disposition is to be inferred, i. From the apparent tendency of the 

act: 2. From the nature of the tno^t're . '133 

Case I. Tendency, ^00(2 — mo^Ye, aelf -regarding . .134 

Case 2. Tendency, bad — moivr&t tdf^regardrng . . .134 

Case 3. Tendency, pro(M2— motive, ^ooc2-i0t72 . . . . i34 

Case 4. Tendency, had — motive, good-wiU . . .135 

This case not an impossible one . . .135 

Example I. . . . , . . .135 

ExampIe.II. ........ 135 

Example III. ........ 136 

Case 5. Tendency, ^00(2 — moUve, love of reputcition . . .13^ 

The bulk of mankind apt to depreciate this motive . .136 

Case 6. Tendency, icki — motive, Aonottr . * • ^37 

Example I. ........ i37 

Example II. ....... . 138 

Case 7. Tendency, ^oo<i — emotive, pte^^ . . .138 

Case 8. Tendency, fead — ^motive, rdigion . . * .138- 

The disposition may be bad in this case . . .139 

Case 9. Tendency, good — ^motive, malevolence . • . .140 

Example ........ 140 

Case 10. Tendency, had — emotive, malevolence .... 141 

Example ........ 141 

Problem — to measure the depravity in a man's disposition . . 141 

A man's disposition is constituted by the 8um of his intentions . 142 

— which owe their birth to motives . . . . .142 

A seducing or corrupting motive, what — a tutdaay or preseroatory 

motive . . . . . . . . 142 

Tutelary motives are either ff^anc2tn^ or occoflionoZ . . .141 

Standing tutelaiy motives are, i. Good-wiU . . . > ^43 

2. ThiQ love oi rep^ation '143 

3. ThQ desire of am.ity . .144 

4. The motive of reZi^ton . • '44 
Occasional tutelary motives may be any whatsoever . . . '45 
Motives that are particularly apt to act in this character are, I. Lo^e 

of ease, 2. Sdf -preservation . . . . . '45 

Bangers to which sdf-preservaiion is most apt in this case to have re- 
spect, are, i. Dangers purely physical. 2. Dangers depending 
on detection ....... 

Danger depending on detection may result from, i. Opposition on 
the spot : 2. Subsequent punishment .... 

The force of the two standing tutelary motives of love of reputation, 
and desire of amity, depends upon detection 

Strength of a temptation, what is meant by it . 

Indications afforded by this and other circumstances respecting the 
depravity of an offender's disposition .... 



146 
146 

146 

147 

148 



XXVI 



Contents. 



Rules for measuring the depravity of diBpositioii indicated by an 

offence •....*.• 

Use of this chapter ....... 



PAGE 

149 
151 



CHAPTER XII. 



OP THE CONSEQUENCES OF A MISCHIEVOUS ACT. 

§ I. Shapes in which the mischief of an Act may show itself. 



Becapitulation ....... 

Mischief of an act, the aggregate of its mischievoas consequences 

The mischief of an act, primary or secondary . 

Primary — original or derivative .... 

The secondary — i. Ala/rm: or, 2. Danger 

Example ....... 

The danger tohence it arises — ^a past offence affords no direct motive 

to a futv/re ...... 

But it auggesia feasibility y and weakens the force of restraining motives 

viz. I. Those issuing from the political sanction . 
2. Those issuing from the moral 
It is said to operate by the influence of exam/pie 
The alarm and the danger, though connected, are distinguishdble 
Both may have respect to the same person, or to others 
The primary consequences of an act may be mischievous^ and the 

seconda/ry^ beneficial ..... 

Analysis of the different shapes in which the mischief of an act may 

show itself ...... 

— applied to the preceding cases .... 

— to examples of other cases where the mischief is less conspicuous 
Example I. An act of self -intoxication 

Example II. Non-payment of a tax .... 
No alarm, when no assignable person is the object 



153 
153 
153 

155 
155 
155 
156 
156 

157 
157 

157 

158 

159 

159 

159 
160 

162 



§ 2. How Intentionality, 8fC, may injhience the mischief of 

an Act, 



Secondary mischief influenced by the staJbe of the agent's mind 
Case I. Involimtariness . . . . . 

Case 2. UninterUionality with heedlessness 



163 
164 
164 



ContenU. 



xxvu 



Case 3, Misfupposal of a complete juttifieaiion, without rashness 

Case 4. Missupposal of a partial justification, without rashness 

Case 5. Missupposal, with rashness .... 

Case 6. Consequences completely interUionalt and free from mis- 
supposal ....... 

The nature of a motive takes not away the mischief of the secondaiy 
consequences ...... 

Nor the beneficiakiess ...... 

But it may aggravate the mischievousness, where they are mis- 
chievous ....... 

Bat not the 7/u>«f in the case of the worst motives 

It does the more, the more considerable the tendency of the motive 
to produce such acts ..... 

— which is as its strength and constancy 
Greneral (fficacy of a species of motive, how measured . 
A mischievous act is more so, when issuing from a self-regarding 

than when from a dissocial motive 

— so even when issuing from the motive of religion . 
How the secondary mischief is influenced by disposition 
Connexion of this with the succeeding chapt^ 



PAOS 

165 
165 
165 

165 

165 
166 

166 
166 

167 
167 
167 

167 
168 
168 
168 



CHAPTER XIII. 



CASES UNMEET FOB PUNISHMENT. 



§ I. General view of cases tmmeet/or Punishment. 

The end of law is, to augment happiness 

But punishment is an evil ..... 

What concerns the end, and several other topics, relative to 
punishment, dismissed to another work 

Concise view of fche ends of punishment 
Therefore ought not to be admitted 



. 170 


. 170 


. 170 


. 170 













1. Where groundless 

2. Ineffica<nous 

3. Unprofiiable 

4. Orneedless 



§ 2. Cases in which Punishment is groundless. 
I . Where there has never been any mischief : as in the case of consent 171 



xxviii Contents, 

V 

PAGE 

2. Where the mischief was outtffeighed: as in precaution against 

ccdamity, eaid the exerciae oi powers . . . .172 

3- — or will, for a certainty, be cured by compensation . .172 

Hence the fiivours shown to the offences of responsible 
offenders : such as simple mercantile fra/uds . .172 

§ 3. Cases in which Punishment must he inefficacious. 



1. Where the penal provision comes too late: as in i. An ex-post-facto 

law. 2. An ultra-legal sentence .... 

2. Or is not made knovm : as in a law not sufficiently promulgated 

3. Where the mil cannot be deterred firom any act, as in, [a] Infancy 

[b] Insanity ...... 

[c] Intoxication ...... 

In in&ncy and intoxication the case can hardly be proved 
to come under the rule .... 

The reason for not punishing in these three cases is com 
monly put upon a wrong footing . 

4. Or not from the individual act in question, as in, . 

[a] Unintentionality ...... 

[b] Unconsciousness ...... 

[c] Missupposal . . . 

5. Or is acted on by an opposite superior force : as by, 

[a] Physical danger ..... 

[b] Threatened mischief ..... 

Why the influence of the moral and religious sanctions is 
not mentioned in the same view . 

6. — or the bodily organs cannot follow its determination : as under 

physical compulsion or restraint .... 

§ 4. Ca^es where Punishment is unprofitable, 

1 . Where, in the sort of case in question, the punishment would pro 

duce more evil than the offence would . . 

Evil producible by a punishment — its four branches — viz. [a] Be- 
stramt ..>••.. 

[b] ApprehenMon ...... 

[c] Sufferance ...... 

[d] Derivative evils ..... 
The evil of the offence, being different according to the nature of the 

offence, cannot be represented here 

2. Or in the individual case in question : by reason of 

[a] The multitude of delinquents .... 

[b] The value of a delinquent's service 



172 

173 
17.? 
173 
173 

173 

174 
174 
174 
174 
»74 
174 
175 
175 

175 
175 



175 

175 
176 

176 

176 

176 
176 
176 

177 



Contents. 



XXIX 



[c] The displeasure of the people .... 

[d] The displeasure offareign powers 

§ 5. Cases where Pwnishment is needless. 



PAGE 

177 
177 



I. Where the mischief is to be prevented at a cheaper rate : as by 

instruction ....... 177 



CHAPTER XIV. 



OP THE PROPOBTION BETWEEN PUNISHMENTS AND OFFENCES. 



Recapitulation 

Four objects of punishment 

ist Object — to prevent aU offences , 
2nd Object — to prevent the worst , 
3rd Object — to keep down the misehirf 
4th Object — ^to act at the least expense 
Rules of proportion between punishments and offences 

The same rules applicable to motives in general 
Rule I. — Outweigh the profit of the offence . 

Profit may be of any other kind, as well as pecuniary 

Impropriety of the notion that the punishment ought not to 

increase with the temptation 

The propriety of taking the strength of the temptation for a ground of 

abatement, no objection to this rule 
Rule 2. — ^Venture more against a great offence than a smaU one 

Example. — Incendiarism and coining 
Rule 3. — Cause the least of two offences to be preferred 
Rule 4. — Punish for each particle of the mischief 

Example. — In blows given, and money stolen 
Rule 5. — ^Punish in no degree without special reason . 
Rule 6. — ^Attend to circumstances influencing sensibility 
Comparative view of the above rules .... 
Into the account of the value of a punishment, must be taken its 

deficiency in point of certainty and proximity 
Also, into the account of the mischief and profit of the offence^ the 

mischief and profit of other offences of the same habit 
Rule 7* — Want of certainty must be made up in magnitude . 
Rule 8. — So ajso want of proximity .... 
Rule 9. — ^For acts indicative of a habit, punish as for the habit 
The remaining rules are of less importance 



78 
78 
78 
78 
78 
78 
78 
79 
79 
79 

79 

80 
81 
81 
81 
81 
81 
82 
82 
82 

82 

83 
84 

84 

84 
84 



Contents. 



Bule lo. — For the sake of quality, increase in quantity 
Bale II. — ^Particolorly for a moral lesson 

A punishment applied by way of moral lesson, what 

Example. — ^In simple corporal injuries 

Example. — In military laws 

Bule 12. — ^Attend to circmnstances which may render punishment 

unprofitable ....... 

Bule 13. — ^For simplicity s sake, small disproportions may be neglected 

Proportionality carried very fax in the present work — ^why 
Auxiliary force of the physical, moral, and religious sanctions, not 
here allowed for — why ...... 

Becapitulation . . . . . . ^ . 

The nicety here observed vindicated from the charge of inutility 



PAGE 

184 
184 

184 
185 

185 

185 

185 
185 

186 
186 
187 



CHAPTER XV. 



OF THE PBOPEBTIES TO BE GIVEN TO A LOT OF PtTNISHMENT. 



Properties are to be governed by proportion . 

Property i. Variability ..... 

Property 2. Equability ..... 

Punishments which are apt to be deficient in this respect 

Property 3. Commensurahility to other punishments ^ 

How two lots of punishment may be rendered perfectly commen 

surable ..... ^ . 

Property 4. Characteristicalness .... 

The mode of punishment the most eminently characteristic, is that of 

retcdiation ...... 

Property 5. — ExemplarUy ..... 

The most effectual way of rendering a punishment exempk^ry is by 

means of analogy ..... 

Property 6. Frugality ..... 

Frugality belongs in perfection to pecuniary punishment 
Exemplarity and frugality in what they differ and agree 
Other properties t)f inferior importance 
Property 7. Subserviency to r^ormaiion . . ■. 

— applied to offences originating in iU-wiU 

— to offences originating in indolence joined to pecuniary interest 
Property 8. SJffioacy with respect to disablement 

— is most conspicuous in capital punishment 
Other punishments in which it is to be found 



189 
189 
190 
191 
191 

191 
19a 

192 
»93 

194 

194 
194 

195 

195 

195 

195 
196 

196 

196 

197 



Contents. xxxi 

PAGE 

Property 9. Subserviency to eompemation . . -197 

Property 10. Popularity . . . .198 

Ghaxacteristtcalness renders a punishment, i. memorable: 
2. exemplary : %. popular ..... 198 
Mischief 8 resulting from the unpopvJarUy of a punishment — discontent 

among the people, and ioec^ness in the law . . . 19S 

This property supposes a pr^udice which the legidature ought to cure 199 
Property 11. ItemisaibUity . . . . . • *99 

To obtain all these properties, punishments must be mixed . 201 

The foregoing properties recapitulated .... aoi 

Connexion of this with the ensuing chapter .... 202 



CHAPTER XVI. 

DIVISION OF OFFEKCBS. 

§ I. Classes of Offences. 

Method pursued in the following division . . . 204 
Distinction between wliat are offences and what ought tohe . . 204 
No act ought to he an offence but what is detrimental to the com- 
munity .... .... 205 

To be so, it must be detrimental to some one or more of its members . 305 

These may be assignable or not . . . . . 205 

Persons cusignable, how ..... 205 

If assignable, the offender himself, or others .... 205 

Class I . Private offences ...... 205 

Class 2. Semi-public ofiEenxses ...... 206 

Limits between private, semi-public, and public offences, 

are, strictly speaking, undistinguishable. . . 206 

Class 3. Self-regarding offences ..... 206 

Class 4. Public offsnces . . . . . . 207 

Class 5. MuUiform offences, viz. I. Offences by falsehood, 2. Offences 

against trust ....... 207 

The imperfections of language an obstacle to arrangement . 207 

Irregularity of this class ..... 208 

— which could not be avoided on any other plan . » . 208 

§ 2. Divisions and sub-diidsions. 

Divisions of Class i. i. Offences against person. 2 — Property. 
3 — Repudiation. 4 — Condition. 5 — Person and property. 6 — 
Person and reputation ...... 208 



xxxu 



Contents. 



PAGE 

In what manner pleasure and pain depend upon the relation 

a man bears to exterior objects .... 209 

Divisions of C/oM 2. i. Offences through eolamt^y . . .211 

Sub-divisions of offences through calamity, dismissed . . .212 

2. Offences of mere ddinquenqf, how they correspond with the divi- 
sions of private offences . . . . . .212 

Divisions of Class 3 coincide with those of Glass i . . .213 

Divisions of Class 4 . . . . . . . 213 

^a;Aau«<ive method departed from . . -213 

Cormexion of the nine first divisions one with another .214 

Connexion of offences against religion with the foregoing ones . 219 

Connexion of offences against the national, interest in general with the 

rest • • . . • • .221 

Sub-divisions of CUus 5 enumerated ..... 221 

Divisions of offences by /aZ«eAo(K2 . . . . .221 

Offences by falsehood, in what they agree with one another . .221 

— in what they differ ....... 222 

Svb-divisions of offences by fcdsehood are determined by the divisions 

of the preceding classes ...... 222 

Offences of this class, in some instances, change their names; in 

others, not ....... 223 

A trustf what ........ 223 

Powet* and right, why no complete definition is here given 

of them . . . . . . 2 24 

Offences against trust, condition, and property, why ranked under 

separate divisions . . . . . . .226 

Offences against trust — their connexion with each other . • ^34 

Prodigality in trustees dismissed to Class 3 . . . .241 

The ^uh-divisions of offences against trust are also detennined by the 

divisions of the preceding classes . . . .241 

Cowiexion between offences hy falsehood and offences against trust . 242 



§ 3. Genera of class i. 

Analysis into genera pursued no further than Class i . . .242 

Offences against an individual may be simple in their effects or com- 
plex ........ 243 

Offences against person — their genera . • ^43 

Offences against reputation ...... 246 

Offences against property ...... 247 

Payment, what ...... 

Offences against j^er^on ane^reputo^ton . . • ^53 

Offences against person aaid property . . . . •^54 

Offences against condition — Conditions domestic or civil . • 255 



Contents. 



xxxiii 



PA6B 

Domestic conditions grounded on natural relationships . -255 

Bdations — two result from every two objects . -256 

Domestic relations which are purely of legal institution . •258 

Offences touching the condition of a master . . . .261 

Various modes of servitude ...... 263 

Offences touching the condition of a servant .... 264 

Ouardianship, what — Necessity of the institution . . . 266 

Duraiion to be given to it . . . . 269 

Potoers that may, and diUies that ought to be, annexed to it . 269 

Offences touching the condition of a guardian . . .270 

Offences touching the condition of a ward . . . .273 

Offences touching the condition of a |XEren< . . . '274 

Offences touching the /^'aZ con<2i<ion . . . .276 

Condition of a hut^and, — PowerSt duties, and rights, that may be an- 
nexed to it ....*.• 278 

Ojfenc«8 touching the condition of a husband . . . .280 

Offences touching the condition of a wife • . • .282 

Civil conditions . . . . .287 

§ 4. AdvarUages of the present method. 

General idea of the method here pursued .... 296 

Its advantages ....... 299 

— I. It is convenient for the apprehension and the memory 299 

— 2. It gives room for general propositions .... 300 

— 3. It points out the reason of the law .... 301 

— 4. It is alike applicable to the laws of aZZ no^ioTM . . 3^^ 

§ 5. Characters of thefioe classes. 

Characters of the classes, how deducible from the above method . 30 a 

Characters of dass 1 . . . . . 302 

Characters of class 2 . . . 304 

Characters of class 3 . . . . 305 

Characters of dass 4 . . . . . . 306 

Characters of dass 5 . . . . . 307 



CHAPTER XVn. 



aF THE LIMITS OF THE PENAL BRANCH OF JURISPRUDENCE. 

§ I. Limits between private Ethics and the art 0/ Legislation, 



Use of this chapter 
Ethics in general, what 



309 
310 



XXXIV 



ContenU. 



PA6B 

Private ethics . . . . . . .310 

The art oi government : that is, of legislation and administration . 310 
Interests of the inferior animals improperly neglected in 
legislation . . . . . .310 

Art of edtieation . . . . • 311 

Ethics exhibit the rules of, i. Prudence. 2. Probity 4 3. Beneficence 312 
Probity and beneficence how they connect with prudence . - 312 

Every act which is a proper object of ethics is not of legislation . 31a 

The limits between the provinces of privcUe ethics and legislcUion, 

marked out by the cases unmeet for punishment . .314 

1 . Neither ought to apply where punishment is (^rroundZesf . .314 

2. How £Etr private ethics can apply in the cases where punishment 

would he inefficacious . . . . . - ^^5 

How far, where it would be unprofitable . . . -315 

Which it may be, I. Although confined to the p?«7<y . .316 

2. By enveloping the innace?^^ . . > 318 

Legislation how far necessary for the enfurcement of the dictates of 

prudence ........ 319 

— Apt to go too far in this respect ..... 320 

— Particularly in matters of reZi^on . . . . .320 

— How far necessary for the enforcement of the dictates of probity , 32 1 

— of the dictates of 6enc/?ce«cc . . . . .322 
Difference between private ethics and the art of legislation recapitU' 

laied ........ 323 

§ 2. Jurisprudence^ its branches. 

Jurisprudence, expository — censorial . . . . .323 

Expository jurisprudence, autkoriiafive — unauthoritative . . 324 

Sources of the dii^Dctions yet remaining . . . •334 

Juxiapmdence, local — universal . . . . -325 

7— vntemal and international . . . . . . 326 

Internal jurisprudence, national and provincial^ local or parUovlar . 327 
Jurisprudence, ancient — living . . . . •328 

Jurisprudence, statviory — customary . . . . '339 

Jurisprudence, dvil — penal — criminal .... 329 

Question, concerning the distinction between the civil branch and the 

penal, stated ....... 329 

I. Occasion and purpose of this concluding note •330 

II. By a law here is not meant a statute . . . 330 

III. Every law is either a command, or a revocation of one . 330 

IV. A declaratory law is not, properly speaking, a law . 330 
V. Every coercive law creates an offence . . '330 

VI. A law creating an offence, and one appointing punishment, 

are distinct laws ...... 33^ 



Contents. ixxv 

PAGE 

Til. A diseoercive law can have no punitory one appertaining to 

it but through the intervention of a coercive one . 331 

VIII. But a punitory law involves the simply imperative one it 

belongs to ...... 331 

IX. The simply imperative one might therefore be spared, but 

for its expository matter . . . . • 33^ 

X. iVio^re of such expository matter . . • 33^ 

XI. The vastness of its comparative bulk is not peculiar to 

legislative commands . . . . • 33^ 

XII. The same mass of expository matter may serve in common 

for many laws ...... 33a 

XIII. The imperative character essential to law, is apt to be con- 

cealed in and by expository matter . . '333 

XIV. The concealment is favoured by the multitude of indirect 

forms in which imperative matter is capable of being 

couched ....... 332 

XV. Number and nature of the laws in a code, how determined 333 

XVI. General idea of the limits between a civU and a penal code 333 

XVII. Contents of a civil code ..... 333 

XVIII. Contents of a penal code ..... 333 

XIX. In the Code Frederic the imperative character is almost 

lost in the expository matter . . -333 

XX. So in the Roman law ..... 334 

XXI. In the barbarian codes it stands conspicuous . . 334 

XXII. Constitutional code, its connexion with the two others . 334 
"XXIIT. Thus the matter of one law may be divided among all 

three codm . . . . 334 

XXIV. Expository matter, » great quantity of it exists everywhere, 

in no other form than tiiftt of common or judiciary law . 334 
XXV. Hence the deplorable state of the science of legislation, 

considered in respect of its /orm . . . '335 

XXVI. Occasions affording an exemplification of the difficulty as 
well as importance of this branch of science ; — attempts 

to limit the powers of supreme representcUive legislatures 335 

XXVII. Example : American declarations of rights . . . 335 



• • • 












AN -•' .-* 

INTRODUCTIOSf" 

TO THB 

PRINCIPLES OF MORALS AND LEGl'SLillON. 



Iff • «# 









« 1 -/• 



CHAPTER I, 

OP THE PBINCIPLE OP UTILITY. 

I. Natttre has placed mankind under the governance of two Mankind 
sovereign masters, pain and pleasure. It is for them alone to Sv^p^ and 
point out what we ought to do, as well as to determine what we ^ ®"'*^' 
shall do. On the one hand the standard of right and wrong, on 
the other the chain of causes and effects, are fastened to their 
throne. They govern us in all we do, in all we say, in all we 
think : every effort we can make to throw off our subjection, will 
serve but to demonstrate and confirm it. In words a man may 
pretend to abjure their empire : but in reality he will remain 
subject to it all the while. The principle of utility^ recognises 
this subjection, and assumes it for the foundation of that system, 

* Note by the Author, July 1822. 

To this denomination lias of late been added, or substituted, the greatest 
happine88 or greatest felicity principle : this for shortness, instead of saying 
at length that principle which states the greatest happiness of all those 
whose interest is in question, as being the right and proper, and only 
right and proper and universally desirable, end of human action : of human 
action in every situation, and in particular in that of a functionary or set 
of functionaries exercising the powers of Grovernnient. The word utility 
does not so clearly point to the ideas of pleoMire and pain as the words 
happiness and felicity do : nor does it lead us to the consideration of the 
numbeTf of the interests affected ; to the number^ as being the circumstance, 
which contributes, in the largest proportion, to the formation of the standard 
here in question ; the standard of right and torongj by which alone the 
propriety of human conduct, in every situation, can with propriety be tried. 
This want' of a sufficiently manifest connexion between the ideas of happir 
ness and pleasure on the one hand, and the idea of utility on the other, I 
have every now and then found operating, and with but too much efficiency, 
as a bar to the acceptance, that might otherwise have been given, to this 
principle. 

B 



a Of the Principle .&jr Utility. [chap. 

w • '. • 

the object of which is to rear' the fabric of felicity by the htinds 
of reason and of law.,.*Syfitems which attempt to question it, 
deal in sounds inste9d'pf;sense, in caprice instead of reason, in 
darkness instead;^ light. 

But enough of metaphor and declamation : it is not by such 
means thset m(^al science is to be improved. 

Il4\5iie*.principle of utility is the foundation of the present 
w/)rk':. k will be proper therefore at the outset to give an ex- 

•*|^li)oit'and determinate account of what is meant by it. By the 

• *• • • • 

Prindtdejbf principle ^ of utility is meant that principle which approves or 

what.' ' disapproves of every action whatsoever, according to the ten- 
dency which it appears to have to augment or diminish the 
happiness of the party whose interest is in question : or, what is 
the same thing in other words, to promote or to oppose that 
happiness. I say of every action whatsoever ; and therefore not 
only of every action of a private individual, but of every measure 
of government. 

utility. III. By utility is meant that property in any object, whereby 

it tends to produce benefit, advantage, pleasure, good, or happi- 
ness, (all this in the present case comes to the same thing) or 
(what comes again to the same thing) to prevent the happening 
of mischief, pain, evil, or unhappiness to the party whose interest 
is considered : if that party be the community in general, then 
the happiness of the community : if a particular individual, then 
the happiness of that individual. 

Interest of IV. The interest of the community is one of the most general 

the oominu* , , 

nity, what, expressions that can occur in the phraseology of morals : no won- 
der that the meaning of it is often lost. When it has a meaning, 

A principle, ^ The word principle is derived from the Latin principium : which seems 

* *' to be compomided of the two words primtis, first, or chief, and cipium, a 

termination which seems to be derived from capio, to take, as in mancipium, 
municipiuni; to which are analogous aucepSfforcepSt and others. It is a 
term of very vague and very extensive signification : it is applied to any 
thing which is conceived to serve as a foundation or beginning to any series 
of operations : in some cases, of physical operations ; but of mental opera- 
tions in the present case. 

The principle here in question may be taken for an act of the mind ; a 
sentiment ; a sentiment of approbation ; a sentiment which, when applied 
to an action, approves of its utility, as that quality of it by which the measure 
of approbation or disapprobation bestowed upon it ought to be governed. 



I.] Of the Principle of Utility, 3 

it is this. The community is a fictitious hodt/y composed of the 
individual persons who are considered as constituting as it were 
its members. The interest of the community then is, what ? — the 
sum of the interests of the several members who compose it. 

V. It is in vain to talk of the interest of the community, 
without understanding what is the interest of the individual ^. 
A thing is said to promote the interest, or to he for the interest, 
of an individual when it tends to add to the sum total of his 
pleasures: or, what comes to the same thing, to diminish the 
sum total of his pains. 

VI. An action then may be said to be conformable to the An action 
principle of utiMty, or, for shortness sake, to utility, (meaning to the prin- 
with respect to the community at large) when the tendency it iity, what, 
has to augment the happiness of the community is greater than 

any it has to diminish it. 

YII. A measure of government (which is but a particular a measure of 
kind of action, performed by a particular person or persons) may conformable 
be said to be conformable to or dictated by the principle of cipieofuti- 
utility, when in like manner the tendency which it has to aug- 
ment the happiness of the community is greater than any which 
it has to diminish it. 

VIII. "When an action, or in particular a measure of govern- Laws or dic- 
ment, is supposed by a man to be conformable to the principle ty, what, 
of utility, it may be convenient, for the purposes of discourse, to 
imagine a kind of law or dictate, called a law or dictate of 

utility : and to speak of the action in question, as being con- 
formable to such law or dictate, 

IX. A man may be said to be a partizan of the principle of Apartizanof 
utility, when the approbation or disapprobation he annexes to of utility, 
any action, or to any measure, is determined by and proportioned 

to the tendency which he conceives it to have to augment or to 
diminish the happiness of the community : or in other words, to 
its conformity or unconformity to the laws or dictates of utility. 

X. Of an action that is conformable to the principle of utility. Ought, 

ou^t not. 

^ Interest is one of those words, which not having any superior genus, 
cannot in the oidinary way be defined. 

B 2 



4 Of the Principle of Utility. [chap. 

right and one may always say either that it is one that ought to be clone, 
how to be' or at least that it is not one that ought not to be done. One 
may say alsoy that it is right it should be done; at least that it is 
not wrong it should be done : that it is a right action ; at least 
that it is not a wrong action. When thus interpreted, the words 
oughif and right and vyrong, and others of that stamp, have a 
meaning : when otherwise, they have none. 
To prove the XI. Has the rectitude of this principle been ever formally 

rectitude of itih i- 

this princi- contested ] It should seem that it had, by those who have not 

pleisatonoe , , , . . 

unnecessary known what they have been meaning. Is it susceptible of any 

and impos- a. . , 

Bible. II direct proof? it should seem not: for that which is used to 
■ prove everything else, cannot itself be proved : a chain of proofs 
I must have their commencement somewhere. To give such proof 
is as impossible as it is needless. 

It hassei- XII. Not that there is or ever has been that human creature 

dom, how- 

e¥CT. as yet, breathing, however stupid or perverse, who has not on many, 

sistentiT perhaps on most occasions of his life, deferred to it. By the 
natural constitution of the human frame, on most occasions of 
their lives men in general embrace this principle, without think- 
ing of it : if not for the ordering of their own actions, yet for 
the trying of their own actions, as well as of those of other men. 
There have been, at the same time, not many, perhaps, even of 
the most intelligent, who have been disposed to embrace it purely 
and without reserve. There are even few who have not taken 
some occasion or other to quarrel with it, either on account of 
their not understanding always how to apply it, or on account of 
some prejudice or other which th^y were afraid to examine into, 
or could not bear to part with. For such is the stuff that man 
is made of : in principle and in practice, in a right track and in 
a wrong one, the rarest of all human qualities is consistency. 
It can never XIII. When a man attempts to combat the principle of utility, 
ttiti^com- 1 it is with reasons drawn, without his being aware of it, from 
that very principle itself^. His arguments, if they prove any 

^ 'The principle of vtility, (I have heard it said) is a dangerous principle: 
it is dangerous on certain occasions to consult it.' This is as much as to 
say, what ? that it is not consonant to utility, to consult utility : in short, 
that it is not consulting it, to consult it. 



bated. 



I.] Of the Principle of Utility, 5 

thing, prove not that the principle is wrongs but that, according, ||i 

to the applications he supposes to be made of it, it is miaapplied, * 

Is it possible for a man to move the earth ? Yes ; but he must 

first find out another earth to stand upon. 

XIV. To disprove the propriety of it by arguments is im- Couwe to be 

possible : but, from the causes that have been mentioned, or supmounting 

prejudioes 
from some confused or partial view of it, a man may happen to that may 

be disposed not to relish it. Where this is the case, if he thinks entertained 

the settling of his opinions on such a subject worth the trouble. 

Addition by the Author, July 1822. 

Not long after the publication of the Fragment on Gx>vemment, anno 
1 776, in which, in the character of an all-comprehensive and all-commanding 
principle, the principle of utility was brought to view, one person by, whom 
observation to the above effect was made was Alexander Wedderhum, at 
that time Attorney or Solicitor General, afterwards successively Chief Jus- 
tice of the Common Pleas, and Chancellor of England, under the successive 
titles of Lord Loughborough and Earl of Bosslyn. It was made — not 
indeed in my hearing, but in the hearing of a person by whom it was 
almost immediately communicated to me. So &i,r from being self -contra- 
dictory, it was a shrewd and perfectly true one. By that distinguished 
functionary, the state of the Government was thoroughly understood : by 
the obscure individual, at that time not so much as supposed to be so : his 
disquisitions had not been as yet applied, with any thing like a comprehen- 
sive view, to the field of Constitutional Law, nor therefore to those features 
of the English Gt>vernment, by which the greatest happiness of the ruling 
one with or without that of a favoured few, are now so plainly seen to be 
the only ends to which the course of it has at any time been directed. The 
principle of utilUy was an appellative, at that time employed — employed by 
me, as it bad been by others, to designate that which, in a more perspicuous 
and instructive manner, may, as above, be designated by the name of the 
greatest happiness principle. * This principle (said Wedderbum) is a dan- 
gerous one.' Saying so, he said that which, to a certain extent, is 
strictly true : a principle, which lays down, as the only right and justifiable 
end of Government, the greatest happiness of the greatest number — how 
can it be denied to be a dangerous one ? dangerous it unquestionably is, to 
every government which has for its actuaX end or object, the greatest hap- 
piness of a certain o»e, with or without the addition of some comparatively 
small number of others, whom it is matter of pleasure or accommodation to 
him to admit, each of them, to a share in the concern, on the footing of so 
many junior partners. Dangerous it therefore really was, to the interest — 
the sinister interest — of all those functionaries, himself included, whose 
interest it was, to maximize delay, vexation, and expense, in judicial and 
other modes of procedure, for the sake of the profit, extractible out of the 
expense. In a Government which had for its end in view the greatest 
happiness of the greatest number, Alexander Wedderbum might have been 
Attorney General and then Chancellor : but he would not have been 
Attorney General with j6 15,000 a year, nor Chancellor, with a peerage with 
a veto upon all justice, with £25,000 a year, and with 500 sinecures at his 
disposal, under the name of Ecclesiastical Benefices, besides et cceteras. 



6 Of the Principle of Utility. [chap, 

let liim take the following steps, and at length, perhaps, he m&y 
come to reconcile himself to it. 

1. Let him settle with himself, whether he would wish to 
discard this principle altogether ; if so, let him consider what it 
is that all his reasonings (in matters of politics especially) can 
amount to ] 

2. If he would, let him settle with himself, whether he would 
judge and act without any principle, or whether there is any 
other he would j^dge and act by 1 

3. If there be, let him examine and satisfy himself whether 
the principle he thinks he has found is really any separate in- 
telligible principle ; or whether it be not a mere principle in 
words, a kind of phrase, which at bottom expresses neither more 
nor less than the mere averment of his own unfounded senti- 
ments ; that is, what in another person he might be apt to call 
caprice 1 

4. If he is inclined to think that his own approbation or dis- 
approbation, annexed to the idea of an act, without any regard 
to its consequences, is a sufficient foundation for him to judge 

, and act upon, let him ask himself whether his sentiment is to be 
a standard of right and wrong, with respect to every other man, 

j or whether every man's sentiment has the same privilege of 
being a standard to itself 1 

5. In the first case, let him ask himself whether his principle 
is not despotical, and hostile to all the rest of human race ) 

6. In the second case, whether it is not anarchial, and whether 
at this rate there are not as many different standards of right 
and wrong as there are men 1 and whether even to the same 
man, the same thing, which is right to-day, may not ^(without the 
least change in its nature) be wrong to-morrow ? and whether 
the same thing is not right and wrong in the same place at the 
same time ] and in either case, whether aU argument is not at 
an end ? and whether, when two men have said, * I like this,' 
and ' I don*t like it,' they can (upon such a principle) have any 
thing more to say ? 

7. If he should have said to himself, No : for that the senti- 



I.] Of the Principle of Utility. 7 

ment which he proposes as a standard must he grounded on 
reflection, let him say on what particulars the reflection is to 
turn ? if on particulars having relation to the utility of the act, 
then let him say whether this is not deserting his own principle, 
and borrowing assistance from that very one in opposition to 
which he sets it up : or if not on those particulars, on what 
other particulars ? 

8. If he should be for compounding the matter, and adopting 
his own principle in part, and the principle of utility in part, let 
him say how far he will adopt it ? 

9. When he has settled with himself where he will stop, then 
let him ask himself how he justifies to himself the adopting it so 
farl and why he will not adopt it any farther 1 

I o. Admitting any other principle than the principle of utility 
to be a right principle, a principle that it is right for a man to 
pursue ; admitting (what is not true) that the word right can 
have a meaning without reference to utility, let him say whether 
there is any such thing as a motive that a man can have to 
pursue the dictates of it : if there is, let him say what that 
motive is, and how it is to be distinguished from those which 
enforce the dictates of utility : if not, then lastly let him say 
what it is this other principle can be good for) 



CHAPTER n. 



OF PRINCIPLES ADVERSE TO THAT OF UTILITY. 



All other 
principles 
than that of 
utility must 
be wrong. 



"Wi^sin 
which a 
principIe^ 
maybe 

WCODg, 



AsceticisQi, ori- 
gin of the I 
word. I 

Principles of / 
the Monks. 



I. If the principle of utility be a right principle to be governed 
by, and that in all cases, it follows from what has been just 
observed, that whatever principle differs from it in any case 
must necessarily be a wrong one. To prove any other principle, 
therefore, to be a wrong one, there needs no more than just to 
show it to be what it is, a principle of which the dictates are in 
some point or other different from those of the principle of 
utility : to state it is to confute it. 

II. A principle may be different from that of utility in two 
ways : I . By being constantly opposed to it : this is the case 
with a principle which may be termed the principle of asceti- 
cism^, 2, By being sometimes opposed to it, and sometimes 

^ Ascetic is a term that has been sometimes applied to Monks. It comes 
&om a Greek word which signifies exercise. The practices by which Monks 
sought to> distinguish themselves from other men were called their Ex- 
ercises. These exercises consisted in so many contrivances they had for 
tormenting themselves. By this they thought to ingratiate themselves 
with the Deity. . For the Deity, said they, is a Being of infinite benevo- 
lence: now a Being of the most ordinary benevolence is pleased to see 

/ others make themselves as happy as they can : therefore to make ourselves 
as unhappy as we can is the way to please the Deity. If any body asked 
them, whiftt motive they could find for doing all this % Oh ! said they, you 
are not to imagine that we are punishing ourselves for nothing : ;we know 
very well what we are about. You are to know, that for every grain of 
pain it costs us now, we are to have a hundred grains of pleasure by and by. 
The case is, that God loves to see us torment ourselves at present : indeed 
he has as good as told us so. But this is done only to try us, in order just 

I to see how we should behave : which it is plain he could not know, without 
making the experiment. Now then, from the satisfaction it gives him to 
see us make ourselves as unhappy as we can make ourselves in this present 
life, we have a sure proof of the satis&ction it will give him to see us as 
happy as he can make us in a life to come. 



Of Principles adverse to that of Utility. 9 

not, as it maj happen : this is the case with another, which may 
be termed the principle of sympathy and antipathy. 

III. By t he p rinciple of asceticism I mean that principle, Principle of 
which, like the principle of utility, approves or disapproves of what. 
any action, according to the tendency which it appears to hav^ 
to augment or diminish the happiness of the party whose in- 
terest is in question ; but in an inverse manner : approving of 
actions in as far as they tend to diminish his happiness ; dis- 
approving of them in as far as they tend to augment it. 

lY. It is evident that any one who reprobates any the least Apartizanof 
particle of pleasure, as such, from whatever source derived, is of asoeti- 

. , . . . . cism, wno. 

pro tarUo a partizan of the principle of asceticism. It is only 
upon that principle, and not from the principle of utility, that 
the most abominable pleasure which the vilest of malefactors 
ever reaped from his crime would be to be reprobated, if it stood 
alone. The case is, that it never does stand alone ; but is neces- 
sarily followed by such a quantity of pain (or, what comes to the 
same thing, such a chance for a certain quantity of pain) that 
the pleasure in comparison of it, is as nothing : and this is the 
true and sole, but perfectly sufficient, reason for making it a 
ground for punishment. 

V. There are two classes of men of very different complexions, This prin- 

•^ * ciplehashad 

by whom the principle of asceticism appears to have been em- in some a 

braced; the one a set of moralists, the other a set of religion- cai, in others 
ists. Different accordingly have been the motives which appear origin. 
to have recommended it to the notice of these different parties. 
Hope, that is the prospect of pleasure, seems to have animated 
the former : hope, the aliment of philosophic pride : the hope of 
honour and reputation at the hands of men. Fear, that is the 
prospect of pain, the latter : fear, the offspring of superstitious 
fancy : the fear of future punishment at the hands of a splenetic 
and revengeful Deity. I say in this case fear : for of the in- 
visible future, fear is more powerful than hope. These circum^ 
stances characterize the two different parties among the parti- 
zans of the principle of asceticism ; the parties and their motives 
different, the principle the same. 



lo Of Prineiples adverse to that of Utility, [chap. 

cftwiSu£- ^^' "^^ religious party, however, appear to have carried it 
t^r by the farther than the philosophical : they have acted more consistently 
E^e**M *^^ ^^^ wisely. The philosophical party have scarcely gone 
Bophicai. farther than to reprobate pleasure : the religious party have fre- 
quently gone so far as to make it a matter of merit and of duty 
to court pain. The philosophical party have hardly gone farther 
than the making pain a matter of indifference. It is no evil, 
they have said : they have not said, it is a good. They have not 
so much as reprobated all pleasure in the lump. They have 
discarded only what they have called the gross; that is, such 
as are organical, or of which the origin is easily traced up to 
such as ai*e organical : they have even cherished and magnified 
the refined. Yet this, however, not under the name of pleasure : 
to cleanse itself from the sordes of its impure original, it was 
necessary it should change its name: the honourable, the glorious, 
the reputable, the becoming, the honestumj the decorum, it was 
to be called : in short, any thing but pleasure, 
Su^^ YII. From these two sources have flowed the doctrines from 
hM°^**'^* which the sentiments of the bulk of mankind have all along re- 
OTTO*a^n'ir ^®^^®^ ^ tincture of this principle ; some from the philosophical, 
P«J^of gome from the religious, some from both. Men of education 
*^« "^^ows more frequently from the philosophical, as more suited to the 
▼uigw. elevation of their sentiments : the vulgar more frequently from 
the superstitious, as more suited to the narrowness of their in- 
tellect, undilated by knowledge : and to the abjectness of their 
condition, continually open to the attacks of fear. The tinctures, 
however, derived from the two sources, would naturally inter- 
mingle, insomuch that a man would not always know by which 
of them he was most influenced : and they would often serve to 
corroborate, and enliven one another. It was this conformity 
that made a kind of alliance between parties of a complexion 
otherwise so dissimilar : and disposed them to unite upon various 
occasions against the common enemy, the partizan of the prin- 
ciple of utility, whom they joined in branding with the odious 
name of Epicurean. 



II,] Of Principles adverse to that of Utility, 1 1 

VIII. The principle of asceticism, however, with whatever The prind- 
warmth it may have been embraced by its partizans as a rule of cism has 

lien 61* been 

private conduct, seems not to have been carried to any consider- steaday ap- 1 
able length, when applied to the business of government. In a either ^7^ 
few instances it has been carried a little way by the philosophical ness of 
party : witness the Spartan re^men. Though then, perhaps, it ment. " 
may be considered as having been a measure of security : and an 
application, though a precipitate and perverse application, of the 
principle of utility. Scarcely in any instances, to any consider^ 
able length, by the religious: for the various monastic orders^ 
and the societies of the Quakers, Dumplers, Moravians, and other 
religionists, have been free societies, whose regimen no man has 
been astricted to without the intervention of his own consent* 
Whatever merit a man may hav-e thought there would be in 
making himself miserable, no such notion seems ever to have 
occurred to any of them, that it may be a merit, much less a 
duty, to make others miserable : although it should seem, that if 
a certain quantity of misery were a thing so desirable, it would 
not matter much whether it were brought by each man upon 
himself, or by one man upon another. It is true, that from the 
same source from whence, among the religionists, the attachment 
to the principle of asceticism took its rise, flowed other doctrines 
and practices, from which misery in abundance was produced in 
one man by the instrumentality of another: witness the holy 
wars, and the persecutions for religion. But the passion for 
producing misery iiji these cases proceeded upon some special 
ground : the exercise of it was confined to persons of particular 
descriptions : they were tormented, not as men, but as heretics 
and infidels. To have inflicted the same miseries on their fellow- 
believers and fellow-sectaries, would have been as blameable in 
the eyes even of these religionists, as in those of a partizan of 
the principle of utility. For a man to give himself a certain 
number of stripes was indeed meritorious : but to give the same 
number of stripes to another man, not consenting, would have 
been a sin. We read of saints^ who for the good of their souls, 
find the mortification of their bodies^ have voluntarily yielded 



12 On Principles adverse to that of Utility, [chap. 

themselyes a prey to Termin : but though many persons of this 
class have wielded the reins of empire, we read of none who 
have set themselves to work, and made laws on purpose, with a 
view of stocking the body politic with the breed of highwaymen, 
housebreakers, or incendiaries. If at any time they have suffered 
the nation to be preyed upon by swarms of,jdle pensioners, or 
useless placemen, it has rather been from netjllg efi d? aEli llll- 
"^ecility, than frofiST^ny settled plan for oppressing and plundering 
of the people. If at any time they have sapped the sources of 
national wealth, by crampiag commerce, and driving the inhabi- 
tants into emigration, it has been with other views, and in . pur^ 
suit of other ends. If they have declaimed against the pursuit 
of pleasure, and the use of wealth, they have commonly stopped 
at declamation : they have not, like Lycurgus, made express 
ordinances for the purpose of banishing the precious metals. If 
they have established idleness by a law, it has been not because 
idleness, the mother of vice and misery, is itself a virtue, but 
because idleness (say they) is the road to holiness. If under the 
notion of fasting, they have joined in the plan of confining their 
subjects to a diet, thought by some to be of the most nourishing 
and prolific nature, it has been not for the sake of making them 
tributaries to the nations by whom that diet was to be supplied, 
but for the sake of manifesting their own power, and exercising 
the obedience of the people. If they have established, or suffered 
to be established, punishments for the breach of celibacy, they 
have done no more than comply with the petitions of those 
deluded rigorists, who, dupes to the ambitious and deep-laid 
policy of their rulers, first laid themselves under that idle obliga- 
tion by a vow. 
The prin- IX. The principle of asceticism seems originally to have been 

cipleof asce- . . . 

ticism, in its the reverie of certain hasty speculators, who having perceived, 

bujt that of or fBincied, that certain pleasures, when reaped in certain cir- 

applied. cumstances, have, at the long run, been attended with pains more 

\ than equivalent to them, took occasion to quarrel with every 

I thing that offered itself under the name of pleasure. Having 

then got thus far, and having forgot the point which they set out 



II.] Of Principled adverse to that of Utility. 13 

from, they pushed on, and went so much farther as to think it t 

meritorious to fall in love with pain. Even this, we see, is at 

bottom but the principle of utility misapplied. 

X. The principle of utility is capable of being consistently It can never 

pursued ; and it is but tautology to say, that the more con* entbr pur- 

fiistently it is pursued, the better it must ever be for human-^ 

kind. The principle of asceticism never was, nor ever can be, 

consistently pursued by any living creature. Let but one tenth 

part of the inhabitants of this earth pursue it couBistently, and 

in a day's time they will have turned it into a hell. 

XL Among principles adverse^ to that of utility, that which The prin- 
ciple ckT symr 

^ The following Note was first printed in January 1789. 
It ought rather to have been styled, more extensively, t he principle of 
caprice. Where it applies to the choice of actions to be marked out /or 



injunction or prohibition, for reward or punishment, (to stand, in a word, 
as subjects for obligations to be imposed,) it may indeed with propriety be 
termed, as in the text, the principle of sympathy and antipathy. But this 
appellative does not so well apply to it, when occupied in the choice of the 
events which are to serve as sources of title with respect to rights : where 
the actions prohibited and allowed the obligations and rights, being already 
fixed, the only question is, under what circumstances a man is to be in- 
vested with the one or subjected to the other ? from what incidents occasion 
is to be taken to invest a man, or to refuse to invest him, with the one, or 
to subject him to the other ? In this latter case it may more appositely be 
characterized by the name of the pha/ntaslic principle. Sympathy and 
antipathy are affections of the sensible faculty. But the choice of titles 
with respect to rights, especially with respect to proprietary rights, upon 
grounds unconnected with utility, has been in many instances the work, 
not of the affections but of the imagination. 

When, in justification of an article of English Common Law, calling 
uncles to succeed in certain cases in preference to fathers. Lord Coke pro- 
duced a sort of ponderosity he had discovered in rights, disqualifying them\ 
from ascending in a straight line, it was not that he loved uncles particu- ' 
larly, or hated fathers, but because the analogy, such as it was, was what 
his imagination presented him with, instead of a reason, and because, to a 
judgment unobservant of the standard of utility, or unacquainted with the 
art of consulting it, w here affectio n is out of the way , i magination is the | 
onl y guide . ^ """" "" 

wnen i know not what ingenious grammarian invented the proposition 
DeUgatris non potest delegare, to serve as a rule of law, it was not surely 
tbat he hiMl any antipathy to delegates of the second order, or that it was 
any pleasure to him to think of the ruin which, for want of a manager at 
home, may befal the affairs of a traveller, whom an unforeseen accident 
has deprived of the object of his choice : it was, that the incongruity, of 
giving the same law to objects so contrasted as active and passive are, waa 
not to be surmounted, and that 'Otiu chimes, as well as it contrasts, wiih 
••art. 



14 Of Principles adverse to that of Utility, [chap. 

pathy and at this day seems to have most influence in matters of ffovern- 

antipathyi , , , 

what. ment, is what may be called the principle of sympathy and an* 



When that inexorable maxim, (of which the dominion is no more to be 
defined, than the date of its birth, or the name of its father, is to be found,) 
was imported from England for the government of Bengal, and the whole 
fabric of judicatnre was crashed by the thunders of ex post facto justice, it 
was not surely that the prospect of a blameless magistracy perishing in 
prison afforded any enjoyment to the unoffended authors of their misery ; 
but that the music of the maxim, absorbing the whole imagination, had 
drowned the cries of humanity along with the dictates of common sense *. 
Fiat Justitia^ mat coelumy says another maxim, as full of extravagance as 
it is of harmony : Go heaven to wreck — so justice be but done : — ^and what 
is the ruin of kingdoms, in comparison of the wreck of heaven ? 

So again, when the Prussian chancellor, inspired with the wisdom of I 
know not what Roman sage, proclaimed in good Latin, for the edification 
of German ears, Servitus aervitutis non datur, [Cod. Fred. tom. ii. par. 2. 
liv. 2. tit. X. § 6. p. 308.] it was not that he had conceived any aversion to 
the life-holder who, during the continuance of his term, should wish to 
gratify a neighbour with a right of way or water, or to the neighbour who 
should wish to accept of the indulgence ; but that, to a jurisprudential ear, 
-tus 'tutis sound little less melodious than 'Otus -are. Whether the melody 
of the maxim was the real reason of the rule, is not left open to dispute : 
for it is ushered in by the conjimction quia, reason's appointed harbinger : 
quia servitus servitutis non datur. 

Neither would equal melody have been produced, nor indeed could 
similar melody have been called for, in either of these instances, by the 
opposite provision : it is only when they are opposed to general rules, and 
not when by their conformity they are absorbed in them, that more specific 
ones can obtain a separate existence. Delegatus potest delegare, and Ser- 
vitus servitutis datur, provisions already included under the general adop- 
tion of contracts, would have been as unnecessary to the apprehension and 
the memory, as, in comparison of their energetic negatives, they are insipid 
to the ear. 

Were the inquiry diligently made, it would be found that the goddess of 

1 Additional Note by the Author, July i8aa. 

Add, and that the bad system, of Mahometan and other native law was to be put down 
at all events, to make way for the inapplicable and still more mischievous system of English 
Judge-made law, and, by the hand of his accomplice Hastings, was to be put into the pocket 
of Lmpey — Importer of this instrument of subversion, £8,000 a-year contrary to law, in 
addition to the £8,000 a-year lavished upon him, with the customary profusion, by the hand 
of law. — See the Account of this transaction in Mill's British India. 

To this Governor a statue is erecting by a vote of East India Directors and Proprietors : 
on it should be inscribed — Let it but put money into our pockets, no tyranny too flagitious 
to be worshipped by us. 

To this statue of the Arch-malefactor should be added, for a companion, that of the long- 
robed accomplice : the one lodging the bribe in the hand of the other. The hundred millions 
of plundered and oppressed Hindoos and Mahometans pay for the one : a Westminster 
Hall subscription might pay for the other. 

What they have done for Ireland with her seven millions of souls, the authorised denlen 
and perverters of justice have done for Hindoetan with her hundred millions. In this there is 
nothing wonderful. The wonder is — that, under such institutions, men, though in ever such 
small number, should be found, whom the view of the injustices which, by English Judge- 
made laWy they are compelled to commit, and the miseries they are thus compelled to pro- 
duce, deprive of health and rest. Witness the Letter of an English Hiudostan Judge, Sept. i» 
1819, whicli lies before me. I will not make so cruel a requital for his honesty, as to put his 
name in print : indeed the House of Commons* Documents already published leave little 
need of it. 



li.] Of Principles adverse to that of Utility. 15 

tipathY> By the principle of sympathy and antipathy, I mean 
that principle which approves or disapproves of certain actions, 

harmony haa exercised more influence, however latent, oyer the dispensa- 
tions of Themis, than her most diligent historiographers, or even her most 
passionate panegjnrists, seem to have been aware of. Every one knows, 
how, by the ministry of Orpheus, it was she who first collected the sons of 
men beneath the shadow of the sceptre : yet, in the midst of continual 
experience, men seem yet to learn, with what successful diligence she has 
laboured to guide it in its course. Every one knows, that measured num- 
bers were the language of the infancy of law : none seem to have observed, 
with what imperious sway they have governed her maturer age. In English 
jurisprudence in particular, the connexion betwixt law and music, however 
less perceived than in Spartan legislation, is not perhaps less reaJ nor less 
close. The music of the Office, though not of the same kind, is not less 
musical in its kind, than the music of the Theatre ; that which hardens the 
heart, than that which softens it : — sostenutos as long, cadences as sono- 
rous ; and those governed by rules, though not yet promulgated, not less 
determinate. Search indictments, pleadings, prbceedings in chancery, con- 
veyances : whatever trespasses you may find against truth or conuuon sense, 
you will find none against the laws of harmony. The English Liturgy, 
justly as this quality has been extolled in that sacred office, possesses not 
a greater measure of it, than is commonly to be found in an English Act of 
Parliament. Dignity, simplicity, brevity, precision, intelligibility, possi- 
bility of being retained or so much as apprehended, every thing yields to 
Harmony. Volumes might be filled, shelves loaded, with the sacrifices 
that are made to this insatiate power. Expletives, her ministers in Grecian 
poetry, are not less busy, though in different shape and bulk, in English 
l^islation : in the former, they are monosyllables ^ : in the latter, they are 
whole lines ^. 

To return to the pi^vncipU of sympathy and antipathy : a term preferred 
at first, on account of its impartiality, to the principle of caprice. The 
choice of an appellative, in the above respects too narrow, was owing to my 
not having, at that time, extended my views over the civil branch of law, 
any otherwise than as I had found it inseparably involved in the penal. 
But when we come to the former branch, we shall see the phantastic prin- 
ciple making at least as great a figure there, as the principle of sympoithy 
and antipathy in the latter. 

In the days of Lord Coke, the light of utility can scarcely be said to have 
as yet shone upon the fibce of Common Law. If a faint ray of it, under the 
name of the argumentum ab ineonvenientif is to be found in a list of about 
twenty topics exhibited by that great lawyer as the co-ordinate leaders of 
that all-perfect system, the admission, so circumstanced, is as sure a proof 
of neglect, as, to the statues of Brutus and Cassius, exclusion was a cause 
of notice. It stuids, neither in the front, nor in the rear, nor in any post of 
honour ; but huddled in towards the middle, without the smallest mark of 
preference. [Coke, Littleton, 11. a.] Nor is this Latin ineonvenicTice by 
any means the same thing with the English one. It stands distinguished 
from mischief : and because by the vulgar it is taken for something less 
bad, it is given by the learned as something worse. The law prefers a 

1 Hcv, TOt, ye, vw, See. 

3 And be it further enacted by the authority aforesaid, that^Provided always, and it 
is hereby further enacted and declared that — &c. &c. 



1 6 Of Principles adverse to that of Utility, [chap. 

not on account of their tending to augment the happineBs, nor 
yet on account of their tending to diminish the happiness of the 
party whose interest is in question, but merely because a man 
finds himself disposed to approve or disapprove of them : holding^ 
up that approbation or disapprobation as a sufficient reason for 
itself, and disclaiming the necessity of looking out for any ex- 
trinsic ground. Thus far in the general department of morals : 
and in the particular department of politics, measuring out the 
quantum (as well as determining the ground) of punishment, by 
the degree of the disapprobation. 
This is XII. It is manifest, that this is rather a principle in name 

negation of than in reality: it is not a positive principle of itself, so much 
tiianany * as a term employed to signify the negation of all principle, 
tive. What one expects to find in a principle is something that points 

Out some external consideration, as a means of warranting and 
guiding the internal sentiments of approbation and disapproba- 
tion : this expectation is but ill fulfilled by a proposition, which 
does neither more nor less than hold up each of those sentiments 
as a ground and standard for itself. 
Sentiments XIII. In looking over the catalogue of human actions (says 
of theprin- a partizan of this principle) in order to determine which of them 
pathy. are to be marked with the seal of disapprobation, you need but 

to take counsel of your own feelings : whatever you find in your- 
self a propensity to condemn, is wrong for that very reason. For 
the same reason it is also meet for punishment ^ in what pro- 
portion it is adverse to utility, or whether it be adverse to utility 
at all, is a matter that makes no difference. In that same propor- 
tion also is it meet for punishment : if you hate much, punish 

mischief to an inconvenience^ says an admired maxim, and the more ad- 
mired, because as nothing is expressed by it, the more is supposed to be 
undCTstood. 

Not that there is any arowed, much less a constant opposition, between 
the prescriptions of utility and the operations of the common law : such con- 
Htancy we have seen to be too much even for ascetic fervor. [Supra, par. x.] 
From time to time instinct would unavoidably betray them into the paths 
of reason : instinct which, however it may be cramped, can never be killed 
by education. The cobwebs spun out of the materials brought together by 
' the competition of opposite analogies,* can never have ceased being warped 
by the silent attraction of the rational principle : though it should have 
been, as the needle is by the msgiket, witlkout the privity ol oonsflMiios. 



II.] Of Principles adverse to that of Utility. %'j 

much : if you hate little^ punish little : puuish as you hate*. 1i 
you hate not at all, punish not at all : the fine feelings of the 
soul are not to be oyerborne and tyrannized by the harsh and 
rugged dictates of political utility, 

XIY. The various systems that have been formed concerning The systems 
the standard of right and wrong, may all be reduced to the been formed 
principle of sympathy and antipathy. One account may serve the sSmdwd 
for all of them. They consist all of them in so many con- J^iJ^g, f^ 
trivances for avoiding the obligation of appealing to any external to this^rin? 
standard, and for prevailing upon the reader to accept of the ^^^ ®' 
author s sentiment or opinion as a reason for itself. The phrases 
different, but the principle the same^. 

' It is curious enough to observe the varietj of inventions men have hit various 
upon, and the variety of phrases they have brought forward, in order to EjjJ|^^^*as 
conceal from the world, and, if possible, firom themselves, this very general ^he character- 
and therefore very pardonable self-sufficiency. ^ mar^pre^ 

1. One man says, he has a thing made on purpose to tell him what is ^|^*^^^' 
right and what is wrong ; and that it is called a moral sense : and then he ^ Moral Sense, 
goes to work at his ease, and says, such a thing is right, and such a thing 

is wrong — why ? * because my moral sense tells me it is.* 

2. Another man comes and alters the phrase : leaving out moral, and I* Co™™on 
putting in common, in the room of it. He then teUs you, that his common 

sense teaches him what is right and wrong, as surely as the other's moral 
sense did : meaning by common sense, a sense of some kind or other, which, 
he says, is possessed by all mankind : the sense of those, whose sense is not 
the same as the author's, being struck out of the account as not worth 
taking. This contrivance does better than the other ; for a moral sense, 
being a new thing, a man may feel about him a good while without being 
able to find it out : but common sense is as old as the creation ; and there 
is no man but would be ashamed to be thought not to have as much of it 
as his neic^hbours. It has another great advantage : by appearing to share 
power, it lessens envy: for when a man gets up upon this ground, in order 
to anathematize those who differ firom hun, it is not by a sic volo sic jvheo, 
but by a velitisjubeatis. 

3. Another man comes, and says, that as to a moral sense indeed, he \J^J^^' 
cannot find that he haa any such thing : that however he has an under- ^ ^' 
standing, which will do quite as well. This understanding, he says, is the 
standard of right and wrong : it tells him so and so. All good and wise 

men understand as he does : if other men's understandings differ in any 
point from his, sa much the worse for them ; it is a sure sign they ara 
either defective or corrupt. 

4. Another man says, that there is an eternal and immutable Rule of i^^^ ^ 
Bight : that that rule of right dictates so and so : and then he begins 
giving you his sentiments upon any thing that comes uppermost : and 

these sentiments (you are to take for granted) are so many branches of thei 
eternal rule of right. 
5« Another maoj, or perhaps the same man (it's no matter) says^ that &^it"«s8oC 

G 



i8 



€f Principles adverse to that of Utility. [cHap. 



Thiaprin- XV. It IS manifest, that the dictates of this principle will 

ciple will JT r- 

frequently frequently coincide with those of utility, though perhaps with- 



6. Law of 
Nature. 



7. Law of 
Reason, Rijj^ht 
Reason, 
Natural 

iustice, 
Natural 
Equity, Good 
Order. 



8. Truth. 



9. Doctrine of 
Election. 



\ 



Repugrnancy to 
Nature. 



Mtechiefthejr 
produce.' 



there are certam practices conformable, and others repugnant, to the 
Fitness of Things ; and then he tells you, at his leisure, what practices are 
conformable and what repugnant : just as he happens to like a practice or 
dislike it. 

6. A gi-eat multitude of people are continually talking of the Law of 
Nature ; and then they go on giving you their sentiments about what is 
right and what is wrong : and these sentiments, you are to understand, are 
so many diapters and sections of the Law of Nature. 

7' Instead of the phrase. Law of Nature, you have sometimes, Law 
of Beason, Bight Keason, Natural Justice, Natural Equity, Good Order. 
Any of them will do equally well. This latter is most ubed in politics. 
The three last are much more tolerable than the others, because they do 
not very explicitly claim to be any thing more than phrases : they insist 
but feebly upon the being looked upon as so many positive standards of 
themselves, and seem content to be taken, upon occasion, for phrases ex- 
pressive of the conformity of the thing in question to the proper standard, 
whatever that may be. On most occasions, however, it will be better to 
say utility : utility is dbarer, as referring more explicitly to pain and 
pleasure. 

8. We have one philosopher, who 8a3rs, there is no harm in any thing in 
the world but in telling a lie : and that if, for example, you were to murder 
your own father, this would only be a particular way of saying, he was not 
your £a.ther. Of course, when this philosopher sees any thing that he does 
not like, he says, it is a particular way of telling a lie. It is saying, that 
the act ought to be done, or may be done, when, in truth, it ought not to be 
done. 

9. The fairest and openest of them all is that sort of man who speaks out, 
and says, I am of the number of the Elect : now God himself takes care to 
inform the Elect what is right : and that with so good effect, and let them 
strive ever so, they cannot help not only knowing it but practising it. If 
therefore a man wants to know what is right and what is wrong, he has 
nothing to do but to come to me. 

It is upon the principle of antipathy that such and such acts are often 
reprobated 01^ the score of their being unnatural : the practice of exposing 
children, established among the Greeks and Bomans, was an unnatural 
practice. Uni^tural, when it means any thing, means unfrequent : and 
there iC^ieans something ; although nothing to the present purpose. But 
here it means no such thing : for the frequency of such acts is perhaps the 
gre^t complaint. It therefore means nothing; nothing, I mean, which 
there is in the act itself. All it can serve to express is, the disposition of 
the person who is talking of it : the disposition he is in to be angry at the 
thoughts of it, Poes it merit his anger ? Very likely it may : but whether 
it does or no is a question, which, to be answered rightly, can only be 
answered upon the principle of utility. 

Unnatural, is as good a word as moral sense, or common sense; and 
would be as good a foundation for a system. Such an act is unnatural ; 
Chat is, repugnant to nature : for I do not like to practise it ; and, conse- 
quentiy, do not practise it. It is therefore repugnant to what ought to be 
the nature of every body else. 

The mischief common to att these ways of thinking and arguing (which. 



II.] Cf Principles adverse to that of Utility, 19 

out intendiDg any such thing. Probably more frequently than coincide 
not : and hence it is that the business of penal justice is carried utility. 

in truth, as we have seen, are but one and the same method, couched in 
different forms of words) is their serving as a cloke, and pretence, and ali- 
ment, to despotism : if not a despotism in practice, a despotism however 
in disposition : which is but too apt, when pretence and power offer, to 
show itself in practice. The consequence is, that with intentions very 
commonly of the purest kind, a man becomes a torment either to himself 
or his fellow-creatures. If he be of the melancholy cast, h« sits in silent 
grief, bewailing their blindness and depravity: if of the irascible, he de- 
claims with fury and virulence against all who differ from him; blowing up 
the coals of fanaticism, and branding with the charge of corruption and in- 
sincerity, every man who does not think, or profess to think, as he does. u . . 

If such a man happens to possess the advantages of style, his book y ^ ^ ^ 
may do a considerable deal of mischief before the notbingness of it is 
understood. 

These principles, if such they can be called, it is more frequent to see 
applied to morals than to politics : but their influence extends itself to 
both. In politics, as well as morals, a man will be at least equally glad of 
a pretence for deciding any question in the manner that best pleases him, 
without the trouble of inquiry. If a man is an infallible judge of what is 
right and wrong in the actions of private individuals, why not in the 
measures to be observed by public men in the direction of those actions ? 
accordingly (not to mention other chimeras) I have more than once known 
the pretended law of nature set up in legislative debates, in opposition to 
arguments derived from the principle of utility. 

*But is it never, then, from any other considerations than those of utility, ^**J5I5 "*h**^ 
that we derive our notions of right and wrong ? * I do not know : I do sofe ground of 
not care. Whether a moral sentiment can- be originally conceived: from any Stion wc ever 
other source than a view of utility, is one question : whether upon exam^ bestow, is a 
ination and reflection it can, in point of fact,, be actually persisted in and skimtion °"' 
justified on any other ground, by a person reflecting within himself, is 
another : whether in point of right it can properly be justified on any other 
gi'ound, by a person addressing himself to the ccHnm unity, is a third. The 
two first are questions of speculation : it matters not, comparatively 
speaking, how they are decided. The last is a question of practice : the 
decision of it is of as much importance as that of any can be. 

* I feel in myself,' (say you) ' a disposition to approve of such or such an 
action in a moral view : but this is not owing to any notions I have of its 
being a useful one to the community. I do not pretend to know whether 
it be an useful one or not : it may be, for aught I know, a mischievous 
one.' 'But is it then,' (say I) *a mischievous one? examine; and if you 
can make yourself sensible that it is so, then, if duty means any thing, that 
is, moral duty, it is your duty at least to abstain from it : and mQre than 
that, if it is what lies in your power, and can be done without too great a 
sacrifice, to endeavour to prevent it. It is not your cherishing the notion ' 
of it in your bosom, and giving it the name of virtue, that will excuse 
you/ 

'I feel in myself,' (say you again) 'a disposition to detest such or such an 
action in a moral view ; but this is not owing to any notions I have of its 
being a mischievous one to the community. I do not pretend to know 
whether it be a mischievous one or not : it may be not a mischievous one : 

C 2 



20 Of Princijples adverse to thai of Utility, [chap, 

on upon that tolerable sort of footing upon which we see it car- 
ried on in common at this day. For what more natural or more 
general ground of hatred to a practice can there be, than the 
mischievousness of such practice 1 What all men are exposed 
to suffer by, all men will be disposed to hate. It is far yet, 
however, from being a constant ground : for when a man suffers, 
it is not always that he knows what it is he suffers by. A man 
may suffer grievously, for instance, by a new tax, without being 
able to trace up the cause of his sufferings to the injustice of 
some neighbour, who has eluded the payment of an old one. 
Thia prin- XVI. The principle of sympathy and antipathy is most apt to 
apt to err on err on the side of -severity. It is for applying punishment in 

the side of i-ii . i-ii 

severity. many cases which deserve none : m many cases which deserve 
some, it is for applying more than they deserve. There is no 
incident imaginable, be it ever so trivial, and so remote from 
miscliief, from which this principle may not extract a ground 
of punishment. Any difference in taste : any difference in 
opinion : upon one subject as well as upon another. No dis- 
agreement so trifling which perseverance and altercation will 
not render serious. Each becomes in the other's eyes an enemy, 
and, if laws permit, a criminaP. This is one of the circum- 

'it may be, for auglit I know, an useful one.' — * May it indeed,' (say I) ' an 
useful one ? but let me tell you then, that unless duty, and right and wrong, 
be just what you please to make them, if it really be not a mischievous one, 
and any body has a mind to do it, it is no duty of yours, but, on the con- 
trary, it would be very wrong in you, to take upon you to prevent him : 
detest it within yourself as much as you please ; that may be a very good 
reason (unless it be also a useful one) for your not doing it yourself: but if 
\ you go about, by word or deed, to do any thing to hinder him, or make him 
Jj/^ suffer for it, it is you, and not he, that have done wrong : it is not your 
setting yourself to blame his conduct, or branding it with the name of vice, 
that will make him culpable, or you blameless. Therefore, if you can make 
yourself content that he shall be of one mind, and you of another, about 
that matter, and so continue, it is well : but if nothing will serve you, 
but that you and he must needs be of the stmie mind, I'll tell you what 
you have to d«) : it is for you to get the better of your antipathy, not for 
him to truckle to it.' 

* King James the First of England had conceived a violent antipathy 
ankinst Arians : two of whom he burnt \ This gratification he procured 
himself without much diflBculty : the notions of the times were fevourable 
to it. He yrrote a furious book against Vorstius, for being what was called 

i Hume's Hist. voL 6. 



II.] Of Principles adverse to that of Utility, 31 

stances by which the human race \a distinguished (not much 
indeed to its advantage) from the brute creation. 

XVII. It is not, however, by any means unexampled for this But errs, in 
principle to err on the side of lenity. A near and perceptible stances, on 
mischief moves antipathy. A remote and imperceptible mis- lenity. 
chief, though not less real, has no effect. Instances in proof of 

this will occur in numbers in the course of the work ^. It would 
be breaking in upon the order of it to give them here. 

XVIII. It may be wondered, perhaps, that in all this while The theo- 
no mention has been made of the theological principle ; meaning dpieTwhAt— 
that principle which professes to recur for the standard of right nte prm^ 
and wrong to the will of God. But the case is, this is not in ^^^ ®* 
fact a distinct principle. It is never any thing more or less thau 

one or other of the three before-mentioned principles presenting 
itself under another shape. The will of God here meant cannot 
be his revealed will, as contained in the sacred writings : for 
that is a system which nobody ever thinks of recurring to at this 
time of day, for the details of political administration : and even 
before it can be applied to the details of private conduct, it is 

an Arminian: for Yorstius was at a distance. He also wrote a furious 
book, called * A Counterblast to Tobacco,' against the use of tliat drug, 
which Sir Walter Raleigh had then lately introduced. Had the notions of 
the times co>operated with him, he would have burnt the Anabaptist and 
the smoker of tobacco in the same fire. However he had the satis&ction 
of putting Ealeigh to death afterwards, though for another crime. 

Dispiites concerning the comparative excellence of French and Italian 
music have occasioned very serioas bickerings at Paris. One of the parties 
would not have been sorry (says Mr. D'Alerabert *) to have brought govern- 
ment into the quarrel. Pretences were sought after and urged. Long 
before that, a dispute of like nature, and of at least equal warmth, had been 
kindled at London upon the comparative merits of two composers at 
London ; where riots between the approvers and disapprovers of a new play 
are, at this day, not unfrequent. The ground of quarrel between the Big- 
endians and the Little-endians in the &.ble, was not more frivolous than 
many an one which has laid empires desolate. In Russia, it is said, there 
was a time when some thousands of persons lost their lives in a quarrel, in 
which the government had taken part, about the number of fingers to be 
used in m^king the sign of the cross. This was in days of yore : the 
ministers of Catherine II. are better instructed ^ than to take any other 
part in such disputes, than that of preventing the parties concerned from 
doing one another a mischief. 

* See ch. xvi. [Division], par. 42, 44. 

1 Melanges Easai sur la Libert^ de la Musique. * Instrucfe. art. 474, 47s, 47(1. 



22 Of Principles adverse to that of Utility, [chap. 

universally allowed, by tlie most eminent divines of all persua- 
sions, to stand in need of pretty ample interpretations ; else to 
what use are the works of those divines ? And for the guidance 
of these interpretations, it is also allowed, that some other stand- 
ard must be assumed. The will then which is meant on this 
occasion, is that which may be called the presumptive will : that 
is to say, that which is presumed to be his will on account of 
the conformity of its dictates to those of some other principle. 
What then may be this other principle ? it must be one or other 
of the three mentioned above : for there cannot, as we have 
seen, be any more. It is plain, therefore, that, setting revelation 
out of the question, no light can ever be thrown upon the 
standard of right and wrong, by any thing that can be said upon 
the question, what is God's will. "We may be perfectly sure, 
indeed, that whatever is right is conformable to the will of Q-od : 
but so far is that from answering the purpose of showing us 
what is right, that it is necessary to know first whether a thing 
is right, in order to know from thence whether it be conformable 
to the will of God *. 
Antipathy, XIX. There are t wo thi ngs which are very apt to be con- 
tions it'dio- founded, but which it imports us carefully t o di stinguish : — the 

tates be ever ,• t_* t_ i. j.- j.u • j r • j* 

so right, is motive or cau se, which, by operating on the mind of an mdi- 
seifY right vidual, is productive of any act : and the ground or reason which 

The principle * The principle of theology refers every thing to Grod's pleasure. But 
how rSuobie ^1^** ^ God's pleasure? God does not, he confessedly does not now, either 
to one or an- k speak Or write to us. How then are we to know what is his pleasure ? By 
other Siree^ | observing what is our own pleasure, and pronouncing it to be his. Accord* 
principles. iugly, what is called the pleasure of God, is and must necessarily be (revela- 
tion apart) neither more nor less than the good pleasure of the person, 
whoever he be, who is pronouncing what he believes, or pretends, to be 
God's pleasure. How know you it to be God's pleasure that such or such 
an act should be abstained from? whence come you even to suppose as 
much ? * Because the engaging in it would, I imagine, be prejudicial upon 
the whole to the happiness of mankind;' says the partizan of the principle 
of utility : * Because the commission of it is attended with a gross and 
sensual, or at least with a trifling and transient satisfaction ; ' says the par- 
tizan of the principle of asceticism : * Because I detest the thoughts of it ; 
and I cannot, neither ought I to be called upon to tell why ;* says he who 
proceeds upon the principle of antipathy. In the words of one or other of 
these must that person necessarily answer (revelation apart) who professes 
to take for his standard the will of God. 



II.] Of Principles adverse to that of Utility. 23 

warrants a legislat or, or other by-stander, Jn n^g^rding that ftct ^j^^^ ^^ 
with an eye of approbatio n. When the act happens, in the par- 
ticular instance in question, to be productive of effects which we 
approve of, much more if we happen to observe that the same 
motive may frequently be productive, in other instances, of the | 
like effects, we are apt to transfer our approbation to the motive | 
itself, and to assume, as the just ground for the approbation we 
bestow on the act, the circumstance of its originating from that 
motive. It is in this way that the sentiment of antipathy had 
often been considered as a just ground of action. Antipathy, for 
instance, in such or such a case, is the cause of an action which 
is attended with good effects : but this does not make it a right 
ground of action in that case, any more than in any other. Still 
farther. Not only the effects are good, but the agent sees before- 
hand that they will be so. This may make the action indeed a 
perfectly right action : but it does not make antipathy a right 
ground of action. For the same sentiment of antipathy, if im- 
plicitly deferred to, may be, and very frequently is, productive of 
the very worst effects. Antipathy, therefore, can never be a 
right ground of action. No more, therefore, can resentment, 
which, as will be seen more particularly hereafter, is but a modi- 
fication of antipathy. The only right ground of action, that can 
possibly subsist, is, after all, the consideration of utility, which, 
if it is a right principle of action, and of approbation, in any one 
case, is so in every other. Other principles in abundance, that 
is, other motives, may be the reasons why such and such an act 
Tias been done : that is, the reasons or causes of its being done : 
but it is this alone that can be the reason why it might or ought 
to have been done. Antipathy or resentment requires always to 
be regulated, to prevent its doing mischief: to be regulated by 
whati always by the principle of utility. The principle of 
utility neither requires nor admits of any other regulator than 
itself. 



CHAPTER III. 



OP THE POUE SANCTIONS OB SOUBCBS OP PAIN AND PLEASURE. 

Connexion I. It has been shown that the happiness of the individuals, of 
of this . . . . . 

chapter with whom a community is composed, that is their pleasures and their 

the pre* 

ceding. pecurity, is the end and the sole end which the legislator ought 
to have in view : the sole standard, in conformity to which each 
individual ought, as f&r as depends upon the legislator, to be 
made to fashion his behaviour. But whether it be this or any 
thing else that is to be done, there is nothing by which a man 
can ultimately be made to do it, but either pain or pleasure. 
Having taken a general view of these two grand objects {viz, 
pleasure, and what comes to the same thing, immunity from 
pain) in the character of Jlnal causes ; it will be necessary to 
take a view of pleasure and pain itself, in the character of 
efficient causes or means. 

II. There are four distinguishable sources from which plea- 
sure and pain are in use to flow : considered separately, they 
may be termed the physical, the political, the moral, and the re- 
ligious : and inasmuch as the pleasures and pains belonging to 
each of them are capable of giving a binding force to any law 
or rule of conduct, they may all of them be termed sanctions ^. 

^ Sanctio, in Latin, was used to signify the act of Minding^ and, by a 
common grammatical transition, any thing which serves to bind a man : to 
wit, to the observance of such or such a mode of conduct. According to a 
Latin grammarian \ the import of the word is derived by rather a far-fetched 
process (such as those conmionly are, and in a great measure indeed must 
be, by which intellectual ideas are derived from sensible ones) from the 
word sanguis, blood : because, among the Romans, with a view to inculcate 
into the people a persuasion that such or such a mode of conduct would be 



Pour sanc- 
tions or 
souroesof 
pleasure 
and pain. 



1 Senrius. See AinsworUi's Diet, ad verbum Sanctio, 



Of the Four Sanctions or Sources of Pain and Pleasure. a5 

III. If it be in the present life, and from the ordinary course i.The 

* ""^ — ' . - ^ — ■ * ' — ' physical 

of nature, not purposely modified by the interposition of the sanction, 
"will of any human being, nor by any extraordinary interposition 
of any superior invisible being, that the pleasure or the pain 
takes place or is expected, it may be said to issue from or to 
belong to the physical sanction , 

IV. If at the hands of a varticular perso n or set of persons in 2. The 

Ai_ ' n 1 , _ , , .political. 

the community, who under names correspondent to that of 
jtidge, are chosen for the .particular purpose of di spensing it, 
according to the will of the sovereign or supreme ruling power 
in the state, it may be said to issue from the political sanction , 

V. If at the hands of such ch ance persons i n the community, 3. The moral 
as the party in question may happen in the course of his life toi 

have concerns with, according to each man s spontaneous dispo- \ 
sition, and not according to any settled or concerted rule, it may 
be said to issue from the moral or popular sanction^, 

YI. If from the immediate hand of a superior invisible being, 4. The 
either in the present life, or in a future, it may be said to issue 
from the religious s anction, 

VII. Pleasures or pains which may be expected to issue from The plea- 
the physical, political, or moral sanctions, must all of them be pains which 
expected to be experienced, if ever, in the present life : those the ^igious 
which may be expected to issue from the religious sanction, may Boay regard 
be expected to be experienced either in the present life or in a pU^t iffe 
fulure. oraftiture. 

rendered obligatory upon a man by the force of what I call the religious 
sanction (that is, that he would be made to suffer by the extraordinary 
interposition of some superior being, if he failed to observe the mode of 
conduct in question) certain ceremonies were contrived by the priests : 
in the course of which ceremonies the blood of victims was made use of. 

A Sanction then is a source of obligatory powers or motives : that is, of 
pains Rnd pleasures ; which, according as they are connected with such or 
Buch modes of conduct, operate, and are indeed the only things which can 
operate, as motives. See Chap. x. [Motives]. 

^ Better termed popular, as more directly indicative of its constituent 
cause ; as likewise of its relation to the more common phrase public opinion, 
in French opinion pvhlique, the name there given to that tutelary power, 
of which of late so much is said, and by which so much is done. The latter 
appellation is however unhappy and inexpressive ; since if opinion is mate- 
rial, it is only in virtue of the influence it exercises over action, through 
the medium of the affections and the will. 



26 Of the Fov/r Sanctions or [chap. 

Those which VIIL Those which can be experienced in the present life, 
present ijfe^ can of courBC be no others than such as human nature in th« 
soever course of the present life is susceptible of: and from each of 
flow, differ these sources may flow all the pleasures or pains of which, in 
circum. the course of the present life, human nature is susceptible. With 

M lift VI /^CMI €^!m 

their regard to these then (with which alone we have in this place 

'^ " ^°' any concern) those of them which belong to any one of those 
sanctions, differ not ultimately in kind from those which belong 
to any one of the other three : the only difference there is among 
them lies in the circumstances that accompany their production. 
A suffering which befalls a man in the natural and spontaneous 
\ course of things, shall be styled, for instance, a calamity ; in 
which case, if it be supposed to befall him through any impru- 
dence of his, it may be styled a punishment issuing from the 
physical sanction. Now this same suffering, if inflicted by the 
) law, will be what is commonly called a punishment ; if incurred 
for want of any friendly assistance, which the misconduct, or 
supposed misconduct, of the sufferer has occasioned to be with- 
I holden, a punishment issuing from the moral sanction ; if through 
the immediate interposition of a particular providence, a punish- 
* ment issuing from the religious sanction. 
Example. IX. A man's goods, or his person, are consumed by fire. If 

this happened to him by what is called an accident, it was a 
calamity : if by reason of his own imprudence (for instance, from 
his neglecting to put his candle out) it may be styled a punish- 
ment of the physical sanction: if it happened to him by the 
sentence of the political magistrate, a punishment belonging to 
the political sanction ; that is, what is commonly called a punish- 
ment : if for want of any assistance which his neighbour with- 
held from him out of some dislike to his moral character, a 
punishment of the moral sanction : if by an immediate act of 
God^a displeasure, manifested on account of some sin committed by 
him, or through any distraction of mind, occasioned by the dread 
of such displeasure, a punishment of the religious sanction^. 

^ A suffering conceived to befall a man by the immediate act of Grod, as 
above, is often, for shortness' sake, called a judgment : instead of saying, a 



III.] Sources of Pain and Pleasure. 27 

X. As to such of the pleasures and pains belonging to the Those which 
religious sanction, as regard a future life, of what kind these future life 
may be we cannot know. These lie not open to our observation, specifically 
During the present life they are matter odIj of expectation : and, 
whether that expectation be derived from natural or revealed 
religion, the particular kind of pleasure or pain, if it be different 

from all those which lie open to our observation, is what we can 
have no idea of. The best ideas we can obtain of such pains and 
pleasures are altogether unliquidated in point of quality. In 
what other respects our ideas of them may be liquidated will be 
considered in another place *. 

XI. Of these four sanctions the physical is altogether, we may The physical 
observe, the ground- work of the political and the moral : so is included in 
it also of the religious, in as far as the latter bears relation to other three, 
the present life. It is included in each of those other three. 

This may operate in any case, (that is, any of the pains or plea- 
sures belonging to it may operate) independently of them : none 
of ^em can operate but by means of this. In a word, the powers 
of nature may operate of themselves ; but neither the magistrate, 
nor men at large, can operate, nor is God in the case in ques- 
tion supposed to operate, but through the powers of nature. 

XII. For these four objects, which in their nature have so Use of this 

chapter. 

much in common, it seemed of use to find a common name. 
It seemed of use, in the first place, for the convenience 
of giving a name to certain pleasures and pains, for which 
a name equally characteristic could hardly otherwise have been 
found : in the second place, for the sake of holding up the effi- 
cacy of certain moral forces, the influence of which is apt not 
to be sufficiently attended to. Does the political sanction exert 
an influence over the conduct of mankind? The moral, the 
religious sanctions do so too. In every inch of his career are 
the operations of the political magistrate liable to be aided or 
impeded by these two foreign powers : who, one or other of 

suffering inflicted on him in consequence of a special judgment formed, and 
resolution thereupon taken, by the Deity. 
^ See ch. xiii. [Cases unmeet] par. 2. note. 



iz8 Of the Four Sanctions or Sources of Pain and Pleasure* 

them, or both, are sure to be either his rivals or his allies. Does 
it happen to him to leave them out in his calculations % he will 
be sure almost to find himself mistaken in the result. Of all 
this we shall find abundant proofs in the sequel of this work. 
It behoves him, therefore, to have them continually before his 
eyes ; and that under such a name as exhibits the relation they 
bear to his own purposes and designs. 



CHAPTER IV. 

VALtTE OF A LOT OP PLEASUEB OE PAIN, HOW TO 

BE MEASUBED. 

I. Pleasubes then, and the avoidance of pains, are the ends Use of this 
which the legislator has in view: it behoves him therefore to 
understand their value. Pleasures and pains are the instruments 

he has to work with : it behoves him therefore to understand 
their force, which is again, in other words, their value. 

II. To a person considered bv himself ^ the value of a pleasure Cimim- 

stiSiiicfis to be 

or pain considered hy itself, will be greater or less, according to taken into 

^i_ i? /• 11 • • i 1 theaccount 

the four foILowmg circumstances . inestimat- 

1. lt& intensity, vsjueofa 

T^ 7 .. pleasure or 

2. Its duration, ^m con- 

tj. ^ • - ^ • ^ sidered with 

3. Its certainty or uncertainty, reference to 

4. Its ^oj^nquity or remoteness, pewSif and 

III. These are the circumstances which are to be considered ^ * ®® • 

— con- 
in estimating a pleasure or a pain considered each of them by sidered as 

° '^ *^ , . "^ connected 

itself. But when the value of any pleasure or pain is considered with other 

pleasures 

for the purpose of estimating the tendency of any act by which or pains. 
it is produced, there are two other circumstances to be taken 
into the account j these are, 

^ These circumstances have since been denominated dements or dimen^ 
sions of value in a pleasure or a pain. 

Not long after the publication of the first edition, the following memo- 
riter verses were framed, in the view of lodging more eifectually, in the 
memory, these points, on which the whole fabric of morals and legislation 
may be seen to rest. 

Intense, long, eefrtain, speedy, fruitful, pure-^ 

Such marks in pleasures and in pains endure. 

Such pleasures seek, if private be thy end : 

If it be public, wide let them extend. 

Such pains avoid, whichever be thy view : 

If pains must come, let them extend to few. 



1 

I 



30 Value of a Lot of JPleamre or Pain, [chap. 

5. Its fecundity, or the chance it has of being followed by 
sensations of the same kind : that is, pleasures, if it be a plea- 
sure : pains, if it be a pain. 

6. Its pvHty, or the chance it has of not being followed by 
sensations of the opposite hind : that is, pains, if it be a pleasure : 
pleasures, if it be a pain. 

These two last, however, are in strictness scarcely to be deemed 
properties of the pleasure or the pain itself ; they are not, there- 
fore, in strictness to be taken into the account of the value of 
that pleasure or that pain. They are in strictness to be deemed 
properties only of the act, or other event, by which such plea- 
sure or pain has been produced ; and accordingly are only to be 
taken into the account of the tendency of such act or such event. 
-7 con- ' IV. To a number of persons, with reference to each of whom 
reference to the value of a pleasure or a pain is considered, it will be greater 

a number of , f , • . . •• xi • 

persons. or less, accordmg to seven circumstances : to wit, the six pre- 
ceding ones ; mz, 

1. Its intensity. 

2. Its duration, 

3. Its certainty or uncertainty. 

4. Its propinquity or remoteness, 

5. Its fecundity. 

6. lie purity. 

And one other ; to wit : 

7. Its extent; that is, the number of persons to whom it ex- 
tends ; or (in other words) who are affected by it. 

Process for V. To take an exact account then of the general tendency of 
the ten- any act, by which the interests of a community are affected, 
act or event, proceed as follows. Begin with any one person of those whose 

interests seem most immediately to be affected by it : and take 

an accoiiht, 

1. Of the value of each distinguishable pleasure which appears 
to be produced by it in ihe first instance. 

2. Of the' value of each pain which appears to be produced by 
it in the^r5^ instance. 

3. Of the value of each pleasure which appears to be produced 






IV.] how to be Measured. 31 

by it after the first. This constitutes the fecundity of the first 
pleastMre and the impurity of the first pain, 

4. Of the value of each pain which appears to be produced 
by it after the first. This constitutes the fecundity of the first , 
pain, and the impirity of the first pleasure. 

5. Sum up all the values of all the pleasures on the one side, 
and those of all the pains on the other. The balance, if it be on 
the side of pleasure, will give the good tendency of the act upon 
the whole, with respect to the interests of that individual person ; 
if on the side of pain, the had tendency of it upon the whole. 

6. Take an account of the number of persons whose interests 
appear to be concerned ; and repeat the above process with re- 
spect to each. Sum up the numbers expressive of the degrees 
of good tendency, which the act has, with respect to each indi- ^ < 
vidual, in regard to whom the tendency of it is good upon the 
whole : do this again with respect to each individual, in regard 

to whom the tendency of it is good upon the whole : do this 
again with respect to each individual, in regard to whom the 
tendency of it is had upon the whole. Take the hakmce ; which, 
if on the side of pleasure, will give the general good tendency of 
the act, with respect to the total number or community of indi- 
viduals concerned ; if on the side of pain, the general evil tendency, 
with respect to the same community. 

VI. It is not to be expected that this process should be strictly Use of the 
pursued previously to every moral judgment, or to every legisla- process. 
tive or judicial operation. It may, however, be always kept in 

view : and as near as the process actually pursued on these oc- 
casions approaches to it, so near will such process approach to 
the character of an exact one. 

VII. The same process is alike applicable to pleasure and The same 
pain, in whatever shape they appear : and by whatever "denom- piicabie to 
ination they are distinguished : to pleasure, whether it be called evil, profit 
good (which is properly the cause or instrument of pleasure) or chief, and all 
profit (which is distant pleasure, or the cause or instrument of flcatfoS of 
distant pleasure,) or convenience, or advantage, henefit, emolv^ pi^"'^ *" 
mient, happiness, and so forth : to pain, whether it be called evil, 



this theory. 



32 Value of a Lot of Pleasure or Pain, how to be Measured, 

(which corresponds to good) or mischi^, or inoonveniefMe^ or 
disadvantage, or loss, or unhappiness, and so forth. 
CoDfomii^ yilL Nor is this a novel and unwarranted, any more than it 

of hmu's 

practice^ is a useless theory. In all this there is nothing but what the 
practice of mankind, wheresoever they have a clear view of their 
own interest, is perfectly conformable to. An article of property, 
an estate in land, for instance, is valuable, on what account? 
On account of the pleasures of all kinds which it enables a man 
to produce, and what comes to the same thing the pains of all 
kinds which it enables him to avert. But the value of such an 
article of property is universally understood to rise or fall ac- 
cording to the length or shortness of the time which a man has 
in it : the certainty or uncertainty of its coming into possession ; 
and the nearness or remoteness of the time at which, if at all, it 
is to come into possession. As to the intensity of the pleasures 
which a man may derive from it, this is never thought of, be- 
cause it depends upon the use which each particular person may 
come to make of it; which cannot be estimated till the par- 
ticular pleasures he may come to derive from it, or the particular 
pains he may come to exclude by means of it, are brought to 
view. For the same reason, neither does he think of the /e^ 
eundity or purity of those pleasures. 

Thus much for pleasure and pain, happiness and unhappiness^ 
in general. We come now to consider the several particular 
kinds of pain and pleasure. 



CHAPTER V. 

PLBASUEES AND PAINS, THEIB KINDS. 

I. Having represented what belongs to all sorts of pleasures Heasores 

And TlAITlfl 

and pains alike, we come now to exhibit, each by itself, the are either 
several sorts of pains and pleasures. Fains and pleasures may or, 2. (S>m« 
be called by one general word, interesting perceptions. Interest- 
ing perceptions are either simple or complex. The simple ones 
are those which cannot any one of them be resolved into more : 
complex are those which are resolvable into divers simple 
ones. A complex interesting perception may accordingly be 
composed either, i. Of pleasures alone: 2. Of pains alone: 
or, 3. Of a pleasure or pleasures, and a pain or pains to- 
gether. What determines a lot of pleasure, for example, to be 
regarded as one complex pleasure, rather than as divers simple 
ones, is the nature of the exciting cause. Whatever pleasures 
are excited all at once by the action of the same cause, are apt 
to be looked upon as constituting all together but one pleasure. 

II. The several simple pleasures of which human nature is The simple 
susceptible, seem to be as follows : i. The pleasures of sense. eiS^S»d. 
2. The pleasures of wealth. 3. The pleasures of skilL 4. The 
pleasures of amity. 5. The pleasures of a good name. 6. The 
pleasures of power. 7. The pleasures of piety. 8, The pleasures 

of benevolence. 9. The pleasures of malevolence. 10. The plea- 
sures of memory. 11. The pleasures of imagination. 12. The 
pleasures of expectation. 13. The pleasures dependent on asso- 
ciation. 14. The pleasures of relief. 

UI. The several simple pains seem to be as follows: i. The The simple 
pains of privation* 2. The pains of the senses, 3. The pains of enumentocU 



34 



Pleasures aiid Pains. [chap. 



awkwardDess. 4. The pains of enmity. 5. The pains of an ill 
name. 6. The pains of piety. *j. The pains of benevolence- 
8. The pains of malevolence. 9. The pains of the memory. 
10. The pains of the imagination. 1 1. The pains of expectation. 
12. The pains dependent on association^. 
PleasureBof IV. I. The pleasures of sense seem to be as follows: i. The 
mSitS"' pleasures of the taste or palate ; including whatever pleasures 
are experienced in satisfying the appetites of hunger and thirst. 
2. The pleasure of intoxication. 3. The pleasures of the organ 
of smelling. 4. The pleasures of the touch. 5. The simple 
pleasures of the ear ; independent of association. 6. The simple 
pleasures of the eye; independent of association. 7. The plea- 
sure of the sexual sense. 8. The pleasure of health : or, the 
internal pleasureable feeling or flow of spirits (as it is called,) 
which accompanies a state of full health and vigour ; especially 
:at tunes of moderate bodily exertion. 9. The pleasures of novelty : 
or, the pleasures derived from the gratification of the appetite 
of curiosity,' by the application of new objects to any of the 
senses \ 
Pleasures of V. 2. By the pleasures of wealth may be meant those plea- 
which are sures which a nmn is apt to derive &om the consciousness of 
«M)i!dsition possessing any article or articles which stand in the list of in- 
sessicS!** struments of enjoyment or security, and more particularly at the 
time of his first acquiring them ; at which time the pleasure 
may be styled a pleasure of gain or a pleasure of acquisition : at 
other times a pleasure of possession. 
3. Pleasures 3* The pleasures of skill, as exercised upon particular objects, 

of skill. 

Analytical ^ Tbo Catalogue here given, is what seemed to be a complete list of the 

riven^^^ "°"' several simple pleasures and pains of which human nature is susceptible : 
insomuch, that if, upon any occasion whatsoever, a man feels pleasure or 
pain, it is either referable at once to some one or other of these kinds, or 
resolvable into such as are. It might perhaps have been a satis&ction to 
the reader, to have seen an analytical view of the subject, taken upon an 
exhaustive plan, for the purpose of dononstrating the oatalogue to be what 
it purports to be, a complete one. The catalogrue is in fact the result of 
such an analysis ; which, however, J thought it better to discard at present, 
as being of too metaphysical a cast, and not strictly within the limits of this 
design. See ch. xiii. [Cases unmeet], par. 2. Note. 

' There are also pleasures of novelty, excited by the appearance of new 
ideas : these are pleasures of the imagination. See in&a xiii. 



v.] Pleasures and Pains, 35 

are those which accompany the application of such particular 
instruments of enjoyment to their uses, as cannot he so applied 
without a greater or less share of difficulty or exertion \ 

VI. 4. The pleasures of amity, or self-recommendation, are the 4. Pleasures 
pleasures that may accompany the persuasion of a man's heing 

in thje acquisition or the possession of the good-will of such or 
such assignahle person or persons in particular : or, as the phrase 
is, of heing upon good terms with him or them: and as. a fruit 
of it, of his being in a way to have the benefit of their spon- 
taneous and gratuitous services. 

VII. «. The pleasures of a good name are the pleasures that «. Pleasures 

. . . ... of a good 

accompany the persuasion of a man's being in the acquisition name. 
or the possession of the good-will of the world about him ; that 
is, of such members of society as he is likely to have concerns 
with ; and as a means of it, either their love or their esteem, or 
both : and as a fruit of it, of his being in the way to have the 
benefit of their spontaneous and gratuitous services. These may 
likewise be called the pleasures of good repute, the pleasures of 
honour, or the pleasures of the moral sanction ^. 

VIII. 6. The pleasures of power are the pleasures that ac- 6. Pleasures 
company the persuasion of a man's being in a condition to dis- 
pose people, by means of their hopes and fears, to give him the 
benefit of their services : that is, by the hope of some service, or 

by the fear of some disservice, that he may be in the way to 
render them. 

IX. 7. The pleasures of piety are the pleasures that accompany 7- Pleasures 
the belief of a man's being in the acquisition or in possession of 

the good- will or favour of the Supreme Being : and as a fruit of 
it, of his being in a way of enjojring pleasures to be received by 
God's special appointment, either in this life, or in a life to 
come. These may also be called the pleasures of religion, the 

* For instance, the pleasure of being able to gratify the sense of hearing, 
by singing, or performing upon any musical instrument. The pleasure thus 
obtained, is a thing superadded to, and perfectly distinguishable from, that 
which a man enjoys from hearing another person perform in the same 
manner. 

^ See ch. iii. [Sanctions]. 

D 2 



3^ Pleasures and Pains, [chap. 

pleasures of a religious disposition, or the pleasures of the 
religious sanction ^. 

8. Pleasures X. 8. The pleasures of benevolence are the pleasures resulting 
lence or from the view of any pleasures supposed to be possessed by the 

beings who may be the objects of benevolence ; to wit, the sensi- 
tive beings we are acquainted with ; under which are commonly 
included, i. The Supreme Being. 2. Human beings. 3. Other 
animals. These may also be called the pleasures of good-will, 
the pleasures of sympathy, or the pleasures of the benevolent or 
social affections. 

9. Heasupes XI. o. The pleasures of malevolence are the pleasures result- 
lenoe or ill- mg from the View of any pam supposed to be suiiered by the 

beings who may become the objects of malevolence : to wit, 
I. Human beings. 2. Other animals. These may also be styled 
the pleasures of ill-will, the pleasures of. the irascible appetite, 
the pleasures of antipathy, or the pleasures of the malevolent or 
dissocial affections, 
ij- pleasures XII. lo. The pleasures of the memory are the pleasures which, 
memory. after having enjoyed such and such pleasures, or even in some 
case after having suffered such and such pains, a man will now 
and then experience, at recollecting them exactly in the order 
and in the circumstances in which they were actually enjoyed or 
suffered. These derivative pleasures may of course be distin- 
guished into as many species as there are of original perceptions, 
from whence they may be copied. They may also be styled 
pleasures of simple recollection. 
iLPleasurea XIII. II. The pleasures of the imagination are the pleasures 
imagination, which may be derived from the contemplation of any such 
pleasures as may happen to be suggested by the memory, but in 
a different order, and accompanied by different groups of circum- 
jstances. These may accordingly be referred to any one of the 
three cardinal points of time, present, past, or future. It is 
evident they may admit of as many distinctions as those of the 
former class. 
i2.Plea8urea XIV. 12. The pleasures of expectation are the pleasures that 

^ See ch. iii. [Sanctions]/ 



v.] Pleasures and Pains. 37 

result from the coDtemplation of any sort of pleasure, referred of expecta- 
to time future, and accompanied with the sentiment of belief. 
These also may admit of the same distinctions ^. 

XV. 13. The pleasures of association are the pleasures which is. Pleasures 
certain objects or incidents may happen to afford, not of them- on associa- 
selves, but merely in virtue of some association they have con- 
tracted in the mind with certain objects or incidents which are 

in themselves pleasurable. Such is the case, for instance, with 
the pleasure of skill, when afforded by such a set of incidents as 
compose a game of chess. This derives its pleasurable quality 
from its association partly with the pleasures of skill, as exer- 
cised in the production of incidents pleasurable of themselves : 
partly from its association with the pleasures of power. Such is 
the case also with the pleasure of good luck, when afforded by 
such incidents as compose the game of hazard, or any other game 
of chance, when played at for nothing. This derives its plea- 
surable quality from its association with one of the pleasures of 
wealth ; to wit, with the pleasure of acquiring it. 

XVI. 14. Farther on we shall see pains grounded upon plea- w.PieMures 
sures ; in like manner may we now see pleasures grounded upon 

pains. To the catalogue of pleasures may accordingly be added 
the pleasures of relief: or, the pleasures which a man experiences 
when, after he has been enduring a pain of any kind for a certain 
time, it comes to cease, or to abate. These may of course be 
distinguished into as many species as there are of pains : and 
may give rise to so many pleasures of memory, of imagination, 
and of expectation. 

XVII. I. Pains of privation are the pains that may result i- ^aV?^ ^^ 

' *^ ^ ^ •' . privation. 

from the thought of not possessing in the time present any of 
the several kinds of pleasures. Pains of privation may accord- 
ingly be resolved into as many kinds as there are of pleasures to 
which they may correspond, and from the absence whereof they 
may be derived. 

XVIII. There are three sorts of pains which are only so T^iese in- 

^ In contradistinction to these, all other pleftsures may be tenued plea- 
sures of enjoyment. 



38 



Pleasures and Pains, 



[chap. 



1. Fains of 
desire. 



2. Pains of 
disappoint- 
ment. 



S. Pains of 
regret. 



2. Pains of 
the senses. 



many modifications of the several pains of privation. When the 
enjoyment of any particular pleasure happens to be particularly 
desired, but without any expectation approaching to assurance, 
the pain of privation which thereupon results takes a particular 
name, and is called the pain of desire, or of unsatisfied desire. 

XIX. Where the enjoyment happens to have been looked for 
with a degree of expectation approaching to assurance, and that 
expectation is made suddenly to cease, it is called a pain of dis- 
appointment. 

XX. A pain of privation takes the name of a pain of regret 
in two cases: i. Where it is grounded on the memory of a 
pleasure, which having been once enjoyed, appears not likely to 
be enjoyed again: 2. Where it is grounded on the idea of a 
pleasure, which was never actually enjoyed, nor perhaps so much 
as expected, but which might have been enjoyed (it is supposed,) 
had such or such a contingency happened, which, in fact, did 
not happen. 

XXI. 2. The several pains of the senses seem to be as fol- 
lows: I. The pains of hunger and thirst: or the disagreeable 
sensations produced by the want of suitable substances which 
need at times to be applied to the alimentary canal. 2. The 
pains of the taste : or the disagreeable sensations produced by the 
application of various substances to the palate, and other supe- 
rior parts of the same canal. 3. The pains of the organ of 
smell : or the disagreeable sensations produced by the effluvia 
of various substances when applied to that organ. 4. The pains 
of the touch : or the disagreeable sensations produced by the ap- 
plication of various substances to the skin. 5. The simple pains 
of the hearing: or the disagreeable sensations excited in the 
organ of that sense by various kinds of sounds : independently 
(as before,) of association. 6. The simple pains of the sight : or 
the disagreeable sensations if any such there be, that may be 
excited in the organ of that sense by visible images, independent 
of the principle of association. 7 ^. The pains resulting from 



No positive 
pains corre- 
spond to the 



^ The pleasure of the sexual sense seems to have no positive pain to 
correspond to it : it has only a pain of privation, or pain of the mental 



▼•] Pleasures and Pains. 39 

excessive heat or cold, unless these be referable to the touch. 
8. The pains of disease : or the acute and uneasy sensations 
resulting from the several diseases and indispositions to which 
human nature is liable. 9. The pain of exertion, whether bodily 
or mental : or the uneasy sensation which is apt to accompany 
any intense effort, whether of mind or body. 

XXII. 3^. The pains of awkwardness are the pains which 8. Pains of 
sometimes result from the unsuccessful endeavour to apply any ness. 
particular instruments of enjoyment or security to their uses, or 
from the difficulty a man experiences in applying them". 

XXm. 4. The pains of enmity are the pains that may accom- 4. P^ins of 
pany the perauasion of a man's being obnoxious to the ill-will of 
such or such an assignable person or persons in particular : or, 
as the phrase is, of being upon ill terms with him or them : and, 
in consequence, of being obnoxious to certain pains of some sort 
or other, of which he may be the cause. 

XXIY. 5. The pains of an ill-name, are the pains that ac- 6. Fains of 

, , . . an ill name, 

company the persuasion of a man's being obnoxious, or in a way 

to be obnoxious to the ill-will of the world about him. These 
may likewise be called the pains of ill-repute, the pains of dis- 
honour, or the pains of the moral sanction '. 

class, the pain of unsatisfied desire. K any positive pain of body result jJSuS'^iMc** 
from the want of such indulgence, it belongs to the head of pains of disease. 

^ The pleasures of novelty have no positive pains corresponding to them. No positire 
The pain which a man experiences when he is in the condition of not know- spomi^o^e 
ing what to do with himself, that pain, which in French is expressed by a jJl^^JJ* **' 
single word ennui, is a pain of privation : a pain resulting from the absence, 
not only of aU the pleasures of novelty, but 6f aU kinds of pleasure whatso- 
ever. 

The pleasures of wealth have also no positive pains corresponding to ^ J^^*^** 
them : the only pains opposed to them are pains of privation. If any posi- 
tive pains result from the want of wealth, they are referable to some other 
class of positive pains ; principally to those of the senses. From the want 
of food, for instance, result the pains of> hunger ; from the want of clothing, 
the pains of cold ; and so forth. 

* It may be a question, perhaps, whether this be a positive pain of itself, ^^.J^ij^Jg 
or whether it be nothing more than a pain of privation, resulting from the pain, or only a 
consciousness of a want of skill. It is, however, but a question of words, JSSrtioni 
nor does it matter which way it be determined. 

' In as far as a man*s fellow-creatures are supposed to be determined by The positive 
any event not to regard him with any degree of esteem or good will, or to SJJSI, anTthe 
regard him with a less degree of esteem or good will than they would other- p«ns of pnva- 



40 Pleasures and Pains. [chap. 

e-Pftinsof XXV. 6\ The pains of piety are the pains that accompany 

* ^* the belief of a man's being obnoxious to the displeasure of the 

Supreme Being : and in consequence to certain pains to be 

inflicted by his especial appointment, either in this life or in a 

life to come. These may also be called the pains of religion ; 

the pains of a religious disposition ; or the pains of the religious 

sanction. When the belief is looked upon as well-grounded, 

these pains are commonly called religious terrors ; when looked 

upon as ill-grounded, superstitious terrors ^. 

j.Riiiisof XXVI. 7. The pains of benevolence are the pains resulting 
benevolence. , * o 

from the view of any pains supposed to be endured by other 
beings. These may also be called the pains of good-will, of 
sympathy, or the pains of the benevolent or social affections. 

8. Pains of XXVII. 8. The pains of malevolence are the pains resulting 

XQ&l6VOlfillG6. 

from the view of any pleasures supposed to be enjoyed by any 
beings who happen to be the objects of a man's displeasure; 
These may also be styled the pains of ill-will, of antipathy, or 
the pains of the malevolent or dis-social affections. 

9. Pftins of XXVIII. 9. The pains of the memory may be grounded on 

' every one of the above kinds, as weU of pains of privation as 
of positive pains. These correspond exactly to the pleasures of 
the memory. 

10. Pains of XXIX. 10. The pains of the imagination may also be grounded 

tion, opposed wise ; not to do him any sorts of good offices, or not to do him so many 
pleasures of a 900^ offices as they would otherwise ; the pain resulting from such consider- 
good name. ation may be reckoned a pain of privation : as far as they are supposed to 
another. regard him with such a degree of aversion or disesteem as to be disposed to 

do him positive Ul offices, it may be reckoned a positive pain. The pain of 

privation, and the positive pain, in this case run one into another indis- 

tinguishably. 
^n?corre- ^ There seem to be no positive pains to correspond to the pleasures of 

spond to the power. The pains that a man may feel from the want or the loss of power, 
p(^ar.'^^ °^ in as far as power is distinguished from all other sources of pleasure, seem 

to be nothing more than pains of privation. 
The positive » The positive pains of piety, and the pains of privation, opposed to the 
and the pains' pleasures of piety, run one into another in the same manner as the positive 
opp"sed'to'the P*"^^ of enmity, or of an ill name, do with respect to the pains of privation, 
pleasures of opposcd to the pleasures of amity, and thos3 of a good name. If what is 
op?aiiSher'° apprehended at the hands of God is barely the not receiving pleasure, the 

pain is of the privative class : if, moreover, actual pain be apprehended, it 

is of the class of positive pains. 



v.] Pleasures and Pains. 4^ 

on any one of the above kinds, as well of pains of privation as theima«ina- 
of positive pains : in other respects they correspond exactly to 
the pleasures of the imagination. 

XXX. 1 1. The pains of expectation may be grounded on each Jiu5uSd<« 
one of the above kinds, as well of pains of privation as of posi- 
tive pains. These may be also termed pains of apprehension ^. 

XXXI. 12. The pains of association correspond exactly to^*-^**^**^ 

*^ ^ I J association. 

the pleasures of association. 
• XXXII. Of the above list there are certain pleasures and Rawures 

^ and pains 

pains which suppose the existence of some pleasure or pain **^^®i*^®[, 
of some other person, to which the pleasure or pain of the per- ingorextra- 

, regarding. 

son in question has regar4 : such pleasures and pains may be 
termed eoctrorregarding. Others do not suppose any such thing : 
these may be termed self-rega/rding *. The only pleasures and 
pains of the extra-regarding class are those of benevolence and 
those of malevolence : all the rest are self-regarding ^. 

XXXIII. Of all these several sorts of pleasures and pains, there in what 
is scarce any one which is not liable, on more accounts than one, law is con- 
to come under the consideration of the law. Is an offence com-|the above 
mitted ? it is the tendency which it has to destroy, in such orlpieasures. 
such persons, some of these pleasures, or to produce some of 
these pains, that constitutes the mischief of it, and the ground 
for punishing it. It is the prospect of some of these pleasures, 
or of security from some of these pains^ that constitutes the 
motive or temptation, it is the attainment of them that consti- i 
tutes the profit of the offence. Is the offender to be punished ? < 
It can be only by the production of one or more of these pains, J 
that the punishment can be inflicted \ 

^ In contradiBtinction to these, all other pains may be termed pains of 
sufferance. 

* See chap. x. [Motives]. 

' By this means the pleasures and pains of amity may be the more Pleasures and 
clearly distinguished from those of benevolence : and on the other hand, ^enmity'^^ 
those of enmity from those of malevolence. The pleasures and pains of 1^'*°^'^^^ 
amity and enmity are of the self-regarding cast : those of benevolence and beneToience 
malevolence of the extra-regarding. Sk ™*^**° 

* It would be a matter not only of curiosity, but of some use, to exhibit complex 

ft catalogue of the several complex pleasures and pains, analyzing them at pleasures and 
the same time into the several simple ones, of which they are respectively £h^ °"^*^ ' 



4« 



Pleasures and Pains, 



Spednien. 
Pleasures of ; 
country 
prospect. 



compofled. But such a diBquiaition would take up too much room to be ad- 
mitted here. A short specimen, however, for the purpose of illustratiou, 
can hardly be dispensed with. 

The pleasures taken in at the eye and ear are generally very complex^ 
The pleasures of a country scene, for instance, consist commonly, amongst 
othere, of the following pleasures : 

I. Pleasures of the senses. 

1. The simple pleasures of sight, excited by the perception of agreeable 
colours and figures, green fields, waving foliage, glistening water, and the 
like. 

2. The simple pleasures of the ear, excited by the perceptions of the 
chirping of birds, the murmuring of waters, the rustling of the wind among 
the trees. 

3. The pleasures of the smell, excited by the perceptions of the firagrance 
of flowers, of new-mown hay, or other v^etable substances, in the first 
stages of fermentation. 

4. The agreeable inward sensation, produced by a brisk circulation of 
the blood, and the ventilation of it in tne lungs by a pure air, such as that 
in the country frequently is in comparison of that which is breathed in 
tewns. 

It. Pleasures of the imagination produced by association. 

1. The idea of the plenty, resulting from the possession of the objects 
that are in view, and of the happiness arising from it. 

2. The idea of the innocence and happiness of the birds, sheep, cattle, 
dogs, and other gentle or domestic animals. 

3. The idea of the constant flow of health, supposed to be enjoyed by all 
these creatures : a notion which is apt te result from the occasional flow of 
health enjoyed by the supposed spectator. 

4. The idea of gratitude, excited by the contemplation of the all-powerful 
and beneficent Bmng, who is looked up to as the author of these blessings. 

These four last are all of them, in some measure at least, pleasures of 
sympathy. 

The depriving a man of this groupe of pleasures is one of the evils apt to 
result firom imprisonment ; whether produced by illegal violence, or in the 
way of punifibment, by appointment of the laws. 



CHAPTER VI. 



OP CIRGUMSTANGBS nrPLUEKCINO SBNSIBILrrT. 

I. Pain and pleasure are produced in men's minds by the Piinand 

,. - . -r^i •1.1 -T* ploasurenot 

action of certain causes. But the quantity of pleasure and pain uniformly 
runs not uniformly in proportion to the cause ; in other words, tioned to 
to the quantity of force exerted by such cause. The truth of 
this observation rests not upon any metaphysical nicety in the 
import given to the terms catise, quantity, and force : it will 
be equally true in whatsoever manner such force be measured. 

II. The disposition which any one has to feel such or such a Degree or 
quantity of pleasure or pain, upon the application of a cause of qfaensibi- 
given force, is what we term the degree or quantum of his 
sensibility. This may be either general, referring to the sum 

of the causes that act upon him during a given period : or par- 
ticular, referring to the action of any one particular cause, or 
sort of cause. 

III. But in the same mind such and such causes of pain or Bias or 

, . quality of 

pleasure will produce more pain or pleasure than such or such sensibility, 
other causes of pain or pleasure : and this proportion will in 
different minds be different. The disposition which any one has 
to have the proportion in which he is affected by two such 
causes, different from that in which another man is affected 
by the same two causes, may be termed the quality or bias of 
his sensibility. One man, for instance, may be most affected 
by the pleasures of the taste ; another by those of the ear. So 
also, if there be a difference in the nature or proportion of two 
pains or pleasures which they respectively experience £rom the 
same cause; a case not so frequent as the former. From the 
same injury^ for instance, one man may feel the same quantity 



44 Of Circumslances influencing Sensibility. [chap. 

of grief and resentment together as another man: but one of 

them shall feel a greater share of grief tlian of resentment : the 

other, a greater share of resentment than of grief. 

Bxoitiiig lY. Any incident which serves as a cause, either of pleasure 

pleasurable or of pain, may be termed an exciting cause : if of pleasure, a 

' pleasurable cause : if of pain, a painful, afflictive, or dolorific 

cause \ 

^oesin- ^* ^^^ *^® quantity of pleasure, or of pain, which a man is 
TOMiSmly, ^^^^ *® experience upon the application of an exciting cause, 
what. since they will not depend altogether upon that cause, will de- 

pend in some measure upon some other circumstance or circum- 
stances : these circumstances, whatsoever they be, may be termed 
circumstances influencing sensibility \ 
Ciionm- VI. These circumstances will apply differently to different 

fluencing excitmg causes ; insomuch that to a certain exciting cause, a 

sensibility ... « i, , 11 i • i 7 n 1 

enumerated, certam Circumstance shall not apply at all, which shall apply 
with great force to another exciting cause. But without enter- 
ing for the present into these distinctions, it may be of use to 
sum up all the circumstances which can be found to influence 
the effect of omy exciting cause. These, as on a former occasion,, 
it may be as well first to sum up together in the concisest manner 
possible, and afterwards to allot a few words to the separate ex- 
planation of each article. They seem to be as follows : i. Health. 
2. Strength. 3. Hardiness. 4. Bodily imperfection. 5. Quan- 
tity and quality of knowledge. 6. Strength of intellectual 
powers. 7. Firmness of mind. 8. Steadiness of mind. 9. Bent 
of inclination. 10. Moral sensibility. 11. Moral biases. 12. B,e- 

^ The exciting cause, the pleasure or pain produced by it, and the inten- 
tion produced by such pleasure or pain in the character of a motive, are 
objects so intimately connected, that, in what follows, I fear I have not, on 
every occasion, been able to keep them sufficiently distinct. I thought it 
necessary to give the reader this warning ; after which, should there be 
found any such mistakes, it is to be hoped they will not be productive of 
much confusion. 

^ Thus, in physical bodies, the momentum of a ball put in motion by 
impulse, will be influenced by the circumstance of gravity : being in some 
directions increased, in others diminished by it. So in a ship, put in motion 
by the wind, the momentum. and direction will be influenced not only by 
the attraction of gravity, but by the motion and resistance of the water, and 
several other circumstances. 



Ti.] Of Circumstances influencing Sensibility, 45 

ligious sensibility. 13. B«ligious biases. 14. Sympathetic sen" 
sibility. 15. Sympathetic biases. 16. Antipathetic sensibility. 
17. Antipathetic biases. 18. Insanity. 19. Habitual occupa- 
tions. 20. Pecuniary circumstances. 21. Connexions in the 
way of sympathy. 22. Connexions in the way of antipathy. 
23. Radical frame of body. 24. Radical frame of mind. 25. Sex. 
26. Age. 27. Rank. 28. Education. 29. Climate. 30. Lineage. 
31. Q-overnment. 32. Religious profession ^. 

VII. I. Health is the absence of disease, and consequently of 1. Health, 
all those kinds of pain which are among the symptoms of disease. 
A man may be said to be in a state of health when he is not 
conscious of any uneasy sensations, the primary seat of which 
can be perceived to be anywhere in his body *. In point 'of 

* An analytical view of all these circumstances will be given at the con- Extent and in- 
clusion of the chapter : to which place it was necessary to refer it, as it subject^ 
could not well have been understood, till some of them had been previously 
explained. 

To search out the vast variety of exciting or moderating causes, by which 
the degree or bias of a man's sensibility may be influenced, to define the 
boundaries of each, to extricate them from the entanglements in which they 
are involved, to lay the effect of each article distinctly before the reader's 
eye, is, perhaps, if not absolutely the most difficult task, at least one of the 
most difficult tasks, within the compass of moral physiology. Disquisitions 
on this head can never be completely satisfactory without examples. To 
provide a sufficient collection of such examples, would be a work of great 
labour as well as nicety : history and biography would need to be ran- 
sacked : a vast course of reading would need to be travelled through on 
purpose. By such a process the present work would doubtless have been 
rendered more amusing ; but in point of bulk, so enormous, that this single 
chapter would have been swelled into a considerable volume. Feigned 
cases, although they may upon occasion serve to render the general matter 
tolerably intelligible, can never be sufficient to render it palatable. On 
this therefore, as on so many other occasions, I must confine myself to dry 
and general instruction : discarding illustration, although sensible that 
without it instruction cannot manifest half ito efficacy. The subject, how- 
ever, is so difficult, and so new, that I shall think I have not ill succeeded, 
if, without pretending to exhaust it, I shall have been able to mark out the 
principal points of view, and to put the matter in such a method as may 
^cilitate the researches of happier inquirers. 

The great difficulty lies in the nature of the words ; which are not, like 
pain and pleasure, names of homogeneous real entities, but names of various 
fictitious entities, for which no common genus is to be found : and which 
therefore, without a vast and roundabout chain of investigation, can never 
be brought under any exhaustive plan of arrangement, but must be picked 
up here and there as they happen to occur. 

- ' It may be thought, that in a certain degree of health, this negative 
account of the matter hardly comes up to the case. In a certain degree of 



4<S 



Of Circuf9istances influencing SenaibUitf. [cHap. 



3.Hardi 
ness. 



general Bensibility, a man who is under the pressure of any 
bodily indisposition, or, as the phrase is, is in an ill state of 
health, is less sensible to the influence of any pleasurable cause, 
and more so to that of any afflictive one, than if he were well. 
2.8tirQn^h. VIII. 2. The Circumstance of strength, though in point of 
causality closely connected with that of health, is perfectly dis- 
tinguishable from it. The same man will indeed generally be 
stronger in a good state of health than in a bad one. But one 
man, even in a bad state of health, may be stronger than another 
even in a good one. Weakness is a common concomitant of 
disease : but in consequence of his radical frame of body, a man 
may be weak all his life long, without experiencing any disease. 
Health, as we have observed, is principally a negative circum- 
stance : strength a positive one. The degree of a man's strength 
can be measured with tolerable accuracy \ 

IX. 3. Hardiness is a circumstance which, though closely con- 
nected with that of strength, is distinguishable from it. Hardi- 
ness is the absence of irritability. Irritability respects either 
pain, resulting from the action of mechanical causes ; or disease, 
resulting from the action of causes purely physiological. Irrita- 
bility, in the former sense, is the disposition to undergo a greater 

health, there ifi often such a kind of feeling diffused over the whole frame, 
such a comfortable feel, or flow of spirits, as it is called, as may with pro- 
priety come under the head of positive pleasure. But without experiencing 
any such pleasurable feeling, if a man experience no painful one, he may be 
wdl enough said to be in health. 

^ The most accurate measure that can be given of a man's strength, seems 
to be that which is taken from the weight or number of pounds and ounces 
he can lift with his hands in a given attitude. This indeed relates imme- 
diately only to his arms : but these are the organs of strength which are 
most employed ; of which the strength corresponds with most exactness to 
the general state of the body with regard to strength ; and in which the 
quantum of strength is easiest measured. StrengUi may accordingly be 
distinguished into general and pourticular. 

Weakness is a negative term, and imports the absence of strength. It 
is, besides, a relative term, and accordingly imports the absence of such a 
quantity of strength as makes the share, possessed by the person in ques- 
tion, less than that of some person he is compared to. Weakness, when it 
is at such a degree as -to make it painful for a man to perform the motions 
necessary to the going through the ordinary functions of life, such as to get 
up, to walk, to dress one's self, and so forth, brings the circumstance of 
health into question, and puts a man into that sort of condition in which 
he is said to be in ill hisaltll^ 



Measure of 
streneth, the 
weient a 
canlift. 



man 



Weakness, 

what 



VI.] Of Cireumstances injlumcing Sensibility. 47 

or leas degree of pain upon the application of a mechanical 
eanse ; such as are most of those applications by which simple 
afflictive punishments are inflicted, as whipping, beating, and the 
like. In the latter sense, it is the disposition to contract disease 
with greater or less facility, upon the application of any instru- 
ment acting on the body by its physiological properties ; as in 
the case of fevers, or of colds, or other inflammatory diseases, 
produced by the application of damp air : or to experience im- 
mediate uneasiness, as in the case of relaxation or chilliness 
produced by an over or under proportion of the matter of heat. 

Hardiness, even in the sense in which it is opposed to the action Difference 
of mechanical causes, is distinguishable from strength. The ex- stranf^h 
temal indications of strength are the abundance and firmness of ^ss. 
the muscular fibres : those of hardiness, in this sense, are the 
firmness of the muscular fibres, and the callosity of the skin. 
Strength is more peculiarly the gift of nature: hardiness, of 
education. Of two persons who have had, the one the education 
of a gentleman, the other, that of a common sailor, the first 
may be the stronger, at the same time that the other is the 
hardier. 

X. 4. By bodily imperfection may be understood that con- 4. Bodily 
dition which a person is in, who either stands distinguished by tion. 
any remarkable deformity, or wants any of those parts or facul- 
ties, which the ordinary run of persons of the same sex and age 

are furnished with : who, for instance, has a hare-lip, is deaf, or 
has lost a hand. This circumstance, like that of ill-health, tends 
in general to diminish more or less the effect of any pleasurable 
circumstance, and to increase that of any afflictive one. The 
effect of this circumstance, however, admits of great variety : 
inasmuch as there are a great variety of ways in which a man 
may suffer in his personal appearance, and in his bod^y organs 
and faculties : all which differences will be taken notice of in 
their proper places \ 

XI. 5. So much for circumstances belonging to the condition 5 Quantity 
of the body : we come now to those which concern the con- ^fn^^*^ 

> See B. I. Tit. [Irwp. oorp. Injuries]. ^®^*^ 



48 Of Circumstances influencing Sensibility, [chap. 

dition of the mind : the use of mentioning these will be seen 
hereafter. In the first place may be reckoned the quantity and 
quality of the knowledge the person in question happens to 
possess: that is, of the ideas which he has actually in store, 
ready upon occasion to call to mind ; meaning such ideas as are 
in some way or other of an interesting nature : that is, of a 
nature in some way or other to influence his happiness, or that 
of other men. When these ideas are many, and of importance, 
a man is said to be a man of knowledge ; when few, or not of 
importance, ignorant, 
e. Strength XII. 6. By strength of intellectual powers may be understood 
tuai powers, the degree of facility which a man experiences in his endeavours 
to call to mind as well such ideas as have been already aggre- 
gated to his stock of knowledge, as any others, which, upon any 
occasion that may happen, he may conceiye a desire to place 
there. It seems to be on some such occasion as this that the 
words parts and talents are commonly employed. To this head 
may be referred the several qualities of readiness of apprehen* 
sion, accuracy and tenacity of memory, strength of attention, 
clearness of discernment, amplitude of comprehension, vividity 
and rapidity of imagination. Strength of intellectual powers, in 
general, seems to correspond pretty exactly to general strength 
of body : as any of these qualities in particular does to particular 
strength, 
^f SS^^" XIII. 7. Firmness of mind on the one hand, and irritability 
on the other, regard the proportion between the degrees of effi- 
cacy with which a man is acted upon by an exciting cause, of 
which the value lies chiefly in magnitude, and one of which 
the value lies chiefly in j)ropinquity \ A man may be said 
to be of a firm mind, when small pleasures or pains, which are 
present or near, do not aflect him, in a greater proportion to 
their value, than greater pleasures or pains, which are uncertain 
or remote ^ ; of an irritable mind, when the contrary is the 
case. 

* See chap. iv. [Value]. 

' When, for instf^nce, having been determined, by the prospect of some 



VI.] Of Circumstances influencing Sensibility. 49 

XIV. 8. Steadiness regards the time during which a given s. Steadi- 
exciting cause of a given value continues to affect a man in 
nearly the same manner and degree as at first, no assignable 
external event or change of circumstances intervening to make 

an alteration in its force ^. 

XV. g. By the bent of a man's inclinations may be under- 9. Bent of 

. . inclinations. 

stood the propensity he has to expect pleasure or pain from cer- 
tain objects, rather than from others. A man's inclinatioiis may 
be said to have such or such a bent, when, amongst the several 
sorts of objects which afford pleasure in some degree to all men, 
he is apt to expect more pleasure from one particular sort, than 
from another particular sort, or more from any given particular 
sort, than another man would expect from that sort ; or when, 
amongst the several sorts of objects, which to one man afford 
pleasure, whilst to another they afford none, he is apt to expect, 
or not to expect, pleasure from an object of such or such a sort : 
so also with regard to pains. This circumstance, though inti- 
mately connected with that of the bias of a man's sensibility, is 
not undistinguishable from it The quantity of pleasure or pain, 
which on any given occasion a man may experience from an 
application of any sort, may be greatly influenced by the ex- 
pectations he has been used to entertain of pleasure or pain from 
that quarter ; but it will not be absolutely determined by them : 
for pleasure or pain may come upon him from a quarter from 
which he was not accustomed to expect it. 

XVI. 10. The circumstances of moral, religious, sympathetie, io.Morai 
and antipatJietic sensibility, when closely considered, will appear 

to be included in some sort under that of bent of inclination. On 

inoonvemence, not to disclose a fiict, although he should be put to the rack, 
he perseveres in such resolution after the rack is brought into his presence^ 
and even applied to him. 

^ The focility with which children grow tired of their play-things, and 
throw them away, is an instance of unsteadiness : the perseverance with 
which a merchant applies himself to his traffic^ or an author to his book, 
may be taken for an instance of the oontraiy. It is difficult to judge of the 
quantity of pleasure or pain in these cases, but from the effects ^%hich it 
produces in the character of a motive : and even then it is difficult to pro- 
nounce, whether the change of conduct happens by the extinction of the old 
pleasure or pain, or by the intervention of a new one. 

E 



50 Cf Circumstanees injluencmg Sensibility, [chap. 

account of their particular importance they may, however, be 
worth mentioning apart. A man's moral sensibility may be said 
to be strong, when the pains and pleasures of the moral sanc- 
tion^ show greater in his eyes, in comparison with other pleasures 
and pains (and consequently exert a stronger influence) than in 
the eyes of the persons he is compared with; in other words, 
when he is acted on with more than ordinary efficacy by the 
sense of honour : it may be said to be weak, when the contrary 
is the case. 

bii^"^ XVII. 1 1. Moral sensibility seems to regard the average effect 

or influence of the pains and pleasures of the moral sanction, 
upon all sorts of occasions to which it is applicable, or happens 
to be applied. It regards the average force or qvantity of the 
impulses the mind receives from that source during a given 
period. Moral bias regards the particular acts on which, upon 
so many particular occasions, the force of that sanction is looked 
upon as attaching. It regards the quality or direction of those 
impulses. It admits of as many varieties, therefore, as there are 
dictates which the moral sanction may be conceived to issue 
forth. A man may be said to have such or such a moral bias, 
or to have a moral bias in favour of such or such an action, 
when he looks upon it as being of the number of those of which 
the performance is dictated by the moral sanction. 

senSb^t^"* XVIII. 12. What has been said with regard to moral sensi- 
bility, may be applied, mtUatis mutamdis, to religious. 

13. Religious XIX. 1 3. What has been said with regard to moral biases, 
may also be applied, mutatis m^tandisy to religious biases. 

J*-Sympa- XX. 14. By sympathetic sensibility is to be understood the 

sibiiity. propensity that a man has to derive pleasure from the happi- 
ness, and pain from the unhappiness, of other sensitive beings. 
It is the stronger, the greater the ratio of the pleasure or pain 
he feels on their account is to that of the pleasure or pain which 
(according to what appears to him) they feel for themselves. 

JJ-Sympar XXI. 1 5. Sympathetic bias regards the description of the 
parties who are the objects of a man's S3mipathy: and of the 

^ See ch. v. [Pleasures and Pains]. 



VI.] Of Circumstances influencing Sensibility. 51 

acts or other circumstances of or belonging to those persons, 
by which Uie sympathy is excited. These parties may be, 
I. Certain individuals. 2. Any subordinate class of individuals. 
3. The whole nation. 4. Human kind in general. 5. The 
whole sensitive creation. According as these objects of sym- 
pathy are more numerous, the affection, by which the man is 
biased, may be said to be the more enlwrged. 

XXII. 16, 17. Antipathetic sensibility and antipathetic biases ifl. 17. An- 
are just the reverse of sympathetic sensibility and sympathetic sensibility, 
biases. By antipathetic sensibility is to be understood the pro- 
pensity that a man has to derive pain from the happiness, and 
pleasure from the unhappiness, of other sensitive beings. 

XXIII. 18. The circumstance of insanity of mind corresponds 18« Insanity. 
to that of bodily imperfection. It admits, however, of much less 
variety, inasmuch as the soul is (for aught we can perceive) one 
indivisible thing, not distinguishable, like the body, into parts. 

What lesser degrees of imperfection the mind may be susceptible 
of, seem to be comprisable under the already-mentioned heads 
of ignorance, weakness of mind, irritability, or unsteadiness ; or 
under such others as are reducible to them. Those which are 
here in view are those extraordinary species and degrees of 
mental imperfection, which, wherever they take place, are as 
conspicuous and as unquestionable as lameness or blindness in 
the body : operating partly, it should seem, by inducing an ex- 
traordinary degree of the imperfections above naentioned, partly 
by giving an extraordinary and preposterous bent to the incli* 
nations. 

XXIY. 10. Under the head of a man's habitual occupations, id- Habi- 

, , . tual oocu- 

are to be understood, on this occasion, as well those which he pations. 
pursues for the sake of profit, as those which he pursues for the 
sake of present pleasure. The consideration of the profit itself 
belongs to the head of a man's pecuniary circumstances. It is 
evident, that if by any means a punishment, or any other exciting, 
cause, has the effect of putting it out of his power to continue in 
the pursuit of any such occupation, it must on that account be 
so much the more distressing. A man's habitual occupations^^ 

E 2 



52 Of Circumstances influencing Sensibility, [chap. 

though intimately connected in point of causality with the bent 
of his inclinations^ are not to be looked upon as precisely the 
same circumstance. An amusement, or channel of profit^ may be 
the object of a man's inclinaticms, which has never been the 
subject of his habitual occupations : for it may be, that though 
he wished to betake himself to it, he never did, it not being in 
his power: a circumstance which may make a good deal of 
difference in the effect of any incident by which he happens to 
be debarred from it. 
2o.pecu. XXV. 20. Under the head of pecuniary circumstances, I 

cv^twoes. meaJ^ to bring to view the proportion which a man's means 
bear to his wants : the sum total of his means of every kind, 
to the sum total of his wants of every kind. A man's means 
depend upon three circumstances: i. His property. 2. The 
profit of his labour. 3. His connexions in the way of support. 
His wants seem to depend upon four circumstances, i. His 
habits of expense. 2. His connexions in the way of burthen. 
3. Any present casual demand he may have. 4. The strength 
of his expectation. By a man's property is to be under- 
stood, whatever he has in store independent of his labour. 
By the profit of his labour is to be understood the growing 
profit. As to labour, it may be either of the body princi- 
pally, or of the mind principally, or of both indifferently: nor 
does it matter in what manner, nor on what subject, it be 
applied, so it produce a profit. By a man's connexions in 
the way of support, are to be understood the pecuniary assist- 
ances, of whatever kind, which he is in a way of receiving 
from any persons who, on whatever account, and in whatever 
proportion, he has reason to expect should contribute gratis to 
his maintenance : such as his parents, patrons, and relations. It 
seems manifest, that a man can have no other means than these. 
What he uses, he must have either of his own, or from other 
people : if from other people, either gratis or for a price. As 
to habits of expense, it is well known, that a man's desires are 
governed in a great degree by his habits. Many are the cases in 
which desire (and consequently the pain of privation connected 



VI.] Of Circumstances influencing Sensibility. 53 

with it^) would not even subsist at dl, but for previous enjoy- 
ment. By a man's connexions in the way of burthen, are to be 
understood whatever expense he has reason to look upon him- 
self as bound to be at in the support of those who by law, or the 
customs of the world, are warranted in looking up to him for 
assistance ; such as children, poor relations, superannuated ser- 
vants, and any other dependents whatsoever. As to present 
casual demand, it is manifest, that there are occasions on which 
a given sum will be worth infinitely more to a man than the 
same sum would at another time : where, for example, in a case 
of extremity, a man stands in need of extraordinary medical 
assistance : or wants money to carry on a law-suit, on which 
his all depends : or has got a livelihood waiting for him in a 
distant country, and wants money for the charges of conveyance. 
In such cases, any piece of good or ill fortune, in the pecuniary 
way, might have a very different effect from what it would have 
at any other time. With regard to strength of expectation ; 
when one man expects to gain or to keep a thing which another 
does not, it is plain the circumstance of not having it will affect 
the former very differently from the latter; who, indeed, com- 
monly will not be affected by it at all. 

XXVI. 31. Under the head of a man's connexions in the 2LCon- 

... . nexions in 

way of sympathy, I would bring to view the number and descrip- the way of 
tion of the persons in whose welfare he takes such a concern, as 
that the idea of their happiness should be productive of pleasure, 
and that of their unhappiness of pain to him : for instance, a 
man's wife, his children, his parents, his near relations, and in- 
timate friends. This class of persons, it is obvious, will for the 
most part include the two classes by which his pecuniary circum- 
stances are affected : those, to wit, from whose means he may 
expect support, and those whose wants operate on him as a 
burthea But it is obvious, that besides these, it may very well 
include others, with whom he has no such pecuniary connexion : 
and even with regard to these, it is evident that the pecuniary 
dependence, and the union of affections, are circumstances per- 

^ See ch. v. [Pleaeores and Pains], 



54 ^ Circumstancei influencing Sensibility. [chap. 

fectlj distinguisbable. Accordinglj, the connexions here in 
question, independently of any influence they may have on a 
man's pecuniary circumstandes, have an influence on the effect 
of any exciting causes whatsoever. The tendency of them is to 
increase a man's general sensibility; to increase, on the one 
hand, the pleasure produced by all pleasurable causes ; on the 
other, the pain produced by all afflictive ones. When any plea- 
surable incident happens to a man, he naturally, in the first 
moment, thinks of the pleasure it will afford immediately to 
himself: presently afterwards, however (except in a few cases, 
which is not worth while here to insist on) he begins to think 
of the pleasure which his friends will feel upon their coming to 
know of it : and this secondary pleasure is commoDly no mean 
addition to the primary one. First comes the self-regarding 
pleasure : th^i comes the idea of the pleasure of sympathy, 
which you suppose that pleasure of yours will give birth to in 
the bosom of your friend : and this idea excites again in yours 
a new pleasure of sympathy, grounded upon his. The first plea- 
sure issuing from your own bosom, as it were from a radiant 
point, illuminates the bosom of your friend : reverberated from 
thence, it is reflected with augmented warmth to the point from 
whence it first proceeded : and so it is with pains ^. 

Nor does this effect depend wholly upon affection. Among 
near relations, although there should be no kindness, the plea- 
sures and pains of the moral sanction are quickly propagated by 
a peculiar kind of sympathy : no article, either of honour or 
disgrace, can well fall upon a man, without extending to a cer- 
tain distance within the circle of his family. What reflects 
honour upon the father, reflects honour upon the son : what re- 
fleets disgrace, disgrace. The ecmse of this singular and seem- 
ingly unreasonable circumstance (that is, its analogy to the rest 

^ Thk is one reason why legislators in general like better to have manied 
people to deal with than single ; and people that have children than such 
as are childless. It is manifest that the stronger and more numerous a 
man's connexions in the way of sympathy are, the stronger is the hold 
which the law has upon him. A wife and children are so many pledges a 
man gives to the world for his good behaviour. 



VI.] Of Circumstances h^uencmg SensUnlity. 55 

of the phenomena of the human mind,) belongs not to the pre- 
sent purpose. It is sufficient if the effect be beyond dispute. 

XXVII. 22. Of a man's connexions in the way of antipathy, 22.Con- 

, , "^ nexions in 

there needs not any thing very particular to be observed. Hap- the way of 
pily there is no primseyal and constant source of antipathy in 
human nature, as there is of sympathy. There are no permanent 
sets of persons who are naturally and of course the objects of an- 
tipathy to a man, as there are who are the objects of the con- 
trary affection. Sources, however, but too many, of antipathy, 
are apt to spring up upon various occasions during the course of 
a man's life : and whenever they do, this circumstance may have 
a very considerable influence on the effects of various exciting 
causes. As on the one hand, a punishment, for instance, which 
tends to separate a man &om those with whom he is connected 
in the way of sympathy, so on the other hand, one which tends 
to f(M*ce him into the company of those with whom he is con- 
nected in the way of antipathy, will, on that account, be so 
much the more distressing. It is to be observed, that sympathy 
itself multiplies the sources of antipathy. Sympathy for your 
friend gives birth to antipathy on your part against all those 
who are objects of antipathy, as well as to sympathy for those 
who are objects of sympathy to him. In the same manner does 
antipathy multiply the sources of sympathy; though commonly 
perhaps with rather a less degree of efficacy. Antipathy against 
your enemy is apt to give birth to sympathy on yowr part 
towards those who are objects of antipathy, as well as to an- 
tipathy against those who are objects of sympathy, to him. 

XXVIII. 23. Thus much for the circumstances by which the ^.Radical 

^ ^ ^ ^ frame of 

effect of any exciting cause may be influenced, when applied body, 
upon any given occasion, at any *given period. But besides 
these supervening incidents, there are other circumstances re- 
lative to a man, that may have their influence, and which are 
co-eval to his birth. In the first place, it seems to be universally 
agreed, that in the original frame or texture of every man's 
body, there is a something which, independently of all subse- 
quently intervening circumstances, renders him liable to be 



56 €f Circumstances infiuendng Sensibility, [chap. 

affected by causes producing bodily pleasure or pain, in a 
manner different from that in which another man would be 
affected by the same causes. To the catalogue of circumstances 
influencing a man's sensibility, we may therefore add his ori- 
ginal or radical frame, texture, constitution, or temperament of 
body. 
24. Radical XXIX. 24. In the next place, it seems to be pretty well 
mind. agreed, that there is something also in the original frame or 

texture of every man's mind, which, independently of all ex- 
terior and subsequently intervening circumstances, and even of 
his radical frame of body, makes him liable to be differently 
affected by the same exciting causes, from what another man 
would be. To the catalogue of circumstances influencing a 
man's sensibility, we may therefore further add his original or 
radical frame, texture, constitution or temperament of mind ^ 
This distinct XXX. It seems pretty certain, all this while, that a man*s 

from tho cir« 

cumstanoe sensibility to causes producing pleasure or pain, even of mind, 
body; may depend in a considerable degree upon his original and ac- 

quired frame of body. But we have no reason to think that it 
can depend altogether upon that frame : since, on' the one hand, 
we see persons whose frame of body is as much alike as can be 
conceived, differing very considerably in respect of their mental 
frame : and, on the other hand, persons whose frame of mind is 
as much alike as can be conceived, differing very conspicuously 
in regard to their bodily frame *. 

Idiosyncrasy. ^ The characteristic circumstances whereby one man's frame of body or 
what mind, coiisidered at any given period, stands distinguished from that of 

another, have been comprised by metaphysicians and physiologists under 
the name idioifyncrasy, from tStos, peculiar, and cwKpaai9, composition. 
Whether the ^ Those who maintain, that the mind and the body are one substance, 
^ or h^ate- i^^y ^^T^ object, that upon that supposition the distinction between frame 
dfff "'*''** "® of mind and frame of body is but nominal, and that accordingly there is no 
such thing as a frame of mind diHtinct from the frame of body. But grant- 
ing, for argument- sake, the antecedent, we may dispute the consequence. 
For if the mind be but a part of the body, it is at any rate of a nature very 
different from the other parts of the body. 

A man's frame of body cannot in any part of it undergo any considerable 
alteration without its being immediately indicated by phaenomena discern- 
ible by the senses. A man's frame of mind may undergo very considerable 
alterations, his frame of body remaining the same to all appearance ; that 



Vi.] Of Circtimstances influencing Sensibility. , 57 

XXXI. It seems indisputable also, that the different sets of — «»g from 
external occurrences that may befall a man in the course of his 

life, will make great differences in the subsequent texture of his 
mind at any given period : yet still those differences are not 
solely to be attributed to such occurrences. Equally far from 
the truth seems that opinion to be (if any such be maintained) 
which attributes all to nature, and that which attributes all to 
education. The two circumstances will therefore still remain 
distinct, as well from one another, as from all others. 

XXXII. Distinct however as they are, it is manifest, that at Yet the re- 

"^ . , suit of them 

no period in the active part of a man's life can they either of is not sepa- 
them make their appearance by themselves. All they do is to oermble. 
constitute the latent ground- work which the other supervening 
circumstances have to work upon : and whatever influence those 
original principles may have, is so changed and modified, and 
covered over, as it were, by those other circumstances, as never 
to be separately discernible. The effects of the one influence are 
indistinguishably blended with those of the other. 

XXXIII. The emotions of the body are received, and with Frame of 
reason, as probable indications of the temperature of the mind, cates, but 
But they are far enough from conclusive. A man may exhibit, ly, that of 
for instance, the exterior appearances of grief, without really 
grieving at all, or at least in any thing near the proportion in 
which he appears to grieve. Oliver Cromwell, whose conduct 
indicated a heart more than ordinarily callous, was as remark- 
ably profuse in tears ^. Many men can command the external ap- 
pearances of sensibility with very little real feeling \ The female 

is, for any thing that is indicated to the contraiy by phsenomena cognizable 
to the senses : meaning those of other men. 

^ Hume's Hist. 

^ The quantity of the sort of pain, which is called grief, is indeed hardly 
to be measured by any external indications. It is neither to be measured* 
for instance, by the quantity of the tears, nor by the number of moments 
spent in crying. Indications rather less equivocal may, perhaps, be afforded 
by the pulse. A man has not the motions of hie heart at command as he 
has those of the muscles of his face. But the particular significancy of 
these indications is still very uncertain. All they can express is, that the 
man is affected ; they cannot express in what manner, nor firom what cause. 
To an affection resulting in reality from such or such a cause, he mi^ give 



58 



Of CircumManceB influencing Sensibility, [chap. 



Secondary 
influencing 
circum- 
stances. 



25. Sex. 



sex commonly i^ith greater faeuiilitj than the male : hence the 
proverbial expression of a woman's tears. To have this kind of 
command over one's self, was the characteristic excellence of the 
orator of ancient times, and is still that of the player in our 
own, 

XX XIV. The remaining circumstances may, with reference to 
those already mentioned, be termed secondary influencing cir- 
cumstances. These have an influence, it is true, on the quantum 
or bias of a man's sensibility, but it is only by means of the 
other primary ones. The manner in which these two sets of 
circumstances are concerned, is such that the primary ones do 
the business, while the secondary ones lie most open to ob- 
seryation. The secondary ones, therefore, are those which are 
most heard of ; on which account it will be necessary to take 
notice of them : at the same time that it is only by means of the 
primary ones that their influence can be explained ; whereas the 
influence of the primary ones will be apparent enough, without 
any mention of the secondary ones. 

XXXY. 25. Among such of the primitive modifications of 
the corporeal fi*ame as may s^pear to influence the quantum and 
bias of sensibility, the most obvious and conspicuous are those 
which constitute the sex. In point of quantity, the sensibility 
of the female sex appears in general to be greater than that of 
the male. The health of the female is more delicate than that 
of the male : in point of strength and hardiness of body, in point 
of quantity and quality of knowledge, in point of strength of 
intellectual powers, and firmness of mind, she is commonly in- 

an artificial colouring, and attribute it to such or such another cause. To 
an affection directed in reality to such or such a person as its object, he 
may give an artificial bias, and represent it as if directed to such or such 
another object. Tears of rage he may attribute to contrition. The concern 
he feels at the thoughts of a punishment that awaits him, he may impute 
to a sympathetic concern for the mischief produced by his offence. 

A very tolerable judgment, however, may commonly be formed by a dis- 
cerning mind, upon laying all the external indications exhibited by a man 
together, and at the same time comparing them with his actions. 

A remarkable instance of the power of the will, over the external indica- 
tions of sensibility, is to be found in Tacitus's story of the Roman soldier, 
who raised a mutiny in the camp, pretending to have lost a brother by the 
lawless cruelty of the GenenU. The truth was, he never had had a brother. 



VI.] Of Circuffistances influencing Sensibility. 59 

ferior: moral, religious, sympatlietic, and antipathetic sensibility 
are commonly stronger in her than in the male. The quality of 
her knowledge, and the bent of her inclinations, are commonly 
in many respects different. Her moral biases are also, in certain 
respects, remarkably different : chastity, modesty, and delicacy, 
for instance, are prized more than courage in a woman : courage, 
more than any of those qualities, in a man. The religious 
biases in the two sexes are not apt to be remarkably different ; 
except that the femaleos rather more inclined than the male to 
superstition ; that is, to observances not dictated by the prin- 
ciple of utility ; a difference that may be pretty well accounted 
for by some of the before-mentioned circumstances. Her sym- 
pathetic biases are in many respects different : for her own off- 
spring all their lives long, and for children in general while 
young, her affection is commonly stronger than that of the 
male. Her affections are apt to be less enlarged: seldom ex> 
panding themselves so much as to take in the welfare of her 
country in general, much less that of mankind, or the whole 
sensitive creation : seldom embracing any extensive class or di- 
vision, even of her own countrymen, unless it be in virtue of 
her sympathy for some particular individuals that belong to it. 
In general, her antipathetic, as well as sympathetic biases, are'i^t 
to be less conformable to the principle of utility than those of 
the male ; owing chiefly to some deficiency in point of know- 
ledge, discernment, and comprehension. Her habitual occupa- 
tions of the amusing kind are apt to be in many respects dif- 
ferent from those of the male. With regard to her connexions 
in the way of sympathy, there can be no difference. In point of 
pecuniary circumstances, according to the customs of perhaps all 
pountries, she is in general less independent. 

XXXVI. 26. Age is of course diyided into divers periods, of a6.Age. 
which the number and limits are by no means uniformly ascer- 
tained. One might distinguish it, for the present purpose, into, 
I. Infancy. 2. Adolescence. 3. Youth. 4. Maturity. 5. De- 
cline. 6. Decrepitude. It were lost time to stop on the present 
occasion to examine it at each period, and to observe the indi- 



6o Of Circumstances influencing Sensibititt/, [chap. 

cations it gives, with respect to the several primary circum- 
stances just reviewed. Infancy and decrepitude are commonly 
inferior to the other periods, in point of health, strength, hardi- 
ness, and so forth. In infancy, on the part of the female, the 
imperfections of that sex are enhanced : on the part of the male, 
• imperfections take place mostly similar in quality, but greater in 
quantity, to those attending the states of adolescence, youth, and 
maturity in the female. In the stage of decrepitude both sexes 
relapse into many of the imperfections of iniiEincy. The generality 
of these observations may easily be corrected upon a particular 
review. 
27. Bank. XXXVII. 27. Station, or rank in life, is a circumstance, 

that) among a civilized people, will commonly undergo a multi- 
plicity of variations. Casteris paribus, the quantum of sensibility 
appears to be greater in the higher ranks of men than in the 
lower. The primary circumstances in respect of which this 
secondary circumstance is apt to induce or indicate a difference, 
seem principally to be as follows : i. Quantity and Quality of 
knowledge. 2. Strength of mind. 3. Bent of inclination. 4. 
Moral sensibility. 5. Moral biases. 6. Beligious sensibility. 
7. Religious biases. 8. Sympathetic sensibility. 9. Sympathetic 
biases. 10. Antipathetic sensibility. 11. Antipathetic biases. 
12. Habitual occupations. 13. Nature and productiveness of 
a man's means of livelihood. 14. Connexions importing profit. 
15. Habit of expense. 16. Connections importing burthen. 
A man of a certain rank will frequently have a number of de- 
pendents besides those whose dependency is the result of natural 
relationship. As to health, strength, and hardiness, if rank has 
any influence on these circumstances, it is but in a remote way, 
chiefly by the influence it ^^ay have on its habitual occupations. 
28.Bduca. XXXVIII. 28. The influence of education is still more ex- 
tenBive. Education Btaud upon a footing somewhat different 
from tb&t of the cireuuxi^tances of age, sex, and rank. These 
words, though the iufl^^ ^ of the circumstances they respec- 
tively denote exerts its^^ principally^ if not entirely, through 
^ aiedium of certaixi f the primary circumBtances before 



VI.] Of G^cumstances infltiencing Sensibility. 6t 

mentioned^ present, however, each of them a circumstance which 
has a separate existence of itself. This is not the case with the 
word education : which means nothing any farther than as it 
serves to call up to view some one or more of those primary 
circumstances. Education may be distinguished into phy- 
sical and mental; the education of the body and that of 
the mind: mental, again, into intellectual and moral; the 
culture of the understanding, and the culture of the affec- 
tions. The education a man receives, is given to him partly 
by others, partly by himself. By education then nothing more 
can be expressed than the condition a man is in in respect of 
those primary circumstances, as resulting partly from the 
management and contrivance of others, principally of those who 
in the early periods of his life have had dominion over him, 
partly from his own. To the physical part of his education, 
belong the circumstances of health, strength, and hardiness: 
sometimes, by accident, that of bodily imperfection ; as where 
by intemperance or negligence an irreparable mischief happens 
to his person. To the intellectual part, those of quantity and 
quality of knowledge, and in some measure perhaps those of 
firmness of mind and steadiness. To the moral part, the bent 
of his inclinations, the quantity and quality of his moral, reli- 
gious, sympathetic, and antipathetic sensibility: to all three 
branches indiscriminately, but under the superior control of 
external occurrences, his habitual recreations, his property, his 
means of livelihood, his connexions in the way of profit and of 
burthen, and his habits of expense. With respect indeed to all 
these points, the influence of education is modified, in a manner 
more or less apparent, by that of exterior occurrences ; and in a 
manner scarcely at all apparent, and altogether out of the reach 
of calculation, by the original texture and constitution as well 
of his body as of his mind. 

XXXIX. 29. Among the external circumstances by which 29. Climate, 
the influence of education is modified, the principal are those 
which come under the head of climate. This circumstance 
places itself in front, and demands a separate denomination, not 



6% Of CircumstaTiees influencing Sensibility, [chap. 

merely on account of the magnitude of its influence, but also on 
account of its being conspicuous to every body, and of its apply- 
ing indiscriminately to great numbers at a time. This circum- 
stance depends for its esseriee upon the situation of that part of 
the earth which is in question, with respect to the course taken 
by the whole planet in its revolution round the sun : but for its 
influence it depends upon the condition of the bodies which com- 
pose the earth's surface at that part, principally upon the quan- 
tities of sensible heat at difiPerent periods, and upon the density, 
and purity, and dryness or moisture of the circumambient air. 
Of the so often mentioned primary circumstances, there are few 
of which the production is not influenced by this secondary one ; 
partly by its manifest effects upon the body ; partly by its less 
perceptible effects upon the mind. In hot climates men's health 
is apt to be more precarious than in cold : their strength and 
hardiness less: their vigour, firmness, and steadiness of mind 
less : and thence indirectly their quantity of knowledge : the 
bent of their iQclinations different : most remarkably so in re- 
spect of their superior propensity to sexual enjoyments, and in 
respect of the earliness of the period at which that propensity 
begins to manifest itself: their sensibilities of all kinds more 
intense: their habitual occupations savouring more of sloth 
than of activity : their radical frame of body less strong, pro- 
bably, and less hardy : their radical frame of mind less vigorous, 
less firm, less steady. 
30. Lineage. XL. 30. Another article in the catalogue of secondary cir- 
cumstances, is that of race or Unease: the national race or 
lineage a man issues from. This circumstance, independently of 
that of climate, will commonly make some difference in point of 
radical frame of mind and body. A man of negro race, bom in 
France or England, is a very different being, in many respects, 
from a man of French or English race. A man of Spanish race, 
bom in Hexico or Peru, is at the hour of his birth a different 
sort of being, in many respects, from a man of the original 
Mexican or Peruvian race. This circumstance, as far as it is 
distinct from climate, rank, and education, and from the two 



' 1 



VI.} Of Circumstances influencing Sensibility. 6^ 

just mentioned, operates chiefly through the medium of moral, 
religious, sympathetic, and antipathetic hiases. 

XLI. 31. The last circumstance but one, is that of govern- 31. Govern- 
ment : the government a man lives under at the time in ques- 
tion ; or rather that under which he has been accustomed most 
to live. This circumstance operates principally through the 
medium of education : the magistrate operating in the character 
of a tutor upon all the members of the state, by the direction be 
gives to their hopes and to their fears. Indeed under a solicitous 
and attentive government, the ordinary preceptor, nay even the 
parent himself is but a deputy, as it were, to the magistrate : 
whose controlling influence, difierent in this respect from that of 
the ordinary preceptor, dwells with a man to his life's end. The 
effects of the peculiar power of the magistrate are seen more 
particularly in the influence it exerts over the quantum and bias 
of men's moral,* religious, sympathetic, and antipathetic sensi- 
bilities. Under a well-constituted, or even under a well-admi- 
nistered though ill-constituted government, men's moral sensi- 
bility is commonly stronger, and their moral biases more con- 
formable to the dictates of utility : their religious sensibility 
frequently weaker, but their religious biases less unconformable 
to the dictates of utility: their sympathetic affections more 
enlarged, directed to the magistrate more than to small parties 
or to individuals, and more to the whole community than to 
either: their antipathetic sensibilities less violent, as being 
more obsequious to the influence of well-directed moral biases, 
and less apt to be excited by that of ill-directed religious ones : 
their antipathetic biases more conformable to well-directed moral 
ones, more apt (in proportion) to be grounded on enlarged and 
sympathetic than on narrow and self-regarding affections, and 
accordingly, upon the whole, more comformable to the dictates 

of utility. 

XLII. qa. The last circumstance is that of religious profes- 32. Religious 

. , . \ profession. 

sion : the religious profession a man is of : the religious irater- 
nity of which he is a member. This circumstance operates 
principally through the medium of religious sensibility and reli- 



64 



Of Circumsiances influencing Sensibility. [chap. 



Use of the 
preceding 
observa- 
tions. 



gious biases. It operates, however, as an indication more or 
less conclusive, with respect to several other circumstances. 
With respect to some, scarcely but through the medium of the 
two just mentioned : this is the case with regard to the quantum 
and bias of a man's moral, sympathetic, and antipathetic sen- 
sibility: perhaps in some cases with regard to quantity and 
quality of knowledge, strength of intellectual powers, and bent 
of inclination. "With respect to others, it may operate immedi- 
ately of itself : this seems to be the case with regard to a man's 
habitual occupations, pecuniary circumstances, and connexions 
in the way of sympathy and antipathy. A man who pays very 
little inward regard to the dictates of the religion which he finds 
it necessary to profess, may find it difficult to avoid joining in 
the ceremonies of it, and bearing a part in the pecuniary bur- 
thens it imposes ^. By the force of habit and example he may 
even be led to entertain a partiality for persons 6f the same pro- 
fession, and a proportionable antipathy against those of a rival 
one. In particular, the antipathy against persons of different 
persuasions is one of the last points of religion which men part 
with. Lastly, it is obvious, that the religious profession a man 
is of cannot but have a considerable influence on his education. 
But, considering the import of the term education, to say this is 
perhaps no more than saying in other words what has been said 
already. 

XLIII. These circumstances, all or many of them, will need 
to be attended to as often as upon any occasion any account is 
taken of any quantity of pain or pleasure, as resulting from any 
cause. Has any person sustained an injury ? they will need to 
be considered in estimating the mischief of the offence. Is satis- 
faction to be made to him ? they will need to be attended to in 

^ The 'ways in which a religion may lessen a man's means, or augment 
his wants, are various. Sometimes it will prevent him from making a 
profit of his money : sometimes from setting his hand to labour. Sometimes 
it will oblige him to buy dearer food instead of cheaper : sometimes to pur- 
chase useless labour : sometimes to pay men for not labouring : sometimes 
to purchase trinkets, on which imagination alone has set a value : some- 
times to purchase exemptions from punishment, or titles to felicity in the 
world to come. 



VI.] Of Circumstances influencing Sensibility. 65 

adjusting the quantwm of that satisfaction. Is the injurer to be 
punished 1 they will need to be attended to in estimating the 
force of the impression that will be made on him by any given 
punishment* 

XLIV. It is to be observed, that though they seem all of Howfiwtho 

, , circum- 

them, on some account or other, to merit a place in the cata- stances in 

, , . , question can 

logue, they are not all of equal use m practice. Different articles be taken in- 
among them are applicable to different exciting causes. Of those 
that may influence the effect of the same exciting cause, some 
apply indiscriminately to whole classes of persons together ; 
being applicable to all, without any remarkable difference in 
degree : these may be directly and pretty fully provided for by 
the legislator. This is the case, for instance, with the primary 
circumstances of bodily imperfection, and insanity: with the 
secondary circumstance of sex : perhaps with that of age : at 
any rate with those of rank, of climate, of lineage, and of reli- 
gious profession. Others, however they may apply to whole 
classes of persons, yet in their application to different individuals 
are susceptible of perhaps an indefinite variety of degrees. These 
cannot be fully provided for by the legislator ; but, as the exist- 
ence of them, in every sort of case, is capable of being ascer- 
tained, and the degree in which they take place is capable of 
being measured, provision may be made for them by the judge, 
or other executive magistrate, to whom the several individuals 
that happen to be concerned may be made known. This is the 
case, I. With the circumstance of health. 2. In some sort with 
that of strength. 3. Scarcely with that of hardiness : still less 
with those of quantity and quality of knowledge, strength of intel- 
lectual powers, firmness or steadiness of mind ; except in as far as 
a man's condition, in respect of those circumstances, may be indi- 
cated by the secondary circumstances of sex, age, or rank ; hardly 
with that of bent of inclination, except in as far as that latent cir- 
cumstance is indicated by the more manifest one of habitual oc- 
cupations : hardly with that of a man's moral sensibility or biases, 
except in as far as they may be indicated by his sex, age, rank, 
and education: not at all with his religious sensibility anc^ 

p 



66 Of Circumstanees inflmneing Sensibility, [chap. 

religious biases, except in as far as they may be indicated by the 
religious profession he belongs to : not at all with the quantity 
or quality of his sympathetic or antipathetic sensibilities, except 
in as far as they may be presumed from his sex, age, rank, edu- 
cation, lineage, or religious profession. It is the case, however, 
with his habitual occupations, with his pecuniary circumstances, 
and with Lis connexions in the way of sympathy. Of others, 
again, either the existence cannot be ascertained, or the degree 
cannot be measured. These, therefore, cannot be taken into 
account, either by the legislator or the executive magistrate. 
Accordingly, they would have no claim to be taken notice 
of, were it not for those secondary circumstances by which 
they are indicated, and whose influence could not well be 
understood without them. What these are has been already 
mentioned. 
To what XLV. It has already been observed, that different articles in 

oiusesthere this list of circumstances apply to different exciting causes : the 
sion to apply circumstance of bodily strength, for instance, has scarcely any 
^^' influence of itself (whatever it may have in a roundabout way, 

and by accident) on the effect of an incident which should 
increase or diminish the quantum of a man's property. It re- 
mains to be considered, what the exciting causes are with which 
the legislator has to do. These may, by some accident or other, 
be any whatsoever : but those which he has principally to do, 
are those of the painful or afflictive kind. With pleasurable ones 
he has little to do, except now and then by accident : the 
reasons of which may be easily enough perceived, at the same 
time that it would take up too much room to unfold them here. 
The exciting causes with which he has principally to do, are, on 
the one hand, the mischievous acts, which it is his business to 
prevent ; on the other hand, the punishments, by the terror of 
which it is his endeavour tp prevent them. Now of these two 
sets of exciting causes, the latter only is of his production : 
being produced partly by his own special appointment, partly 
in conformity to his general appointment, by the special ap- 
pointment of the judge. For the legislator, therefore, as well 



VI.] Cf Circumstances influencing SensiUlity. 67 

as for the judge, it is necessary (if they would know what it is 
they are doing when they are appointing punishment) to have 
an eye to all these circumstances. For the legislator, lest, 
meaning to apply a certain quantity of punishment to all per- 
sons who shall put themselves in a given predicament, he should 
unawares apply to some of those persons much more or much 
less than he himself intended : for the judge, lest, in applying 
to a particular person a particular measure of punishment, he 
should apply much more or much less than was intended, 
perhaps by himself, and at any rate by the legislator. They 
ought each of them, therefore, to have before him, on the one 
hand, a list of the several circumstances by which sensibility 
may be influenced ; on the other hand, a list of the several \ 
species and degrees of punishment which th^y purpose to make 
use of : and then, by making a comparison between the two, to 
form a detailed estimate of the influence of each of the circum- 
stances in question, upon the effect of each species and degree 
of punishment. • 

There are two plans or orders of distribution, either of which 
might be pursued in the drawing up this estimate. The one is \ 
to make the name of the circumstance take the lead, and under [ 
it to represent the difierent influences it exerts over the effects 
of the several modes of punishment : the other is to make the 
name of the punishment take the lead, and under it to represent 
the different influences which are exerted over the effects of it 
by the several circumstances above mentioned. Now of these 
two sorts of objects, the punishment is that to which the inten- 
tion of the legislator is directed in the first instance. This is of 
his own creation, and will be whatsoever he thinks fit to make 
it : the influencing circumstance exists independently of him, 
and is what it is whether he will or no. What he has occasion 
to do is to establish a certain species and degree of punishment : 
and it is only with reference to that punishment that he has 
occasion to make any inquiry concerning any of the circum- 
stances here in question. The latter of the two plans there- 
fore is that which appears by far the most useful and com* 

F 2 



68 



Of Circumstances influencing Sensibility, [chap. 



Analytical 
view of the 
circum- 
stances in- 
fluencini 



sensibility, 



ity. 



modious. But neither upon the one nor the other plan can any 
such estimate be delivered here^. 

XLYI. Of the several circumstances contained in this cata- 
logue, it may be of use to give some sort of analytic view; 
in order that it may be the more easily discovered if any which 
ought to have been inserted are omitted ; and that, with regard 
to those which are inserted, it may be seen how they differ and 
agree. 

In the first place, they may be distinguished into ^primary 
and secondary: those may be termed primary, which operate 
immediately of themselves : those secondary, which operate 
not but by the medium of the former. To this latter head 
belong the circumstances of sex, age, station in life, education, 
climate, lineage, government, and religious profession : the rest 
are primary. These again are. either connate or adventitious : 
those which are connate, are radical frame of body and radical 
frame of mind. Those which are adventitious, are either personal, 
or exterior. The personal, again, concern either a man's dis^ 
positions, or his actions. Those which concern his dispositions, 
concern either his body or his mind. Those which concern his 
body are health, strength, hardiness, and bodily imperfection. 
Those which concern his mind, again, concern either his under" 
standing or his affections. To the former head belong the 
circumstances of quantity and quality of knowledge, strength of 
understanding, and insanity. To the latter belong the circum- 



* This is far from being a visionary proposal, not reducible to practice. 
I speak from experience, having actually drawn up such an estimate, 
though upon the least commodious of the two plans, and before the several 
circumstances in question had been reduced to the precise number and 
order in which they are here enumerated. This is a part of the matter 
destined for another work. See ch. xiii. [Cases unmeet], par a. Note. 
There are some of these circumstances that bestow particular denominations 
on the persons they relate to : thus, from the circumstance of bodily imper- 
fections, persons are denominated deaf, dumb, blind, and so forth : from the 
circumstance of insanity, idiots, and maniacs : from the circumstance of 
age, infants : for all which classes of persons particular provision is made in 
the Code. See B. I. tit. [Exemptions]. Persons thus distinguished will 
form so many articles in the catcUogvs pereonarum privUegiatarvm, See 
Appendix, tit. [Composition]. 



VI.] Of Circumstances infinencing Sensibility, 69 

stances of firmness of mind, steadiness, bent of inclination, moral 
sensibility, moral biases, religious sensibility, religious biases, 
sympathetic sensibility, sympathetic biases, antipathetic sensi- 
bility, and antipathetic biases. Those which regard his actions, 
are his habitual occupations. Those which are exterior to him, 
regard either the things or the persons which he is concerned 
with ; under the former head come his pecuniary circumstances^; 
under the latter, his connexions in the way of sympathy and 
antipathy. 

^ As to a man^s pecuniary oircumstanoes, the causes on which those cir- Analytical view 
cumstances depend, do not come aU of them under the same class. The tuenf^klcsin 
absolute quantum of a man's property does indeed come under the same a.«»n's pecu- 
class with his pecuniary circumstances in general : so does the profit he stance""^*^""' 
makes from the occupation which furnishes him with the means of liveli- 
hood. But the occupation itself concerns his own person, and comes under 
the same head as his habitual amusements: as likewise his habits of 
expense : his connexions in the ways of profit and of burthen, under the 
same head as his connexions in the way of sympathy : and the circum- 
stances of his present demand for money, and strength of expectation, come 
under the head of those circumstances relative to bis person which regard 
his affections. 



CHAPTER VII. 



OF HUMAN ACTIONS IN GENERAL. 



The demaiidi I. The business of government is to promote the happiness of 

for punish- I ^ ^ ° ^ ^ . . 

itoent de- I the society, by punishing and rewarding. That part of its busmess 
i»rtupoii which consists in punishing, is more particularly the subject of 
of the act. penal law. In proportion as an act tends to disturb that happi- 
ness, in proportion as the tendency of it is pernicious, will be the 
demand it creates for punishment. What happiness consists of 
we haye already seen: enjoyment of pleasures, security from 
pains. 
Tendency of ^' The general tendency of an act is more or less pernicious, 
min^d bylts according to the sum total of its consequences : that is, accord- 
q^Ses. ^^S ^ *^® difference between the sum of such as are good, and 

the sum of such as are evil. 

Material HI- It is to be observed, that here, as well as henceforward, 

queues only wherever consequences are spoken of, such only are meant as 

r^^ed. are material. Of the consequences of any act, the multitude 

and variety must needs be infinite : but such of them only as 

are material are worth regarding. Now among the consequences 

of an act, be they what they may, such only, by one who views 

them in the capacity of a legislator, can be said to be material \ 

as either consist of pain or pleasure, or have an influence in the 

production of pain or pleasure ^. 

^ Or of importance. 

^ In certain cases the consequences of an act may be material by serving 
as evidences indicating the existence of some other material fact, which is 
even antecedent to the act of which they are the consequences : but even 
here, they are material only because, in virtue of such their evidentiary 
quality, they have an influence, at a subsequent period of time, in the pro- 



1 



Of Human, Actwtu m Generat. 



71 



IV. It is also to be observed, that into the account of the con- 
sequences of the act, are to be taken not such only as might 
have ensued. Were intention out of the question, but such also 
as depend upon the connexion there may be between these first- 
mentioned consequences and the intention. The connexion 
there is between the intention and certain consequences is, as 
we shall see hereafber^, a means of producing other conse- 
quences. In this lies the difference between rational agency and 
irrational. 

V. Now the intention, with regard to the consequences of att 
act, will depend upon two things : i. The state of the will or in* 
tention, with respect to the act itself! And, 2. The state of the 
understanding, or perceptive faculties, with regard to the cir* 
cumstances which it is, or may appear to be, accompanied with. 
Now with respect to these circumstances, the perceptive fa- 
culty is susceptible of three states : consciousness, unconscious* 
ness, and false consciousness. Consciousness, when the party 
believes precisely those circumstances, and no others, to subsist^ 
which really do subsist : unconsciousness, when he fails of per- 
ceiving certain circumstances to subsist, which, however, do 
subsist : false consciousness, when he believes or imagines certain 
circumstances to subsist, which in truth do not subsist. 

VI. In every transaction, therefore, which is examined with 
a view to punishment, there are four articles to be considered : 
I. The act itself, which is done. a. The circumstances in which 
it is done. 3. The intentionality that may have accompanied it. 
4. The conscioibsnesSf unconsciousness, or false consciousness, 
that may have accompanied it. 

What regards the act and the circumstances will be the sub- 
ject of the present chapter : what regards intention and con- 
sciousness, that of the two succeeding. 

VII. There are also two other articles on which the general 
tendency of an act depends : and on that, as well as on other 

duction of pain and pleasure : for example, by serving as grounds for con- 
viction, and thence for punishment. See tit. [Simple Falsehoods], vei*bo 
[material]. 

^ See B. I. tit. [Exemptions] and tit. [Extenuations]. 



These de- 
pend in part 
upon the 
intention. 



The inten- 
tion depends 
as well upon 
the under- 
standing as 
the wlQ. 



Ill an action 
are to be 
considered, 

1. The act. 

2. The cir- 
cumstances. 
S.Theinten. 
tionality. 

4. The con- 
sciousness. 



6. The mo- 
tives. 6. The 
disposition. 



^% Of Human Actions in General, [chap. 

accounts, the demand which it creates for punishment. These are, 

1. The particular motive or motives which gave birth to it. 

2. The general disposition which it indicates. These articles 

will be the subject of two other chapters. 

Acts positive VIII. Acts may be distinguished in several ways, for several 
and nega- 
tive, purposes. 

They may be distinguished, in the first place, into positive 
and negative. By positive are meant such as consist in motion 
or exertion: by negative, such as consist in keeping at rest; 
that is, in forbearing to move or exert one's self in such and 
such circumstances. Thus, to strike is a positive act : not to 
strike on a certain occasion, a negative one. Positive acts are 
I styled also acts of commission ; negative, acts of omission or 
' forbearance ^. 
Negative IX. Such acts, again, as are negative, may either be absolutely 

so relatively SO, or relatively : absolutely, when they import the negation of 
lately. all positive agency whatsoever ; for instance, not to strike at all : 

relatively, when they import the negation of such or such a par- 
ticular mode of agency ; for instance, not to strike such a person 
or such a thing, or in such a direction. 
Negative X. It IS to be observed, that the nature of the act, whether 

expressed positive Or negative, is not to be determined immediately by the 
and vice * form of the discourse made use of to express it. An act which 



versa. 



^^cts<>[on»««»o» * The distinction between positive and negative acts runs through the 
whole system of offences, and sometimes makes a material difference with 
regard to their consequences. To recondle us the better to the extensive, 
and, as it may appear on some occasions, the inconsistent signification here 
given to the word ad^ it may be considered, i. That in many cases, where 
no exterior or overt act is exercised, the state which the mind is in at the 
time when the supposed act is said to happen, is as truly and directly the 
result of the will, as any exterior act, how plain and conspicuous soever. 

, The not revealing a conspiracy, for instance, may be as perfectly the act of 
the will, as the joining in it. In the next place, that even though the mind 
should never have had the incident in question in contemplation (insomuch 
that the event of its not happening should not have been so much as 
obliquely intentional) still the state the person^s mind was in at the time 

' when, if he had so vnlled, the incident might have happened, is in many 
cases productive of as material consequences ; and not only as likely, but as 
fit to call for the interposition of other agents, as the opposite one. Thus, 
when a tax is imposed, yoiur not paying it is an act which at any rate must 
be punished in a certain manner, whether you happened to think of paying 
it or not. 



viT.] Of Human Actions in General. 73 

is positive in its nature may be cbaracterized by a negative ex- 
pression : tbus^ not to be at rest, is as mucb as to say to move. 
So also an act, wbicb is negative in its nature, may be cbaracter- 
ized by a positive expression : tbus, to forbear or omit to bring 
food to a person in certain circumstances, is signified by the 
single and positive term to starve, 

XI. In the second place, acts may be distinguished into ex- Acts ezter- 
temal and internal. By external, are meant corporal acts ; acts ternai. 

of the body: by internal, mental acts ; acts of the mind. Thus, 
to strike is an external or exterior ^ act : to intend to strike, an 
internal or interior one. 

XII. Acts of disdourse are a sort of mixture of the two : ex- Actsof dis- ' 
temal acts, which are no ways material, nor attended with any 
consequences, any farther than as they serve to express the exist- 
ence of internal ones. To speak to another to strike, to write [ 

to him to strike^ to make signs to him to strike, are all so many J 
acts of discourse. 

XTTT. Third, Acts that are external may be distinguished into External 

. . , *c*s may be 

transitive and intransitive. Acts may be called transitive, when transitive or 

intransitive, 
the motion is communicated from the person of the agent to 

some foreign body : that is, to such a foreign body on which the 

effects of it are considered as being material; as where a man 

runs against you, or throws water in your face. Acts may be 

called intransitive, when the motion is communicated to no other 

body, on which the effects of it are regarded as material, than 

some part of the same person in whom it originated : as where a 

man runs, or washes himself^. 

^ An exterior act is also called by lawyers overt, 

* The distinction is well known to the latter grammarians : it is with P**'*"*^^^®* 
them indeed that it took its rise : though by them it has been applied tive acts and 
rather to the names than to the things themselves. To verbs, signifying JS?ognized by 
transitive acts, as here described, they have given the name of transitive grammarians. 
verbs : those significative of intransitive acts they have termed intransitive. 
These last are still more frequently called neuter ; that is, neither active nor 
passive. The appellation seems improper : since, instead of their being 
neithert they are both in one. 

To the class of acts that are here termed intransitive, belong those which 
constitute the 3rd class in the system of offences. See ch. [Division] and B. I. 
tit. [Self-regarding Offences]. 



74 Of Human Adiom in Gefieral. [chap. 

A transitive XIV. An act of the transitive kind may be said to be in its 
mencement, commencement, or in the^«^ stage of its progress, while the 
andinterme- motion is confined to the person of the agent, and has not yet 
gress.^'*^ l>^Ji communicated to any foreign body, on which the efiFects of 
it can be material. It may be said to be in its termination, or 
to be in the last stage of its progress, as soon as the motion or 
impulse has been communicated to some such foreign body. It may 
be said to be in the middle or intermediate stage or stages of its 
progress, while the motion, having passed from th^ person of the 
agent, has not yet been communicated to any such foreign body. 
Thus, as soon as a man has lifted up his hand to strike, the act 
he performs in striking you is in its commencement : as soon as 
his hand has reached you, it is in its termination. If the act be 
the motion of a body which is separated from the person of the 
agent before it reaches the object, it may be said, during that 
interval, to be in its intermediate progress ^ or in gradu media*- 
tivo : as in the case where a man throws a stone or fires a bullet 
at you. 
An intransi- XY. An act of the intransitive kind may be said to be in its 
commence- Commencement, when the motion or impulse is as yet confined 
termumtion. to the member or organ in which it originated ; and has not yet 
been communicated to any member or organ that is distinguish- 
able from the former. It may be said to be in its termination, 
as soon as it has been applied to any other part of the same per- 
son. Thus, where a man poisons himself, while he is lifting up 
the poison to his mouth, the act is in its commencement : as 
soon as it has reached his lips, it is in its termination ^. 

iActs tran- XYI. In the third place, acts may be distinguished into tran- 
continued, sient and continue. Thus, to strike is a transient act : to lean, 
a continued one. To buy, a transient act : to keep in one's 
possession, a continued one. 
piflferenoe XVII. In strictness of speech there is a difference between a 

between a ^ '^ 

continued continti^d act and a repetition of acts. It is a repetition of acts, 

^ Or in Us migration, or in transitu, 

* These distinctions will be referred to in the next chapter : ch. vili. [Iit- 
tentionality] : and applied to practice in B. I. tit. [Extenuations]. 



VII.} Of Human Actions in General. 75 

when there are intervals filled up by acts of different natures : a act and a 
continued act, when there are no such intenrals, Thus^ to acts, 
lean, is one continued act : to keep striking, a repetition of 
acts. 

XVIII. There is a difference, again, between a r^titimt of Difference 

between a 

acts, and a hubit or practice. The term repetition of acts maj repetition of 

• » m 11 1 acts and. a 

be employed, let the acts m question be separated by ever such habit. 
short intervals, and let the sum total of them occupy ever so 
short a space of time. The term habit is not employed but 
when the acts in question are supposed to be separated by long- 
continued intervals, and the sum total of them to occupy a con- 
siderable space of time. It is not (for instance) the drinking \j^[ \^ >^^ 
ever so many times, nor ever so much at a time, in the course of f 
the same sitting, that will constitute a habit of drunkenness : it \a^~i,Ii^ 
is necessary that such sittings themselves be frequently repeated. 
Every habit is a repetition of acts > or, to speak more strictly, 
when a man has frequently repeated such and such acts after 
considerable intervals, he is said to have persevered in or con- 
tracted a habit : but every repetition of acts is not a habit ^. 

XIX. Fourth, acts may be distinaniished into indivisible and Acts are in- 

/ , , '' ° . divisible, or 

divisible. Indivisible acts are merely imaginary: they may be divisible; 
easily conceived, but can never be known to be exemplified, sibie, as well 

01 1 . . . . ^^^"^ reKard 

Such as are divisible may be so, with regard either to matter or to matter as 

, , , .to motion. 

to motion. An act indivisible with regard to matter, is the 
motion or rest of one single atom of matter. An act indivisible, 
with regard to motion, is the motion of any body, from one 
single atom of space to the next to it. 

Fifth, acts may be distinguished into simple and complex: | 
simple, such as the act of striking, the act of leaning, or the act 
of drinking, above instanced : complex, consisting each of a 
multitude of simple acts, which, though numerous and hetero- 
geneous, derive a sort of unity from the relation they bear to 
some common design or end ; such as the act of giving a dinner, 

^ A habits it should seem, can hardly in strictness be termed an aggre- 
gate of acts : acts being a sort of real archetypal entities, and habits a 
kind of fictitious entities or imaginary beings, supposed to be constituted 
by, or to result as it were out of, the former. 



76 



Of Human Actions in General. 



[chap. 



Caution re- 
specting the 
ambiguity of 
language. 



1 



Circum- 
stances are 
to be con- 
sidered. 



Circum- 
stances, 
what. 



the act of maintaining a child, the act of exhibiting a triumph, 
the act of bearing arms, the act of holding a court, and so 
forth. 

XX. It has been every now and then made a question, what it 
is in such a case that constitutes one act: where one act has 
ended, and another act has begun : whether what has happened 
has been one act or many ^. These questions, it is now evident, 
may frequently be answered, with equal propriety, in opposite 
ways: and if there be any occasions on which they can be 
answered only in one way, the answer will depend upon the na- 
ture of the occasion, and the purpose for which the question is 
proposed. A man is wounded in two fingers at one stroke — ^Is 
it one wound or several ? A man is beaten at 1 2 o'clock, and 
again at 8 minutes after 12 — Is it one beating or several % You 
beat one man, and instantly in the same breath you beat an- 
other — Is this one beating or several % In any of these cases it 
may be one, perhaps, as to some purposes, and several as to 
others. These examples are given, that men may be aware of 
the ambiguity of language : and neither harass themselves with 
unsolvable doubts, nor one another with interminable disputes. 

XXI. So much with regard to acts considered in themselves : 
we come now to speak of the circwmstances with which they 
may have been accompanied. These must necessarily be taken 
into the account before any thing can be determined relative to 
the consequences. "What the consequences of an act may be 
upon the whole can never otherwise be ascertained : it can never 
be known whether it is beneficial, or indifferent, or mischievous. 
In some circumstances even to kill a man may be a beneficial 
act : in others, to set food before him may be a pernicious one. 

XXII. Now the circumstances of an act, are, what? Any 
objects ' whatsoever. Take any act whatsoever, there is nothing 
in the nature of things that excludes any imaginable object from 



^ Distinctions like these come frequently in question in the course of 
Procedure. 
* Or entities. See B. II. tit. [Evidence], § [Facts], 



vii.] Of Human Actions in General, 77 

being a circumstance to it. Any given object may be a circum- 
stance to any other ^. 

XXIII. We have already had occasion to make mention forcircum- 

a moment of the consequences of an act : these were distinguished material and 

• j x*ij* x'iTi'1 j^-L* immaterial. 

into material and immaterial. In like manner may the circum* 

stances of it be distinguished. Kow malericblity is a relative 
term : applied to the consequences of an act, it bore relation to 
pain and pleasure : applied to the circumstances, it bears rela- 
tion to the consequences. A circumstance may be said to be I 
material, when it bears a visible relation in point of causality : 
to the consequences : immaterial, when it bears no such visible 
relation. 

XXIV. The consequences of an act are events ^ A circum- ^ circimi- 
stance may be related to an event in point of causality in any ^S^Sd^ 
one of four ways : i. In the way of causation or production. ^iSt*o/<Si- 
2. In the way of derivation. 3, In the way of collateral con- JjJr^yg, 
nexion. 4. In the way of conjunct influence. It may be said "^o^s^ 
to be related to the event in the way of causation, when it is of fjon® "^^i. 
the number of those that contribute to the production of such lateral con- 

nexion. 

event : in the way of derivation, when it is of the number of the f Coiyunct 

•^ ^ '^ ^ ^ mnuence. 

events to the production of which that in question has been 
contributory: i n the way of co ll ateral connexio n, where the 
circumstance in question, and the event in question, without 
being either of them instrumental in the production of the other, 
are related, each of them, to some common object, which has 
been concerned in the production of them both : in the w ay of 
conjunct influence, when, whether related in any other way or 



^ The etymology of the word circumstance is perfectly characteristic of Circumstance, 
its import : circum stantiay things standing round : objects standing round J^the wort?" 
a given object. I forget what mathematician it was that defined God to 
be a circle, of which the centre is every where, but the circumference no 
where. In like manner the field of circumstances, belonging to any act, 
may be defined a circle, of which the circumference is no where, but of 
which the act in question is the centre. Now then, as any act may, for 
the purpose of discourse, be considered as a centre, any other act or object 
whatsoever may be considered as of the number of those that are standing 
round it. 

' SeeB. n. tit. [Evidence], § [Facts]. 



78 Of Human Actions in General, [ciAF. 

/' not, they have both of them concurred in the production of eome 
common consequence. 
Example. XXV. An example may be of use. In the year 1628, Villiers, 

tionofBuck- Duke of Buckingham, favourite and minister of Charles I. of 
England, received a wound and died. The man who gave it 
him was one Felton, who, exasperated at the mal-administration 
of which that minister was accused, went down from London to 
Portsmouth, where Buckingham happened then to be, made his 
way into his anti-chamber, and finding him busily engaged in 
conversation with a number of people round him, got close to 
him, drew a knife and stabbed him. In the effort, the assas- 
sin's hat fell off, which was found soon after, and, upon searching 
him, the bloody knife. In the crown of the hat were found 
scraps of paper, with sentences expressive of the purpose he 
was come upon. Here then, suppose the event in question is 
the wound received by Buckingham : Felton's drawing out his 
knife, his making his way into the chamber, his going down to 
Portsmouth, his conceiving an indignation at the idea of Buck- 
ingham's administration, that administration itself, Charles's ap- 
pointing such a minister, and so on, higher and higher without 
end, are so many circumstances, related to the event of Buck- 
ingham's receiving the wound, in the way of causation or pro- 
duction : the bloodiness of the knife, a circumstance related to 
the same event in the way of derivation : the finding of the hat 
upon the ground, the finding the sentences in the hat, and the 
writing them, so many circumstances related to it in the way of 
collateral connexion : and the situation and conversations of the 
people about Buckingham, were circumstances related to the 
circumstances of Felton's making his way into the room, going 
down to Portsmouth, and so forth, in the way of conjunct influ- 
ence ; inasmuch as they contributed in common to the event of 
Buckingham's receiving the wound, by preventing him from 
putting himself upon his guard upon the first appearance of the 
intruder*. 

^ The division may be farther illustrated and confirmed by the more 
simple and particular case of animal generation. To production corresponds 



VII.] Of Suffian Actions in General. 79 

XXVI. These several relations do not all of them attach upon it \a not 

* , every event 

an event with equal certainty. In the first place, it is plain, that has cir- 

, ^ 1 . 1 cumstances 

indeed, that every event must have some circumstance or other, related to it 

,. , ' 1 n * ^ ' t f ' 11 in all those 

and in truth, an mdennite multitude of circumstances, related to ways, 
it in the way of production : it must of course have a still greater 
multitude of circumstances related to it in the way of collateral 
connexion. But it does not appear necessary that every event 
should have circumstances related to it in the way of derivation : 
nor therefore that it should have any related to it in the way of 
conjunct influence. But of the circumstances of all kinds which 
actually do attach upon an event, it is only a very small number 
that can be discovered by the utmost exertion of the human 
faculties : it is a still smaller number that ever actually do attract 
our notice : when occasion happens, more or fewer of them will 
be discovered by a man in proportion to the strength, partly of 
his intellectual powers, partly of his inclination^. It appears 

paternity : to derivation, filiation : to collateral connexion, collateral con- 
sanguinity : to conjunct influence, marriage and copulation. 

If necessary, it might be again illustrated by tbe material image of a 
chain, such as that which, according to the ingenious fiction of the ancients, 
is attached to the throne of Jupiter. A section of this chain should then 
be exhibited by way of specimen, in the manner of the diagram of a pedi' 
gree. Such a figure I should accordingly have exhibited, had it not been 
for the apprehension that an exhibition of this sort, while it made the 
subject a small matter clearer to one man out of a hundred, might, like the 
matiiematical formularies we see sometimes employed for the like purpose, 
>nake it more obscure and formidable for the other ninety-nine. 

^ The more remote a connexion of this sort is, of course the more obscure. 
It will often happen that a connexion, the idea of which would at first 
sight appear extravagant and absurd, shall be rendered highly probable, 
and indeed indisputable, merely by the suggestion of a few intermediate 
circumstances. 

At Borne, 390 years before the Christian sera, a goose sets up a cackling : 
two thousand years afterwards a king of France is murdered. To consider 
these two events, and nothing more, what can appear more extravagant 
than the notion that the former of them should have had any influence on 
the production of the latter? Fill up the gap, bring to mind a few inter- 
mediate circumstances, and nothing can appear more probable. It was the 
cackling of a parcel of geese, at the time the Gauls had surprised the Capi- 
itol, that saved the Boman conmionwealth : had it not been for the ascend- 
ancy that commonwealth acquired afterwards over most of the nations of 
Europe, amongst others over Fn^nce, the Christian religion, humanly 
speaking, could not have established itself in the manner it cUd in that 
country. Grant then, that such a man as Henry IV. would have existed, 
no man, however, would have had those motives, by which Ravaillae, mis- 



8o 



Of Human Actions in General. 



[chap. 



Use of this 
chapter. 



therefore that the multitude and description of such of the cir- 
cumstances belonging to an act, as may appear to be material, 
will be determined by two considerations : i. By the nature of 
things themselves. 2. By the strength or weakness of the facul- 
ties of those who happen to consider them. 

XXVII. Thus much it seemed necessary to premise in general 
concerning acts, and their circumstances, previously to the con- 
sideration of the particular sorts of acts with their particular 
circumstances, with which we shall have to do in the body of 
the work. An act of some sort or other is necessarily included 
in the notion of every offence. Together with this act, under 
the notion of the same offence, are included certain circum- 
stances : which circumstances enter into the essence of the 
offence, contribute by their conjunct influence to the production 
of its consequences, and in conjunction with the act are brought 
into view by the name by which it stands distinguished. These 
we shall have occasion to distinguish hereafter by the name of 
criminative circumstances^. Other circumstances again entering 
into combination with the act and the former set of circumstances, 
are productive of still farther consequences. These additional 
consequences, if they are of the beneficial kind, bestow, according 
to the value they bear in that capacity, upon the circumstances 
to which they owe their birth the appellation of exculjpative^ or 
or extenvMive circumstances' : if of the mischievous kind, they 
bestow on them the appellation of aggravative circumstances*. 
Of all these different sets of circumstances, the criminative are 
connected with the consequences of the original offence, in the 
way of production ; with the act, and with one another, in the 
way of conjunct influence : the consequences of the original 
offence with them, and with the act respectively, in the way of 
derivation : the consequences of the modified offence, with the 



led by a mischievous notion concerning the dictates of that religion, was 
prompted to assassinate him. 

* See B. I. tit. [Grim, circumstances]. 

* See B. I. tit. [Justifications]. 
' See B. I. tit. [Extenuations]. 

* See B. I. tit. [Aggravations]. 



vn.] Of Human Actions in General. 8i 

criminative, exculpative, and extenuative circumstances respec- 
tively, in the way also of derivation: these different sets of 
circumstances, with the consequences of the modified act or 
offence, in the way of production: and with one another (in 
respect of the consequences of the modified act or offence) in the 
way of conjunct influence. Lastly, whatever circumstances can 
be seen to be connected with the consequences of the offence, 
whether directly in the way of derivation, or obliquely in the 
way of collateral affinity (to wit, in virtue of its being connected, 
in the way of derivation, with some of the circumstances with 
which they stand connected in the same manner) bear a material 
relation to the offence in the way of evidence, they may accord- 
ingly be styled emdervtiary circumstances, and may become of l 
use, by being held forth upon occasion as so many proofs, indi- 
cations, or evidences of its having been committed^. 

' See B. I. tit. [Accessoiy OfFences] and B. II. tit. [Evidence]. 

It is evident that this analysis is equally applicable to incidents of a 
purely physical nature, as to those in which moral agency is concerned. If 
therefore it be just and useful here, it might be found not impossible, per- 
haps, to find some use for it in natural philosophy. 



CHAPTER VIII. 



OF INTENTIONALITY. 



Hecapitula- 

tiOJD. 



The inten- 
tion may 
r^rard, 
1. The act : 
or, 2. The 
oonse- 
qufflioes. 



I. So much with regard to the two first of the articles upon 
which the evil tendency of an action may depend : viz, the act 
itself, and the general assemblage of the circumstances with 
which it may have been accompanied. We come now to con- 
sider the ways in which the particular circumstance of intention 
may be concerned in it. 

II. First, then, the intention or will may regard either of two 
objects: i. The act itself: or, 2. Its consequences. Of these 
objects, that which the intention regards may be styled inten- 
tional. If it regards the act, then the act may be said to be 
intentional^: if the consequences, so also then may the conse- 
quences. If it regards both the act and consequences, the 
whole action may be said to be intentional. Whichever of those 
articles is not the object of the intention, may of course be said 
to be unintentioTial, 



Ambis^ty of 
the words 
voluntary and 
involuntary. 



^ On this occasion the words voluntary and involvi/nAary are commonly 
employed. These, however, I purposely abstain from, on account of the 
extreme ambiguity of their signification. By a voluntary act is meant 
sometimes, any act, in the performance of which the will has had any con- 
cern at all ; in this sense it is synonymous to iidefiitiowd : sometimes such 
acts only, in the production of which the will has been determined by 
motives not of a painful nature ; in this sense it is synonymous to uncon- 
strained, or uncoerced : sometimes such acts only, in the production of 
which the will has been determined by motives, which, whether of the 
pleasurable or painful kind, occurred to a man himself, without being sug- 
gested by any body else ; in this sense it is synonymous to spontaneous. 
The sense of the word involuntary does not correspond completely to that 
of the word voluntary. Involuntary is used in opposition to intentional ; 
and to unconstrained : but not to spontaneous. It might be of use to con- 
fine the signification of the words voluntary and involuntary to one single 
and very narrow case, which will be mentioned in the next note. 



Of Intentionality, 83 

III. The act may very easily be intentional without the con- it mm re- 
sequences; and often is so. Thus, you may intend to touch a ^hout^i^ 
man, without intending to hurt him: and yet, as the conse-^^^^' 
quences turn out, you may chance to hurt him. 

lY. The consequences of an act may also be intentional, with- —crtheoon- 
out the act's being intentional throughout ; that is, without its ^houtre- 
being intentional in every stage of it : but thb is not so frequent SSlJ^ite 
a case as the former. You intend to hurt a man, suppose, by run- "^■*^* 
ning against him, and pushing him down : and you run towards 
him accordingly: but a second man coming in on a sudden 
between you and the first man, before you can stop yourself, you 
run against the second man, and by him push down the first. 

V. But the consequences of an act cannot be intentional, —.but not 
without the act's being itseK intentional in at least the first Kaniiiig the 
stage. If the act be not intentional in the first stage, it is 
no act of yours: there is accordingly no intention on your 
part to produce the consequences : that is to say, the individual 
consequences. All there can have been on your part is a distant 
^ intention to produce other consequences, of the same nature, by 
some act of yours, at a future time : or else, without any inten- 
tion, a bare wish to see such event take place. The second man, 
suppose, runs of his own accord against the first, and pushes him 
down. You had intentions of doing a thing of the same nature : 
viz. To run against him, and push him down yourself; but you 
had done nothing in pursuance of those intentions : the indi- 
vidual consequences therefore of the act, which the second man 
performed in pushing down the first, cannot be said to have 
been on your part intentional \ 

^ To render the analysiB here given of the possible states of the mind in Anactuninten- 
point of intentionality absolutely complete, it must be pushed to such a ^age.'m^ be' 
farther degree of minuteness, as to some eyes will be apt to appear trifling. *J "^^h respect 
On this account it seemed advisable to discard what follows, from the text z. 'Quantity of 
to a place where any one wl?o thinks proper may pass by it. An act of the ^DirectionT* * 
bpdy, when of the positive kind, is a motion : now in motion there are 3- velocity, 
always three articles to be considered : i. The quantity of matter that I 
moves : 2. The direction in which it moves : and, 3. The velocity with | 
which it moves. GcHrespondent to these three articles, are so many modeA 
of intentionaUty, with regard to an act, considered as being only in its first ■ 
stage. To be completely tmintentional, it must be unintentional with | 

Q 2 



84 Of Intentionality. [chap. 

Aoonae- VI, Second. A consequence, when it is intentional, may 

when iiiten.|either be directly so, or only obliquely. It may be said to be 
be directly directly or lineally intentional, when the prospect of producing 
liqueiy. it constituted one of the links in the chain of causes by which 
the person was determined to do the act. It may be said to be 
obliquely or collaterally intentional, when, although the conse- 
quence was in contemplation, and appeared likely to ensue in 
case of the act's being performed, yet the prospect of producing 
such consequence did not constitute a link in the aforesaid 
chain. 
When di- 1 VII. Third. An incident, which is directly intentional, may 
matoiy so, oJ either be ultimately so, or only mediately. It may be said to be 
ultimately intentional, when it stands last of all exterior events 
in the aforesaid chain of motives ; insomuch that the prospect of 
the production of such incident, could there be a certainty of its 
taking place, would be sufficient to determine the will, without 
the prospect of its producing any other. It may be said to be 
mediately intentional, and no more, when there is some other 
incident, the prospect of producing which forms a subsequent 
link in the same chain : insomuch that the prospect of producing 

respect to every one of these three particulars. This is the case with those 
acts which alone are properly termed involuntary : acts, in the performance 
of which the will has no sort of share : such as the contraction of the heart 
and arteries. 

Upon this principle, acts that are unintentional in their first stage, may 
be distinguished into such as are completely unintentional, and such as are 
incompletely unintentional : and these again may be unintentional, either 
in point of quantity of matter alone, in point of direction alone, in point of 
velocity alone, or in any two of these points together. 

The example given further on may easily be extended to this part of the 
analysis, by any one who thinks it worth Uie while. 

There seem to be occasions in which even these disquisitions, minute as 
they may appear, may not be without their use in practice. In the case of 
homicide, for example, and other corporal injuries, all the distinctions here 
specified may occur, and in the course of tnsl may, for some purpose or 
other, require to be brought to mind, and made the subject of discourse. 
What may contribute to render the mention of them pardonable, if the use 
that might possibly be made of them in natural philosophy. In the hands 
of an expert metaphysician, these, together with the foregoing chapter on 
human actions, and the section on facts in general, in title Evidence of the 
Book of Procedure, might, perhaps, be made to contribute something 
towards an exhaustive analysis of the possible varieties of mechanical inven- 
tions. 



VIII.] Of Intentionalitt/. 85 

the former would not have operated as a motive, but for the 
tendency which it seemed to have towards the production of the 
latter. 

VIII. Fourth. When an incident is directly intentional, it When di- 
may either be exclusively so, or inexelustvdy. If may be said tionai, it 
to be exclusively intentional, when no other but that very indi- ciusiveiy so, 
vidual incident would have answered the purpose, insomuch that aiveiy. 

no other incident had any share in determining the will to the 
act in question. It may be said to have been inexclusively ^ in- 
tentional, when there was some other incident, the prospect of 
which was acting upon the will at the same time. 

IX. Fifth. When an incident is inexclusively intentional, it When inex- 
may be either conjunctively so, c^tajunctively, or indiscrimin(Uely, may be con- 
It may be said to be conjunctively intentional with regard to cUsjunc- 
such other incident, when the intention is to produce both : dis- discriinin- 
junctively, when the intention is to produce either the one or 

the other indifferently, but not both : indiscriminately, when the 
intention is indifferently to produce either the one or the other, 
or both, as it may happen. 

X. Sixth. When two incidents are disjunctively intentional, ?^**«5 ^ .^ 

'* '* ' junctively, it 

they may be so with or without 'preference. They may be said ™*^.j!? ^*^ 
to be so with preference, when the intention is, that one of them preference, 
in particular should happen rather than the other : without pre- 
ference, when the intention is equally fulfilled, whichever of them 
happens,'. 

XL One example will make all this clear. William II. king Example, 
of England, being out a stag-hunting, received from Sir Walter 

* Or concurrently. 

" There is a difference between the case where an incident is altogether Difference be- 
nnintentional, and that in which, it being disjunctively intentional with dent's bdn^ 
reference to another, the preference is in favour of that other. In the first JjyJuJfjJJ?' 
case, it is not the intention of the party that the incident in question should tiveiy inten- 
happen at all : in the latter case, the intention is rather that the other ^h^^'eTtion is 
should happen : but if that cannot be, then that this in question should in favour of the 
happen rather than that neither should, and that both, at any rate, should ° 
not happen. 

All these are distinctions to be attended to in the use of the particle w : 
a particle of very ambiguous import, and of great importance in legislation. 
See Append, tit. [Composition]. 



86 Of Intentionality, [chap. 

Tyrrel a wound, of which he died ^. Let us take this case, and 
diversify it with a variety of suppositions, correspondent to the 
distinctions just laid down. 

1. First then, Tyrrel did not so much as entertain a thought 
of the king's death ; or, if he did, looked upon it as an event of 
which there was no danger. In either of these cases the in- 
cident of his killing the king was altogether unintentional. 

2. He saw a stag running that way, and he saw the king 
riding that way at the same time : what he aimed at was to kill 
the stag : he did not wish to ki]l the king : at the same time he 
saw, that if he shot, it was as likely he should kill the king 
as the stag: yet for all that he shot, and killed the king ac- 
cordingly. In this case the incident of his killing the king was 
intentional, but obliquely so. 

3. He killed the king on account of the hatred he bore him, 
and for no other reason than the pleasure of destroying him. 
In this case the incident of the king's death was not only directly 
but ultimately intentional. 

4. He killed the king, intending fiilly so to do ; not for any 
hatred he bore him, but for the sake of plundering him when 
dead. In this case the incident of the king's death was directly 
intentional, but not ultimately: it was mediately intentional. 

5. He intended neither more nor less than to kill the king. 
He had no other aim nor wish. In this case it was exclusively 
as well as directly intentional : exclusively, to wit, with regard 
to every other material incident. 

6. Sir Walter shot the king in the right leg, as he was pluck- 
ing a thorn out of it with his left hand. His intention was, by 
shooting the arrow into his leg through his hand, to cripple him 
in both those limbs at the same time. In this case the incident 
of the king's being shot in the leg was intentional : and that 
conjunctively with another which did not happen ; viz, his being 
shot in the hand. 

7. The intention of Tyrrel was to shoot the king either in the 
hand or in the leg, but not in both; and rather in the hand 

^ Hume^s Hist. 



VIII.] Of IntetUionality. 87 

than in the leg. In this case the intention of shooting in the 
hand was disjunctively concurrent, with regard to the other in- 
cident, and that with preference. 

8. His intention was to shoot the king either in the leg or 
the hand, whichever might happen ; but not in both. In this 
case the intention was inexclusive, but di^unctivelyso: yet that» 
however, without preference. 

9. His intention was to shoot the king either in the leg or 
the hand, or in both, as it might happen. In this case the 
intention was indiscriminately concurrent, with respect to the 
two incidents. 

XII. It is to be observed^ that an act may be unintentional intentionai- 

A.. 1 i*.j*i*i I. ityoftheact 

m any stage or stages of it, though intentional in the preceding : with raroect 
and, on the other hand, it may be intentional in any stage or entitages, 
stages of it, and yet unintentional in the succeeding \ But teriai. 
whether it be intentional or no in any preceding stage, is im-| 
material, with respect to the consequences, so it be unintentional \ 
in the last. The only point, with respect to which it is material, 
is the proof. The more stages the act is imintentional in, the \ 
more apparent it will cominonly be, that it was unintentional | 
with respect to the last. If a man, intending to strike you on 
the cheek, strikes you in the eye, and puts it out, it will probably 
be difficult for him to prove that it was not his intention to 
strike you in the eye. It will probably be easier, if his intention 
was really not to strike you, or even not to strike at alL 

Xni. It is frequent to hear men speak of a good intention, of Goodnem 

n ^ t nil ^ and badness 

a bad mtention : of the goodness and badness of a man s mten- of intention 

, , , dismissed, 

tion : a circumstance on which great stress is generally laid. It 

is indeed of no small importance, when properly understood : 

but the import of it is to the last degree ambiguous and obscure. 

Strictly speaking, nothing can be said to be good or bad, but 

either in itself ; which is the case only with pain or pleasure : 

or on account of its effects ; which is the case only with things 

that are the causes or preventives of pain and pleasure. But in 

a figurative and less proper way of speech, a thing may also be 

^ See ch. vii. [Actions], par. 14. 



1 



88 Of Intentionality^ 

styled good or bad, in consideration of its cause. Now the effects 
of an intention to do such or such an act, are the same objects 
which we have been speaking of under the appellation of itd 
^(ynAeqtwn^ces : and the causes of intention are called motives. A 
man's intention then on any occasion may be styled good or 
bad, with reference either to the consequences of the act, or with 
reference to his motives. If it be deemed good or bad in any 
sense, it must be either because it is deemed to be productive of 
good or of bad consequences, or because it is deemed to originate 
from a good or from a bad motive. But the goodness or bad- 
ness of the consequences depend upon the circumstances. Now 
the circumstances are no objects of the intention. A man in- 
tends the act: and by his intention produces the act : but as to 
the circumstances, he does not intend ^k/em : he does not, inas- 
much as they are circumstances of it, produce them. If by 
accident there be a few which he has been instrumental in pro- 
ducing, it has been by former intentions, directed to former acts, 
productive of those circumstances as the consequences : at the 
time in question he takes them as he finds them. Acts, with 
i their consequences, are objects of the will as well as of the 
understanding : circumstances, as such, are objects of the under- 
standing only. All he can do with these, as such, is to know or 
not to know them : in other words, to be conscious of them, or 

(not conscious. To the title of Consciousness belongs what is 
to be said of the goodness or badness of a man's intention, as 
resulting from the consequences of the act : and to the head of 
Motives, what is to be said of his intention, as resulting from 
the motive. 



CHAPTER IX. 



OF CONSCIOUSNESS. 

I. So far with regard to the ways in which the will or inten- Connexion 
tion may be concerned in the production of any incident : we ter with the 

. foregoing. 

come now to consider the part which the understanding or 
perceptive faculty may have borne, with relation to such in- 
cident. 

n. A certain act has been done, and that intentionally : that ^<^ advised 

' '' ^ andunad- 

act was attended with certain circumstances : upon these cir- vised: con- 

*^ sciousness, 

cumstances depended certain of its consequences ; and amongst what, 
the rest, all those which were of a nature purely physical. Now 
then, take any one of these circumstances, it is plain, that a 
man, at the time of doing the act from whence such consequences 
ensued, may have been either conscious, with respect to this 
circumstance, or unconscious. In other words, he may either 
have been aware of the circumstance, or not aware: it may 
either have been present to his mind, or not present. In the 
first case, the act may be said to have been an advised act, with 
respect to that circumstance : in the other case, an imadvised 
one. 

III. There are two points, with regard to which an act may! Unadvised 
have been advised or unadvised : i. The eadstence of the circum-jj^SSOT 
stance itself. 2. The materiality of it \ SSeriiSttyf 

rV. It is manifest, that with reference to the time of the The circum- 
act, such circumstance may have been either present, past, or have been 

X . present, 

futv/re. past, or 

V. An act which is unadvised, is either heedles s, or not heed- An'waad- 
less. It is termed heedless, when the case is thought to be^J^i^ 
such, that a^p erson of ordinary prudence *, if prompted by an n^Sai^ 

* See ch. vii. [Actions], par. 3. * See ch. vi. [Sensibility], par. 12. 



re- 



90 Of Consciousness, [chap. 

ordinary share of benevolence^ would have been likely to have 
bestowed such and so much attention and reflection upon the 
material circumstances, as would have effectually disposed him 
to prevent the mischievous incident from taking place : not 
heedless, when the case is not thought to be such as above 
mentioned ^. 
Amis-ad- YI. Again. Whether a man did or did not suppose the ex- 

visod ftctia 

what.— A istence or materiality of a given circumstance, it may be that he 

posaL did suppose the existence and materiality of some circumstance, 

which either did not exist, or which, though existing, was not 

1 material. In such case the act may be said to be mis-advised, 
with respect to such imagined circumstance : and it may be said, 
that there haa been an erroneous supposition, or a mis-sn^pposal 
in the case. 
The sup- YH. Now a circumstance, the existence of which is thus 

posed cur- 

cumstanoe erroneously supposed, may be material either, i. In the way of 
been ma- prevention : or, 2. In that of compensation. It may be said to 
way either of be material in the way of prevention, when its effect or tendency, 
or of 00m- had it existed, would have been to prevent the obnoxious con- 
sequences: in the way of compensation, when that effect or 
tendency would have been to produce other consequences, the 
beneflcialness of which would have out- weighed the mischievous- 
ness of the others. 

It may have YIII. It is manifest that, with reference to the time of the 
posed pre- act, such imaginary circumstance may in either case have been 
or future/ supposed either to be present, past, or future. 
Example, IX. To return to the example exhibited in the preceding 

continued . 

ih>m the last chapter. 

^ '* 10. Tyrrel intended to shoot in the direction in which he 

shot ; but he did not know that the king was riding so near 
that way. In this case the act he performed in shooting, the 
act of shooting, was unadvised, with respect to the eodstence of 
the circumstance of the king's being so near riding that way. 
II. He knew that the king was riding that way : but at the 

^ See B. I. tit. [Extenuations]. 



pensation. 



IX.] Of ConscioTisness, 91 

distance at which the king was, he knew not of the prohability I 
there was that the arrow would reach him. In this case the I 
act was unadvised, with respect to the materialUy of the cir-' 
cumstance. 

12. Somebody had dipped the arrow in poison, without 
TyrreFs knowing of it. In this case the act was unadyised,! 
with respect to the existence of a past circumstance. I 

13. At the very instant that Tyrrel drew the bow, the king, 
being screened from his view by the foliage of some bushes, was 
riding furiously, in such manner as to meet the arrow in a 
direct line : which circumstance was also more than Tyrrel 
knew of. In this case the act was unadvised, with respect to | 
the existence of a jpresent circumstance. 

14. The king being at a distance from court, could get 
nobody to dress his wound till the next day; of which circum- 
stance Tyrrel was not aware. In this case the act was unad-| 
vised, with respect to what was then a future circumstance. 1 

15. Tyrrel knew of the king's being riding that way, of his 
being so near, and so forth ; but being deceived by the foliage 
of the bushes, he thought he saw a bank between the spot from 
which he shot, and that to which the king was riding. In this 
case the act was Tms-advised, proceeding on the missujppascd of 
a preventive circumstance. 

16. Tyrrel knew that every thing was as above, nor was he 
deceived by the supposition of any preventive circumstance. 
But he believed the king to be an usurper : and supposed he 
was coming up to attack a person whom Tyrrel believed to be 
the rightful king, and who was riding by Tyrrers side. In 
this case the act was also mis-advised, but proceeded on the 
mis-supposal of a compensative circumstance. 

X. Let us observe the connexion there is between intention- in what case 
ality and consciousness. When the act itself is intentional, and ness extends 
with respect to the existence of all the circumstances advised^ tionaiity ' 
as also with respect to the materiality of those circumstances, in to the oon- 
relation to a given consequence, and there is no mis-supposal ^®^^®°**^* 
with regard to any preventive circumstance, that consequence 



^2, Of Consciousness. [chap. 

must also be intentional : in other words ; advisedness, with 
\ respect to the circumstances, if clear from the mis-supposal of 

any preventive circumstance, extends the intentionality from the 
lact to the consequences. Those consequences may be either 

directly intentional, or only obliquely so : but at any rate they 

cannot but be intentional. 

Example XI. To go on with the example. If Tyrrel intended to shoot 

continued. , . . . t • • 

in the direction in which the king was riding up, and knew that 

the king was coming to meet the arrow, and knew the pro- 
bability there was of his being shot in that same part in which 
he was shot, or in another as dangerous, and with that ^ame 
degree of force, and so forth, and was not misled by the erro- 
neous supposition of a circumstance by which the shot would 
have been prevented from taking place, or any such other pre- 
ventive circumstance, it is plain he could not but have intended 
the king's death. Perhaps he did not positively wish it ; but 
for all that, in a certain sense he intended it. 
A misad- XII. "What heedlessness is in the case of an unadvised act, 

vised act ■■ ••ji i» '-i*-! a*j*ji. 

may be rash rashness IS m the case of a misadvised one. A misadvised act 
then may be either rash or not rash. It may be termed rash, 
when the case is thought to be such, that a person of ordinary 
prudence, if prompted by an ordinary share of benevolence, 
would have employed such and so much attention and reflection 
to the imagined circumstance, as, by discovering to him the non- 
existence, improbability, or immateriality of it, would have 
effectually disposed him to prevent the mischievous incident 
from taking place. 

Theinten- XIII. In ordinary discourse, when a man does an act of 

tionmaybe i . i ,, . ,. ... 

good or bad which the consequences prove mischievous, it is a common 
dependentiy thing to Speak of him as having acted with a good intention or 
as weU as with a bad intention, of his intention's being a good one or a 
conse- bad one. The epithets good and bad are all this while applied, 
we see, to the intention : but the application of them is most 
commonly governed by a supposition formed with regard to the 
nature of the motive. The act, though eventually it prove 
mischievous, is said to be done with a good intention, when it is 



quences. 



IX.] Of Conscioumess. 93 

supposed to issue from a motive which is looked upon as a good 
motive : with a bad intention, when it is supposed to be the 
result of a motive which is looked upon as a bad motive. But 
the nature of the consequences intended, and the nature of the 
motive which gave birth to the intention, are objects which, 
though intimately connected, are perfectly distinguishable. The 
intention might therefore with perfect propriety be styled a 
good one, whatever were the motive. It might be styled a 
good one, when not only the consequences of the act prove mis- 
chievous, but the motive which gave birth to it was what is 
called a bad one. To warrant the speaking of the intention as 
being a good one, it is sufficient if the consequences of the act, 
had they proved what to the agent they seemed likely to be, 
fvotUd have been of a beneficial nature. And in the same 
manner the intention may be bad, when not only the conse- 
quences of the act prove beneficial, but the motive which gave 
birth to it was a good one. 

XIV. Now, when a man has a mind to speak of your intention it is better 

, when the in- 

as being good or bad, with reference to the consequences, if he tmtion is 
speaks of it at all he must use the word intention, for there spoken of as 

. • .1 -r* .^ 1 i. ., . ^ being good 

IS no other. But if a man means to speak of the motive from or had, not 
which your intention originated, as being a good or a bad one, motive, 
he is certainly not obliged to use the word intention : it is at 
least as well to use the word motive. By the supposition he 
means the motive ; and very likely he may not mean the inten- 
tion. For what is true of the one is very often not true of the 
other. The motive may be good when the intention is bad : 
the intention may be good when the motive is bad : whether 
they are both good or both bad, or the one good and the other 
bad, makes, as we shall see hereafter, a very essential difference 
with regard to the consequences ^. It is therefore much better, 
when motive is meant, never to say intention. 

XY. An example will make this clear. Out of malice a man\Example. 
prosecutes you for a crime of which he believes you to be guilty, 
but of which in fact you are not guilty. Here the eon8equ£nce$l 

^ See ch. xii. [Consequences]. 



94 



Of Consciousness. 



[chap. 



Intention, 
in what 
cases it may 
be innocent. 






Intentional- 
it^ and con- 
sciousness, 
how spoken 
of in the 
Roman law. 



of his conduct are mischievouB : for they are mischievous to you 
at any rate, in virtue of the shame and anxiety which you are 
made to suffer while the prosecution is depending : to which is 
to be added, in case of your being convicted, the evil of the 
punishment. To you therefore they are mischievous; nor is 
there any one to whom they are beneficial. The man's motive 
was also what is called a bad one : for malice will be allowed by 
every body to be a bad motive. However, the consequences of 
his conduct, had they proved such as he believed them likely to 
be, would have been good : for in them would have been in- 
cluded the punishment of a criminal, which is a benefit to all 
who are exposed to suffer by a crime of the like nature. The 
intention therefore, in this case, though not in a common way of 
speaking the motive, might be styled a good one. But of mo- 
tives more particularly in the next chapter. 

XVI. In the same sense the intention, whether it be positively 
good or no, so long as it is not bad, may be termed innocent. 
Accordingly, let the consequences have proved mischievous, and 
let the motive have been what it wHl, the intention may be 
termed innocent in either of two cases : i. In the case of un- 
advised ness with respect to any of the circumstances on which 
the mischievousness of the consequences dependecL : 2. In the 
case of m^-advisedness with respect to any circumstance, which, 
had it been what it appeared to be, would have served either to 
prevent or to outweigh the mischief. 

XVII. A few words for the purpose of applying what has 
been said to the Koman law. Unintentionality, and innocence 
of intention, seem both to be included in the case of infor- 
tunium, where there is neither dolus nor ctdpa. Unadvisedness 
coupled with heedlessness, and mis-ad visedn ess coupled with 
rashness, correspond to the culpa sine dolo. Direct intention- 
ality corresponds to dolus. Oblique intentionality seems hardly 
to have been distinguished firom direct; were it to occur, it 
would probably be deemed also to correspond to dolus. The 
division into culpa, lata, levis, and levissima, is such as nothing 
certain can correspond to. What is it that it expresses f A dis- 



IX.] Of Consciousness^ 95 

tinction, not in tlie case itself, but only in the sentiments wHch 
any person (a judge, for instance) may find himself disposed to 
entertain with relation to it : supposing it already distinguished 
into three subordinate cases by other means. 

The word dolus seems ill enough contrived : the word culpa as 
indifferently. Dolus, upon any other occasion, would be under- 
stood to imply deceit, concealment^, clandestinity^: but here it 
is extended to open force. Culpa, upon any other occasion, 
would be understood to extend to blame of every kind. It 
would therefore include dolus ^. 

XVni. The above-mentioned definitions and distinctions are Use of this 
for from being mere matters of speculation. They are capable ceding 
of the most extensive and constant application, as well to moral 
discourse as to legislative practice. Upon the degree and bias 
of a man's intention, upon the absence or presence of conscious- 
ness or mis-Bupposal, depend a great part of the good and bad, 
more especially of the bad consequences of an act; and on this, 
as well as other grounds, a great part of the demand for punish- 

* See B. I. tit. [Theft] verho [amenable]. 

* Dolus, an virtus quis in hoste requirit ? — ^ViROlL. 
5<$Ay ill KoL A/MpadSv. — Homeb. 

^ I pretend not here to give any determinate explanation of a set of 
words, of which the great misfortune is, that the import of them is confused 
and indeteiminate. I speak only by approximation. To attempt to deter- 
mine the precise import that has been given them by a hundredth part of 
the authors that have used them, would be an endless task. Would any 
one talk intelligibly on this subject in Latin ? let him throw out dolus alto- 
gether : let him keep culpa, for the purpose of expressing not the case 
itself, but the sentiment that is entertained concerning a case described by 
other means. For intentionality, let him coin a word boldly, and say inten- 
tumalitas : for unintentionality, Tion-intemtionalitas. For unadvisedness, 
he has already the word imcUia ; though the words imprudentiat inobser- 
vantia, were it not for the other senses they are used in, would do better : 
for unadvisedness coupled with heedlessness, let him say inseitia culpcibilis : 
for unadvisedness without heedlessness, inscitia inculpabUis : for mis-ad- 
visedness coupled with rashness, error culpcibilis, error temerarius, or error 
cum temeritate: for mis-advisedness without rashness, error inctdpahilis, 
error non-temerarius, or error sine temerUate. 

It is not unfrequent likewise to meet with the phrase, malo ammo : a 
phrase still more indeterminate, if possible, than any of the former. It 
seems to have reference either to intentionality, or to consciousness, or to 
the motive, or to the disposition, or to any two or more of these taken 
together ; nobody can tell which : these being objects which seem to have 
never hitherto been properly distinguished and defined. 



95 Of Consciousness, 

ment ^. The presence of intention with regard to such or such a 
consequence, and of consciousness with regard to such or such a 
circumstance, of the act, will form so many criminative circum- 
stances^, or essential ingredients in the composition of this or 
that offence : applied to other circumstances, consciousness will 
form a ground of aggravation, annexable to the like offence'. 
In almost all cases, the absence of intention with regard to 
certain consequences, and the absence of consciousness, or the 
presence of mis-supposal, with regard to certain circumstances, 
will constitute so many grounds of extenuation \ 

^ See ch. xiii. [Cases unmeet]. 

' See B. I. tit. [Circumstances influencing]. 

' See B. I. tit. [Agyravations]. 

* See B. I. tit. [Extenuations]. 



CfiAPTER X. 



OF MOTIVES. 

§ I. Different senses of the word motive^. 

I. It is an acknowledged trutli, that erery kind of act what^ Moti> '. 
ever, and consequently every kind of offence, is apt to assume a sidere . 
different character, and be attended with different effects, accord^ 

ing to the nature of the motive which gives birth to it. This 
makes it requisite to take a view of the several motives by which 
human conduct is liable to be influenced* 

II. By a motive, in the most extensive sense in which the Pnroly spe- 

" culative mo* 

tives have 



word is ever used with reference to a thinking being, is meant 
any thing that can contribute to give birth to, or even to pre- 
vent, any kind of action. Kow the action of a thinking being 
is the act either of the body, or only of the mind : and an act of 
the mind is an act either of the intellectual faculty, or of the 
will. Acts of the intellectual faculty will sometimes rest in the | 
understanding merely, without exerting any influence in the pro^ 
duction of any acts of the will. Motives, which are not of a 
nature to influence any other acts than those, may be styled 
purely speculative motives, or motives resting in speculation,! 
But as to these acts, neither do they exercise any influence over 

^ Kote by the ftuthor, July, 1822. 

For a tabular simultaneouB view of the whole list of MOTIVBS, in conjunc- 
tion with the correspondent pleasures and pains, interests and desires, aee, 
by the same author. Table of the Sprvngs of Action, &c., with Explanatory 
Notes and Observations. London : 181 7, Hunter, St. Paul's Church Yard* 
8vo. pp. 33. 

The word vndttceTnent has of late presented itself, as being in its significa- 
tion more oomprehenfiive than the word motvvef and on some occasions more 
apposite. 



nothing to 
do here. 



98 (Jf Motives, [chap. 

external acts, or over their consequences, nor consequently over 
any pain or any pleasure that may be in the number of such 
consequences. Now it is only on account of their tendency to 
produce either pain or pleasure, that any acts can be material. 
"With acts, therefore, that rest purely in the understanding, we 
have not here any concern : nor therefore with any object, if any 
such th^ere be, which, in the character of a motive, can have no 
influence on any other acts than those. 
Motives to HI. The motives with which alone we have any concern, are 

the will. •' ' 

such as are of a nature to act upon the will. By a motive then, 
in this sense of the word, is to be understood any thing what- 
soever, which, by influencing the will of a sensitive being, is 
supposed to serve as a means of determining him to act, or 
I voluntarily to forbear to act ^, upon any occasion. Motives of 
^ this sort, in contradistinction to the former, may be styled prac- 
' iAaal motives, or motives applying to practice. 
Pigumtive IV. Owing to the poverty and unsettled state of language, 
ative senses the word moiwe is employed indiscriminately to denote two 
' kinds of objects, which, for the better understanding of the sub- 
ject, it is necessary should be distinguished. On some occasions 
it is employed to denote any of those really existing incidents 
from whence the act in question is supposed to take its rise. 
The sense it bears on these occasions may be styled its literal or 
unfigv/raUve sense. On other occasions it is employed to denote 
a certain fictitious entity, a passion, an affection of the mind, an 
ideal being which upon the happening of any such incident is 
considered as operating upon the mind, and prompting it to 
take that course, towards which it is impelled by the influence 



* When the effect or tendency of a motive is to determine a man to for- 
bear to act, it may seem improper to make use of the term motive .* since 
motive, properly speaking, means that which disposes an object to move. 
We must however use that improper term, or a term which, though proper 
enough, is sc£u?ce in use, the word determinative. By way of justification, or 
at least apology, for the popular usage in this behalf, it may be observed, 
that even forbearance to act, or the negation of motion (that is, of bodily 
motion) supposes an act done, when such forbearance is voluntary. It sup- 
poses, to wit, an act of the will, which is as much a positive act, as much a 
motion, as any other act of the thinking substance. 



X.] Of Motives, 99 

of such incident. Motives of this class are Avarice, Indolence, I 
Benevolence, and so forth; as we shall see more particularly ' 
farther on. This latter may be styled ih^ figva^ive sense of 
the term motive* * 

Y. As to the real incidents to which the name of motive is Motives in- 
also given, these too are of two very different kinds. They erterior. 
may be either, i. The iniemal perception of any individual lot / 
of pleasure or pain, the expectation of which is looked upon as 
calculated to determine you to act in such or such a manner; as / 
the pleasure of acquiring such a sum of money, the pain of 
exerting yourself on such an occasion, and so forth : or, 2. Any , 
external event, the happening whereof is regarded as having a ' 
tendency to bring about the perception of such pleasure or such 
pain : for instance, the coming up of a lottery ticket, by which 
the possession of the money devolves to you ; or the breaking 
out of a fire in the house you are in, which makes it necessary 
for you to quit it. The former kind of [motives may be termed 
interior, or internal : the latter exterior, or external. 

YI. Two other senses of the term motive need also to be dis- Motive in 
tinguished. Motive refers necessarily to action. It is a pleasure, motiye in 
pain, or other event, that prompts to action. Motive then, in 
one sense of the word, must be previous to such event. But, 
for a man to be governed by any motive, he must in every 
case look beyond that event which is called his action ; he must 
look to the consequences of it : and it is only in this way that 
the idea of pleasure, of pain, or of any other event, can give 
birth to it. He must look, therefore, in every case, to some 
event posterior to the act in contemplation : an event which as 
yet exists not, but stands only in prospect. Now, as it is in all 
cases difficult, and in most cases unnecessary, to distinguish 
between objects so intimately connected, as the posterior pos- 
sible object which is thus looked forward to, and the present 
existing object or event which takes place upon a man's looking 
forward to the other, they are both of them spoken of under the 
same appellation, motive. To distinguish them, the one first ' 
mentioned may be termed a motive in jorospect, the other a 

H 2 



loO Of Motives, [chap. 

• motive in e99tt und under each of these denominations will 
come as well exterior as internal motives. A fire breaks out in 
your neighbour's house : you are under apprehension of its ex- 
tending to your own : you are apprehensive, that if you stay in 

i it, you will be burnt: you accordingly run out of it. This then 
is the act: the others are all motives to it. The event of 
the fire's breaking out in your neighbour's house is an external 
motive, and that in use: the idea or belief of the proba- 

' Ittity of the fire's extending to your own house, that of your 
being burnt if you continue, and the pain you feel at the 

i thought of such a catastrophe, are all so many internal events, 

■ but still in es^e: the event of the fire's actually extending to 
your own house, and that of your being actually burnt by it, 
external motives in prospect : the pain you would feel at seeing 
your house a burning, and the pain you would feel while you 
yourself were burning, internal motives in prospect : which 
events, according as the matter turns out, may come to be in 
tsse: but then of course they will cease to act as motives. 
Motives im- VII. Of all these motives, which stand nearest to the act, to 
remotef ^® production of which they all contribute, is that internal 
motive in tBze which consists in the expectation of the internal 
motive in prospect : the pain or uneasiness you feel at the 
thoughts of being burnt ^. All other motives are more or less 
remote : the motives in prospect, in proportion as the period at 
which they are expected to happen is more distant from the 
period at which the act takes place, and consequently later in 
point of time : the motives in esse^ in proportion as they also 
are more distant from that period, and consequently earlier in 
point of time*. 

^ Whether it be the expectation of being burnt, or the pain that accom- 
panieB that expectation, that u the immediate internal motive spoken of, 
may be difficult to determine. It may even be questioned, perhaps, whether 
they are distinct entities. Both questions, however, seem to be mere ques- 
tions of words, and the solution of them altogether immaterial. Even the 
other kinds of motives, though for some purposes they demand a separate 
consideration, are, however, so intimately allied, that it will often be scarce 
practicable, and not always material, to avoid confounding them, as they 
have always hitherto been confounded. 

\ Under the term esM must be included as well i^asi existence, with re- 



w ^ ■" 



to 

X.] Of Mqiiv^s^ loi 

VIII. It has already been observed; Jtk^fc with motives of Motives to 
which the influence terminates altogether |d jbbe understanding, standing, 
we have nothing here to do. If then, amongst/ol^^ts that are may inim. 
spoken of as motives with reference to the undefi^t'aRclj'gg, there will, 
be any which concern us here, it is only in as far as sVcK objects ' 
may, through the medium of the understanding, exercke an 
influence over the will. It is in this way, and in this way'bnljpy^:- , 
that any objects, in virtue of any tendency they may have iio".-': •" 
influence the sentiment of belief, may in a practical sense act in -"-.• , 
the character of motives. Any objects, by tending to induce a 
belief concerning the existence, actual, or probable, of a practical 
motive ; that is, concerning the probability of a motive in pros- 
pect, or the existence of a motive in esse; may exercise an 
influence on the will, and rank with those other motives that 

have been placed under the name of practical. The pointing 
out of motives such as these, is what we frequently mean when 
we talk of giving reasons. Your neighbour's house is on fire as 
before. I observe to you, that at the lower part of your neigh- 
bour's house is some wood-work, which joins on to yours ; that 
the flames have caught this wood- work, and so forth; which I do 
in order to dispose you to believe as I believe, that if you stay 
in your house much longer you will be burnt. In doing this, 
then, I suggest motives to your understanding ; which motives, 
by the tendency they have to give birth to or strengthen a pain, 
which operates upon you in the character of an internal motive f 
in esse, join their force, and act as motives upon the will. 

§ 2. No motives either constantly good or constantly had. 

IX. In all this chain of motives, the principal or original link ^?*5f"E«^ 
seems to be the last internal motive in prospect : it is to this » a motive 

ference to a given period, as present. They are equally real, in oomparison 
with what is as yet but future. Language is materially deficient, in not 
enabling us to distinguish with precision between existence as opposed to 
WMrealityt and present existence as opposed to past. The word existence 
in English, and esse, adopted by lawyers from the Latin, have the incon- 
venience of appearing to confine the existence in question to some single 
period consid^^ as being present. 



102 »Of*J^otives. [chap. 



• *. 



battheideM that all the other qiQ^^VSed In prospect owe tbeir materiality: and 

or pain. the immediately*1^{^g motive its existence. This motive in 

prospect, we %e^ is* always some pleasure, or some pain ; some 

pleasura/.^nHhEEdh' the act in question is expected to be a means of 

4 9 

co]^inui!&g**or producing : some pain which it is expected to be 

^ a^ meiUis of discontinuing or preventing. A motive is substan- 

^•/«,«6^41y nothing more than pleasure or pain, operating in a certain 






manner. 



• SToionof X. Now, pleasure is in itself a good : nay, even setting aside 

\ i)8fiifabad immunity from pam, the only good: pain is in itself an evil; 

and, indeed, without exception, the only evil ; or else the words 

good and evil have no meaning. And this is alike true of every 

sort of pain, and of every sort of pleasure. It follows, there- 

Ifore, immediately and incontestibly, that tTiere is no such thing 
as any sort of motive that is in itself a had one^. 
Inaocuiaoy ^^* ^^ ^ common, however, to speak of actions as proceeding 
rioM^^ from good or had motives : in which case the motives meant are 
oT^me such as are internal. The expression is fax from being an 
moti^.*** accurate one ; and as it is apt to occur in the consideration of 
almost every kind of offence, it will be requisite to settle the 
precise meaning of it, and observe how far it quadrates with the 
truth of things. 
Any sort of XII. With respect to goodness and badness, as it is with 
give bii^i^ everything else that is not itself either pain or pleasure, so is it 
JSJ[ *^ ^ with motives. If they are good or bad, it is only on account of 
. I their effects : good, on account of their tendency to produce 
'. pleasure, or avert pain : bad, on account of their tendency to 

I produce pain, or avert pleasure. Now the case is, that from one 
and the same motive, and from every kind of motive, may pro- 
^ ceed actions that are good, others that are bad, and others that 

' Let a man's motive be ill-will ; call it even malice, envy, cruelty ; it is 
still a kind of pleasure that is his motive : the pleasure he takes at the 
thought of the pain which he sees, or expects to see, his adversary undergo. 
Now even this wretched pleasure, taken by itself, is good : it may be faint ; 
it may be short : it must at any rate be impure : yet while it lasts, and 
before any bad consequences arrive, it is as good as any other that is not 
more intense. See ch. iv. [Value]. 



X.] Of Motives. 103 

are indifferent. This we shall proceed to ghew with respect to 
all the different kinds of motives, as determined by the various 
kinds of pleasures and pains. „> 

XnL Such an analysis, useful as it is, will be found to be a Difficulties /^ 
matter of no small difficulty; owing, in great measure, to a cer- inthe way 
tain perversity of structure which prevails more or less through- lysis of this 
out all languages. To speak of motives, as of anything else, 
one must call them by their names. But the misfortune is, that ^ 
it is rare to meet with a motive of which the name expresses 
that and nothing more. Commonly along with the very name 
of the motive, is tacitly involved a proposition imputing to it a 
certain quality ; a quality which, in many cases, will appear to ' 
include that very goodness or badness, concerning which we are 
here inquiring whether, properly speaking, it be or be not im- 
putable to motives. To use the common phrase, in most cases, ^ 
the name of the motive is a word which is employed either only 
in a good sense, or else only in a bad sense. Now, when a word / 
is spoken of as being used in a good sense, all that is necessarily 
meant is this : that in conjunction with the idea of the object it 
is put to signify, it conveys an idea of approbation: that is, of a / 
pleasure or satisfaction, entertained by the person who employs 
the term at the thoughts of such object. In like manner, when 
a word is spoken of as being used in a bad sense, all that 
is necessarily meant is this : that, in conjunction with the 
idea of the object it is put to signify, it conveys an idea / 
of disapprobation: that is, of a displeasure entertained by 
the person who employs the term at the thoughts of such / 
object. Now, the circumstance on which such approbation 
is grounded will, as naturally as any other, be the opinion of / 
the goodness of the object in question, as above explained : 
such, at least, it must be, upon the principle of utility: so, / 
on the other hand, the circumstance on which any such dis- 
approbation is grounded, will, as naturally as any other, be / 
the opinion of the badness of the object : such, at least, it 
must be, in as far as the principle of utility is taken for the 
standard. 



/ 




104 ^f Motives. [chap. 

Now thei-e are certain motives which, unless in a few par- 
ticular cases, have scarcely any other name to be expressed 
by but such a word as is used only in a good sense. This 
is the case, for example, with the motives of piety and honour. 
The consequence of this is, that if, in speaking of such a motive, 
a man should have occasion to apply the epithet bad to any 
actions which he mentions as apt to result from it, he must 
appear to be guilty of a contradiction in terms. But the 
names of motives which have scarcely any other name to 
be expressed by, but such a word as is used only in a bad 
sense, are many more \ This is the case, for example, with the 
motives of lust and avarice. And accordingly, if in speaking 
of any such motive, a man should have occasipn to apply the 
epithets good or indifferent to any actions which he mentions as 
apt to result from it, he must here also appear to be guilty of a 
similar contradiction ^. 

This perverse association of ideas cannot, it is evident, but 
throw great difficulties in the way of the inquiry now before us. 
Confining himself to the language most in use, a man can scarce 
avoid running, in appearance, into perpetual contradictions. His 
propositions will appear, on the one hand, repugnant to truth ; 
and on the other hand, adverse to utility. Aa paradoxes, they 
will excite contempt: as mischievous paradoxes, indignation. 
For the truths he labours to convey, however important, and 
however salutary, his reader is never the better : and he himself 
is much the worse. To obviate this inconvenience, completely, 
he has but this one unpleasant remedy; to lay aside the old 
phraseology and invent a new one. Happy the man whose 

^ For the reason, see chap. xi. [DispositionB]^ par. xvii. note. 

' To this imperfection of language, and nothing more, are to be attributed, 
in great measure, the violent clamours that have from time to time been 
raised against those ingenious moralists, who, travelling out of the beaten 
tract of speculation, have found more or less difficulty in disentangling 
themselves from the shackles of ordinary language : such as Kochefoucault, 
Mandeville, and Helvetius. To the unsoundness of their opinions, and, 
with still greater injustice, to the corruption of their hearts, was often im- 
puted, what was most commonly owing either to a want of skill, in matters 
of language on the part of the author, or a want of discernment, possibly 
now and then in some instances a want of probity, on the part of the com- 
mentator. 



X.] 0/ Motives. 105 



?^ 



language is ductile enough to permit bim this resource. To 
palliate the inconvenience, where that method of obviating it is 
impracticable, he has nothing left for it but to enter into a long 
discussion, to state the whole matter at large, to confess, that 
for the sake of promoting the purposes, he has violated the 
established laws of language, and to throw himself upon the 
mercy of his readers^. 

§ 3. OatcUogvs of motives corresponding to that of Pleaswres 

cmd Pains, 

Xiy. From the pleasures of the senses, considered in the physical de- 
gross, results the motive which, in a neutral sense, may be termed J^n^igto 
physical desire : in a bad sense, it is termed sensuality. Name MSeirT ° 
used in a good sense it has none. Of this, nothing can be deter- 8®^®"^ 
mined, till it be considered separately, with reference to the 
several species of pleasures to which it corresponds. 

XY. In particular, then, to the pleasures of the taste or palate r|tj^ motive 
corresponds a motive, which in a neutral sense having received S^^©^" 
no name that can serve to express it in all cases, can only be ^^^jJJ^J*' 
termed, by circumlocution, the love of the pleasures of the palate. 
In particular cases it is styled hunger : in others, thirst^. Jhe 
love of good cheer expresses this motive, but seems to go beyond ' 
intimating, that the pleasure is to be partaken of in company, 

^ Happily, language is not always so intractable, but that by making use 
of two words instead of one, a man may avoid the inconvenience of &bri- 
eating words that are absolutely new. Thus instead of the word lust, by 
putting together two words in conunon use, he may frame the neutral ex- 
pression, sexual desire : instead of the word avarice, by putting together 
two other words also in common use, he may frame the neutral expression, 
pecuniary interest. This, accordingly, is the course which I have taken. 
In these instances, indeed, even the combination is not novel : the only 
novelty there is consists in the steady adherence to the one neutral ex- 
pression, rejecting altogether the terms, of which the import is infected by 
adventitious and unsuitable ideas. 

In the catalogue of motives, corresponding to the several sorts of pains 
and pleasures, I have inserted such as have occurred to me. I cannot 
pretend to warrant it complete. To make sure of rendering it so, the only 
way would be, to turn over the dictionaiy from b^finning to end : an opera> 
tion which, in a view to perfection, would be necessary for more purposes 
than this. See B. I. tit. [Defamation], and Append, tit. [Composition]. 

^ Hunger and thirst, considered in the light of motives, import not so 
much the desire of a particular kind of pleasure, as the desire of removing 
a positive kind of pain. They do not extend to the desire of that kind of 
pleasure which depends on the choice of foods and liquors. 



io6 Of Motives. [chap. 

and involying a kind of sympathy. In a bad sense, it is styled 
in some cases greediness, voraciousness, gluttony: in others, 
principally when applied to children, Uckenshness. It may in 
some cases also be represented by the word daintiness. Name 
used in a good sense it has none. i. A boy, who does not want 
for victuals, steals a cake out of a pastry-cook's shop, and eats it. 
In this case his motive will be universally deemed a bad one : 
and if it be asked what it is, it may be answered, perhaps, licker- 
ishness. 2. A boy buys a cake out of a pastry-cook's shop, and 
eats it. In this case his motive can scarcely be looked upon as 
either good or bad, unless his master should be out of humour 
with him; and then perhaps he may call it lickerishness, as 
before. In both cases, however, his motive is the same. It is 
neither more nor less than the motive corresponding to the plea- 
sures of the palate^. 
Sexual de- XVI. To the pleasures of the sexual sense corresponds the 

sires coire- ... . 

sponding to motive which, in a neutral sense, may be termed sexual desire. 

the pleasure . , 

of thesezuAi In a bad sense, it is spoken of under the name of lasciviousness, 

sense 

' and a variety of other names of reprobation. Name used in a 

good sense it has none^. 

I. A man ravishes a virgin. In this case the motive is, with- 
out scruple, termed by the name of lust, lasciviousness, and so 
forth; and is universally looked upon as a bad one. 2. The 
same man, at another time, exercises the rights of marriage with 
his wife. In this case the motive is accounted, perhaps, a good 
one, or at least indifferent : and here people would scruple to 
call it by any of those names. In both cases, however, the 

^ It will not be worth while, in every case, to give an instance in which 
the action may be indififerent : if good as well as bad actions may result 
from the same motive, it is easy to conceive, that also may be indifferent. 

^ Love indeed includes sometimes this idea : but then it can never 
answer the purpose of exhibiting it separately : since there are three 
motives, at least, that may all of them be included in it, besides this : the 
love of beauty corresponding to the pleasures of the eye, and the motives 
corresponding to those of amity and benevolence. We speak of the love of 
children, of the love of parents, of the love of God. These pious uses pro- 
tect the appellation, and preserve it from the ignominy poured forth upon 
its profane associates. Even sensual love would not answer the purpose ; 
since that would include the love of beauty. 



X.] Of Motives. 107 

motive may be precisely the same. In both cases it may be 
neither more nor less than sexual desire. 

XVII. To the pleasures of curiosity corresponds the motive Curiosity, 

•^ •' ^ , &c. corre- 

known by the same name : and which may be otherwise called spending to 
the love of novelty, or the love of experiment ; and, on parti- sures pf 
cular occasions, sport, and sometimes play. 

I. A boy, in order to divert himself, reads an improving book : » 
the motive is accounted, perhaps, a good one: at any rate not a r ^v^ ..^^^^ ^^^^^ 
bad one. 2. He sets his top a spinning : the motive is deemed, J^^^^ \^,^ ^ 
at any rate, not a bad one. 3. He sets loose a mad ox among f^ff^^ "t* 
a crowd ; his motive is now, perhaps, termed an abominable one. , \ \ Vuifwsw' 
Yet in all three cases the motive may be the very same ; it may\ ' '^< \\\X 
be neither more nor less than curiosity. 

XVIII. As to the. other pleasures of sense they are of t^^^^^^^f 
little consequence to have given any separate denominations to sense. 
the corresponding motives. 

XIX. To the pleasures of wealth corresponds the sort of motive ^^^^jj^ 
which, in a neutral sense, may be termed pecuniary interest : in *^© piej- 
a bad sense, it is termed, in some cases, avarice, covetousness, wealth, 
rapacity, or lucre : in other cases, niggardliness : in a good sense, 

but only in particular cases, economy and frugality; and in some 
cases the word industry may be applied to it : in a sense nearly 
indifferent, but rather bad than otherwise, it is styled, though 
only in particular cases, parsimony. 

I. For money you gratify a man's hatred, by putting his 
adversary to death. 2. For money you plough his field for 
him. — In the first case your motive is termed lucre, and is ac- 
counted corrupt and abominable : and in the second, for want 
of a proper appellation, it is styled industry ; and is looked upon 
as innocent at least, if not meritorious. Yet the motive is in 
both cases precisely the same : it is neither more nor less than 
pecuniary interest 

XX. The pleasures of skill are neither distinct enough, nor of None to the 

- , . - pleasuros of 

consequence enough, to have given any name to the corresponding skiu. 

motive. 

XXI. To the pleasures of amity corresponds a motive which, To the plea- 



lo8 Of Motives. [chap. 

■urea of in a neutral sense, may be termed the desire of ingratiating one's 

^iroof^ self. In a bad sense it is in certain cases styled servility: in a 

o^^ael^°^ good sense it has no name that is peculiar to it : in the cases in 

which it has been looked on with a favourable eye, it has seldom 

been distinguished from the motive of sympathy or benevolence, 

with which, in such cases, it is commonly associated. 

I. To acquire the affections of a woman before marriage, to 
preserve them afterwards, you do every thing, that is consistent 
with other duties, to make her happy : in this case your motive 
is looked upon as laudable, though there is no name for it. 2. 
For the same purpose, you poison a woman with whom she is at 
enmity : in this case your motive is looked upon as abominable, 
though still there is no name for it. 3. To acquire or preserve 
the favour of a man who is richer or more powerful than your- 
self, you make yourself subservient to his pleasures. Let them 
even be lawful pleasures, if people choose to attribute your be- 
haviour to this motive, you will not get them to find any other 
name for it than servility. Yet in all three cases the motive is 
the same : it is neither more nor less than the desire of ingra- 
tiating yourself. 
To the plea- XXII. To the pleasures of the moral sanction, or, as they may 

sures of a , *> ^ 

good name, otherwise be called, the pleasures of a good name, corresponds a 
reputation, motive which, in a neutral sense, has scarcely yet obtained any 
adequate appellative. It may be styled, the love of reputation. 
It is nearly related to the motive last preceding: being neither 
more nor less than the desire of ingratiating one's self with, or, 
as in this case we should rather say, of recommending one's self 
to, the world at large. In a good sense, it is termed honour, or 
the sense of honour : or rather, the word honour is introduced 
somehow or other upon the occasion of its being brought to view: 
for in strictness the word honour is put rather to signify that 
imaginary object, which a man is spoken of as possessing upon 
the occasion of his obtaining a conspicuous share of the pleasures 
that are in question. In particular cases, it is styled the love of 
glory. In a bad sense, it is styled, in some cases, false honour ; 
in others, pride ; in others, vanity. In a sense not decidedly 



X.] Of Motives. 109 

bad, but rather bad than otherwise, ambitioil. In an indifPerent 
sense, in some cases, the loye of fame : in others, the senise of 
shame. And, as the pleasures belonging to the moral sanction 
run undistinguishably into the pains derived from the same 
source ^ it may also be styled, in some cases, the fear of dis- 
honour, the fear of disgrace, the fear of infamy, the fear of 
ignominy, or the fear of shame. 

I. You have received an affi*ont from a man: according to the 
custom of the country, in order, on the one hand, to save your- 
self from the shame of being thought to bear it patiently^; on 

* See Cliap. vi. [Pleasures and Pains], par. xxiv. note. 

^ A man's bearing an afiront patiently, that is, without taking this 
method of doing what is called wiping it off, is thought to import one or 
other of two things : either that he does not possess that sensibility to the 
pleasures and pains of the moral sanction, which, in order to render himself 
a respectable member of society, a man ought to possess : or, that he does 
not possess courage enough to stake his life for the chance of gratifying 
that resentment which a proper sense of the value of those pleasures and 
those pains it is thought would not fsal to inspire. True it is, that there 
are divers other motives, by any of which the same conduct might equally 
be produced : the motives corresponding to the religious sanction, and the 
motives that come under the head of benevolence. Piety towards God, the 
practice in question being generally looked upon as repugnant to the dic- 
tates of the religious sanction : sympathy for your antagonist himself, whose 
life would be put to hazard at the same time with your own ; sympathy 
for his connexions ; the persons who are dependent on him in the way of 
support, or connected with him in the way of sympathy : sympathy for 
your own connexions : and even sympathy for the public, in cases where 
the man is such that the public appears to have a material interest in his 
life. But in comparison with the love of life, the influence of the religious 
sanction is known to be in general but weak : especially among people of 
those classes who are here in question : a sure proof of which is the preva- 
lence of this very custom. Where it is so strong as to preponderate, it is so 
'rare, that, perhaps, it gives a man a place in the calendar : and, at any 
rate, exalts him to the rank of martyr. Moreover, the instances in which 
either private benevolence or public spirit predominate over the love of life, 
will also naturally be but rare : and, owing to the general propensity to 
detraction, it will also be much rarer for them to be thought to do so. 
Now, when three or more motives, any one of them capable of producing a 
given mode of conduct, apply at once, that whiph appears to be the most 
powerful, is that which wiU of course be deemed to have actually done the 
most : and, as the bulk of mankind, on this as on other occasions, are dis- 
posed to decide peremptorily upon superficial estimates, it will generally be 
looked upon as having done the whole. 

The consequence is, that when a man of a certain rank forbears to take 
this chance of revenging an a£&ont, his conduct will, by most people, be 
imputed to the love of life : which, when it predominates over the love of 
reputation, is, by a not unsalutaiy association of ideas, stigmatized with the 
reproachful name of cowardice. 



110 Of Motives. [chap. 

the other hand, to obtain the reputation of courage ; you chal- 
lenge him to fight with mortal weapons. In this case your 
motive will by some people be accounted laudable, and styled 
honour : by others it will be accounted blameable, and these, if 
they call it honour, will prefix an epithet of improbation to it, 
and call it false honour. 2. In order to obtain a post of rank 
and dignity, and thereby to increase the respects paid you by 
the public, you bribe the electors who are to confer it, or the 
judge before whom the title to it is in dispute. In this case 
your motive is commonly accounted corrupt and abominable, and 
is styled, perhaps, by some such name as dishonest or corrupt 
ambition, as there is no single name for it. 3. In order to 
obtain the good-will of the public, you bestow a large sum in 
works of private charity or public utility. In this case people 
will be apt not to agree about your motive. Your enemies will 
put a bad colour upon it, and call it ostentation : your Mends, 
to save you from this reproach, will choose to impute your con- 
duct not to this motive but to some other: such as that of 
charity (the denomination in this case given to private sym- 
pathy) or that of public spirit. 4. A king, for the sake of 
gaining the admiration annexed to the name of conqueror (we 
will suppose power and resentment out of the question) engages 
his kingdom in a bloody war. His motive, by the multitude 
(whose sympathy for millions is easily overborne by the pleasure 
which their imagination finds in gaping at any novelty they 
observe in the conduct of a single person) is deemed an ad- 
mirable one. Men of feeling and reflection, who disapprove of* 
the dominion exercised by this motive on this occasion, without 
always perceiving that it is the same motive which in other in- 
stances meets with their approbation, deem it an abominable 
one ; and because the multitude, who are the manufacturers of 
language, have not given them a simple name to call it by, they 
will call it by some such compound name as the love of false 
glory or false ambition. Yet in all four cases the motive is the 
same : it is neither more nor less than the love of reputation. 
To the plea- XXIII. To the pleasures of power corresponds the motive 



X.] Of Motives. 1 1 1 

which, in a neutral sense, may be termed the love of power, sures of 

D0W6T tillO 

People, who ai^e out of humour with it sometimes, call it the lust love of 
of power. In a good sense, it is scarcely provided with a name. ^^^' 
In certain cases this motive, as well as the love of reputation, 
are confounded under the same name, ambition. This is not to 
be wondered at, considering the intimate connexion there is be- 
tween the two motives in many cases : since it commonly hap- 
pens, that the same object which affords the one sort of pleasure, 
affords the other sort at the same time : for instance, offices, 
which are at once posts of honour and places of trust : and since 
at any rate reputation is the road to power. 

I. If, in order to gain a place in administration, you poison 
the man who occupies it. 2. If, in the same view, you propose 
a salutary plan for the advancement of the pubHc welfare ; your 
motive is in both cases the same. Yet in the first case it is ac- 
counted criminal and abominable : in the second case allowable, 
and even laudable. 

XXIV. To the pleasures as well as to the pains of the re- The motive 
ligious sanction corresponds a motive which has, strictly speak- the rSigious 
ing, no perfectly neutral name applicable to all cases, unless the 
word religion be admitted in this character : though the word 
religion, strictly speaking, seems to mean not so much the mo- 
tive itself, as a kind of fictitious personage, by whom the motive 
is supposed to be created, or an assemblage of acts, supposed to 
be dictated by that personage: nor does it seem to be completely 
settled into a neutral sense. In the same sense it is also, in 
some cases, styled religious zeal : in other cases, the fear of God. 
The love of God, though commonly contrasted with the fear of 
God, does not come strictly under this head. It coincides 
properly with a motive of a different denomination ; viz. a kind 
of sympathy or good-will, which has the Deity for its object. 
In a good sense, it is styled devotion, piety, and pious zeal. In 
a bad sense, it is styled, in some cases, superstition, or super- 
stitious zeal: in other cases, fanaticism, or fanatic zeal: in a 
sense not decidedly bad, because not appropriated to this motive, 
enthusiasm, or enthusiastic zeal. 



Ila 



Of Motkes. 



[chap* 



^/£jt 



I. In order to obtain the favour of the Supreme Being, a man 
assassinates his lawful sovereign. In this case the motive is now 
almost universally looked upon as abominable, and is termed 
fiEmaticism : formerly it was by great numbers accounted laud- 
able, and was by them called pious zeal. 2. In the same view, 
a man lashes himself with thongs. In this case, in yonder house, 
the motive is accounted laudable, and is called pious zeal : in the 
next house it is deemed contemptible, and called superstition. 
3. In the same view, a man eats a piece of bread (or at least 
what to external appearance is a piece of bread) with certain 
ceremonies. In this case, in yonder house^ his motive is looked 
upon as laudable, and is styled piety and devotion : in the next 
house it is deemed abominable, and styled superstition, as be- 
fore : perhaps even it is absurdly styled impiety. 4. In the same 
y; 1 1^ rl view, a man holds a cow by the tail while he is dying. On the 

Thames the motive would in this case be deemed contemptible, 
and called superstition. On the Ghmges it is deemed meritorious, 
and called piety. 5. In the same view, a man bestows a large 
sum in works of charity, or public utility. In this case the mo- 
tive is styled laudable, by those at least to whom the works in 
question appear to come under this description : and by these at 
least it would be styled piety. Yet in all these cases the motive 
is precisely the same : it is neither more nor less than the mo- 
tive belonging to the religious sanction ^. 
Good-will, XXV. To the pleasures of sympathy corresponds the motive 
pleasures of which, in a neutral sense, is termed ffood-will. The word sym- 

sympathy. 70 ^ ^ 

pathy may also be used on this occasion : though the sense of it 
seems to be rather more extensive. In a good sense, it is styled 
benevolence: and in certain cases, philanthropy; and, in a figura- 
tive way, brotherly love ; in others, humanity; in others, charity; 

^ I am aware, or at least I hope, that people in general, when they see 
the matter thus stated, will be ready to aclmowle<]^e, that the motive in 
these cases, whatever be the tendency of the acts which it produces, is not 
a bad one : but this will not render it the less true, that hitherto, in popu- 
lar discourse, it has been common for men to speak of acts, which they 
could not but acknowledge to have originated from this source, as proceed- 
ing from, a bad motive. The same observation will apply to many of the 
«ther cases. 



-^•i*. 



X.] Of Motives. % l$ 

in others^ pity and compassion; in others, mercy; in others, 
gratitude ; in others, tenderness ; in others, patriotism ; in others, 
public spirit. Love is also employed in this as in so many other 
senses. In a bad sense, it has no name applicable to it in all 
cases : in particular cases it is styled partiality. The word 
zeal, with certain epithets prefixed to it, might also be employed 
sometimes on this occasion, though the sense of it be more ex- 
tensive ; applying sometimes to ill as well as to good will. It 
is thus we speak of party zeal, national zeal, and public zeal. 
The word attachment is also used with the like epithets: we 
also say family-attachment. The French expression, esprit de 
corpSy for which as yet there seems to be scarcely any name in 
English, might be rendered, in some cases, though rather in- 
adequately, by the terms corporation spirit, corporation attach* 
ment, or corporation zeal. 

I. A man who has set a town on fire is apprehended and 
committed : out of regard or compassion for him, you help him 
to break prison. In this case the generality of people will pro- 
bably scarcely know whether to condemn your motive or to 
applaud it : those who condemn your conduct, will be disposed 
rather to impute it to some other motive : if they style it benevo- 
lence or compassion, they will be for prefixing an epithet, and 
calling it false benevolence or false compassion \ 2. The man is 
taken again, and is put upon his trial : to save him you swear 
falsely in his favour. People, who would not call your motive a 
bad one before, will perhaps call it so now. 3. A man is at law 
with you about an estate ; he has no right to it : the judge 
knows this, yet, having an esteem or affection for your adversary, 

^ Among the Greeks, perhaps the motive, and the conduct it gave birth 
to, would, in such a case, have been rather approved than disapproved of. 
It seems to have been deemed an act of heroism on the part of Hercules, 
to have delivered his friend Theseus from hell: though divine justioe, 
which held him there, should naturally have been regarded as being at 
least upon a footing with human justice. But to divine justice, even when 
acknowledged under that character, the respect paid at that time of day 
does not seem to have been very profound, or wdl-settled : at present, the 
respect paid to it is profound and settled enough, though the name of it is 
but too often applied to dictates which could have had no other origin than 
the worst sorb of human caprice. 



114 ^f Motives, [chap. 

adjudges it to him. In this csase the motive is by every body 
deemed abominable, and is termed injustice and partiality. 
4. You detect a statesman in receiving bribes : out of regard to 
the public interest, you give information of it, and prosecute 
him. In this case, by all who acknowledge your conduct to liave 
originated from this motive, your motive will be deemed a laud- 
able one, and styled public spirit. But his friends and adherents 
will not choose to account for your conduct in any such manner : 
they will rather attribute it to party enmity. 5. You find a man 
on the point of starving : you relieve him ; and save his life. In 
this case your motive will by every body be accounted laudable, 
and it will be termed compassion, pity, charity, benevolence. Yet 
in all these cases the motive is the same : it is neither more nor 
less than the motive of good- will, 
lu-wiii, &c. XXVI. To the pleasures of malevolence, or antipathy, corre- 
suresofau- sponds the motive which, in a neutral sense, is termed antipathy 
^P* ^y- Qj. displeasure : and, in particular cases, dislike, aversion, abhor- 
rence, and indignation : in a neutral sense, or perhaps a sense 
leaning a little to the bad side, ill-will : and, in particular cases, 
anger, wrath, and enmity. In a bad sense it is styled, in different 
cases, wrath, spleen, ill-humour, hatred, malice, rancour, rage, 
fury, cruelty, tyranny, envy, jealousy, revenge, misanthropy, and 
by other names, which it is hardly worth while to endeavour to 
collect ^. Like good- will, it is used with epithets expressive of 
the persons who are the objects of the affection. Hence we hear 
of party enmity, party rage, and so forth. In a good sense there 
seems to be no single name for it. In compound expressions it 
may be spoken of in such a sense, by epithets, such as jtist and 
lattdabUf prefixed to words that are used in a neutral or nearly 
neutral sense. 

I. You rob a man : he prosecutes you, and gets you punished : 

^ Here, as elsewhere, it may be observed, that the same words which are 
mentioned as names of motives, are also many of them names of passions, 
appetites, and affections : fictitious entities, which are framed only by con- 
sideiing pleasures or pains in some particular point of view. Some of them 
are also names of moral qualities. This branch of nomenclature is remark- 
ably entangled : to unravel it completely would take up a whole volume ; 
not a syllable of which would belong properly to the present design. 



X.] Of Motives. ii 



o 



out of resentment you set upon him, and hang him with your 
own hands. In this case your motive will universally be deemed 
detestable, and will be called malice, cruelty, revenge, and so 
forth. 2. A man has stolen a little money from you : out of 
resentment you prosecute him, and get him hanged by course of 
law. In this case people will probably be a little divided in 
their opinions about your motive : your friends will deem it a 
laudable one, and call it a just or laudable resentment: your 
enemies will perhaps be disposed to deem it blameable, and call 
it cruelty, malice, revenge, and so forth: to obviate which, your 
friends will try perhaps to change the motive, and call it public 
spirit. 3. A man has murdered your father: out of resentment 
you prosecute him, and get him put to death in course of law. 
In this case your motive will be universally deemed a laudable 
one, and styled, as before, a just or laudable resentment: and 
your friends, in order to bring forward the more amiable prin- 
ciple from which the malevolent one, which was your immediate 
motive, took its rise, wiU be for keeping the latter out of sight, 
speaking of the former only, under some such name as filial 
piety. Yet in all these cases the motive is the same: it is 
neither more nor less than the motive of ill-will. 

XXYII. To the several sorts of pains, or at least to all such Seif-preser- 
of them as are conceived to subsist in an intense degree, and to the several 
death, which, as far as we can perceive, is the termination of all pains, 
the pleasures, as well as all the pains we are acquainted with, 
corresponds the motive, which in a neutral sense is styled, in 
general, self-preservation: the desire of preserving one's self from 
the pain or evil in question. Now in many instances the desire 
of pleasure, and the sense of pain, run into one another undis- 
tinguishably. Self-preservation, therefore, where the degree of 
the pain which it corresponds to is but slight will scarcely be 
distinguishable, by any precise line, from the motives corre- 
sponding to the several sorts of pleasures. Thus in the case of 
the pains of hunger and thirst : physical want will in many cases 
be MBTcdj disthigaishable from physical desire. In some cases 
it is styiedf (rtffl in a neutral sense, self-defence. Between the 

I Z 



ji6 Cf Motives. [chap; 

pleasures and tlie pains of the moral and religious sanctions, 
and consequently of the motives that correspond to them, as 
likewise between the pleasures of amity, and the pains of enmity, 
this want of boundaries has already been taken notice of \ The 
case is the same between the pleasures of wealth, and the pains 
of privation corresponding to' those pleasures. There are many 
cases, therefore, in which it will be difficult to distinguish the 
motive of self-preservation from pecuniary interest, from the 
desire of ingratiating one's self, from the love of reputation, and 
from religious hope: in which cases, those more specific and 
explicit names will naturally be preferred to this general and 
inexplicit one. There are also a multitude of compound 
names, which either are already in use, or might be devised, to 
distinguish the specific branches of the motive of self-preserva- 
tion from those several motives of a pleasurable origin : such as 
the fear of poverty, the fear of losing such or such a man's 
regard, the fear of shame, and the fear of God. Moreover, to 
the evil of death corresponds, in a neutral sense, the love of 
life ; in a bad sense, cowardice : which corresponds also to the 
pains of the senses, at least when considered as subsisting in an 
acute degree. There seems to be no name for the love of life 
that has a good sense ; unless it be the vague and general name 
of prudence. 

I. To save yourself from being hanged, pilloried, imprisoned, 
or fined, you poison the only person who can give evidence 
against you. In this case your motive will universally be styled 
abominable; but as the term self-preservation has no bad sense, 
people will not care to make this use of it: they will be apt 
rather to change the motive, and call it malice. 2. A woman, 
having been just delivered of an illegitimate child, in order to 
save herself from shame, destroys the child, or abandons it. In 
this case, also, people will call the motive a bad one, and, not 
caring to speak of it under a neutral name, they will be apt to 
change the motive, and call it by some such name as cruelty. 
3. To save the expense of a halfpenny, you suffer a man, whom 

^ See ch. v, [Pleasures and Pains], par. xxiv, xxy. 



X.] .0/ Motives, iiy 

you could preserve at that expense, to perish with want, before 
your eyes. In this case your motive will be universally deemed . 
an abominable one ; and, to avoid calling it by so indulgent a 
name as self-preservation, people will be apt to call it avarice 
and niggardliness, with which indeed in this case it indistin- 
guishably coincides : for the sake of finding a more reproachful 
appellation, they will be apt likewise to change the motive, and 
term it cruelty. 4. To put an end to the pain of hunger, you 
steal a loaf of bread. In this case your motive will scarcely, 
perhaps, be deemed a very bad one ; and, in order to express 
more indulgence for it, people will be apt to find a stronger 
name for it than self-preservation, terming it necessity. 5. To 
save yourself from drowning, you beat off an innocent man who 
has got hold of the same plank. In this case your motive will 
in general be deemed neither good nor bad, and it will be termed 
self-preservation, or necessity, or the love of life. 6. To save 
your life from a gang of robbers, you kill them in the conflict. 
In this case the motive may, perhaps, be deemed rather laudable 
than otherwise, and, besides self-preservation, is styled also self- 
defence. 7. A soldier is sent out upon a party against a weaker 
party of the enemy : before he gets up with them, to save hi» 
life, he runs away. In this case the motive will universally be 
deemed a contemptible one, and will be called cowardice. Yet 
in all these various cases, the motive is still the same. It is 
neither more nor less than self-preservation. 

XXVIII. In particular, to the pains of exertion corresponds To the pains 
the motive, which, in a neutral sense, may be termed the love the love of 
of ease, or by a longer circumlocution, the desire of avoiding 
trouble. In a bad sense, it is termed indolence \ It seems to 
have no name that carries with it a good sense. 

I. To save the trouble of taking care of it, a parent leaves his 
child to perish. In this case the motive will be deemed an 

^ It may seem odd at first sight to speak of the love of ease as giving 
birth to action : but exertion is as natural an effect of the love of ease a» 
inaction is, when a smaller degree of exertion promises to exempt a man 
from a greater. 



ii8 



€f Motives. 



[chap. 



Motives can 
only be bad 
with refer- 
ence to the 
most fre- 
quent com- 
plexion of 
their effects 



How it is 
that mo- 
tives, such 
as lust, ava- 
rice, &c. are 
constantly 
bad. 



abominable one, and, because indolence will seem too mild a 
name for it, the motive will, perhaps, be changed, and spoken 
of under some such term as cruelty. 2. To save yourself from 
an illegal slavery, you make your eseape^ In this case the 
motive will be deemed certainly not a bad one : and, because 
indolence, or even the love of ease, will be thought too unfa- 
vourable a name for it, it will, perhaps, be styled the love of 
liberty. 3. A mechanic, in order to save his labour, makes an 
improvement in his machinery. In this case, people will look 
upon his motive as a good one ; and finding no name for it that 
carries a good sense, they will be disposed to keep the motive 
out of sight : they will speak rather of his ingenuity, than of 
the motive which was the means of his manifesting that quality. 
Yet in all these cases the motive is the same : it is neither more 
nor less than the love of ease. 

XXIX. It appears then that there is no such thing as any 
sort of motive which is a bad one in itself : nor, consequently, 
any such thing as a sort of motive, which in itself is exclusively 
a good one. And as to their effects, it appears too that these 
are sometimes bad, at other times either indifferent or good : 
and this appears to be the case with every sort of motive. If 
any sort of motive then is either good or hcid on the score of its 
effects f this is the case only on individual occasions, and with in- 
dividual motives ; and this is the case with one sort of motive 
as well as with another. If any sort of motive then can, in eon- 
stderoition of its effects, he termed with a/ay jpro^priety a had one, 
it can only be with reference to the balance of all the effects it 
may have had of both kinds within a given period, that is, of 
its most usual tendency. 

XXX. "What then? (it will be said) are not lust, cruelty, 
avarice, bad motives ? Is there so much as any one individual 
occasion, in which motives like these can be otherwise than bad ? 
No, certainly : and yet the proposition, that there is no one 
sort of motive but what will on many occasions be a good one, 
is nevertheless true. The fact is, that these are names which, if 
properly applied, are never applied but in the cases where the 



X.] Of Motives, 119 

motives they signify happen to be bad. The names of these 
motives, considered apart from their effects^ are sexnal desire, 
displeasure, and pecuniary interest. To sexual desire, when the 
efPects of it are looked upon as bad, is given the name of lust. 
Now lust is always a bad motive. Why 1 Because if the case 
be such, that the effects of the motive are not bad, it does not 
go, or at least ought not to go, by the name of lust. The case 
is, then, that when I say, ' Lust is a bad motive,' it is a propo- 
sition that merely concerns the import of the word lust ; and 
which would be false if transferred to the other word used for 
the same motive, sexual desire. Hence we see the emptiness of 
all those rhapsodies of common-place morality, which consist in 
the taking of such names as lust, cruelty, and avarice, and 
branding them with marks of reprobation : applied to the thingj 
they are false ; applied to the namcj they are true indeed; but 
nugatory. Would you do a real service to mankind, show them 
the cases in which sexual desire merits the name of lust ; dis- 
pleasure, that of cruelty ; and pecuniary interest, that of avarice. 

XXXI. If it were necessary to apply such denominations as Under the 

J rr J ^ ^ above re- 

good, bad, and indifferent to motives, they miffht be classed in strictions, 

, -„ . o motives may 

the following manner, in consideration of the most frequent com- be distin- 

- . , , , gmshed into 

plexion of their effects. In the class of good motives might be good, bad. 

, /^,.i, T r • *"^*^ indif- 

placed the articles of, i. Grood-will. 2. Love of reputation, ferent or 
3. Desire of amity. And, 4. Religion. In the class of bad 
motives, 5. Displeasure. In the class of neutral or indifferent 
motives, 6. Physical desire. 7. Pecuniary interest. 8. Love 
of power. 9. Self-preservation; as including the fear of the 
pains of the senses, the love of ease, and the love of life. 

XXXII. This method of arrangement, however, cannot but Inoonveni- 

o ' ... encesofthia 

be imperfect ; and the nomenclature belonging to it is in danger distribution, 
of being fallacious. For by what method of investigation can a 
man be assured, that with regard to the motives ranked under 
the name of good, the good effects they have had, from the be- 
ginning of the world, have, in each of the four species com- 
prised under this name, been superior to the bad ) still more 
difficulty would a man find in assuring himself, that with regard 



1 20 Of Motives. [chap. 

to those which are ranked under the name of neutral or indif- 
ferent, the effects they have had have exactly balanced each 
other, the value of the good being neither greater nor less than 
that of the bad. It is to be considered, that the interests of the 
person himself can no more be left out of the estimate, than 
those of the rest of the comAunity. For what would become of 
the species, if it were not for the motives of hunger and thirst, 
sexual desire, the fear of pain, and the love of life ? Nor in the 
actual constitution of human nature is the motive of displeasure 
less necessary, perhaps, than any of the others : although a 
system, in which the business of life might be carried on without 
it, might possibly be conceived. It seems, therefore, that they 
could scarcely, without great danger of mistakes, be distin- 
guished in this manner even with reference to each other. 
It is only in XXXIIL The only way, it should seem, in which a motive 

individual I 

instances can with safety and propriety be styled good or bad, i s with ^ 
can be good reference to its eff ects in ea ch individual instance ; and princi- 
pally from the intention it gives birth to : from which arise, as 
will be shown hereafter, the most material part of its effects. 
I j( A motive is good, when the intention it gives birth to is a good 
one ; bad, when the intention is a bad one : and an intention is 
good or bad, according to the material consequences that are the 
objects of it. So far is it from the goodness of the intention's 
being to be known only from the species of the motive. But 
from one and the same motive, as we have seen, may result in- 
tentions of every sort of complexion whatsoever. This circum- 
stance, therefore, can afford no clue for the arrangement of the 
several sorts of motives. 
Motives dis- XXXIV. A more commodious method, therefore, it should 
into social, * seem, would be to distribute them according to the influence 
and self-' : which they appear to have on the interests of the ot her members 
■ of the communi ty, laying those of the party himself out of the 
question : to wit, according to the tendency which they appear to 

Ihave to unite, or disunite, his interests and theirs. On this plan 
they may be distinguished into social, dissocial, and self-regard- 
ing. In the social class may be reckoned, i. Good- will. 2. Love 



regarding. 



X.] . Of Motives. izi 

of reputation. 3. Desire of amity. 4. Ejeligion. In the dis- 
social may be placed, 5. Displeasure. In the self-regarding 
class, 6. Physical desire. 7. Pecuniary interest. 8. Love of 
power. 9. Self-preservation ; as including the fear of the pains 
of the senses, the love of ease, and the love of life. 

XXXV. With respect to the motives that have been termed — social, 
social, if any farther distinction should be of use, to that of 8oci^,and 
good-will alone may be applied the epithet of pwrely-social; 
while the love of reputation, the desire of amity, and the motive 
of religion, may together be comprised under the division of 
semi-social: the social tendency being much more constant a'iid 
unequivocal in the former than in any of the three latter. 
Indeed these last, social as they may be termed, are self-regard- 
ing at the same time ^. 

§ 4. Order of pre-eminence among motives, 

XXX VL Of all these sorts of motives, good-will is that of The dictates 
which the dictates \ taken in a general view, are surest of coin- are the 
ciding with those of the principle of utility. For the dictates coinciding 
of utility are neither more nor less than the dictates of the most of utility, 
extensive' and enlightened (that is well-advised^) benevolence. 
The dictates of the other motives may be conformable to those 
of utility, or repugnant, as it may happen. 

XXXVII. In this, however, it is taken for granted, that in Yet do not 
the case in question the dictates of benevolence are not contra- 
dicted by those of a more extensive, that is enlarged, benevo- 
lence. Now when the dictates of benevolence, as respecting the 
interests of a certain set of persons, are repugnant to the dictates 

^ ' Beligion/ says the pious Addison, somewhere in the Spectator, * is the 
highest species of self-love.' 

^ When a man is supposed to be prompted by any motive to engage, or Laws and die- 
not to engage, in such or such an action, it may be of use, for the conve- £'fiu?ng from 
nience of discourse, to speak of such motive as giving birth to an imaginary motives. 
kind of law or dictate^ injoining him to engage, or not to engage, in it *. 

' See ch. iv. [Value], and ch. vi. [Sensibility], par. xxi. 

* See ch. ix. [Consciousness], 

i See cb. i. 



I2i» Of Motives. [chap. 

of the same motive, as respecting the more important ^ interests 
of another set of persons, the former dictates, it is evident, are 
repealed, as it were, by the latter: and a man, were he to be 
governed by the former, could scarcely, with propriety, be said 
to be governed by the dictates of benevolence. On this account) 
were the motives on both sides sure to be alike present to a 
man's mind, the case of such a repugnancy would hardly be 
worth distinguishing, since the partial benevolence might be 
considered as swallowed up in the more extensive : if the former 
prevailed, and governed the action, it must be considered as not 
owing its birth to benevolence, but to some other motive : if the 
latter prevailed, the former might be considered as having no 
effect. But the case is, that a partial benevolence may govern 
the action, without entering into any direct competition with 
the more extensive benevolence, which would forbid it; because 
the interests of the less numerous assemblage of persons may be 
present to a man's mind, at a time when those of the more 
numerous are either not present, or, if present, make no impres- 
sion. It is in this way that the dictates of this motive may be 
repugnant to utility, yet still be the dictates of benevolence. 
What makes those of private benevolence conformable upon the 
whole to the principle of utility, is, that in general they stand 
unopposed by those of public : if they are repugnant to them, it 
is only by accident. What makes them the more conformable, 
is, that in a civilized society, in most of the cases in which they 
j would of themselves be apt to run counter to those of public 
\ benevolence, they find themselves opposed by stronger motives 
1 of the self-regarding class, which are played off against them by 
' the laws; and that it is only in cases where they stand unop- 
posed by the other. more salutary dictates, that they are left free. 
I An act of injustice or cruelty, committed by a man for the sake 
of his father or his son, is punished, and with reason, as much 
a£ if it were committed for his own. 

Next to XXXVni. After good- will, the motive of which the dictates 

them come ^ 

these of the seem to have the next best chance for coinciding with those of 

love of repu- ^ 

' Or valuable. See ch. iv. [Value]. 



X.] Of Motives. 1 23 

utility, is that of the love of reputation. There is but one cir- 
cumstance which prevents the dictates of this motive from coin- 
ciding in all cases with those of the former. This is, that men 
in their likings and dislikings, in the dispositions they manifest 
to annex to any mode of conduct their approbation or their dis- 
approbation, and in consequence to the person who appears to 
practise it, their good or their ill will, do not govern themselves 
exclusively by the principle of utility. Sometimes it is the 
principle of asceticism they are guided by : sometimes the prin- 
ciple of sympathy and antipathy. There is another circumstance, 
which diminishes, not their conformity to the principle of utility, 
but only their efficacy in comparison with the dictates of the 
motive of benevolence. The dictates of this motive will operate 
as strongly in secret as in public: whether it appears likely that 
the conduct which they recommend will be known or not: 
those of the love of reputation will coincide with those of bene- 
volence only in proportion as a man's conduct seems likely to 
be known. This circumstance, however, does not make so much 
difference as at first sight might appear. Acts, in proportion 
as they are material, are apt to become known ^ : and in point 
of reputation, the slightest suspicion often serves for proof. 
Besides, if an act be a disreputable one, it is not any assurance 
a man can have of the secrecy of the particular act in question, 
that will of course surmount the objections he may have against 
engaging in it. Though the act in question should remain 
secret, it will go towards forming a habit, which may give birth 
to other acts, that may not meet with the same good fortune. 
There is no human being, perhaps, who is at years of discretion, 
on whom considerations of this sort have not some weight : and 
they have the more weight upon a man, in proportion to the 
strength of his intellectual powers, and the firmness of his mind^ 
Add to this, the influence which habit itself, when once formed, 
has in restraining a man from acts towards which, from the 
view of the disrepute annexed to them, as well as from any 

1 See B. II. tit. [Evidence]. 

* See ch. vi. [Sensibility], par. xii, xiii. 



J ^4 ^f Motives. [cnip. 

other cause, he has contracted an aversion. The influence of 
habit, in such cases, is a matter of fiEKt, which, though not 
readily accounted for, is acknowledged and indubitable^. 
Next those XXXTX. After the dictates of the love of reputation come, 

of the desire ^ . 

of amity. as it should Bcem, those of the desire of amity. The former are 
disposed to coincide with those of utility, inasmuch as they are 
disposed to coincide with those of benevolence. Now those of 
the desire of amity are apt also to coincide, in a certain sort, 
with those of benevolence. But the sort of benevolence with 
the dictates of which the love of reputation coincides, is the 
more extensive ; that with which those of the desire of amity 
coincide, the less extensive. Those of the love of amity have 
still, however, the advantage of those of the self-regarding motives. 
The former, at one period or other of his life, dispose a man to 
contribute to the happiness of a considerable number of persons : 
the latter, from the beginning of life to the end of it, confine 
themselves to the care of that single individual. The dictates 
of the desire of amity, it is plain, will approach nearer to a coin- 
cidence with those of the love of reputation, and thence with 
those of utility, in proportion, cceteris paribus^ to the number of 
the persons whose amity a man has occasion to desire : and 
hence it is, for example, that an English member of parliament, 
with all his own weaknesses, and all the follies of the people 
whose amity he has to cultivate, is probably, in general, a better . 
character than the secretary of a visier at Constantinople, or of 
a nai'b in Indostan. 
Difficulty of XL. The dictates of religion are, under the infinite diversity 
those of re- of religions, so extremely variable, that it is difficult to know 
what general account to give of them, or in what rank to place 
the motive they belong to. Upon the mention of religion, people's 
first thoughts turn naturally to the religion they themselves pro- 

* Strictly speaking, habit, being but a fictitious entity, and not really 
any thing distinct fi-om the acts or perceptions by which it is said to be 
formed, cannot be the cause of any thing. The enigma, however, may be 
satisfactorily solved upon the principle of association, of the nature and 
force of which a very satisfactory account may be seen in Dr. Priestley's 
edition of Hartley on Man. 



ligion. 



X.] Of Motives. 135 

fess. This is a great source of miscalculation, and has a tendency 
to place this sort of motive in a higher rank than it deserves. 
The dictates of religion would coincide, in all csbses, with those 
of utility, were the Being, who is the object of religion, univer- 
sally supposed to be as benevolent as he is supposed to be wise 
and powerful ; and were the notions entertained of his benevo- 
lence, at the same time, as correct as those which are entertained 
of his wisdom and his power. Unhappily, however, neither of 
these is the case. He is universally supposed to be all-powerful: 
for by the Deity, what else does any man mean than the Being, 
whatever he be, by whom every thing is done % And as to know- 
ledge, by the same rule that he should know one thing he should 
know another. These notions seem to be as correct, for all 
material purposes, as they are universal. But among the votaries 
of religion (of which number the multifarious fraternity of Chris- 
tians is but a small part) there seem to be but few (I Will not 
say how few) who are real believers in his be^ievolence. They 
call him benevolent in words, but they do not mean that he is 
so in reality. They do not mean, that he is benevolent as man 
5s conceived to be benevolent : they do not mean that he is 
benevolent in the only sense in which benevolence has a meaning. 
'Sot if they did, they would recognise that the dictates of religion 
cpuld be neither more nor less than the dictates of utility: not 
A tittle different : not a tittle less or more. But the case is, 
that on a thousand occasions they turn their backs on the prin- 
ciple of utility. They go astray after the strange principles its 
antagonists : sometimes it is the principle of asceticism : some- 
times the principle of sympathy and antipathy*. Accordingly, 
the idea they bear in their minds, on such occasions, is but too 
often the idea of malevolence ; to which idea, stripping it of its 
own proper name, they bestow the specious appellation of the 
social motive*. The dictates of religion, in short, are no other 

^ Ch. ii. [Principles Adverse], par. xviii. 

* Sometimes, in order the better to conceal the cheat (from their own 
eyes doubtless as well as from others) they set up a phantom of their own, 
which they call Justice : whose dictates are to modify (which being ex- 
plained, means to oppose) the dictates of benevolence. But justice, in the 



1 26 Of Motives. [chap, 

than the dictates of that principle which has been already men- 
tioned under the name of the theological principle^. These, as 
h^s been observed, are just aa it may happen, according to the 
biases of the person in question, copies of the dictates of one or 
other of the three original principles : sometimes, indeed, of the 
dictates of utility : but frequently of those of asceticism, or those 
of sympathy and antipathy. In this respect they are only on a 
par with the dictates of the lore of reputation : in another they 
are below it. The dictates of religion are in all places inter- 
mixed more or less with dictates unconformable to those of utility, 
deduced from texts, well or ill interpreted, of the writings held 
for sacred by each sect : unconformable, by imposing practices 
sometimes inconvenient to a man's Self, sometimes pernicious to 
the rest of the community. The sufferings of uncalled martyrs, 
the calamities of holy wars and religious persecutions, the mis*- 
chiefs of intolerant laws, (objects which can here only be glanced 
at, not detailed) are so many additional mischiefs over and above 
the number of those which were ever brought into the world by 
the love of reputation. On the other hand, it is manifest, that 
with respect to the power of operating in secret, the dictates of 
religion have the same advantage over those of the love of repu- 
tation, and the desire of amity, as is possessed by the dictates of 
benevolence. 
Tendency XLI. Happily, the dictates of religion seem to approach nearer 
improve. and nearer to a coincidence with those of utility every day. But 
why % Because the dictates of the moral sanction do so : and 
those coincide with or are influenced by these. Men of the worst 
religions, influenced by the voice and practice of the surrounding 
world, borrow continually a new and a new leaf out of the book 
of utility: and with these, in order not to break with their 

only sense in which it has a meaning, is an imaginary personage, feigned 
for the convenience of discourse, whose dictates are the dictates of utility, 
applied to certain particular cases. Justice, then, is nothing more than an 
imaginary instrument, employed to forward on certain occasions, and by 
certain means, the purposes of benevolence. The dictates of justice are 
nothing more than a part of the dictates of benevolence, which, on certain 
occasions, are applied to certain subjects ; to wit, to 
' See di. Q. [PiiBiqiiai Aihw> Ibb.} 



X.] ^ Of Motives. 12 J 

religion, tliey endeavour, sometimes with violence enough, to 
patch together and adorn the repositories of their faith. 

XLII. As to the self-regarding and dissocial motives, the Afterwards 
order that takes place among these, and the preceding one, in seif-regard- 
point of extra-regarding influence^ is too evident to need insist- in^, laatly. * 
ing on. As to the order that takes place among the motives pieasm^. 
of the self-regarding class, considered in comparison with one 
another, there seems to be no difference which on this occasion 
would be worth mentioning. With respect to the dissocial motive, 
it makes a difference (with regard to its extra-regarding effects) 
from which of two sources it originates j whether from self- 
regarding or from social opnsiderations. The displeasure you 
conceive against a man may be founded either on some act 
which offends you in the first instance, or on an act which offends 
you no otherwise than because you look upon it as being pre- 
judicial to same other party on whose behalf you interest your- 
self : which other party may be of course either a determinate 
individual, or any assemblage of individuals, determinate or in- 
determinate ^. It is obvious enough, that a motive, though in 
itself dissocial, may, by issuing from a social origin, possess a 
social tendency; and that its tendency, in this case, is likely to 
be the more social, the more enlarged the description is of the 
persons whose interests you espouse. Displeasure, venting itself 
against a man, on account of a mischief supposed to be done by 
him to the public, may be more social in its effects than any 
good- will, the exertions of which are confined to an individual ^. 

§ 5. Conflict among motives. 
XLIIL When a man has it in contemplation to enira&:e in any Motives im- 

pellingand 

action, he is frequently acted upon at the same time by the force restraming, 
of divers motives : one motive, or set of motives, acting in one 
direction ; another motive, or set of motives, acting as it were in 
an opposite direction. The motives on one side disposing him 
to engage in the action : those on the other, disposing him not to 

^ See ch. vi. [Sensibility], par. zzi. 
^ See suprat par. xxxvii. 



128 



()f Motives. 



[chap'. 



What are 
the motives 
most fre- 
quently at 
vananoe. 



Example to 
illustrate a 
struggle 
among con- 
tending 
motives. 



engage in it. Now, any motive, the influence of which tends to 
dispose him to engage in the action in question, may be termed 
an impelling motive : any motive, the influence of which tends 
to dispose him not to engage in it, a restraining motive. But 
these appellations may of course be interchanged, according as 
the act is of the positive kind, or the negative*. 

XLIV. It has been shown, that there is no sort of motive but 
may give birth to any sort of action. It follows, therefore, that . 
there are no two motives but may come to be opposed to one 
another. Where the tendency of the act is bad, the most 
common case is for it to have been dictated by a motive either 
of the self- regarding, or of the dissocial class. In such case the 
motive of benevolence has commonly been acting, though ineflfec- 
tuallyj in the character of a restraining motive. 

XLV. An example may be of use, to show the variety of con-r 
tending motives, by which a man may be acted upon at the 
same time. Crillon, a Catholic (at a time when it was generally 
thought meritorious among Catholics to extirpate Protestants), 
was ordered by his king, Charles IX. of France, to fall privately 
upon Coligny, a Protestant, and assassinate him : his answer 
was, * Excuse me. Sire ; but I'll fight him with all my heart *.' 
Here, then, were all the three forces above mentioned, including 
that of the political sanction, acting upon him at once. By 
the political sanction, or at least so much of the force of 
it as such a mandate, from such a sovereign, issued on such an 
occasion, might be supposed to carry with it, he was enjoined to 
put Coligny to death in the way of assassination : by the reli- 
gious sanction, that is, by the dictates of religious zeal, he was 
enjoined to put him to death in any way : by the moral sanction, 
or in other words, by the dictates of honour, that is, of the love 
of reputation, he was permitted (which permission, when coupled 
with the mandates of his sovereign, operated, he conceived, as an 
injunction) to fight the adversary upon equal terms ; by the 

* See ch. vii. [Actions], par. viii. 

^ The idea of the case here supposed is taken from an anecdote in real 
history, but varies from it in several particulars. 



X.] • Of Motives. 129 

dictates of enlarged beneyolenoe (supposing the mandate to be 
unjustifiable) he was enjoined not to attempt his life in any way, 
but to remain at peace with him : supposing the mandate to be 
unjustifiable, by the dictates of private benevolence he was en- 
joined not to meddle with him at any rate. Among this con-^ 
fusion df repugnant dictates, Crillon, it seems, gave the preference, 
in the first place, to those of honour : in the next place, to those 
of benevolence. He would have fought, had his offer been ac- 
cepted ; as it was not, he remained at peace. 

Here a multitude of questions might arise. Supposing the 
dictates of the political sanction to follow the mandate of the 
sovereign, of what kind were the motives which they afforded him 
for compliance % The answer is, of the self-regarding kind at 
any rate : inasmuch as, by the supposition, it was in the power 
of the sovereign to punish him for non-compliance, or reward 
him for compliance. Did they afford him the motive of re- 
ligion? (I mean independently of the circumstance of heresy 
above mentioned) the answer is, Yes, if his notion was, that it 
was God's pleasure he should comply with them ; No, if it was 
not. Did they afford him the motive of the love of reputation 1 
Yes, if it was his notion that the world would expect and re- 
quire that he should comply with them : No, if it was not. Did 
they afford him that of benevolence ? Yes, if it was his notion that 
the community would upon the whole be the bettei* for his com- 
plying with them : No, if it was not. But did the dictates of the 
political sanction, in the case in question, actually follow the 
mandates of the sovereign : in other words, was such a mandate 
legal ? This we see is a mere question of local jurisprudence, 
altogether foreign to the present purpose. 

XLYI. What is here said about the goodness and badness of Practical use 
motives, is far from being a mere matter of words. There will disquisitions 
be occasion to make use of it hereafter for various important motives, 
purposes. I shall have need of it for the sake of dissipating 
various prejudices, which are of disservice to the community, 
sometimes by cherishing the flame of civil dissensions ^, at other 

1 See B. I. tit. [Rebellion]. 



130 .Of Motives. 

times, by obstructing the course of' justice. It will be shown, 
that in the case of many offences^, the consideration of the 
motive is a most material one : for that in the first place it 
makes a very material difference in the magnitude of the mis- 
chief *: in the next place, that it is easy to be ascertained ; and 
thence may be made a ground for a difference in the demand for 
punishment : but that in other cases it is altogether incapable of 
being ascertained ; and that, were it capable of being ever so 
well ascertained, good or bad, it could make no difference in the 
demand for punishment : that in all cases, the motive that may 
happen to govern a prosecutor, is a consideration totally imma- 
terial : whence may be seen the mischievousness of the prejudice 
that is so apt to be entertained against informers ; and the con- 
sequence it is of that the judge, in particular, should be proof 
j against the influence of such delusions. 

Lastly, The subject of motives is one with which it is neces- 
sary to be acquainted, in order to pass a judgment on any 
means that may be proposed for combating offences in their 
source ^. 

But before the theoretical foundation for these practical ob- 
servations can be completely laid, it is necessary we should say 
something on the subject of disposition : which, accordingly, will 
furnish matter for the ensuing chapter. 

' See B. I. tit. [Simp. corp. injuries]. lb. tit. [Homicide]. 
* See ch. xi. [Dispositions]. 
. * See Append, tit. [Preventive Institutions]. 



CHAPTER XI. 



OF HUHAN SISFOBITIONS IK OENEBAL. 



Yutxzi 



I. In the foregoing chapter it has been shown at large, that Disposition, 
goodness or badness cannot, with any propriety, be predicated 

of motives. Is there nothing then about a man that can pro- 
perly be termed good or bad, when, on such or such an occasion, 
he suffers himself to be governed by such or such a motive? 
Yes, certainly: his disposition. Now disposition is a kind of 
fictitious entity, feigned for the convenience of discourse, in 
order to express what there is supposed to be permanent in a 
man's frame of mind, where, on such or such an occasion, he has 
been influenced by such or such a motive, to engage in an act, 
which, as it appeared to him, was of such or such a tendency. 

II. It is with disposition as with every thing else : it will be — how fiu* it 
good or bad according to its effects : according to the effects it the present 
has in augmenting or diminishing the happiness of the com- 
munity. A man's disposition may accordingly be considered in 

two points of view : according to the influence it has, either, 
I. on his own happiness: or, 2. on the happiness of others. 
Viewed in both these lights together, or in either of them in- 
discriminately, it may be termed, on the one hand, good; on 
the other, bad ; or, in flagrant cases, depraved ^ Viewed in the 

^ It might also be termed virtuous, or vicious. The only objection to 
the use of those terms on the present occasion is, the great quantity of good 
and bad repute that respectively stand annexed to them. The inconve- 
nience of this is, their being apt to annex an ill-proportioned measure of 
disrepute to dispositions which are ill-constituted only with respect to the 
party himself: involving them in such a degree of ignominy as should be 
appropriated to such dispositions only as are mischievous with regard to 
others. To exalt weaknesses to a level with crimes, is a way to diTwiTiiiih 

K 2 



132 Human JDisposilions in General, [chap. 

former of these lights, it has scarcely any peculiar name, which 
has as yet been appropriated to it. It might be termed, though 
but inexpressively, frail or infirm, on the one hand : sound or 
firm, on the other. Viewed in the other light, it might be 
termed beneficent, or meritorious, on the one hand : pernicious 
or mischievous, on the other. Now of that branch of a man's 
disposition, the effects of which regard in the first instance only 
himself, there needs not much to be said here. To reform it 
when bad, is the business rather of the moralist than the legis- 
lator : nor is it susceptible of those various modifications which 
make so material a difference in the effects of the other. Again, 
with respect to that part of it, the effects whereof regard others 
in the first instance, it is only in as far as it is of a mischievous 
nature tha4} the penal branch of law has any immediate concern 
with it : in as far as it may be of a beneficent nature, it belongs 
to a hitherto but little cultivated, and as yet unnamed branch of 
law, which might be styled the remlineratory. 
A mischiey- III. A man then is said to be of a mischievous disposition, 
tion ; a when, by the influence of no matter what motives, he is prc- 

meritorious jji a , n • ^ .^ j» 

disposition ; sumed to be more apt to engage, or form intentions 01 engaging, 
in acts which are apparently of a pernicious tendency, than in 
such as are apparently of a beneficial tendency : of a meritorious 
or beneficent disposition in the opposite case. 

What a IV. I say presumed : for, by the supposition, all that appears 

man's dispo- , , , 

sition is, can IS one single action, attended with one single train of circum- 
matterof stances: but from that degree of consistency and uniformity 
tion. which experience has shown to be observable in the different 

actions of the same person, the probable existence (past or 
future) of a number of acts of a similar nature, is naturally and 
justly inferred from the observation of one single one. Under 
such circumstances, such as the motive proves to be in one in- 
stance, such is the disposition to be presumed to be in others. 
It depends V. I say apparently mischievous : that is, apparently with 

the abhorrence which ought to be reserved for Crimea. To exalt small evils 
to a level with great ones, is the way to diminish the share of attention 
which ought to be paid to great ones. 



XI.] Human Disjxmtions in General. 133 

regard to him : such as to him appear to possess that tendency : the act ap- 
for from the mere event, independent of what to him it appears to him. 
beforehand likely to be, nothing can be inferred on either side. 
If to him it appears likely to be mischievous, in such case, 
though in the upshot it should prove innocent, or even bene- 
ficial, it makes no difference ; there is not the less reason for 
presuming his disposition to be a bad one : if to him it appears 
likely to be beneficial or innocent, in such case, though in the 
upshot it should prove pernicious, there is not the more reason 
on that account for presuming his disposition to be a good one. 
And here we see the importance of the circumstances of inten- 
tionality ^ consciousness ^, unconsciousness ^, and mis-supposal^. 

VI. The truth of these positions depends upon two others, which posi- 
both of them sufficiently verified by experience : The one is, gj^Jfded on 
that in the ordinary course of things the consequences of actions JyThe^^TOr- 
commonly turn out conformable to intentions. A man who sets J^^n^Si? 
up a butchers shop, and deals in beef, when he intends to knock J^5!^°® *"*^ 
down an ox, commonly does knock down an oxj though by*i"®"**®* 
some unlucky accident he may chance to miss his blow and 

knock down a man : he who sets up a grocer's shop, and deals 
in sugar, when he intends to sell sugar, commonly does sell 
sugar : though by some unlucky accident he may chance to sell 
arsenic in the room of it. 

VII. The other is, that a man who entertains intentions of 2. Between 
doing mischief at one time is apt to entertain the like intentions tions of the 

_ _ same person 

at another ^. at different 

tVIII. There are two circumstances upon which the nature of ^^^^ ciisposi- 
the disposition, as indicated by any act, is liable to depend : ^^yj^d* ^ 

* See ch. viii. * See ch. ix. 

^ To suppose a man to be of a good disposition, and at the same time a disposition. 
likely, in virtue of that very disposition, to engage in an habitual train of p^eeds^a 
mischievous actions, is a contradiction in terms : nor could such a proposi- naWt of doing 
tion ever be advanced, but from the giving, to the thing which the word not be a'good 
disposition is put for, a reality which does not belong to it. If then, for °°^' 
example, a man of religious disposition should, in virtue of that very dis- 
position, be in the habit of doing mischief, for instance, by persecuting his 
neighbours, the case must be, either that his disposition, though good in 
certain respects, is not good upon the whole : or that a religious disposition 
is not in general a good one. 



134 Human Dispositions in General. [chap. 

1. From the |e* The apparent tendency of the act: 2. The nature of the 
tendency of pnotive which gave birth to it. This dependency is subject to 

2. From the different rules, according to the nature of the motive. In stating 
tibe^tive. them, I suppose all along the apparent tendency of the act to be, 

as it commonly is, the same as the real. 
Caeei. IX. I. Where the tendency of the act is goodf and the motive 

goodr-mo^ is of the self-regarding kind. In this case the motive affords no 

tive< self" v v ** 

regarding, inference on either side. It affords no indication of a good dis- 
position : but neither does it afford any indication of a bad 
one. 

A baker sells his bread to a hungry man who jasks for it. 
This, we see, is one of those acts of which, in ordinary cases, the 
tendency is unquestionably good. The baker's motive is the 
ordinary commercial motive of pecuniary interest. It is plain, 
that there is nothing in the transaction, thus stated, that can 
afford the least ground for presuming that the baker is a better 
or a worse man than any of his neighbours. 
Case 2. X. 2. Where the tendency of the act is had^ and the motive, 

2>ad— moiiVe, as before, is of the self-regarding kind. In this case the dispo- 
self'regard- ... . t , i . • i • 

ing. sition mdicated is a mischievous one. 

A man steals bread out of a baker's shop : this is one of those 
acts of which the tendency will readily be acknowledged to be 
bad. Why, and in what respects it is so, will be stated farther 
on ^. His motive, we will say, is that of pecuniary interest ; the 
desire of getting the value of the bread for nothing. His dispo- 
sition, accordingly, appears to be a bad one : for every one will 
allow a thievish disposition to be a bad one. 

Case s. XI. 3. Where the tendency of the act is good, and the motive 

Tendency *> %/ 

good-mo' is the purely social one of good-will. In this case the disposition 

will.' indicated is a beneficent one. 

A baker gives a poor man a loaf of bread. His motive is 
compassion ; a name given to the motive of benevolence, in par- 
ticular cases of its operation. The disposition indicated by the 
baker, in this case, is such as every man will be ready enough to 
acknowledge to be a good one. 

^ See ch. xii. [Consequences], and Code, B. I. tit. [Theft]. 



XI.] Human Dispositions in GeneraL. 135 

XII. 4. Where the tendency of the act is had^ and the ^<^*iv® ^^^5^^ 
is the purely social one of good- will. - Even in this case the dis- Jod—motive, 
position which the motive indicates is dubious: it may be a 
mischievous or a meritorious one, as it happens ; according as. 

the mischievousness of the act is more or less apparent. 

XIII. It may be thouffht, that a case of this sort cannot This case 

... -c notanim- 

exist ; and that to suppose it, is a contradiction m terms, r or possible one. 
the act is one, which, by the supposition, the agent knows to be 
a mischievous one. How then can it be, that good-will, that is, 
the desire of doing good, could have been the motive that led 
him into it ? To reconcile this, we must advert to the distinc- 
tion between enlarged benevolence and confined ^. The motive 
that led him into it, was that of confined benevolence. Had; he 
followed the dictates of enlarged benevolence, he would not have 
done what he did. Now, although he followed the dictates of 
that branch of benevolence, which in any single instance of its 
exertion is mischievous, when opposed to the other, yet, as the 
cases which call for the exertion of the former are, beyond com- 
parison, more numerous than those which call for the exertion 
of the latter, the disposition indicated by him,' in following the 
impulse of the former, will often be such as in a man, of the 
common run of men, may be allowed to be a good one upon the 
whole. 

XIV. A man with a numerous family of children, on the Example i. 
point of starving, goes into a baker's shop, steals a loaf, divides , 

it all among the children, reserving none of it for himself. It 
will be hard to infer that that man's disposition is a mischievous 
one upon the whole. Alter the case, give him but one child, 
and that hungry perhaps, but in no imminent .danger of starv- 
ing : and now let the man set fire to a house full of people, for 
the sake of stealing money out of it to buy the bread with. The 
disposition here indicated will hardly be looked upon as a good 
one. 

XV. Another case will appear more difficult to decide than Example II. 
either. Eavaillac assassinated one of the best and wisest of 

^ See ch. x. [Motives]. 



136 



Human Disposilions in General. 



[chap. 



Example 
III. 



sovereigtis, at a time when a good and wise sovereign, a blessing 
at all times so valuable to a state, was particularly precious ; 
and that to the inhabitants of a populous and extensive empire. 
He is taken, and doomed to the most excruciating tortures. His 
son, well persuaded of his being a sincere penitent, and that 
mankind, in case of his being at large, would have nothing more 
to fear from him, efiPectuates his escape. Is this then a sign of a 
good disposition in the son, or of a bad one % Perhaps some will 
answer, of a bad one ; for, besides the interest which the nation 
has in the sufferings of such a criminal, on the score of the ex- 
ample, the future good behaviour of such a criminal is more than 
any one can have sufficient ground to be persuaded of. 

XVI. Well then, let Bavaillac, the son, not facilitate his 
father's escape ; but content himself with conveying poison to 
him, that at the price of an easier death he may escape his tor- 
ments. The decision will now, perhaps, be more difficult. The 
act is a wrong one^ let it be allowed, and such as ought by all 
means to be punished : but is the disposition manifested by it a 
bad one % Because the young man breaks the laws in this one 
instance, is it probable, that if let alone, he would break the 
laws in ordinary instances, for the satisfaction of any inordinate 
desires of his own 1 The answer of most men would probably 
be in the negative. 

XVII. 5. Where the tendency of the act is goody and the 
motive is a semi-social one, the hve of repiUation. In this case 

reputation, the disposition indicated is a good one. 

In a time of scarcity, a baker, for the sake of gaining the 
esteem of the neighbourhood, distributes bread gratis among the 
industrious poor. Let this be taken for granted : and let it be 
allowed to be a matter of uncertainty, whether he had any real 
feeling for the sufferings of those whpm he has relieved, or no. 
His disposition, for all that, cannot, with any pretence of reason, 
be termed otherwise than a good and beneficent one. It can 
only be in consequence of some very idle prejudice, if it receives 
a different name ^ 



Cases. 
Tendency, 
ffood — ^mo- 
tive, love of 



The bulk of ^ The bulk of mankind, ever ready to depreciate the character of their 



XI.] Human Dispositions in General, 137 

XVIII. 6. Where the tendency of the act is had, and the Case 6. . 
motive, as before, is a semi-social one, the love of reputation. 6a<«— motive. 
In this case, the disposition which it indicates is more or less 

good or bad : in the first place, according as the tendency of the 
act is more or less mischievous : in the next place, according as 
the dictates of the moral sanction, in the society in question, 
approach more or less to a coincidence with those of utility. It 
does not seem probable, that in any nation, which is in a state of 
tolerable civilization, in short, in any nation in which such rules 
as these can come to be consulted, the dictates of the moral 
sanction will so far recede from a coincidence with those of 
utiliiy (that is, of enlightened benevolence) that the disposition 
indicated in this case can be otherwise than a good one upon the 
whole. 

XIX. An Indian receives an injury, real or imaginary, from Example I. 
an Indian of another tribe. He revenges it upon the person of 

his antagonist with the most excruciating torments: the case 
being, that cruelties inflicted on such an occasion, gain him 
reputation in his own tribe. The disposition manifested in such 
a case can never be deemed a good one, among a people ever 



neighbours, in order, indirectly, to exalt their own, will take occasion to 
refer a motive to the class of bad ones as often as they can find one still 
better, to which the act might have owed its birth. Conscious that his 
own motives are not of the best class, or persuaded that if they be, they 
will not be referred to that class by others ; afraid of being taken for a 
dupe, and anxious to show the reach of his penetration ; each man takes 
care, in the first place, to impute the conduct of every other man to the 
least laudable of the motives that can account for it : in the next place, 
when he has gone as far that way as he can, and cannot drive down the 
individual motive to any lower class, he changes his battery, and attacks 
the very class itself. To the love of reputation he will accordingly give a 
bad name upon every occasion, calling it ostentation, vanity, or vain-glory. 
Partly to the same spirit of detraction, the natural consequence of the 
sensibility of men to the force of the moral sanction, partly to the influence 
of the principle of asceticism, may, perhaps, be imputed the great abund- 
ance of bad names of motives, in comparison of such as are good or neutral : 
and, in particular, the total want of neutral names for the motives of sexual 
desire, physical desire in general, and pecuniary interest. The superior 
abundance, even of good names, in comparison of neutral ones, would, if 
examined, be found rather to confirm than disprove the above remark. The 
language of a people on these points may, perhaps, serve in some measure 
as a key to their moral sentiments. But such speculative disquisitions are 
foreign to the purpose of the present work. 



mankind apt to 
depreciate this 
motive. 






138 Human Dispositions in General. [chap. 

80 few degrees advanced, in point of civilization, above the 
Indians. 
Example II. XX. A nobleman (to come back to Europe) contracts a debt 
with a poor tradesman. The same nobleman, presently after- 
wards, contracts a debt, to the same amount, to another noble- 
man, at plaj. He is unable to pay both : he pays the whole 
debt to the companion of his amusements, and no part of it to 
the tradesman. The disposition manifested in this case can 
scarcely be termed otherwise than a bad one. It is certainly, 
however, not so bad as if he had paid neither. The principle of 
love of reputation, or (as it is called in the case of this partial 
application of it) honour, is here opposed to the worthier prin- 
ciple of benevolence, and gets the better of it. But it gets the 
better also of the self-regarding principle of pecuniary interest. 
The disposition, therefore, which it indicates, although not so 
good a one as that in which the principle of benevolence pre- 
dominates, is better than one in which the principle of self- 
interest predominates. He would be the better for having more 
benevolence : but would he be the better for having no honour 1 
This seems to admit of great dispute ^. 
Case 7. XXI. 7. Where the tendency of the act is goody and the 

p«S— mo^' motive is the semi-social one of religion. In this case, the dis- 
tive, pie y. p^gj^i^jj indicated by it (considered with respect to the influence 
of it on the man's conduct towards others) is manifestly a bene- 
ficent and meritorious one. 

A baker distributes bread gratis among the industrious poor. 
It is not that he feels for their distresses : nor is it for the sake 
of gaining reputation among his neighbours. It is for the sake 
of gaining the favour of the Deity : to whom, he takes for 
granted, such conduct will be acceptable. The disposition mani- 
fested by such conduct is plainly what every man would call a 
good one. 
Case 8. XXn. 8. "Where the tendency of the act is had, and the motive 

Tend enc v 

6ad-;-motive, is that of religion, as before. In this case the disposition is 
'^ "* dubious. It is good or bad, and more or less good or bad, in the 

' See the case of Duels discussed in B. I. tit. [Homicide]. 



k 



XI.] Human Disjpositions in General. 139 

first place, as the tendency of the act is more or less mischievous ; 
in the next place, according as the religious tenets of the person 
in question approach more or less to a coincidence with the dic- 
tates of utility. 

XXIII. It should seem from history, that even in nations in a The disposi- 

. i* tion may bo 

tolerable state of civilization in other respects, the dictates of bad in this 

C&S6 

religion have been found so far to recede from a coincidence 
with those of utility; in other words, from those of enlightened 
benevolence ; that the disposition indicated in this case may even 
be a bad one upon the whole. This however is no objection to 
the inference which it affords of a good disposition in those 
countries (such as perhaps are most of the countries of Europe 
at preseut) in which its dictates respecting the conduct of a man 
towards other men approach very nearly to a coincidence with 
those of utility. The dictates of religion, in their application to 
the conduct of a man in what concerns himself alone, seem in 
most European nations to savour a good deal of the ascetic 
principle : but the obedience to such mistaken dictates indicates ' 
not any such disposition as is likely to break out into acts of 
pernicious tendency with respect to others. Instances in which 
the dictates of religion lead a man into acts which are pernicious 
in this latter view, seem at present to be but rare : unless it be 
acts of persecution, or impolitic measures on the part of govern- 
ment, where the Idw itself is either the principal actor or an 
accomplice in the mischief. Ravaillac, instigated by no other 
motive than this, gave his country one of the most fatal stabs 
that a country ever received from a single hand : but happily the 
Kavaillacs are but rare. They have been more frequent, how- 
ever, in France than in any other country during the same 
period : and it is remarkable, that in every instance it is this 
motive that has produced them. When they do appear, however, 
nobody, I suppose, but such as themselves, will be for terming a 
disposition, such as they manifest, a good one. It seems hardly 
to be denied, but that they are just so much the worse for their 
notions of religion; and that had they been left to the sole 
guidance of benevolence, and the love of reputation, without any 



142 Human Dispositions in. General. [chap. 



by the sum 
ofhisinten 
tions : 



I 



measure the which the mischieTousness or meritoriousness of a man's dis- 
a man* 8 d^ position 18 to be inferred in the gross : we come now to the 
^^^^ ^^ measure of that mischieyousness or meritoriousness, as resulting 
from those circumstances. Now with meritorious acts and dis- 
positions we have no direct concern in the present work. All 
that penal law is concerned to do, is to measure the depravity of 
the disposition where the act is mischievous. To this object, 
therefore, we shall here confine ourselves. 
A man's dis- XXYII. It is evident, that the nature of a man's disposition 
oo^Siuted must depend upon the nature of the motives he is apt to be 
influenced by : in other words, upon the degree of his sensibility 
to the force of such and such motives. For his disposition is, as 
it were, the sum of his intentions : the disposition he is of during 
a certain period, the sum or result of his intentions during that 
period. If, of the acts he has been intendiuf^ to engage in during 
the supposed period, those which are apparently of a mischievous 
tendency, bear a large proportion to those which appear to him 
to be of the contrary tendency, his disposition will be of the 
mischievous cast : if but a small proportion, of the innocent or 
upright, 
—whichowe XXVIII. Now intentions, like every thing else, are produced 
to motives, ty the things that are their causes : and the causes of intentions 

(are motives. If, on any occasion, a man forms either a good or 
a bad intention, it must be by the influence of some motive. 
A seducing XXIX, "When the act, which a motive prompts a man to 
ing motive, engage in, is of a mischievous nature, it may, for distinction's 
teiary or sake, be termed a seducing or corrupting motive : in which case 
motive! also any motive which, in opposition to the former, acts in the 
character of a restraining motive, may be styled a tutelary^ 
preservatory, or preserving motive. 
Tutelary XXX. Tutelary motives may again be distinguished into 

either stand- Standing or constant, and occasional. By standing tutelary mo- 
8?onS.**^' tives, I mean such as act with more or less force in all, or at 
least in most cases, tending to restrain . a man from any mis- 
chievous acts he may be prompted to engage in ; and. that with 
a force which depends upon the general nature of the act, rather 



XI.] Human Dispositions in General. 143 

than upon any accidental circumstance with which any individual 
act of that sort may happen to be accompanied. By occasional 
tutelary motives, I mean such motives as may chance to act in 
this direction or not, according to the nature of the act, and of 
the particular occasion on which the engaging in it is brought 
into contemplation. 

XXXI. Now it has been shown, that there is no sort of Standing 
motive by which a man may not be prompted to engage in acts tives are, 
that are of a mischievous nature ; that is, which may not come 

to act in the capacity of a seducing motive. It has been shown,! 
on the other hand, that there are some motives which are re- 1 
markably less likely to operate in this way than others. It has* 
also been shown, that the least likely of all is that of benevolence 
or good-wi]l : the most common tendency of which, it has been 
shown, is to act in^fehe character of a tutelary motive. It has 
also been shown, that even when by accident it acts in one way 
in the character of a seducing motive, still in another way it acts 
in the opposite character of a tutelary one. The motive of good- 
will, in as far as it respects the interests of one set of persons, 
may prompt a man to engage in acts which are productive of 
mischief to another and more extensive set : but this is only 
because his good- will is imperfect and confined : not taking into 
contemplation the interests of all the persons whose interests are 
at stake. The same motive, were the affection it issued from 
more enlarged, would operate effectually, in the character of a 
constraining motive, against that very act to which, by the sup- 
position, it gives birth. This same sort of motive may therefore, 
without any real contradiction or deviation from truth, be ranked 
in the number of standing tutelary motives, notwithstanding the 
occasions in which it may act at the same time in the character 
of a seducing one. 

XXXII. The same observation, nearly, may be applied to the 2. The love 
semi-social motive of love of reputation. The force of this, like tion. 
that of the former, is liable to be divided against itself. As in 
the case of good-will, the interests of some of the persons, who 
may be the objects of that sentiment, are liable to be at variance 



144 Human Dispositions in General, [chap. 

with those of others : so in the case of love of reputation, the 
sentiments of some of the persons, whose good opinion is desired, 
may be at variance with the sentiments of other persons of that 
number. Now in the case of an act, which is really of a mis- 
chievous nature, it can scarcely happen that there shall be no 
persons whatever who will look upon it with an eye of disappro- 
bation. It can scarcely ever happen, therefore, that an act really 
mischievous shall not have some part at least, if not the whole, 
of the force of this motive to oppose it ; nor, therefore, that this 
motive should not act with some degree of force in the character 
of a tutelary motive. This, therefore, may be set down as 
another article in the catalogue of standing tutelary motives. 

3. The desire XXXIII. The same observation may be applied to the desire 

of amity. , , ^ x j. 

of amity, though not in altogether equal measure. For, not- 
withstanding the inischievousuess of an act, it may happen, 
without much difficulty, that all the persons for whose amity a 
man entertains any particular present desire which is accom- 
panied with expectation, may concur in regarding it with an eye 
rather of approbation than the contrary. This is but too apt to 
be the case among such fraternities as those of thieves, smug- 
glers, and many other denominations of offenders. This, how- 
ever, is not constantly, nor indeed most commonly the case : 
insomuch, that the desire of amity may still be regarded, upon 
the whole, as a tutelary motive, were it only from the closeness 
of its connexion with the love of reputation. And it may be 
ranked among standing tutelary motives, since, where it does 
apply, the force with which it acts, depends not upon the occa- 
sional circumstances of the act which it opposes, but upon prin- 
ciples as general as those upon which depend the action of the 
other semi-social motives. 

4. The mo- XXXIV. The motive of religion is not altogether in the same 
gion. case with the three former. The force of it is not, like theirs, 

liable to be divided against itself. I mean in the civilized 
nations of modem times, among whom the notion of the unity of 
the Godhead is universal. In times of classical antiquity it was 
otherwise. If a man got Venus on his side, Pallas was on the 



XI.] Muman Dispositions in Oeneral. ^45 

other: if ^olus was for him, Neptune was against him. iBneajs, \ \ 
with all his piety, had but a partial interest at the court of \ ' 
heaven. That matter stands upon a different footing now-a- ^ 

days. In any given person, the force of religion, whatever it be, 
is now all of it on one side. It may balance, indeed, on which 
side it shall declare itself: and it may declare itself, as we have 
seen already in but too many instances, on the wrong as well as 
on the right. It has been, at least till lately, perhaps is still, 
accustomed so much to declare itself on the wrong side, and that 
in such material instances, that on that account it seemed not 
proper to place it, in point of social tendency, on a level alto- 
gether with the motive of benevolence. Where it does act, how- 
ever, as it does in by far the greatest number of cases, in opposi- 
tion to the ordinary seducing motives, it acts, like the motive 
of benevolence, in an uniform manner, not depending upon the 
particular circumstances that may attend the commission of the 
act ; but tending to oppose it, merely on account of its mis- 
chievousness ; and therefore, with equal force, in whatsoever 
circumstances it may be proposed to be committed. This, there- 
fore, may also be added to the catalogue of standing tutelary 
motives. 

XXXV. As to the motives which may operate occasionally Oaswionftl 
in the character of tutelary motives, these, it has been already tives maj be 
intimated^ are of various sorts, and various degrees of strength ever, 
in various offences : depending not only upon the nature of the 
offence, but upon the accidental circumstances in which the idea 
of engaging in it may come in contemplation. Nor is there any 
sort of motive which may not come to operate in this character ; 
as may be easily conceived. A thief, for instance, may be pre- 
vented from engaging in a projected scheme of house-breaking, 
by sitting too long over his bottle ^, by a visit from his doxy, by 
the occasion he may have to go elsewhere, in order to receive his 
dividend of a former booty ' ; and so on. 

XXXYI. There are some motives, however, which seem more Motives thair 

^ Love of the pleasures of the palate. 
^ Pecuniary interest. 



146 Human Dispositions in General, [chap. 

aroportica- vpt to act in this character than others ; especially as things are 
act m^ i^ow constituted, now that the law has every where opposed to 
'^^^^^Us^Q the force of the principal seducing motives, artificial tutelary 
^^f^pre- motives of its own creation. Of the motives here meant it will 
*"^**"*"* be necessary to take a general view. They seem to be reducible 
to two heads ; viz. i. The love of ease ; a motive put into action 
by the prospect of the trouble of the attempt; that is, the trouble 
which it may be necessary to bestow, in overcoming the physical 
difficulties that may accompany it 2. Self-preservation, as op- 
posed to the dangers to which a man may be exposed in the 
prosecution of it. 
DangeMto XXX V 11. These dangers may be either, i. Of a purely physi- 
preMmtion cal nature : or, 2. Dangers resulting from moral agency ; in 
fn ttS*c«2 Other words, from the conduct of any such persons to whom the 
ap^Iare!" *^> ^ known, may be expected to prove obnoxious. But moral 
pi^^^5- ^6^cy supposes knowledge with respect to the circumstances 
S*l)anger8 ^^^ ^® *^ hs^YQ the effect of external motives in giving birth to 
OT^wtwn. ^** -^^^ *^® obtaining such knowledge, with respect to the 
commission of any obnoxious act, on the part of any persons 
who may be disposed to make the agent suffer for it, is called 
detection; and the agent concerning whom such knowledge is 
obtained, is said to be detected. The dangers, therefore, which 
may threaten an offender from this quarter, depend, whatever 
they may be, on the event of his detection ; and may, therefore, 
be all of them comprised under the article of the dcmger of 
detection, 
DBiu^de- XXXYIII. The danger depending upon detection may be 
detection divided again into two branches: i. That which may result 
"SS^"", from any opposition that may be made to the enterprise by 
on t^ielpot? persons ou the spot ; that is, at the very time the enterprise is 
quent^^ carrying on: 2, That which respects the legal punishment, or 
'^'"^^*™ other suffering, that may await at a distance upon the issue of 

the enterprise. 
• The force of XXXIX. It may be worth calling to mind on this occasion, 
standing tu- that among the tutelary motives, which have been styled con- 
ti^e?ofiove stant ones, there are two of which the force depends (though not 



/ 



XI.] Human Dispositions in General. 147 * 

so entirely as the force of the occasional ones which have been ofreputa- 
just mentioned, yet in a great measure) upon the circumstance of ■iieofainiiiy, 
detection. These, it may be remembered, are, the love of reputa- upon detec- 
tion, and the desire of amity. In proportion, therefore, as the 
chance of being detected appears greater, these motives will 
apply with the greater force : with the less force, as it appears 
less. This is not the case with the two other standing tutelary 
motives, that of benevolence, and that of religion. 

XL. We are now in a condition to determine, with some de- strength of 
gree of precision, what is to be understood by the strength of a tioii.whati8 
temptation, and what indication it may give of the degree of 
mischievousness in a man's disposition in the case of any offence. 
When a man is prompted to engage in any mischievous act, we 
will say, for shortness, in an offence, the strength of the tempta- 
tion depends upon the ratio between the force of the seducing 
motives on the one hand, and such of the occasional tutelary 
ones, as the circumstances of the case call forth into action, on 
the other. The temptation, then, may be said to be strong, 
when the pleasure or advantage to be got from the crime is such 
as in the eyes of the offender must appear great in comparison 
of the trouble and danger that appear to him to accompany the 
enterprise : slight or weak, when that pleasure or advantage is 
such as must appear small in comparison of such trouble and 
such danger. It is plain the strength of the temptation depends 
not upon the force of the impelling (that is of the seducing) 
motives altogether : for let the opportimity be more favourable, 
that is, let the trouble, or any branch of the danger, be made 
less than before, it will be acknowledged, that the temptation is 
made so much the stronger: and on the other hand, let the 
opportunity become less favourable, or, in other words, let the 
trouble, or any branch of the danger, be made greater than before, 
the temptation will be so much the weaker. 

Now, after taking account of such tutelary motives as have 
been styled occasional, the only tutelary motives that can remain 
are those which have been termed standing ones. But those 
which have been termed the standing tutelary motives, are the 

L 2 




148 Human Depositions in General. [chap. 

same that we have been styling sociaL It follows, therefore, 

that the strength of the temptation, in any case, after deducting 

the force of the social motives, is as the sum of the forces of the 

seducing, to the sum of the forces of the occasional tutelary 

motives. 

Indications XLI. It remains to be inquired, what indication concerning 

this and ^ the mischievousness or depravity of a man's disposition is afforded 

cumstanoes ^7 ^^ strength of the temptation, in the case where any offence 

t^^^ happens to have been committed. It appears, then, that the 

^nd^ weaker the temptation is, by which a man has been overcome, 

disposition. ^^ more depraved and mischievous it shows his disposition to 

have been. For the goodness of hb disposition is measured by 

the d^ree of his sensibility to the action of the social motives ^ : 

in other words, by the strength of the influence which those 

motives have over him : now, the less considerable the force is 

by which their influence on him has been overcome, the more 

coDvincing is the proof that has been given of the weakness of 

that influence. 

Again, The degree of a man's sensibility to the force of the 
social motives being given, it is plain that the force with which 
those motives tend to restrain him from engaging in any mis- 
chievous enterprise, will be as the apparent mischievousness of 
such enterprise, that is, as the degree of mischief with which it 
appears to liim likely to be attended. In other words, the less 
mischievous the offence appears to him to be, the less averse he 
will be, as far as he is guided by social considerations, to engage 
in it; the more mischievous, the more averse. If then the 
nature of the offence is such as must appear to him highly mis- 
chievous, and yet he engages in it notwithstanding, it shows, 
that the degree of his sensibility to the force of the social mo- 
tives is but slight ; and consequently that his disposition is 
proportionably depraved. Moreover, the less the strength of the 
temptation was, the more pernicious and depraved does it show 
his disposition to have been. For the less the strength of the 
temptation was, the less was the force which the influence of 

> Supra, par. zzvii, xxviii. 



XI.] Suman Dispositions in General* 149 

those motives had to overcome : the clearer therefore is the 
proof that has heen given of the weakness of, that influence. 

XLII. From what has been said, it seems, that, for judging of Bules for 

' •» o «=» measuring 

^e indication that is afforded concerning the depravity of a the depra- 
man's disposition by the strength of the temptation, compared position in- 
with the mischievousness of the enterprise, the following rules an offence, 
may be laid down : 

Rule I. The strength of the temptation being given, the mis- 1 
chievovsness of the disposition manifested by the enterprise, is <i8 I 
the apparent mischievousness of the act. 

Thus, it would show a more depraved disposition, to murder a 
man for a reward of a guinea, or falsely to charge him with a> 
robbery for the same reward, than to obtain the same sum from 
him by simple theft: the trouble he would have to take, and the 
risk he would have to run, being supposed to stand on the same 
footing in the one case as in the other. 

Eule 2« The apparent mischievousness of the act being given, 
a marCs disposition is the more depraved, the slighter the tempta- 
tion is by which he has been overcome. 

Thus, it shows a more depraved and dangerous disposition, if 
a man kill another out of mere sport, as tbe Emperor of Morocco, 
Muley Mahomet, is said to have done great numbers, than out of 
revenge, aa Sylla and Marius did thousands, or in the view of 
self-preservation, as Augustus killed many, or even for lucre, as 
the same Emperor is said to have killed some. And the effects 
/)f such a depravity, on that part of the public which is apprized 
of it, run in the same proportion. From Augustus, some persons 
only bad to fear, under some particular circumstances. From 
Muley Mahomety every man had to fear at all times. 

Rule 3. The appa/rent mischievousness of the act being given, 
the evidence which it affords of the depravity of a mavUs disposi- 
tion is the less conclusive, the stronger the temptation is by which 
he has been overcome^ 

Thus, if a poor man, who is ready to die with hunger, steal a 
loaf of bread, it is a less explicit sign of depravity, than if a rich 
man were to commit a theft to the same amount. It will be 



I 



150 Sumcm Dispositions i/n General. [chap. 

observed, that in this rale all that is said is, that the evidence of 
depravity is in this case the less conclusive : it is not said that 
the depravity iss^positively the less. For in this case it is possible, 
for any thing that appears to the contrary, that the theft might 
have been committed, even had the temptation been not so 
strong. In this case, the alleviating circumstance is only a mat- 
ter of presumption; in the former, the aggravating circumstance 
is a matter of certainty. 

Rule 4. Where the motive is of the dissocial hind, the apparent 
mischievoti^sness of the act, and the strength of the temptation^ 
being given, the d&profoity is as the degree of deliberation with 
which it is accompa/nied. 

For in every man, be his disposition ever so depraved, the 
social motives are those which, wherever the self-regarding 
ones stand neuter, regulate and determine the general tenor of 
his life. If the dissocial motives are put in action, it is only in 
particular circumstances, and on particular occasions; the gentle 
but constant force of the social motives being for a while sub- 
dued. The general and standing bias of every man's nature is, 
therefore, towards that side to which the force of the social mo- 
tives would determine him to adhere. This being the case, the 
force of the social motives tends continually to put an end to 
that of the dissocial ones; as, in natural bodies, the force of 
friction tends to put an end to that which is generated by im- 
pulse. Time, then, which wears away the force of the dissocial 
motives, adds to that of the sociaL The longer, tiiecefore, a man 
continues, on a given occasion, under the dominion of the dis- 
social motives, the more convincing is the proof that has been 
given of his insensibility to the force of the social ones. 

Thus, it shows a worse disposition, where a man lays a de- 
liberate plan for beating his antagonist, and beats him accord- 
ingly, than if he were to beat him upon the spot, in consequence 
of a sudden quarrel : and worse again, if, after having had him 
a long while together in his power, he beats him at intervals, 
and at his leisure ^ 

^ See B. I. tit. [Confinement]. 



XI.] Human Dispositions in General. 151 

XLIII. The depravity of disposition, indicated by an act, is a Use of this 
material consideration in several respects. Any mark of extra- 
ordinary depravity, by adding to the terror already inspired by 
the crime, and by holding up the offender as a person from 
whom there may be more mischief to be apprehended in future, 
adds in that way to the demand for puniehment. By indicating 
a general want of sensibility on the part of the offender, it may 
add in another way also to the demand for punishment. The 
article of disposition is of the more importance, inasmuch as, in ' 
measuring out the quantum of punishment, the principle of sym- 
pathy and antipathy is apt to look at nothing else. A man who 
punishes because he hates, and only because he hates, such a 
man, when he does not find any thing odious in the disposition, 
is not for punishing at all ; and when he does, he is not for ^ 

carrying the punishment further than his hatred carries him. ^ ^ ) 
Hence the aversion we find so frequently expressed against the ^^^ 7^ 
maxim, that the punishment must rise with the strength of the r, ^ 

temptation; a maxim, the contrary of which, as we shall Bee,_JjT^^ kv^ ' * 
would be as cruel to offenders themselves, as it would be sub- , , , , 
versive of the purposes of punishment. OL i]u uUa^ "^ 

'^ \1 /pa -I 



CHAPTER XII. 

OP THE CONSEQUENCES OP A MISCHIEVOUS ACT. 

§ I. Shapes in which the mischief of an act may show itsdf. 

Beoapitula- I, HiTHERTO we have been speaking of the various articles or 
objects on which the consequences or tendency of an act may 
depend : of the bare act itself: of the circvmstances it may have 
been^ or may have been supposed to be, accompanied with : of 
the consciouaness a man may have had with respect to any such 
circumstances : of the intentions that may have preceded the 
act : of the motives that may have given birth to those inten- 
tiona : and of the disposition that may have been indicated by 
the connexion between such intentions and such motives* We 
now come to speak of consequences or tendency : an article which 
forms the concluding link in all this chain of causes and effects, 
involving in it the materiality of the whole. Now, such part of 
this tendency as is of a mischievous nature, is all that we have 
any direct concern with ; to that, therefore, we shall here confine 
ourselves. 
Mischief of H. The tendency of an act is mischievous when the conse- 
Jl^^i^te quences of it are mischievous ; that is to say, either the certain 
chievfMif* consequences or the probable. The consequences, how many and 
que^Qs. whatsoever they may be, of an act, of which the tendency is mis- 
chievous, may, such of them as are mischievous, be conceived to 
constitute one aggregate body, which may be termed the mischief 
of the act. 

The mischief III. This mischief may frequently be distinguished, as it 

primary or were, into two shares or parcels : the one containing what 

may be called the primary mischief ; the other, what may be 



Of the Consequences of a MiscAievous Act. 153- 

called the secondary. That share may be termed the primary, 4 
which is sustained by an assignable individual, or a multitude of 
assignable individuals. That share may be termed the secondary ,1 
which, taking its origin from the former, extends itself either I 
over the whole community, or over some other multitude of 
unassignable individuals. 

lY. The primary mischief of an act may again be distinguished Primarr— 
into two branches : r* The original: and, 2. The derivative. By S^vative. 
the original branch, I mean that which alights upon and is con- 
fined to any person who is a sufiPerer in the first instance, and on 
his own account r the person, for instance, who is beaten, robbed, 
or murdered. By the derivative branch, I mean any share of 
mischief which may befall any other assignable persons in conse- 
quence of his being a sufierer, and no otherwise. These persons 
must, of course, be persons who in some way or other are con- 
nected with him. Now the ways in which one person may be 
connected with another, have been already seen : they may be 
connected in the way of interest (meaning self-regarding interest) 
or merely in the way of sympathy. And again, persons con- 
nected with a given person, in the way of interest, may be 
connected with him either by affording support to him, or by 
deriving it from him ^. 

V. The secondary mischief, again, may frequently be seen to The secon- 
consist of two other shares or parcels: the first consisting of 1. Aurmzor, 
pain; the other of danger. The pain which it produces is a * 
pain of apprehension : a pain grounded on the apprehension of 
. suffering such mischiefs or inconveniences, whatever they may 
be, as it is the nature of the primary mischief to produce. It 
may be styled, in one word, the alarm. The danger is the 
chance, whatever it may be, which the multitude it concerns 
may in consequence of the primary mischief stand exposed to, 
of suffering such mischiefs or inconveniencies. For danger is 
nothing but the chance of pain, or, what comes to the same 
thing, of loss of pleasure. 

YI. An example may serve to make this clear. A man Example. 

* See ch. vi. [Sensibility]. 



154 Of the Consequences of a MiscAievous Ad, [chap. 

attacks yon on the road, and robs yon. Yon suffer a pain on 
the occasion of losing so mnch money ^ : yon also suffered a pain 
at the thoughts of the personal ill-treatment yon apprehended 
he might give you, in case of your not happening to satisfy his 
demands ^. These together constitute the original branch of the 
primary mischief, resulting from the act of robbery. A creditor 
of yours, who expected yon to pay him with part of that 
money, and a son of yours, who expected you to have given 
him another part, are in consequence disappointed. Ton are 
obliged to have recourse to the bounty of your father, to make 
good part of the deficiency. These mischie& together make up 
the derivative branch. The report of this robbery circulates 
from hand to hand, and spreads itself in the neighbourhood. It 
finds its way into the newspapers, and is propagated over the 
whole country. Various people, on this occasion, call to mind 
the danger which they and their Mends, as it appears from this 
example, stand exposed to in travelling; especially such as may 
have occasion to travel the same road. On this occasion they 
naturally feel a certain degree of pain : slighter or heavier, ac- 
cording to the degree of ill-treatment they may understand yon 
to have received ; the frequency of the occasion each person may 
have to travel in that same road, or its neighbourhood; the 
vicinity of each person to the spot; his personal courage; the 
quantity of money he may have occasion to carry about with 
him; and a variety of other circumstances. This constitutes 
the first part of the secondary mischief, resulting from the act 
of robbery; viz. the alarm. But people of one description or 
other, not only are disposed to conceive themselves to incur 
a chance of being robbed, in consequence of the robbery com- 
mitted upon you, but. (as will be shown presently) they do really 
incur such a chance. And it is this chance which constitutes 
the remaining part of the secondary mischief of the act of 
robbery; viz. the danger. 

* Viz. a pcdn of privation. See ch. v. [Pleasures and Pains], xvii. 

' Viz. a pom of cypprehendon, grounaed on the prospect of organical 
pain, or whatever other mi8chie& might have ensued from the ill treat- 
ment, lb. zxx. 



XII.] Of {he Consequences of a Mischievous Act, 155 

VII. Let us see what this chance amounts to ; and whence The dani^er, 
it comes. How is it, for instance, that one robbery can contri- arises— a 
bute to produce another? In the first place, it is certain that affords no 
it cannot create any direct motive. A motive must be the tive to a 
prospect of some pleasure, or other advantage, to be enjoyed 

in future : but the robbery in question is past : nor would it 
furnish any such prospect were it to come : for it is not one 
robbery that will furnish pleasure to him who may be about to 
commit another robbery. The consideration that is to ope- 
rate upon a man, as a motive or inducement to commit a 
robbery, must be the idea of the pleasure he expects to derive 
from the fruits of that very robbery : but this pleasui*e exists 
independently of any other robbery. 

VIII. The means, then, by which one robbery tends, as it But it su^- 

ffests fe&8i~ 

should seem, to produce another robbery, are two. i . By sug- biiity, and 
gesting to a person exposed to the temptation, the idea of com- force of re. 
mitting such another robbery (accompanied, perhaps, with the motives; 
belief of its facility). In this case the influence it exerts applies 
itself^ in the first place, to the understanding. 2. By weakening 
the force of the tutelary motives which tend to restrain him 
from such an action, and thereby adding to the strength of the 
temptation ^. In this case the influence applies itself to the will. 
These forces are, i. The motive of benevolence, which acts as a 
branch of the physical sanction ^ 2. The motive of self-pre- 
servation, as against the punishment that may stand provided 
by the political sanction. 3. The fear of shame ; a motive be- 
longing to the moral sanction. 4. The fear of the divine dis- 
pleasure; a motive belonging to the religious sanction. On 
the first and last of these forces it has, perhaps, no influence 
worth insisting on : but it has on the other two. 

IX. The way in which a past robbery may weaken the force viz. 
with which the political sanction tends to prevent a future sidng trom 

* See ch. xi. [Dispositions] xl. 

' To wit, in virtue of the pain it may give a man to be a witness to, or 
otherwise conscious of, the sufferings of a fellow-creature : especially when 
he is himself the cause of them : in a vford, the pain of sympathy. See 
ch. V. [Pleasures and Pains], zxvi. 



^5^ Of ilie Consequences of a Mischievous Act, [chap* 

the political robbery, may be thus conceived. The way in which this sanc- 
tion tends to prevent a robbery, is by denouncing some par- 
ticular kind of punishment against any who shall be guilty of it: 
the real value of which punishment will of course be diminished 
by the reaZ uncertainty : as also, if there be any difference, the 
wp^r&rd value by the apparent uncertainty. Now this uncer- 
tainty is proportionably increased by every instance in which a 
man is known to commit the offence, without undergoing the 
punishment. This, of course, will be the case with every offence 
for a certain time ; in short, until the punishment allotted to it 
takes place. If punishment takes place at last, this branch of 
the mischief of the offence is then at last, but not till then, put 
a stop to. 

2- Those is. X. The way in which a past robbery may weaken the force 

the morfti. with which the moral sanction tends to prevent a future robbery, 
may be thus conceived. The way in which the moral sanction 
tends to prevent a robbery, is by holding forth the indignation 
of mankind as ready to fall upon him who shall be guilty of it. 
Now this indignation will be the more formidable, according to 
the number of those who join in it: it will be the less so, the 
fewer they are who join in it. But there cannot be a stronger 
way of showing that a man does not join in whatever indignation 
may be entertained against a practice, than the engaging in it 
himself. It shows not only that he himself feels no indignation 
against it, but that it seems to him there is no sufficient reason 
for apprehending what indignatiqn may be felt against it by 
others. Accordingly, where robberies are frequent, and un- 
punished, robberies are committed without shame. It was thus 
amongst the Grecians formerly *. It is thus among the Arabs 
still. 

I* is ^u*^ XI« III whichever way then a past offence tends to pave the 

the influ- ^ay for the commission of a future offence, whether by suggest- 
enceofez* ^ •' ^ ^ ^ ' j on 

ample. ing the idea of committing it, or by adding to the strength of 

* See Horn. Odyss. L. xix. 1. 395 ; ib. L. iii. 1, 71. Plato de Eep. L. i. 
p. 576, edit. Ficin. Thucyd. L. i. — and see B. I. tit. [Offences against 
external security]. 



XII.] Of the Consequences of a Mischievous Act. 157 

the temptation, in both cases it may be said to operate by the 
force or influence of example, 

XII. The two branches of the secondary mischief of an act, The alann 

•^ andtnedan- 

the alarm and the danger, must not be confounded : though ger. though 

... connected, 

intimately connected, they are perfectly distinct: either may are distin- 

. guishable. 

subsist without the other. The neighbourhood may be alarmed 
with the report of a robbery, when, in fact, no robbery either 
has been committed or is in a way to be committed : a neigh« 
bourhood may be on the point of being disturbed by robberies, 
without knowing any thing of the matter. Accordingly, we shall 
430on perceive, that some acts produce alarm without danger : 
others, danger without alarm. 

XIII. As well the danger as the alarm may again be divided. Both may 
each of them, into two branches : the first, consisting of so much to the same 
of the alarm or danger as may be apt to result from the future others.' 
behaviour of the same agent: the second, consisting of so much 

as may be apt to result from the behaviour of other persons : 
such others, to wit, as may come to engage in acts of the same 
3ort and tendency ^. 

XIV. The distinction between the primary and the secondary The primary 
consequences of an act must be carefully attended to. It is so quenoes of 
just, that the latter may often be of a directly opposite nature to be mischiev- 

_ 11* i* OUB* and the 

the former. In some cases, where the primary consequences ot secondanr 
the act are attended with a mischief, the secondary consequences 
may be beneficial, and that to such a degree, as even greatly to 
outweigh the mischief of the primary. This is the case, for 
instance, with all acts of punishment, when properly applied. 
Of these, the primary mischief being never intended to fall 
but upon such persons as may happen to have committed some 
act which it is expedient to prevent, the secondary mischief, 
that is, the alarm and the danger, extends no farther than to 
^uch persons as are under temptation to commit it : in which 

* To the former of these branches is opposed so much of the force of any 
punishment, as is said to operate in the way of reformation : to the latter, 
so much as is said to operate in the way of example. See ch. ziii. [Cases 
unmeet], par. ii. note. 



158 Of the Consequences of a Mischievous Act. [chap. 

case, in as iax as it tends to restrain them from committing such 

acts, it is of a beneficial nature. 
Anahrgigof XV. Thus much with regard to acts that produce positive 
shapes in pain, and that immediately. This case, by reason of its sim* 

which thd 

mischief of plicity, seemed the fittest to take the lead. But acts may pro- 
show itself, duce mischief in various other ways; which, together with 
those already specified, may all be comprized by the following 
abridged analysis. 

Mischief may admit of a division in any one of three points 
of view. I. According to its own viature, 2. According to 
its cause, 3. According to the person, or other party, who is 
the object of it *. "With regard to its nature, it may be either 
simple or complex ^ : when simple, it may either be positive or 
negative: positive, consisting of actual pain: negative, con> 
sisting of the loss of pleasure. Whether simple or complex, and 
whether positive or negative, it may be either certain or contin- 
gent. When it is negative, it consists of the loss of some benefit 
or advantage : this benefit may be material in both or either of 
two ways : i. By affording actual pleasure ; or, 2. By averting 
pain or dcungeVj which is the chance of pain : that is, by affording 
secwrity. In as far, then, as the benefit which a mischief tends 
to avert, is productive of security, the tendency of such mischief 
is to produce inseev/rity. 2. With regard to its cause, mischief 
may be produced either by one single action, or not without the 
concurrence of other actions : if not without the concurrence of 
other actions, these others may be the actions either of the samie 
person, or of other persons : in either case, they may be either 
acts of the same kind as that in question, or of other kinds. 
3. Lastly, with regard to the party who is the object of the 
mischief, or, in other words, who is in a way to be affected by 
it, such party may be either an assignable ^ individual, or assem- 

^ There may be other points of view, according to which mischief might 
be divided, besides these : but this does not prevent the division here given 
from being an exhaustive one. A line may be divided in any one of an 
infinity of ways, and yet without leaving in any one of those cases any 
remainder. See ch. xvi. [Division] i. note. 

^ Ch. V. [Pleasures and Pains] i, 

' See ch. xvi. [Division] iv. note. 



XII.] Of the Conseqmnces of a Mischievous Act. 159 

blage of individuals, or else a multitude of wnassigncbble indi- 
viduals. When the object is an assignable individual, this 
individual may either be the person himsdf who is the author 
of the mischief, or some other person. When the individuals, 
who are the objects of it, are an unassignable multitude, this 
multitude may be either the whole political community or state, 
or some subordincUe division of it. Now when the object of the . 
mischief is the author himself, it may be styled self-rega^'ding : | 
when any other party is the object, extra-rega/rding : when such 
other party is an individual, it may be styled j>rivate : when a 
subordinate branch of the community, semi-public: when the 
whole community, public. Here, for the present, we must stop. 
To pursue the subject through its inferior distinctions, will be 
the business of the chapter which exhibits the division of 
offences \ 

The cases which have beien already illustrated, are those in -7 applied to 

the preced- 

which the primary mischief is not necessarily otherwise than a ing^. 
simple one, and that positive : present, and therefore certain : 
producible by a single action, without any necessity of the con- 
currence of any other action, either on the part of the same 
agent, or of others ; and having for its object an assignable in- 
dividual, or, by accident, an assemblage of assignable individuals : 
extra-regarding therefore, and private. This primary mischief 
is accompanied by a secondary : the first branch of which is 
sometimes contingent and sometimes certain, the other never 
otherwise than contingent : both extra-regarding and semi- 
public:^ in other respects, pretty much upon a par with the 
primary mischief : except that the first branch, viz. the alarm, 
though inferior in magnitude to the primary, is, in point of 
extent, and therefore, upon the whole, in point of magnitude, 
much superior. 

XVI. Two instances more will be sufficient to illustrate the - to exam- 
most material of the modifications above exhibited. cases where 
A1.-1 .. ... ^1. i*^*j the mischief 
man dnnks a certam quantity of liquor, and mtoxicates is less con- 

himself. The intoxication in this particular instance does him ^^^^ j 

^ Ch. xvi. 



i6o Of tie GmxjatmetM of a HueUewams Aei, [chap. 



Aaartor BO soii of lisnB: or, wbjt cfMiieB to tlieniiie tkiiigpDaietlni ii 
^-^"^"^ pcRcpdUe. BiithkproUl)le,miidiiii]ccdiiexttocertjmi,t]iat 



a prtn number of acts of the eame kind woold do him a tctj 
conmieraUe degree of harm : more or le» acc oidii^ to his eoo- 
stitntioiiaiid other cxrcnmstanecs : fcr this is no more than what 
cxperienee manifests ereiy da j. It is also certain, that one act 
of this sort, hj one means or other, tends dmaderablj to increase 
the deposition a man maj be in to practise other acts of the 
same sort : for this abo is Terified bj experience^ Thisy there- 
fore, is one instance where the mischief producible bj the act is 
eontingent : in other wmrds, in which the tendency of the act is 
no otherwise mischierons than in Tirtne of its ptodneing a dkamee 
of mwehiet This chance depends ap<m the concnrrence o{ other 
acts of the same kind ; and those snch as most be practked bj 
the aame parson. The object of the mkehief is that Tcrj persim 
himself who is the anthor of it, and he only, nnkss bj accident. 
The misdiief is theref4»e private and self-regarding. 

As to its secondary misdiief^ alarm, it prodoces none : it pro- 
daces indeed a certain quantity of danger by the inflacnce of 
example : but it is not often that this danger will amount to a 
qoantity worth regarding. 
Example n. XVTL Again. A man imiits paying his share to a public 
men* of* tax. This we see is an act of the negatiye kind \ Is this then 



to be placed npon the list of miaehieroas acts ? Yes;^ 
Upon iriiat grounds ] Upon the following. To defend the com- 
mnnfty against its external as well as its internal adTersaries, 
are tasks, not to mention others of a less ind^pensable nature, 
which cannot be fulfilled but at a considerable expense. But 
whence is the nuMiey for defiraying this expense to come 1 It 
ean be obtained in no other manner than by contributions to be 
collected from iudiyiduals ; in a word, by taxes.i. The produce 
then of these taxes is to be looked upon as a kind of hemefit 
which it is necessary the governing part of the community should 
receiye for the use of the whole. This produce, before it can be 
applied to its destination, requires that there should be certain 

^ See ch. tiL QArtionH] viii. 



XII.] Of the Consequences of a Mischievous Act. 161 

persons commisBioned to receive and to apply it. Now if these 
persons, had they received it, would have applied it to its proper 
destination, it would have been a benefit : the not putting them 
in a way to receive it, is then a mischief. But it is possible, 
that if received, it might not have been applied to its proper 
destination ; or that the services, in consideration of which it 
was bestowed, might not have been performed. It is possible^ 
that the under-officer, who collected the produce of the tax, 
might not have paid it over to his principal : it is possible that 
the principal might not have forwarded it on according to its 
farther destination ; to the judge, for instance^ who is to protect 
the community against its clandestine enemies from within, or 
the soldier, who is to protect it against its open enemies from 
without: it is possible that the judge, or the soldier, had they 
received it, would not however have been induced by it to fulfil 
their respective duties : it is possible, that the judge would not 
have sat for the punishment of criminals, and the decision of 
controversies : it is possible that the soldier vould not have 
drawn his sword in the defence of the con^munity. These, 
together with an infinity of other intermediate acts, which for 
the sake of brevity I pass over, form a connected chain of duties, 
the discharge of which is necessary to the preservation of the 
community. They must every one of them be discharged, ere 
the benefit to which they are contributory can be produced. If 
they are all discharged, in that case the benefit subsists, and any 
act, by tending to intercept that benefit, may produce a mis-' 
chief. But if any of them are not, the benefit fails : it fails of 
itself : it would not have subsisted, although the act in question 
(the act of non-payment) had not been committed. The benefit 
is therefore contingent ; and, accordingly, upon a certain sup- 
position, the act which consists in the averting of it is not a 
mischievous one. But this supposition, in any tolerably-ordered 
government, will rarely indeed be verified. In the very worst- 
ordered government that exists, the greatest part of the duties 
that are levied are paid over according to their destination : 
and, with regard to any particular sum, that is attempted to bo 



i67, Of the Conseqtienees of a Misckievous Act, [chap. 

levied upon any particular person upon any particular occasion, 
it is therefore manifest, that, unless it be certain that it will not 
be so disposed of, the act of withholding it is a mischievous one. 
The act of payment, when referable to any particular sum, 
especially if it be a small one, might also have failed of proving 
beneficial on another ground : and, consequently, the act of non- 
pajnnent, of proving mischievous. It is possible that the same 
services, precisely, might have been rendered without the money 
as with it. I^ then, speaking of any small limited sum, such as 
the greatest which any one person is called upon to pay at a 
time, a man were to say, that the non-payment of it would be 
attended with mischievous consequences ; this would be far from 
certain : but what comes to the same thing as if it were, it is per- 
fectly certain when applied to the whole. It is certain, that if 
all of a sadden the payment of all taxes was to cease, there would 
no longer be any thing ^ectual done, either for the maintenance 
of justice^ or for the defence of the community against its foreign 
adversaries : that therefore the weak would presently be oppressed 
and injured in all macilier of ways, by the strong at home, and 
bc*h together overwhelmed by oppressors from abroad. Upon 
the whole, therefore, it is manifest, that in this case, though the 
mischief is remote and contingent, though in its first appearance 
it consists of nothing more than the interception of a hem/U, 
and though the individuals, in whose favour that benefit would 
have been reduced into the explicit form of pleasure or security, 
are altogether unassignable, yet the mischievous tendency of the 
act is not on all these accounts the less indisputable. The mis- 
chief, in point of intensity and duration, is indeed unknown : it 
is uncertain : it is remote^ But in point of eg^tent it is immense ; 
and in point of /ecundityf pregnant to a degree that baffles cal- 
culation. 
No alarm, XVIIL It may now be time to observe, that it is only in the 
assignable case where the mischief is extra-regarding, and has an assign- 
object, able person or persons for its object, that so much of the 
secondary branch of it as consists in alarm can have place. 
^When the individuals it affects are uncertain,, and altogether out 



xii.] Of the Consequmees of a MiacMevom Act 163 

of sight, no alftrm can be produced : as there is nobody whose 
sufferings you can see, there is nobody whose sufferings you can 
be alarmed at. No alarm, for instance, is produced by non- 
payment to a tax. Jf at any distant and uncertain period of 
time such offence should chance to be productive of any kind of 
alarm, it would appear to proceed, as indeed immediately it 
would proceed, from a very different cause. It might be imme^ 
diately referable, for example, to the act of a legislator, who 
should deem it necessary to lay on a new tax, in order to make 
up for the deficiency occasioned in the produce of the old one. 
Or it might be referable to the act of an enenoy, who, under 
favour of a deficiency thus created in the fund allotted for defence, 
might invade the country, and exact from it much heavier con- 
tributions than those which had been thus withholden from 
the sovereign \ 

As to any alarm which such an offence might raise among the 
few who might chance to regard the matter with the eyes of 
statesmen, it is of too slight and uncertain a nature to be worth 
taking into the account. 



§ 2. How IntentionalUy, dhc, may influence the mischief 

of an act, 

XIX. We have seen the nature of the secondary mischief, Secondwy 

, , mischief m- 

which is apt to be reflected, as it were, from the primary, in the fluenoed by 

^ ... . .. the state of 

cases where the individuals who are the objects of the mischief the agent's 

mind. 

* The investigation might, by a process rendered obvious by analogy, be 
extended to the consequences of an act of a beneficial nature. In both 
instances a tliird order of consequences may be reckoned to have taken 
place, when the influence of the act, through the medium of the passive 
faculty of the patient, has come to affect his active faculty. In this way, 
I. Evil may flow out of mZ; — instance; the exertions of industry put a 
stop to by the extinction of inducement, resulting from a continued chaia 
of acts of robbery or extortion. 3. Good out of evil .-—instance ; habits of 
depredation put a stop to by a steady course of punishment. 3. EvU ovt 
of good : — instance ; habits of industry put a stop to by an excessive course 
of gratuitous bounty. 4. Good out of good : — instance ; a constant and 
increasing course of industry, excited and kept up by the rewards afforded 
by a regular and in<»ea8ing market for the fruits of it. 

M 2 



ness. 



164 Of the Consequences of a Mischievous Act. [chap. 

are assignable. It is now time to examine into the circumstances 
upon which the production of such secondary mischief depends. 
These circumstances are no others than the four articles which 
have formed the subjects of the four last preceding chapters : 
viz. I. The intentionality. 2. The consciousness. 3. The motive. 
4. The disposition. It is to be observed all along, that it is only 
the danger that is immediately governed by the real state of the 
mind in respect to those articles : it is by the apparent state of 
it that the alarm is governed. It is governed by the real only 
in as far as the apparent happens, as in most cases it may be 
expected to do, to quadrate with the real. The different in- 
fluences of the articles of intentionality and consciousness may 
be represented in the several cases following. 
Casei. XX. Case i. Where the act is so completely unintentional, 
as to be altogether involunta/ry. In this case it is attended with 
no secondary mischief at all. 

A bricklayer is at work upon a house: a passenger is walking 
in the street below. A fellow-workman comes and gives the 
bricklayer a violent push, in consequence of which he falls upon 
the passenger, and hurts him. It is plain there is nothing in 
this event that can give other people, who may happen to be in 
the street, the least reason to apprehend any thing in future on 
the part of the man who fell, whatever there may be with regard 
to the man who pushed him. 
Case 2. XXI. Case 2. Where the act, though not unintentional, is un- 

tionaiity advised, insomuch that the mischievous part of the consequences 
lessness. is tmintentional, but the unadvisedness is attended with heedless- 
ness. In this case the act is attended with some small degree of 
secondary mischief, in proportion to the degree of heedlessness. 

A groom being on horseback, and riding through a frequented 
street, turns a corner at a full pace, and rides over a passenger, 
who happens to be going by. It is plain, by this behaviour of 
the groom, some degree of alarm may be produced, less or 
greater, according to the degree of heedlessness betrayed by 
him ; according to the quickness of his pace, the fulness of the 
street, and so forth. He has done mischief, it may be said, by 



\i\ 



f 



XII.] Of the Consequences of a Mischievous AcL 165 

his carelessness, already: who knows but that on other occasions 
the like cause may produce' the like effect % 

XXII. Case 3. Where the act is misadvised with respect to a Case 3. 

^» imii I Ttiwftft.1 

circumstance^ which, had it existed, would /wZZy have excluded or of a complete 
(what comes to the same thing) outweighed the primary mis- without 
chief : and there is no rashness in the case. In this case the act 
is attended with no secondary mischief at all. 
It is needless to multiply examples any farther. 

XXIII. Case 4. Where the act is misadvised with respect to a „.Oa«e 4. 

Missupposal 

circumstance which would have excluded or counterbalanced the of ajMufeai 
primary mischief in part, but not entirely: and still there is no without 
rashness. In this case the act is attended with some degree of 
secondary mischief, in proportion to that part of the primary 
which remains unexcluded or uncounterbalanced. 

XXIV. Case 5. Where the act is misadvised with respect to Case 6. 

a circumstance, which, had it existed, would have excluded or wiS^rasS*^ 
counterbalanced the primary mischief entirely, or in part : and 
there is a degree of rashness in the supposal. In this case, the 
act is also attended with a farther degree of secondary mischief, 
in proportion to the degree of rashness. 

XXV. Case 6. Where the consequences are completely inten- Casee. 
tional, and there is no missupposal in the case. In this case the qu^oes 
secondary mischief is at the highest. SatentiOTS. 

XXVI. Thus much with regard to intentionality and con-^nimis- 

sciousness. We now come to consider in what manner the ^pp**^- 

The nature 

secondary mischief is affected by the natxire of the motive, of a motive 

...... 1 takes not 

Where an act is pernicious m its primary consequences, the away the 
1 . , . -. ^ 1 ,.i i 1 1 1 T /. ii mischief of 

secondary mischief is not obliterated by the goodness of the mo- the second- 

•/ t/ ary conse* 

tive ; though the motive be of the best kind. For, notwith- quenoes. . 
standing the goodness of the motive, an act of which the primary 
consequences are pernicious, is produced by it in the instance in 
question, by the supposition. It may, therefore, in other in- 
stances : although this is not so likely to happen from a good 
motive as from a bad one \ 

^ An act of homicide, for instance, is not rendered innocent, much less 
beneficial, merely by its proceeding from a principle, of religion, of honour 



1 66 Of the Can^quences of a Muciievous Act. [chap. 

Nor the XXVll. An act, which, though pernicious in its primary 

ness. consequences, is rendered in other respects beneficial upon the 

whole, by virtue of its secondary consequences, is not changed 
back again, and rendersd pemidoos upon the whole by the 
badness of the motive : although the motive be of the worst 
'kind^ 

But it may XXVlll. But when not only the primary consequences of ^an 
the mis- act are pernicious, but, in other respects, the secondary likewise, 
XMS8, where! the secondary mischief may be aggraveUed by the nature of the 
mischieyousl motive: 80 much of that mischief, to wit, as respects the future 

(behaviour of the same person. 
But not the XXIX. It is not from the worst kind of motive, however, 

most in the 

(that is, of love of reputation) or even of benevolence. When Bavaillac 
assaBsinated Henry IV. it was from a principle of religion. But this did 
not so much as abate from the mischief of the act. It even rendered the 
act still more mischievous, for a reason that we shall see presently, than if 
it had originated from a principle of revenge. When the conspirators 
against the late king of Portugal attempted to assassinate him, it is said 
to have been from a principle of honour. But this, whether it abated or 
BO, will certainly not be thought to have outweighed, the mischief of the 
act. Had a son of Kavaillac's, as in the case before supposed ^, merely on 
the score of filial affection, and not in consequence of any participation in 
his crime, put him to death in order to rescue him frt)m itie severer hands 
of justice, the motive, although it should not be thought to afford any 
proof of a mischievous disposition, and should, even in case of punishment, 
have made such rescuer an object of pity, would hardly have made the act 
of rescue a beneficial one. 

^ The prosecution of offences, for instance, proceeds most commonly 
from one or other, or both together, of two motives, the one of which is of 
the self-regarding, the other of the dissocial kind : viz. pecuniary interest, 
and ill-will : from pecuniary interest, for instance, whenever the obtaining 
pecuniary amends for damage suffered is one end of the prosecution. It is 
common enough indeed to hear men speak of prosecutions undertaken from 
pubUc spirit ; which is a branch, as we have seen ^ of the principle of bene- 
volence. Far be it from me to deny but that such a principle may very 
frequently be an ingredient in the sum of motives, by which men are 
engaged in a proceeding of this nature. But whenever such a proceeding 
is engaged in from the sole influence of public spirit, uncombined with the 
least tincture of self-interest, or ill-will, it must be acknowledged to be a 
proceeding of the heroic kind. Now acts of heroism are, in the very essence 
of them, but rare : for if they were common, they would not be acts of 
heroism. But prosecutions for crimes are very frequent, and yet, unless 
in very particular circumstances indeed, they are never otherwise than 
beneficial. 

1 Ch. xi. [Disposttlon] zv. a See cfa. x. [Motivee] xxt. 



i 



XII.] Of the Qmsequencea of a Misckievous Act. 167 

that the secondary mischief of an act receives its greatest aggra- eaieof the 

^, " o o«y worst mo- 

vation. tivet. 

XXX. The aggravation which the secondary mischief of an it does the 

, _ more^ the 

act, m as far as it respects the future hehaviour of the same more con- 
person, receives from the nature of a motive in an individual tendency of 
case, is as the tendency of the motive to produce, on the part of to produce 
the same person, acts of the like bad tendency vrith that of the 
act in question. 

XXXI. The tendency of a motive to produce acts of the like —which is 
kind, on the part of any given person, is as the strength and strewthand 
constancy of its influence on that person, as applied to the pro* 
duction of such effects. 

XXXII. The tendency of a species of motive to give birth to Ctenerai effi- 
acts of any kind, among persons in general, is as the strerigth, species of 

o * c ^ motive, how 

constancy, and eootensiveness ^ of its influence, as applied to the measured, 
production of such effects. 

XXXIII. Now the motives, whereof the influence is at once a misohiev- 

• 1 ous act is 

most powerful, most constant, and most extensive, are the mo- more so, 

when issuinfir 

tives of physical desire, the love of wealth, the love of ease, the from a self- 
love of life, and the fear of pain : all of them self-regarding than when 
motives. The motive of displeasure, whatever it may be in point ciai motive." 
of strength and extensiveness, is not near so constant in its in- 
fluence (the case of mere antipathy excepted) as any of the other 
three. A pernicious act, therefore, when committed through 
vengeance, or otherwise through displeasure, is not near so mis- 
chievous as the same pernicious act, when committed by force of 
any one of those other motives ^. 

* Ch. iv. [Value]. 

^ It is for this reason that a threat, or other personal outrage, when com- 
mitted on a stranger, in pursuance of a scheme of robbery, is productive of 
more mischief in society, and accordingly is, perhaps, every where more 
severely punished, than an outrage of the same kind offered to an acquaint- 
ance, in prosecution of a scheme of vengeance. No man is always in a • 
rage. But, at all times, every man, more or less, loves money. Accord- 
ingly, although a man by his quarrelsomeness should for once have been 
engaged in a bad ftotion, he may nevertheless remain a long while, or even 
his whole life-time, without engaging in another bad action of the same 
kind : for he may very weU remain his whole life-time without engaging in 
so violent a quarrel : nor at any rate will he quarrel with more thtui one. 



l68 Of the Consequences of a Mischievous Act. [chap. 

— 80 even XXXIV. As to the motive of religion, "wbatevei* it may 
ing from tiio sometimes prove to be in point of strength and constancy, it is 
reUg^ ^ot in point of extent so universal, especially in its application 
to acts of a mischievous nature^ as any of the three preceding 
motives. It may, however, be as universal in a particular state, 
or in a particular district of a particular state. It is liable 
indeed to be very irregular in its operations. It is apt, however, 
to be frequently as powerful as the motive of vengeance, or 
indeed any other motive whatsoever. It will sometimes even 
be more powerful than any 'other motive. It is at any rate 
much more constant ^. A pernicious act, therefore, when com- 
mitted through the motive of religion, is more mischievous than 
when committed through the motive of ill-will. 
How the XXXV. Lastly, The secondary mischief, to wit, so much of it 

m2*^efTs ^ ^ih respect to the future behaviour of the same person, is 
^^pc«d- aggravated or lessened by the apparent depravity or beneficence 
tion. Qf ]jig disposition : and that in the proportion of such apparent 

depravity or beneficence. 

Connexion XXXVI. The consequences we have hitherto been speaking 

the succeed- of, are the natv/ral consequences, of which the act, and the other 

ing chapter, abides we have been considering, are the causes : consequences 

that result from the behaviour of the individual, who is the 

offending agent, without the interference of political authority. 

We now come to speak of ptmishment : which, in the sense in 

or a few people at a time. But if a man, by his love of money, has once 
been engaged in a bad action, such as a scheme of robbery, he may at any 
time, by the influence of the same motive, be engaged in acts of Uie same 
degree of enormity. For take men throughout, if a man loves money to a 
certain degree to-day, it is probable that he will love it, at least in equal 
degree, to-morrow. And if a man is disposed to acquire it in that way, he 
will find inducement to rob, wheresoever and whensoever there are people 
to be robbed. 

^ If a man happen to take it into his head to assassinate with his own 

hands, or with the sword of justice, those whom he calls heretics, that is, 

* people who think, or perhaps only speak, difierently upon a subject which 

neither party understands, he will be as much inclined to do this at on 

I time as at another. Fanaticism never sleeps : it is never glutted : it is 

V never stopped by philanthropy ; for it makes a merit of trampling on phi- 

i lanthropy : it is never stopped by conscience ; for it has pressed conscience 

I into its service. Avarice, lust, and vengeance, have piety, benevolence, 

I honour ; £Euiaticism has nothing to oppose it. 



XII.] Of the Consequences of a Misckievotis Act. 169 

which it is here considered, is an artificial consequence, annexed 
by political authority to an offensive act, in one instance; in 
the view of putting a stop to the production of events similar 
to the obnoxious part of its natural consequences, in other 
instances. 



CHAPTER Xin. 



CASES UNMEET FOB PUNISHMENT. 



The Old of 
law is, to 
augment 
happiness. 



But punish' 
ment is an 
evil.' 



What concerns 
the end, and 
several other 
topics relatire 
to punishment, 
disinissed to 
another work. 



Concise view of 
the ends of 
punishment. 



§ I . General view of cases immeet/or punishment. 

L The general object which all laws have, or ought to haye, 
in common, is to augment the total happiness of the community; 
and therefore, in the first place, to exclude, as &r as may be, 
every thing that tends to subtract from that happiness : in other 
words, to exclude mischief. 

II. But all punishment is mischief : all punishment in itself 
is evil. Upon the principle of utility, if it ought at all to be 
admitted, it ought only to be admitted in as far as it promises to 
exclude some greater evil \ 

^ What follows, relative to the subject of punishment, ought regularly to 
be preceded by a distinct chapter on the ends of punishment. But having 
little to say on that particular branch of the subject, which has not been 
said before, it seemed better, in a work, which will at any rate be but too 
voluminous, to omit this title, reserving it for another, hereafter to be pub- 
lished, intituled Hie Theory/ of Pimishment ^. To the same work I must 
refer the analysis of the iseveral possible modes of punishment, a particular 
and minute examination of the nature of each, and of its advantages and 
disadvantages, and various other disquisitions, which did not seem absolutely 
necessary to be inserted here. A very few words, however, concerning the 
ends of punishment, can scarcely be dispensed with. 

The immediate principal^end of pimis^nent isjbo control action. This 
action is either th at of the offends, or of others : that of the offender it 
controls by its influence, either on his will, in which case it is said to 
operate in the way of reformation; or on his physical power, in which case 



^ This is the work which, from the Author's papers, has since been published by Mr. 
Dumont In French, in company with TAe Theory of Retoard added to it, for the purpose of 
mutual illustration. It is in contemplation to publish them both in English, from the 
Author's manuscripts, with the benefit of any amendments that have been made by Mr. 
Dumont. INote to EdUion cif 1833.] 



Cases Unmeet for Punishment. 171 

III. It is plain, therefore, that in the following cases punish- ^^J^^^re ^ 
ment ought not to be inflicted. beadmitted; 

h I. Where it is groundless: where there is no mischief for it 1. Where 

/ 1 groundless. 

'to prevent ; the act not being mischieyous upon the whole. 

2. Where it must be inefficacious : where it cannot act so as 2. inefflca- 

cious. 

to prevent the mischief. 

3. Where it is un/profitahle^ or too exipenisive : where the 8. Unprofit- 
mischief it would produce would be greater than what it pre- 
vented. 

4. Where it is needless : where the mischief may be prevented, 4. Or need- 
[ or cease of itself, without it : that is, at a cheaper rate.. 

§ 2. Cases in vykich ^pimishment is groundless. 

These are, 
rV. I. Where there has never been any mischief: where no 1. Where 
mischief has been produced to any body by the act in question, never been 
Of this number are those in which the act was such as might, on cmef : as in 

, ... J. ri V X It. the case of 

some occasions, be mischievous or disagreeable, but the person consent, 
whose interest it concerns gave his consent to the performance of 
it \ This consent, provided it be free, and fairly obtained ^, is 
the best proof that can be produced, that, to the person who 

it is said to operate by disMement : t hat of others i t can influence no other- 
wise than by its influence over their wills ; in which case it is said to ope- 
rate in the way of examvle._ A kind of collateral end, which it has a 
natural tendency to answer, is that of affording a pleasure or satisfaction 
to the party injured, where there is one, and, in general, to parties whose 
ill-will, whether on a self-regarding account, or on the account of sympathy 
or antipathy, has been excited by the offence. This purpose, as fiw as it 
can be answered gratis, is a beneficial one. But no pmushment ought to 
be allotted merely to this purpose, because (setting aedde it» effects in the 
way of control) no such pleasure is ever produced by punishment as can 
be equivalent to the pain. The punishment, however, which is allotted to 
the other purpose, ought, as &r as it can be done without expense, to be 
accommodated to this. Satisfaction thus administered to a party injured, i 
in the shape of a dissocial pleasure \ may be styled a vindictive satis&ction 
or compensation : as a compensation, administered in the shape of a self- 
regarding profit, or stock of pleasure, may be styled a lucrative one. See / 
B. I. tit. vi. [Compensation]. Example is the most important end of all, • 
in proportion as the number of the persons under temptation to offend is to 1 
one. 
* See B. I. tit. [Justifications]. 

1 See cb. z. [Motives]. 



iy2 Cases Unmeet /or PunisAmetU. [chap. 

gives it, no mifichief^ at least no immediate mischief, npon the 
whole, is done. For no man can be so good a jndge as the man 
himself, what it is gives him pleasure or displeasure, 
i Where V. 2. Where the mischief was ouiweigJied: although a mis- 

in precaa- to the production of a benefit which was of ffl*eater value ^ than 
calamity, the mischief. This may be the case with any thing that is done 

and the 

exerdse of in the way of precaution against instant calamity, as also with 

•^"^ any thing that is done in the exercise of the several sorts of 

powers necessary to be established in every conunnnity. to wit, 

domestic, judicial, military, and supreme ^. 

8.— orwiU, YL 3. Where there is a certainty of an adequate compensa- 

taini^ be tion : and that in all cases where the offence can be committed. 

opmpeiuia- This supposes two things : i. That the offence is such as admits 

"* of an adequate compensation : 2. That such a compensation is 

sure to be forthcoming. Of these suppositions, the latter will be 

found to be a merely ideal one : a supposition that' cannot, in 

the universality here given to it, be verified by fact. It cannot, 

therefore, in practice, be numbered amongst the grounds of 

absolute impunity. It may, however, be admitted as a ground 

ibr an abatement of that punishment, which other considerations, 

standing by themselves, would seem to dictate ^ 

§ 3. Cases in which punishment must he inefficacious. 

These are, 
th^^^ VII. I. Where the penal provision is not established until 

* See 8upra> ch.iv.r Value], 
' See Book I. tit. [«fu8tifications]. 
Hence the ' This, for example, seems to have been one groimd, at least, of the 

f^ovxihomnto ^youT shown by perhaps all systems of laws, to such offenders as stand 
responsible upon a footing of responsibility : shown, not directly indeed to the persons 
asshnpSemef? themselvcs ; but to such offences as none but responsible persons are likely 
cantue frauds, to have the opportunity of engaging in. In particular, this seems to be 
the reason why embezzlement, in certain cases, has not conmionly been 
punished upon the footing of theft : nor mercantile frauds upon that of 
common sharping ^ 

1 See tit. [Simple marc Defraudmeiit]. 



xm.] Cases Unmeet for Punishment. 173 

after the act is done. Such are the cases, i. Of an eoopost-facto provision 
law ; where the leffislator himself appoints not a punishment till late: as in, 
after the act is done. 2, Of a sentence beyond the law; where /octo law. 
the judge, of his own authority, appoints a punishment which the legal sen- 
legislator had not appointed. 

VIII. 2. Where the penal provision, though established, is 7io< 2. Or is 
conveyed to the notice of the person on whom it seems intended known : as 

, , 1 1 -I 1. in a law not 

that it should operate. Such is the case where the law has sufficiently 

1. 1 • 1 promul- 

omitted to employ any of the expedients which are jiecessary, to gated, 
make sure that every person whatsoever, who is within the reach 
of the law, be apprized of all the cases whatsoever, in which 
(being in the station of life he is in) he can be subjected to the 
penalties of the law ^. 

IX. 3. "Where the penal provision, though it were conveyed 3. Where the' 

f . 1 1 -I /v t • 'j-i i. X ^"^ cannot 

to a man s notice, could froduee no effect on mm, with respect to be deterred 
the preventing him from engaging in any act of the sort in ques- act : as in, 
tion. Such is the case, i. In extreme infancy; where a man Lajinfimcy.^ 
has not yet attained that state or disposition of mind in which 
the prospect of evils so distant as those which are held forth by 
the law, has the eflfect of influencing his conduct. 2. In insanity; [b] Insanity. | 
where the person, if he has attained to that disposition, has since 
been deprived of it through the iiifluence of some permanent 
though unseen cause. 3. In intoxication; where he has been [o]lntoxi- j - 
deprived of it by the transient influence of a visible cause : such 
as the use of wine, or opium, or other drugs, that act in this 
manner on the nervous system : which condition is indeed nei- 
ther more nor less than a temporary insanity produced by an 
assignable cause ^ 



* See B. II. Appendix, tit. iii. [Promulgation]. 

^ Notwithstanding what is here said, the cases of infancy and intoxication in infancy and 
(as we shall see hereafter) cannot be looked upon in practice as affording c"s°e*j:an harSy 
sufficient grounds for absolute impunity. But this exception in point of be proved to 
practice is no objection to the propriety of the rule in point of theory, fuief "° ^^ 
The ground of the exception is neither more nor less than the difficulty 
there is of ascertaining the matter of fact : viz. whether at the requisite 
point of time the party was actually in the state in question; that is, 
whether a given case comes really under the rule. Suppose the matter of 
fact capable of being perfectly ascertained, without danger ox mistake, the 



174 Cases Unmeet for PunishmeKt, [chap. 

[4. Or not X. 4. Where the penal proidsion (althoagh, being conveyed 

Idrndnai act to the party's notice, it might very well prevent his engaging in 
[asm, acts of the sort in question, provided he knew that it related to 

those acts) could not have this effect, with regard to the indi- 
vidual act he is about to engage in : to wit, because he knows 
not that it is of the number of those to which the penal pro- 
[ainmnten^ vision relates. This may happen^ i. In the case of uninteniuMP- 
faonality. ality; where he intends not to engage, and thereby knows not 
that he is about to engage, in the act in which eventually he is 
I rbiTJ ftbout to engaged 2. In the case of unconsciousness; where, 

J scioumess. although he may know that he is about to engage in the act 
itself yet, from not knowing all the material circuanstanees at- 
tending it, he knows not of the tendency it has to produce that 
mischief, in contemplation of which it has been made penal in 
I [c] Miflgttp- ™^ instances. 3. In the case of missupposal; where, although 
I posai. he may know of the tendency the act has to produce that 

degree of mischief, he supposes it, though mistakenly, to be 
attended with some circumstance, or set of circumstances, which, 
if it had been attended with, it would either not have been 
productive of that mischief or have been productive of such a 
greater degree of good, as has determined the legislator in such a 
case not to make it penal ^ 
6. Or is acted XI. 5. Where, though the penal clause might exercise a full 
] opposite su- and prevailing influence, w^re it to act alone, yet by the pre- 
' as by> ' dominant influence of some opposite cause upon the will, it must 
necessarily be ineffectual ; because the evil which he sets himself 
about to undergo, in the case of his not engaging in the act, is so 

impropriety of punishment would be as indubitable in these cases as in miy 

other ^. 
The reason for The reason that is commonly assigned for the establishing an exemption 
iiTtiTeselhree fr^m punishment in favour of infants, insane persons, and persons under 
cases is eom- intoxication, is either false in fact, or oonfusedly expressed. The phrase is, 
"wrong footing! that the will of these persons concurs not with the act ; that they have no 

vicious will ; or, that they have not the free use of their will. But suppose 

all this to be true ? What is it to the purpose ? Nothing : except in as 

far as it implies the reason given in the text. 
* See ch. viii. [IntentionsSity]. 
^ See ch. Ix. [Consciousness]. 

^ See B. I. tit. iv. [Exemptions], and tit. vii. [Extenuations]. 



xiii,] Cki9e8 Unmeet for PunisAment. 175 

great, that the evil d^iounced by the penal clause, in case of his 

engaging in it, cannot appear greater. This may happen, i. In ^^/****^( 

the case of physical danger; where the evil is such as appears 

likely to be brought about by the unassisted powers of nature, 

2. In the case of a threatened m>ischief: where it is such as [b] Threat-j 

appears likely to be brought about through the intentional and chief. 

conscious agency of vrum \ 

XII. 6. Where (though the penal clause may exert a full and 6. — or the 
prevailing influence over the will of the party) yet his physical Kans cannot 

^ , , , follow its de- 

fOfCvUiea (owing to the predominant influence of some physical termination: 
cause) are not in a condition to follow the determination of the 
will : insomuch that the act is absolutely wjooluritary. Such is Physical 1 
the case c^ physical compulsion or restraint, by whatever means or restraint. | 
brought about ; where the man's hand, for instance, is pushed 
against somo object which his will disposes him not to touch ; or ' 
tied down from touching some object which his will disposes him 
to touch. 

§ 4. Ca,ses where pumishanent is unprofitable. 

These are, 

XIII. I. Where, on the one hand, the nature of the offence, on i- "Vfhere, 

i , , in the «orf 

I the other hand, that of the punishment, are, in me ordinary state of case in 

9 , question, the 

f of things, such, that when compared together, the evil of the punishment 
- latter will turn out to be greater than that of the former. duce more 

XIV. Now the evil of the punishment divides itself into four offence 

would. 

branches, by which so many different sets of persons are affected. ^^ pi-odu- 
I. The evil of coercion or restramt: or the pain which it gives a Smlghment 
man not to be able to do the act, whatever it be, which by the ^^^^^ 
apprehension of the punishment he is deterred from doing. This \^^* W ^" 



Why the in- 
fluence of the 
moral and re- 



mentioned in 
tue same view. 



^ The influences of the moral and religious sanctions, or, in other words, 
of the motives of love of reputation and religion^ are other causes, the force 
of ivhich may, upon particulAr occasions, come to be greater than that of i^ns"k*^r 
any punishment which the legislator is ahle^ or at least which he will think 
proper t to apply. These, therefore, it will be proper for him to have his 
eye upon. But the force of these influences is variable and diflerent in 
different times and places : the force of the foregoing influences is constant 
< and the same, at all times and every where. These, therefore, it can never 
be proper to look upon as safe grounds for establishing absolute impunity : 
owing (as in the above-mentioned cases of infEincy and intoxication) to Uie 
impracticability of ascertaining the matter of &ct. 



176 



Cases Unmeet for Punishment, 



[chap. 



[c] Suffer 
ance. 



tive evils. 



Va] Appro. I is felt by those by whom the law is observed. 2. The evil of 
hension. ap prehensio n: or the pain which a man, who has exposed him- 
self to punishment, feels at the thoughts of undergoing it. This 
is felt by those by whom the law has been broken, and who feel 
themselves in danger of its being executed upon them. 3. The 
evil of s ufieramc e^: or the pain which a man feels, in virtue of 
the punishment itself, from the time when he begins to undergo 
it. This is felt by those by whom the law is broken, and upon 
[d] DOTiva- whom it comes actually to be executed. 4. The pain of sym- 
pathy, and the q^\m&c derivative evils resulting to the persons 
who are in cown^ction with the several classes of original suf- 
ferers just mentioned ^ Now of these four lots of evil, the first 
will be greater or less, according to the nature of the act from 
which the party is restrained : the second and third according to 
the nature of the punishment which stands annexed to that 
ofiPence. 

XV. On the other hand, as to the evil of the offence, this will 

also, of course, be greater or less, according to the nature of each 

offence. The proportion between the one evil and the other will 

therefore be different in the case of each particular offence. The 

cases, therefore, where punishment is unprofitable on this ground, 

can by no other means be discovered, than by an examination of 

each particular offe'nce ; which is what will be the business of 

the body of the work. 

2.— Or in the XVI. 2. Where, although in the ordinary state of things, the 

case in evil resulting from the punishment is not greater than the benefit 

reason of which is likely to result from the force with which it operates, 

during the same space of time, towards the excluding the evil of 

the offence, yet it may have been rendered so by the influence of 

some occasional circumstances. In the number of these circum- 

[a] The stances may be, i. The multitude of delinquents at a particular 

multitude of , , . ,, . , , , 

delinquents, juncture; bemg such as would increase, beyond the ordinary 
measure, the qtux/ntum of the second and third lots, and thereby 
lilso of a part of the fourth lot, in the evil of the punishment. 



(The evil of 
the offence 
being dif- 
ferent, ac- 
cording to 
the nature 
of the of- 
fence, can- 
not be re- 
resented 
ere.) 



E 



^ See ch. v. [Pleasures and Pains], 
' Seech, xii. [Consequences] iv. 



xni.] Cases Unmeet for Punishment. 177 

3. The extraordinary value of the services of some one delin- [b] The 

value '' 



tie I 
ofa I 

luent'tl 



quent ; in the case where the effect of the punishment would delinquent 
be to deprive the community of the benefit of those services. 

3. The displeasure of the people; that is, of an indefinite number j-^^ rn^^ 
of the members of the same community, in cases where (owing to ^^|**™* 
the influence of some occasional incident) they happen to con- p«*p^ 
ceive, that the offence or the offender ought not to be punished at 

all, or at least ought not to be punished in the way in question. 

4. The displeasure oi foreign powers; that is, of the governing [d]The \ 
body, or a considerable number of the members of some foreign o?£iSS^ I 
community or communities, with which the community in ques- p**^®"* 
tion is connected. 

§ 5. Cases where ptmishment is needless. 

These are, 
Xyil. I. Where the purpose of putting an end to the practic4[i. Where 
may be attained as effectually at a cheaper rate : by instruction! is to be 
for .instance, as well as by terror : by informing the under- SdSper * 
standing, as well as by exercising an immediate influence on the ' ' 
will. This seems to be the case with respect to all those offences ftey instruo- 
which consist in the disseminating pernicious principles in mat-P^ 
ters of difity; of whatever kind the duty be; whether political,' 
or moral, or religious. And this, whether such principles 
disseminated wndeTy or even without, a sincere persuasion 
their being beneficial. I say, even withovt : for though in such 
a case it is not instruction that can prevent the writer from 
endeavouring to inculcate his principles, yet it may the readers 
from adopting them : without which, his endeavouring to incul- 
cate them will do no harm. In such a case, the sovereign will / 
commonly have little need to take an active part : if it be the 
interest of orw individual to inculcate principles that are per- 
nicious, it will as surely be the interest of other individuals to j 
expose them. But if the sovereign must needs take a part in i 
the controversy, the pen is the proper weapon to combat error 
with, not the sword. 



ion. 



bel 
of I 

ich 



N 



CHAPTER XIV. 



OF THE PBOFOBTION BETWEEN PUNISHMENTS AND OFFENCES. 

Becapitoia- I. We have seen thai the general object of all laws is to pre- 
^ vent mischief; that is to say, when it is worth while ; but that, 

where there are no other means of doing this than punishment, 
there are four cases in which it is not worth while. 
Four qbieots II. When it 18 worth while, there are four subordinate designs 
ment. or objects, which, in the course of his endeavours to compass, as 

far as may be, that one general object, a legislator, whose views 
are governed by the principle of utility, comes naturally to pro- 
pose to himself. 
1st Object— III. I. His first, most extensive, and most eligible object, is 
all o^^^B. to prevent, in as far as it is possible, and worth while, all sorts 
of offences whatsoever ^ : in other words, so to manage, that no 
offence whatsoever may be committed. 
2d Object— ly, 2. But if a man must needs commit an offence of some 

to prevent 

the wont, kind or other, the next object is to induce him to commit an 
offence less mischievous, rather than one more mischievous : in 
other words, to choose always the least mischievous, of two 
offences that will either of them suit his purpose. 

3d Object— Y. 3. When a man has resolved upon a particular offence, the 

to kfieu 

down the next object is to dispose him to do no more mischief than is 

necessa/ry to his purpose : in other words, to do as little mischief 

as is consistent with the benefit he has in view. 

4th Object— VI. 4. The last object is, whatever the mischief be, which it 

least is proposed to prevent, to prevent it at as cheap a rate as 

expense. ., , 

possible. 
Buies of VII. Subservient to these four objects, or purposes, must be 

proportion 

' By offences I mean, at present, acts which appear to him to have a 
tendency to produce mischief. 



Proportion bettoeen Punishrnents and Offences. 179 
the ndes or canons by which the proportion of punishments ^ to between 

«• • 1 "x punigh- 

onences is to be governed. ments and 

Vni. Rule I. I. The first object, it has been seen, is to i^oiei. 
prevent, in as far as it is worth while, all sorts of offences ; SewroSt of 
therefore, *^ ofRanoe. 

The value of the punishment must not he less in any case than \ 
what is sufficient to outweigh that of the profit ^ of the offence '. ' 
If it be, the offence (unless some other considerations, 
independent of the punishment, should intervene and operate 
efficaciously in the character of tutelary motives^) will be 
sure to be committed notwithstanding ° : the whole lot of 

^ The same rules (it is to be observed) may be applied, with little varia- The same rule 
tion, to rewards as well as punishment : in short, to motives in general, ^ves^j^ *^ 
which, according as they are of the pleasurable or painfiil kind, are of the RencraL 
nature of reuxvrd or pvmUKvMint : and, according as the act they are applied 
to produce is of the positive or negative kind, are styled impelling or re- 
straining. See ch. x. [Motives] xliii. 

' By the profit of an offence, is to be undetstood, not merely the peca* Profit mav be 
niary profit, but the pleasure or advantage, of whatever kind it be, which undl^as VSi as 
a man reaps, or expects to reap, from the gratification of the desire which pecuniary, 
prompted him to engage in the offence K 

It is the profit (that is, the expectation of the profit) of the offence that improi)rietyof 
constitutes the impelling motive, or, where there are several, the sum of thlpuSment 
the impelling motives, by which a man is prompted to engage in the ofiisnce. ^r ^"^4^ t^e" 
It is the punishment, that is, the ^pectation of the punishment, that con- tempution. 
stitutes the restraining motive, which, either by itself^ or in conjunction 
with others, is to act upon him in a contrary direction, so as to induce him 
to abstain from engaging in the offence. Accidental circumstances apart, 
the strength of the temptation is as the force of the seducing, that is, of 
the impeUing motive or motives. To say then, as authors of great merit 
and great name have said, that the punishment ought not to increase with 
the strength of the temptation, is as much as to say in mechanics, that the 
moving force or momentum of the poiver need not increase in proportion to 
the momentum of the hvHJien, 

^ Beccaria, dei diletti, § 6. id. trad. par. Morellet, § 23. 

* See ch. xi. [Dispositions] xxix. 

^ It is a well-known adage, though it is to be hoped not a true one, that (]l/vYvja'i^>"^ a<t^v 
every man has his price. It is commonly meant of a man^s virtue. This i . -. "f"' ^ ( 
saying, though in a very different sense, was strictly verified by some of T c*- ., i^it^N^'^* • 
the Anglo-Saxon laws : by which a fixed price was set, not upon a man*s ' ; > ^ 
virtue indeed, but upon lus life : that 'of liie sovereign himself among the \ 
rest. For 200 shillings you might have killed a peasant : for six times as 
much, a nobleman : for six-and-thirty times as much you might have killed 
the king'. A king in those days was worth exactly 7,200 shillings. If | 
then the heir to the throne, for example, grew weary of waiting for it, he 
had a secure and 1^^ way of gratifying his im^tience : he had but to kill 

X Bee ch. X. [Motives] $ 1. 

sWiUdiis'Lsg. Anglo-Sax. p. 71, 99* See H«me, ▼(fl. I. App. I. p. 2x9. 

N 2 



i8o Of the 'Proportion between [chap. 

punishment will be thrown away : it will be altogether inefftca- 



ground of 
abatement, 
no objection 
tothumle. 



ciouB^, 

The pro- IX. The above rule has been often objected to, on account of 

taking the its seeming harshness : but this can only have happened for want 
the tempta- of it3 being properly understood. The strength of the tempta- 
' - ^ tion, ecBteris parilms, is as the profit of the offence: the quantum 
of the punishment must rise with the profit of the offence : 
eceteris paribus, it must therefore rise with the strength of the 
temptation. This there is no disputing. True it is, that the 
stronger the temptation, the less conclusive is the indication 
which the act of delinquency affords of the depravity of the 
offender's disposition^. So far then as the absence of any 
aggravation, arising from extraordinary depravity of disposition, 
may operate, or at the utmost, so far as the presence of a ground 
of extenuation, resulting from the innocence or beneficence of the 
offender's disposition, can operate, the strength of the temptation 
may operate in abatement of the demand for punishment. But 
it can never operate so far as to indicate the propriety of making 
the punishment ineffectual, which it is sure to be when brought 
below the level of the apparent profit of the offence. 

The partial benevolence which should prevail for the re- 
duction of it below this level, would counteract as well those 
purposes which such a motive would actually have in view, as 
those more extensive purposes which benevolence ought to have 
in view : it would be cruelty not only to the public, but to the 

the king with one hand, and pay himself with the other, and all was right. 
An earl Godwin, or a duke Streon, could have bought the lives of a whole 
dynasty. It is plain, that if ever a king in those days died in his bed, he 
must have had something else, besides this law, to thank for it. This being 
the production of a remote and barbarous age, the absurdity of it is pre- 
sently recognised: but, upon examination, it would be found, that the 
freshest laws of the most civilised nations are continually falling into the 
same error ^. This, in short, is the case wheresoever the punishment is 
fixed while the profit of delinquency is indefinite : or, to speak more pre- 
cisely, where the punishment is limited to such a mark, that the profit of 
delinquency may reach beyond it. 

^ See ch. xiii. [Cases unmeet], § i. 

* See ch. xi. [Dispositions], xlii. 

1 See in particular the English Statute laws throughout, Bonaparte*s Penal Code, and 
the recently enacted or not enacted Spanish Penal Code.— Aote by the Author, July i8aa. 



XIV.] Punishments and Offences* i8i 

very persons in whose behalf it pleads : in its effects, I mean, 
however opposite in its intention. Cruelty to the public, that is) 
cruelty to -the innocent, by suffering them, for want of an ade- 
quate protection, to lie exposed to the mischief of the offence : 
cruelty even to the offender himself, by punishing him to no 
purpose, and without the chance of compassing that beneficial 
end, by which alone the introduction of the evil of punishment' 
is to be justified. 

X. Rule 2. But whether a given offence shall be prevented Rule 2. 

. . . Venture 

in a given degree by a given quantity of punishment, is never more against 
any thing better than a chance ; for the purchasing of which, offence than 
whatever punishment is employed, is so much expended in 
advance. However, for the sake of giving it the better chance 
of outweighing the profit of the offence, 

Tlie greater the mischief of the offence, the greater is the ex- 1 
jpense, which it may be worth while to he a>t, in the way of I 
punishment *. 

XI. Eule 3. The next object is, to induce a man to choose Rule 3. ' 
always the least mischievous of two offences ; therefore ieast1>f two 

Where two offences come in competition, the punishment for the be^^rred. 
greater offence must he sufficient to induce a man to prefer the | 
less\ 

XII. Bule 4. When a man has resolved upon a particular Rule 4. 
offence, the next object is, to induce him to do no more mischief each particle 
than what is necessary for his purpose : therefore mischief. 

The punishment should he adjusted in such manner to each 
particular offence, that for every pa/rt of the mischief there may 
he a motive to restrain the offender from, giving hirth to it^, 

* For example, if it can ever be worth while to be at the expense of so Example.— 
horrible a punishment as that of burning alive, it will be more so in the andUoininK? 
view of preventing such a crime as that of murder or incendiarism, than in 
the view of preventing the uttering of a piece of bad money. See B. I. tit. 
[Defraudment touching the Coin] and [Iiicendiarism]. 

' Espr. des Loix, L. vi. c. 16. 

^ If any one have any doubt of this, let him conceive the offence to be Example.— 
divided into as many separate offences as there are distinguishable parcels i^d mone^^'"' 
of mischief that result from it. Let it consist, for example, in a man's stolen. 
giving you ten blows, or stealing from you ten shillings. If then, for giving 
you ten blows, he is punished no more than for giving you five, the giving 



i8a Of the Proportion between [chap. 

Biiie5. XTTT. Rule 5. The last object is, whatever mischief is 

Pnnish in -ii* ■•.. 

no degree goarded against, to guard against it at as cheap a rate as pos- 

without ., T . , * 

■pedal sible : therefore 



mson. 



IThe pumakment ought in no case to be more than what is 
necessary to bring it into conformity with the rules here given. 
Rale 8. XIY. Hole 6. It is farther to be observed, that owing to the 

ciicmn. different manners and degrees in which persons under different 
infloencinR circumstances are affected by the same exciting cause, a punish- 
^ ^' ment which is the same in name will not always either really 
produce, or even so much as appear to others to produce, in two 
different persons the same degree of pain : therefore 
I That the quantity actually inflicted on each individv^al offender 
may correspond to the quantity inUendedfor similar offenders in 
general^ the several circumstcmces influencing sensibility ought 
always to be taken into a^ceount ^. 

Comparative XV. Of the above rules of proportion, the four first, we may 
view of the , ..... 

above rules, perceive, serve to mark out the limits on the side of diminution ; 

the limits below which a punishment ought not to be dimi- 
nished: the fifth, the limits on the side of increase; the limits 
above which it ought not to be increased. The five first are 
calculated to serve as guides to the legislator : the sixth is cal- 
culated, in some measure, indeed, for the same purpose ; but 
principally for guiding the judge in his endeavours to conform, 
on both sides, to the intentions of the legislator. 
Into the XYI. Let us look back a little. The first rule, in order to 

thevo^ti^ofa render it more conveniently applicable to practice, may need 
miSt be perhaps to be a little more particularly unfolded. It is to be 

you five of these ten blows is an offence for which there is no punishment 

at all : which being understood, as often as a man gives you five blows, he 

will be sure to give you five more, since he may have the pleasure of giving 

f you these five for nothing. In like manner, if for stealing from you ten 

} shillings, he is punished no more than for stealing five, the stealing of the 

I remaining five of those ten shillings is an offence for which there is no 
punishment at all. This rule is violated in almost every page of every body ' 
of laws I have ever seen. 

The profit, it is to be observed, though fi:«quently, is not constantly, pro- 
portioned to the mischief : for example, where a thief, along with the things 
he covets, steals others which are of no use to him. This may happen 
through wantonness, indolence, precipitation, &c. &c. 
* See ch. vi. [Sensibility]. 



XIV.] 



PunisAments and Offerices. 



183 



observed, then, that for the sake of accuracy, it was necessary, taken its /^ 
instead of the word qvantity to make use of the less perspicuoua point^^ ™ 
term value. For the word quantity will not properly includei ^j -^ 
the circumstances either of certainty or proximity: circum-l?2ii5il/* 
stances which, in estimating the value of a lot of pain or plea- 
sure, must always be taken into the account ^ Now, on the one 
hand, a lot of punishment is a lot of pain ; on the other hand, 
the profit of an offence is a lot of pleasure, or what is equivalent 
to it. But the profit of the offence %b commonly more certain f 
than the punishment, or, what comes to the same thing, appears 
so at least to the offender. It is at any rate commonly more 
immediate. It follows, therefore, that, in order to maintain its | 
superiority over the profit of the offence, the punishment must 
have its value made up in some other way, in proportion to that 
whereby it falls short in the two points of certainty and prox- 
imity. Now there is no other way in which it can receive any 
addition to its vcUiue, but by receiving an addition in point of mag- 
nitude. Wherever then the value of the punishment falls short, 
either in point of certainty, or of proximity, of that of the 
profit of the offence, it must receive a proportionable addition in 
point of magnitude *. 



XVn. Yet farther. To make sure of giving the value of the Alao, into 
punishment the superiority over that of the offence, it may be of the, 
necessary, in some cases, to take into the account the profit not and profit of 

the offence, 
the mischief 
and profit of 



only of the individual offence to which the punishment is to be 
annexed, but also of such otlier offences of the sam^ sort as the 
offender is likely to have already committed without detection. 
This random mode of calculation, severe as it is, it will be im- 
possible to avoid having recourse to, in certain cases : in such, to 
wit, in which the profit is pecuniary, the chance of detection 
very small, and the obnoxious act of such a nature as indicates 
a habit : for example, in the case of frauds against the coin. If 
it be not recurred to, the practice of committing the offence will 
be sure to be, upon the balance of the account, a gainful practice. 

* See ch. iv. [Value]. 

' It is for tms reason, for example, that simple compensation is never t 
looked upon as sufficient punishment for theft or robbery. 



other 
offences of 
the same 
JutbU. 



184 Cff the Proportion between [chap. 

That being the case, the legislator will be absolutely sure of 
not being able to suppress it, and the whole punishment that 
is bestowed upon it will be thrown away. In a word (to keep 
to the same expressions we set out with) that whole quantity 
of punishment will be inefficacious, 
W?Sof' XVni. Kule 7. These things being considered, the three 

oert^nty following rules may be laid down by way of supplement and 

made up in explanation to Bule i, 
magnitude. -^ 

To enable the value of the punishment to outweigh that of the 

profit of the ojffence, it must be increased, in point of magnitude, 

m proportion as it falls short in point gf np^rta into/. 

Enles. XIX. Hule 8. Punishment must be further increased in point 

of proximity, cfmagrdtude, in proportion as it falls short in point ofjpnroxirn^. 

Rule 9. XX. Kule 9. Where the act is conclusively indicative of a 

ror acts T I • T • 7 

indicative Q ' homt, such an increase must be given to the punishment as m/ay 
puniflh as enable it to outweigh' the profit not only of the individual offence, 
habit \ huA of such Other like offences as are likely to have been committed 

^ujith impunity by the same offender. 

The remain- XXI. There may be a few other circumstances or considera- 

^ess ^ tions which may influence, in some small degree, the demand 

unpo ce. £^^ punishment : but as the propriety of these is either not so 

demonstrable, or not so constant, or the application of them not 

so determinate, as that of the foregoing, it may be doubted 

whether they be worth putting on a level with the othelrs. 

Rule 10. XXII. Bule 10. WTien a punishment, which in point cf 

For the sake ,., . .71 77 t -, 7 . . . 

of quaiit^r, quamy IS particularly weU calculated to answer its intention, 

quantity, connot exist in less than a certain quantity, it may sometimes be 
of use, for the sake of employing it, to stretch a little beyond that 
quantity which, on other accounts, would be strictly necessary. 
Rule 11. XXIII. Rule 1 1. In particular, this may sometimes be the case, 

for a moral where the punishment proposed is of such a nature as to be par- 
ticvlarly well calculaled to answer the purpose of a moral lesson ^. 

A punbhment ^ A punishment may be said to be calculated to answer the purpose of a 

oFmoraii£^nT ^^otaI lessou, whcu, by roasou of the ignominy it^stamps upon the offence, it 

^^at- is calculated to inspire the public with sentiments of aversion towards thoee 

pernicious habits and dispositions with which the offence appears to be 

connected ; and thereby to inculcate the opposite beneficial habits and 

dispositions. 



\ 



XIV.] Punishments and Offences. 185 

XXrV. Rule 1 2. The tendency of the above considerations is Eule 12. 

. , Attend to 

to dictate an augmentation in the punishment : the following ciroum- 
rule operates in the way of diminution. There are certain cases which may 
(it has been seen ^) in which, by the influence of accidental cir- punishment 
cumstances, punishment may be rendered unprofitable in the 
whole : in the same cases it may chance to be rendered unpro- 
fitable as to a part only. Accordingly, 

In adjusting the quantum of punishment, the circumstances, 
hy which aU punishment may he rendered unprofitable, ou^ht to 
be attended to. 

XXV. Eule 13. It is to be observed, that the more various ^ Rule is. 

"^ ' . Forsim- 

and minute any set of provisions are, the greater the chance is pUcity's 

a . — a . S81K6) SmflJl 

that any given article in them will not be borne m mmd : with- dispropor- 

, .... tiona may bo 

out which, no benefit can ensue from it. Distinctions, which are neglected, 
more complex than what the conceptions of those whose conduct 
it is designed to influence can take in, will even be worse than 
useless. The whole system will present a confused appearance: 
and thus the effect, not only of the proportions established by 
the articles in question, but of whatever is connected with them, 
will be destroyed^. To draw a precise line of direction in such 
case seems impossible. However, by way of memento, it may 
be of some use to subjoin the following rule. 

AmK)ng provisions designed to perfect the proportion between 
punishments amd offences, if any occwr, which, by their own par- 
ticular good ej^ects, would not maJce tip for the harm they would 
do by adding to the intricacy of the Code, they should he omitted^. 

It is this, for example, if any thing, that must justify the application of Example.— 
so severe a punishment as the infamy of a pubUc exhibition, hereinafter por^OmjuriSi 
proposed, for him who lifts up his hand against a woman, or against his 
father. See B. I. tit. [Simp, corporal injuries]. 

It is partly on this principle, I suppose, that military legislators have Example.— 
justified to themselves the inflicting death on the soldier who lifts up his J"^^*"^ 
hand against his superior officer. 

^ See ch. xiii. [Cases unmeet], § 4. 

^ See B. II. tit. [Purposes], Append, tit. [Composition]. 

^ Notwithstandii^ tins rule, my fear is, that in the ensuing model, I Proportionality 
may be thought to have carried my endeavours at proportionality too fiir. f,f^e pr^nt' 
Hiiherto scarce any attention has been paid to it. Montesquieu seems to work— why. 
have been almost &e first who has had the least idea of any such thing. 
In such a matter, therefore, excess seemed more eligible tluth defect. The 



1 86 Of the Proportion between [chap. 

forwKie XXVI. It may be remembered, that the political sanction, 
^rS^d ^^ *^* *^ which the sort of punishment belongs, which in 
reii^9U8 this chapter is all along in view, is but one of four sanctions, 

sanction, not *^ . . . 

here aUowed which may all of them contribute their share towards producing 
the same effects. It may be expected, therefore, that in adjusting 
the quantity of political punishment, allowance should be made 
for the assistance it may meet with from those other controling 
powers. True it is, that from each of these several sources a very 
powerful assistance may sometimes be derived. But the case is, 
that (setting aside the moral sanction, in the case where the force 
of it is expressly adopted into and modified by the politicaP) the 
force of those other powers is never determinate enough to be 
depended upon. It can never be reduced, like political punish- 
ment, into exact lots, nor meted out in number, quantity, 
and value. The legislator is therefore obliged to provide the 
full complement of punishment, as if he were sure of not re- 
ceiving any assistance whatever from any of those quarters. If 
he does, so much the better : but lest he should not, it is neces- 
sary he should, at all events, make that provision which depends 
upon himself. 

Recapituift- XXVII. It may be of use, in this place, to recapitulate the 
several circumstances, which, in establishing the proportion be- 
twixt punishments and offences, are to be attended to. These 
seem to be as follows : 
I. On the part of the ojffenee : 

1. The profit of the offence ; 

2. The mischief of the offence ; 

3. The profit and mischief of other greater or lesser offences, 
of different sorts, which the offender may have to choose 
out of ; 

4. The profit and mischief of other offences, of the same 
sort, which the same offender may probably have been 
guilty of already. 

difficulty 18 to invent : that done, if any thing seems superfluous, it is easy 
to retrench. 

^ See B. I. tit. [Punishments]. 



tion. 



XIV.] Punishments and Offences. 187 

II. On the part of the punishment : 

5. The magnitude of the punishment : composed of its 

intensity and duration ; 

6. The deficiency of the punishment in point of certainty; 

7. The deficiency of the punishment in point of proximity; 

8. The quality of the punishment ; 

9. The accidental advantage in point of quality of a punish- 

ment, not strictly needed in point of quantity; 

10. The use of a punishment of a particular quality, in the 

character of a moral lesson. 

III. On thepa/rt of the offender: 

11. The responsibility of the class of persons in a way to 

offend; 

12. The sensibility of each particular offender; 

13. The particular merits or useful qualities of any parti- 

cular offender, in case of a punishment which might 
deprive the community of the benefit of them; 

1 4. The multitude of offenders on any particular occasion. 

IV. On the pa/rt of the public, at any particular conjuncture : 

1 5. The inclinations of the people, for or against any quantity 

or mode of punishment; 

16. The inclinations of foreign powers. 

V. On the part of the law : that is, of the public for a con- 

tinuance : 

17. The necessity of making small sacrifices, in point of 

proportionality, for the sake of simplicity. 
XXVIII. There are some, perhaps, who, at first sight, may The nicety 
look upon the nicety employed in the adjustment of such rules, observed 
as so much labour lost : for gross ignorance, they will say, never trom the 
troubles itself about laws, and passion does not calculate. But i^u^ty. 
the evil of ignorance admits of cure^ : and as to the proposi- 
tion that passion does not calculate, this, like most of these very 
general and oracular propositions, is not true. When matters 
of such importance as pain and pleasure are at stake, and these 
in the highest degree (the only matters, in short, that can be of 

^ See Append, tit. [Promulgation]. 



1 88 Proportion between Punishments and Offences. 

importance) who is there that does not calculate % lien calcn- 
late, some with less exactness, indeed, some with more : bnt all 
men calculate. I would not saj, that even a madman does not 
calculate^. Passion calculates, more or less, in every man: in 
different men, according to the warmth or coolness of their dis- 
positions: according to the firmness or irritability of their minds: 
according to the nature of the motives by which they are acted 
upon. Happily, of all passions, that is the most given to calcu- 
lation^ from the excesses of which, by reason of its strength, 
constancy, and universality, society has most to apprehend': I 
mean that which corresponds to the motive of pecuniary interest : 
so that these niceties, if such they are to be called, have the best 
chance of being efficacious, where efficacy is of the most im- 
portance. 

^ There are few madmen bat what are observed to be afraid of the strait 
waistcoat. 
^ See ch. zii. [Oonsequences], zzxiix. 



CHAPTER XV. 

OP THE PEOPERTIES TO BE GIVEN TO A LOT OF PUNISHMENT. 

I. It has been shown what the mles are, which cuffht to be Properties 

. are to be 

observed in adjusting the proportion between the punishment governed by 

.1 proportioii. 
and the offence. The properties to be given to a lot of punish- 
ment, in every instance, will of course be such as it stands in 
need of, in order to be capable of being applied, in conformity to 
those rules : the quality will be regulated by the qucmtity. 

n. The first of those rules, we may remember, was, that the Property i. 
quantity of punishment must not be less, in any case, than what 
is sufficient to outweigh the profit of the offence : since, as often 
as it is less, the whole lot (unless by accident the deficiency should 
be supplied from some of the other sanctions) is thrown away: it 
is inefficacious. The fifth was, that the punishment ought in no 
case to be more than what is required by the several other rules : 
since, if it be, all that is above that quantity is needless. The fourth 
was, that the punishment should be adjusted in such manner 
to each individual offence, that every part of the mischief of that 
offence may have a penalty (that is, a tutelary motive) to encounter 
it : otherwise, with respect to so much of the offence as has not a 
penalty to correspond to it, it is as if there were no punishment 
in the case. Now to none of those rules can a lot of punishment | 
be conformable, unless, for every variation in point of quantity, in I 
the mischief of the species of offence to which it is annexed, such 
lot of punishment admits of a correspondent variation. To prove 
this, let the profit of the offence admit of a multitude of degrees. 
Suppose it, then, at any one of these degrees : if the punishment 
be less than what is suitable to that degree, it will be ineffica- 
cious ; it will be so much thrown away : if it be more, as far as 



I 



190 Of the Properties to be given to [chap. 

the difference extends, it will be needless; it will therefore be 
thrown away also in that case. 
. The first property, therefore, that ought to be given to a lot 
of punishment, is that of being variable in point of quantity, 
in conformity to every variation which can take place in either 
the profit or mischief of the offence. This property might, 
perhaps, be termed, in a single word, va/riahUity, 
B^'^b^tv' ■^^^' ^ second property, intimately connected with the former, 
may be styled equability. It will avail but little, that a mode of 
punishment (proper in all other respects) has been established 
by the legislator ; and that capable of being screwed up or let 
down to any degree that can be required ; if, after all, whatever 
degree of it be pitched upon, that same degree shall be liable, 
according to circumstances, to produce a very heavy degree of 
pain, or a very slight one, or even none at all. In this case, as 
in the former, if circumstances happen one way, there will be 
a great deal of pain produced which will be needless: if the 
other way, there will be no pain at all applied, or none that will 
be efficaci(yus, A puuishment, when liable to this irregularity, 
may be styled an unequable one : when free from it, an equaUe 
one. The quantity of pain produced by the punishment will, it 
is true, depend in a considerable degree upon circumstances 
distinct from the nature of the punishment itself: upon the 
condition which the offender is in, with respect to the circum- 
stances by which a man's sensibility is liable to be influenced. 
But the influence of these very circumstances will in many cases 
be reciprocally influenced by the nature of the punishment : in 
other words, the pain which is produced by any mode of punish- 
ment, will be the joint effect of the punishment which is applied 
to him, and the circumstances in which he is exposed to it. Now 
there are some punishments, of which the effect may be liable to 
undergo a greater alteration by the influence of such foreign 
circumstances, than the effect of other punishments is liable to 
undergo. So far, then, as this is the case, equabiliiy or un- 
equability may be regarded as properties belonging to the 
punishment itself. 



XV.] a Lot of PuniihmenU 191 

IV. An example of a mode of punishment which is apt to be Punuh- 

J . ments which 

unequable, is that of hardshmenty when the locus a qw> (or place are apt to 
the part J is banished from) is some determinate place appointed in this 
by the law, which perhaps the offender cares not whether he 
ever see or no. This is also the case with pecvma/iryy or quom- 
pecvmiary punishment, when it respects some particular species 
of property, which the offender may have been possessed 0^ or 
not, as it may happen. All these punishments may be split 
down into parcels, and measured out with the utmost nicety : 
being diyisible by time, at least, if by nothing else. They are not, 
therefore, any of them defective in point of variability : and yet, 
in many cases, this defect in point of equability may make them 
as imfit for use as if they were ^. 

V. The third rule of proportion was, that where two offences Property 8. 

, Commen- 

come in competition, the punishment for the greater offence surabiJiiy to 

must be sufficient to induce a man to prefer the less. Now, to. pnnish- 

. ) ments. 

be sufficient for this purpose, it must be evidently and uniformlyfl 

greater : greater, not in the eyes of some men only, but of all] 

men who are liable to be in a situation to take their choice] 

between the two offences ; that is, in effect, of all mankind. In I 

other words, the two punishments must be perfectly commen- 

surable. Hence arises a third property, which may be termed 

commensurability : to wit, with reference to other punishments'. 

VL But punishments of different kinds are in very few in- How two 

stances uniformly greater one than another ; especially when punishment 

mav be 

the lowest degrees of that which is ordinarily the greater, are rendered 

^ By the English law, there are several offences which are punished by a ) 
total forfeiture of moyeables, not extending to immoveables. This is the 
case with suicide, and with certain species of theft and homicide. In some ' 
cases, this is the principal punishment : in others, even the only one. The | 
consequence is, that if a man's fortune happens to consist in moveables, he ■ 
is ruined ; if in inmioveables, he suffers nothing. 

^ See View of the Hard-Labour BiU, Lond. 1778, p. 100. 

For the idea of this property, I must acknowledge myself indebted to an 
anonymous letter in the St. James's Chronicle, of the 27th of September, 
1777 ; the author of which is totally uuknown to me. If any one should 
be disposed to think lightly of the instruction, on account of the channel 
by which it was first communicated, let him tell me where I can find an 
idea more ingenious or original 



1^2 



Of the Properlies to be give% to 



[chap. 



oomiDen' 
ninble. 



Pioperty 4. 
ChaJracter- 
isticalneis. 



The mode of 
punuhxneQt 
the most 
emmently 
chanicter- 



eompared with the highest degrees of that which is ordinarilj 
the less : in other words, punishments of different kinds are in 
few instances nniformlj commensorable. The only certain and 
mdyersal means of making two lots of punishment perfectlj 
commensurable, is bj making the lesser an ingredient in the 
composition of the greater. This may be done in either of two 
ways. I. By adding to the lesser punishment another quantity 
of punishment of the same kind. 2. By adding to it another 
quantity of a different kind« The latter mode is not less certain 
than the former : for though one cannot always be absolutely 
sure, that to the same person a given punishment wHl appear 
greater than another givei^ punishment ; yet one may be always 
absolutely sure, that any given punishment, so as it does but 
come into contemplation, will appear greater than none at all. 

VII. Again : Punishment cannot act any &rther than in as 
far as the idea of it, and of its connection with the offence, is 
present in the mind. The idea of it, if not present, cannot act 
at all; and then the punishment itself must be ineffieaciofis. 
Now, to be present, it must be remembered, and to be remem- 
bered it must have been learnt. But of all punishments that 
can be imagined, there are none of which the connection with the 
offence is either so easily learnt, or so efficaciously remembered, 
as those of which the idea is already in part associated with 
some part of the idea of the offence : which is the case when the 
one and the other have some circumstance that belongs to them 
in common. When this is the case with a punishment and an 
offence, the punishment is said to bear an analogy to, or to be 
characteristic o^ the offence ^. Cka/racteristicalness is, therefore, 
a fourth property, which on this account ought to be given, 
whenever it can conveniently be given, to a lot of punishment. 

VIII. It is obvious, that the effect of this contrivance will be 
the greater, as the analogy is the closer. The analogy will be 
the closer, the more material ^ that circumstance is, which is in 

^ See Montesq. Esp. des Loiz, L. xii. ch. iv. He seems to have the 
property of characteristicahiess in view ; but that the idea he had of it was 
vezy indistinct, appears firom the extravagant advantages he attributes to it. 

^ See ch. vii. [Actions], iii. 



\ 



XV.] a Lot of Punisiment. 193 

common. Now the most material circumstance that can belong iiticisthat 
to an offence and a punishment in common, is the hurt or damage turn, 
which they produce. The closest analogy, therefore, that can 
subsist between an offence and the punishment annexed to it, is 
that which subsists between them when the hurt or damage thej 
produce is of the same nature : in other words, that which is 
constituted by the circumstance of identity in point of damage \ 
Accordingly, the mode of punishment, which of all others bears 
the closest analogy to the offence, is that which in the proper r 
and exact sense of the word is termed retaliation. Betaliation, j 
therefore, in the few cases in which it is practicable, and not too 
expensive, will have one great advantage over every other mode 
of punishment. 

IX. Again: It is the idea only of the punishment (or, inpkopertys./ 
other words, the apparent punishment) that really acts upon the pianty. I 
mind ; the punishment itself (the real punishment) acts not any 
farther than as giving rise to that idea. It is the apparent \ 
punishment, therefore, that does all the service, I mean in the 
way of example, which is the principal object *. It is the real 
punishment that does all the mischief ^ Now the ordinary and 
obvious way of increasing the magnitude of the apparent punish- 
ment, is by increasing the magnitude of the real. The apparent 
magnitude, however, may to a certain degree be increased by 
other less expensive means : whenever, therefore, at the same 
time that these less expensive means would have answered that 
purpose, an additional real punishment is employed, this additional 
real punishment is needless. As to these less expensive means, 
they consist, i. In the choice of a particular mode of punishment, 
a punishment of a particular quality, independent of the quan- 
tity^. . 2. In a particular set of sol&mnities distinct from the 
punishment itself, and accompanying the execution of it °. 

^ Besides this, there are a variety of other ways in which the punishment 
may bear an analogy to the offence. This will be seen by looking over tho 
table of punishments. 

' See ch. x\u. [Cases unmeet], § i, 2. note. 

' lb. § 4. par. iii. 

* See B. 1. tit. [Punishments]. 

» See B. II. tit. [Execution], 



194 



Of the Projierties to be given to [chap. 



The most 
effectual 
\iray of 
rendering a 
punishment 
exemplary is 
by means of 
analogy. 



Property 6. 
Frugahfy. 



Frugality 
belongs m 
perfection to 
pecuniary 
punishment. 



X. A mode of punishment, according as the appearance of it 
bears a greater proportion to the reality, may be said to be the 
more exemplary. Now as to what concerns the choice of the 
punishment itself, there is not any means by which a given 
quantity of punishment can be rendered more exemplary, than 
by choosing it of such a sort as shall bear an analogy to the 
offence. Hence another reason for rendering the punishment 
analogous to, or in other words characteristic of, the offence. 

XI. Punishment, it is still to be remembered, is in itself an 
expense : it is in itself an evil *. Accordingly the fifth rule of 
proportion is, not to produce more of it than what is demanded 
by the other rules. But this is the case as often as any particle 
of pain is produced, which contributes nothing to the effect pro- 
posed. Now if any mode of punishment is more apt than an- 
other to produce any such superfluous and needless pain, it may 
be styled wnfrugal; if less, it may be styled /ni^a?. Frugality, 
therefore, is a sixth property to be wished for in a mode of 
punishment. 

XII. The perfection of frugality, in a mode of punishment, is 
where not only no superfluous pain is produced on the part of 
the person punished, but even that same operation, by which he 
is subjected to. pain, is made to answer the purpose of producing 
pleasure on the part of some other person. Understand a profit 
or stock of pleasure of the self-regarding kind : for a pleasure of 
the dissocial kind is produced almost of course, on the part of 
all persons in whose breasts the offence has excited the sentiment 
of ill-will. Now this is the case with pecuniary punishment, as 
also with such punishments of the quasi-jpecv/niary kind as con- 
sist in the subtraction of such a species of possession as is trans- 
ferable from one party to another. The pleasure, indeed, pro- 
duced by such an operation, is not in general equal to the pain ^ : 
it may, however, be so in particular circumstances, as where he, 
from whom the thing is taken, is very rich, and he, to whom it 
is given, very poor : and, be it what it will, it is always so much 
more than can be produced by any other mode of punishment « 

^ Ch. xiii. [Cases unmeet], par. ii. * lb. note. 



XV.] a Lot of TunuhmenL 195 

XIII. The properties of exemplarity and frugality seem to Bxempiarity 
pursue the same immediate end, though by diflferent courses. fSigaiity, in 
Both are occupied in diminishing the ratio of the real suffering Sffer an^ 
to the apparent : but exemplarity tends to increase the apparent ; "*^* / 
frugality to reduce the real. -( ^^IIS V^ 

XIV. Thus much concerning the properties to be given to other 
punishments in general, to whatsoever offences they are to be mferior 
applied. Those which follow are of less importance, either as ™^ ^ 
referring only to certain offences in particular, or depending 

upon the influence of transitory and local circumstances. 

In the first place, the four distinct ends into which the main 
and general end of punishment is divisible ^, may give rise to so 
many distinct properties, according as any particular mode of 
punishment appears to be more particularly adapted to the com- 
passing of one or of another of those ends. To that of example^ 
as being the principal one, a particular property has already been 
adapted. There remains the three inferior ones of TtfoTmaixom,^ 
disahlemerU, and eomjp&nsation, 

XV. A seventh property, therefore, to be wished for in a Property 7. 

mode of punishment, is that of suhserviency to reformation^ or viency to 

, , , refloniubtioQ* 

reforming tendency. Now any punishment is subservient to 

reformation in proportion to its qtiantiti/: since the greater the 
punishment a man has experienced, the stronger is the tendency 
it has to create in him an aversion towards the offence whiqh 
was the cause of it : and that with respect to all offences alike. 
But there are certain punishments which, with, regard to certain 
offences, have a particular tendency to produce that effect by 
reason of their qvality: and where this is the case, the punish- 
ments in question, as applied to the offences in question, will 
pro tanto have the advantage over all others. This influence 
will depend upon the nature of the motive which is the cause of 1 
the offence: the punishment most subservient to reformation! 
will be the sort of punishment that is best calculated to in- \ 
validate the force of that motive. 

XVI. Thus, in offences originating from the motive of ill- — applied to 

^ See ch. ziii. [Cases unmeet], par. ii. note. 

2 



196 Of the Projaertiea to be given to [chap. 

offences will^^ that punisbment has the strongest reforming tendency, 
in^wiiL which is best calculated to weaken the force of the irascible 
afiPections. And more particularly, in that sort of offence which 
consists in an obstinate refusal, on the part of the offender, to do 
something which is lawfully required of him ^, and in which the 
obstinacy is in great measure kept up by his resentment against 
those who have an interest in forcing him to compliance, the 
most efficacious punishment seems to be that of confinement to 
spare diet, 
—to offences XVII. Thus, also, in offences which owe their birth to the 
S^^oiraioe joint influence of indolence and pecuniary interest, that punish- 
l^uniaiy ment seems to possess the strongest reforming tendency, which 
interest. ^ ^y^^ calculated to weaken the force of the former of those 
dispositions. And more particularly, in the cases of theft, em- 
bezzlement^ and every species of defraudment, the mode of 
punishment best adapted to this purpose seems, in most cases, 
to be that of penal labour. 
Property 8. XYIII. An eighth property to be given to a lot of punish- 
', ment in certain cases, is that of efficacy with respect to disable- 
ment, or, as it might be styled more briefly, disabling efficacy. 
' This is a property which may be given in perfection to a lot 
of punishment ; and that with much greater certainty than the 
property of subserviency to reformation. The inconvenience is, 
that this property is apt, in general, to run coimter to that of 
frugality: there being, in most cases, no certain way of disabling 
a man from doing mischief, without, at the same time, disabling 
him, in a great measure, from doing good, either to himself or 
others. The mischief therefore of the offence must be so great 
as to demand a very considerable lot of punishment, for the 
purpose of example, before it can warrant the application of a 
punishment equal to that which is necessary for the purpose of 
disablement. 
— is most XIX. The punishment, of which the efficacy in this way is the 

in capital greatest, is evidently that of death. In this case the efficacy of it 
punishmenlr. 

* See eh. x. [Motives]. 

^ See B. I. tit. [Offences againflt Justice]. 



Efficacy 
with respecr 
to disable- 
ment. 



XV.} a Lot of PunisimenL 197 

is certain. This accordingly is the punishment peculiarly adapted 
to those cases in which the name of the offender^ so long as he 
lives, may be sufficient to keep a whole nation in a flame. This 
will now and then be the case with competitors for the sove- 
reignty, and leaders of the factions in civil wars : though, when 
applied to offences of so questionable a nature, in which the 
question concerning criminality turns more upon success than 
any thing else ; an infliction of this sort may seem more to 
savour of hostility than punishment. At the same time this 
punishment, it is evident, is in an eminent degree v/nfrugctt; 
which forms one among the many objections there are against 
the use of it, in any but very extraordinary cases ^. 

XX. In ordinary cases the purpose may be sufficiently answered other 
by one or other of the various kinds of conflnement and banish- mentsin 
meut : of which, imprisonment is the most strict and efficacious, to be found. 
For when an offence is so circumstanced that it cannot be com- 
mitted but in a certain place, as is the case, for the most part, 

with offences against the person, all the law has to do, in order 
to disable the offender from committing it, is to prevent his 
being in that place. In any of the offences which consist in the 
breach or the abuse of any kind of trust, the purpose may be 
compassed at a still cheaper rate, merely by forfeiture of the 
trust : and in general, in any of those offences which can only be 
committed under favour of some relation in which the offender 
stands with reference to any person, or sets of persons, merely by 
forfeiture of that relation : that is, of the right of continuing to 
reap the advantages belonging to it. This is the case, for in- 
stance, with any of those offences which consist in an «.buse of 
the privileges of marriage, or of the liberty of carrying on any 
lucrative or other occupation. . 

XXI. The ninth property is that of svhserviency to compensa- Property 9. 
tion. This property of punishment, if it be vindictive compensa- viency to 
tion that is in view, will, with little variation, be in proportion ^^f^'^^*" 
to the quantity: if ItierativCf it is the peculiar and characteristic 
property of pecuniary punishment. 

^ See B. I. tit. [PanishmeDts]. 



198 Of the Projperiies to be given to [chap. 

Fropotf 10. XXn. In the rear of all these properties may be introduced 
that of popularity/; a very fleeting and indeterminate kind of 
property, which may belong to a lot of punishment one moment, 
and be lost by it the next. By popularity is meant the property 
of being acceptable, or rather not unacceptable, to the bulk of 
the people, among whom it is proposed to be established. In 
strictness of speech, it should rather be called essence of wnr 
popularity: for it cannot be expected, in regard to such a matter 
as pimishment, that any species or lot of it should be positively 
acceptable and grateful to the people: it is sufficient, for the 
most part, if they have no decided aversion to the thoughts of it. 
Now the property of characteristicalness, above noticed, seems 
to go as for towards conciliating the approbation of the people 
to a mode of punishment, as any; insomuch that popularity may 
be regarded as a kind of secondary quality, depending upon that 
of characteristicalness ^. The use of inserting this property in 
the catalogue, is chiefly to make it serve by way of memento to 
the legislator not to introduce, without a cogent necessity, any 
mode or lot of punishment, towards which he happens to per- 
ceive any violent aversion entertained by the body of the people. 
MiBcfaiefB XXni. The effects of unpopularity in a mode of punishment a 

fhnnthe ^^ analogous to those of unfrugality. The unnecessary pain I 
iJS^'^f a which denominates a punishment unfrugal, is most apt to be that I 
5^S»n^t which is produced on the part of the offender. A portion of * 
pwSe, and Superfluous pain is in like manner produced when the punish- 
th?i^.** *" ment is unpopular : but in this case it is produced on the part 
of persons altogether innocent, the people at large. This is 
already one mischief; and another is, the weakness which it is 
apt to introduce into the law. When the people are satisfied 
with the law, they voluntarily lend their assistance in the execu- 
tion: when they are dissatisfied, they will naturally withhold 

Characteristi- ^ ^^ property of characteristicalnesg, tberefore, is useful in a mode of l( 
a^unfahment" P^^l^^^^t i*i three different ways : i. It renders a mode of punishment, ll 
I. memorable': before infliction, more easy to be borne in mind : 2. It enables it, especially V 
3. ^pSar"^' *^^ infliction, to make the stronger impression, when it is there ; that is, I 

renders it the more exemplary : 3. It tends to render it more acceptable to | 

the people, that is, it renders it the more p&pvlaT, 



XV.] a Lot of PunisimenL 199 

that assistance; it is well if they do not take a positive part in 
raising impediments. This contributes greatly to the uncertainty 
of the punishment j by which, in the first instance, the frequency 
of the offence receives an increase. In process of time that 
deficiency, as usual, is apt to draw on an increase in magnitude : 
an addition of a certain quantity which otherwise would be 
needless ^. 

XXIY. This property, it is to be observed, necessarily sup- This proper- 
poses, on the part of the people, some prejudice or other, which a premdice 
it is the business of the legislator to endeavour to correct. For legislator 
if the aversion to the punishment in question were grounded on cure, 
the principle of utility, the punishment would be such as, on 
other accounts, ought not to be employed : in which case its 
popularity or unpopularity would never be worth drawing into 
question. It is properly therefore a property not so much of the 
punishment as of the people : a disposition to entertain an un- 
reasonable dislike against an object which merits their approba- 
tion. It is the sign also of another property, to wit, indolence 
or weakness, on the part of the legislator: in suffering the 
people, for the want of some instruction, which ought to be and 
might be given them, to quarrel with their own interest. Be 
this as it may, so long as any such dissatisfaction subsists, it 
behoves the legislator to have an eye to it, as much as if it were 
ever so well grounded. Every nation is liable to have its pre- 
judices and its caprices, which it is the business of the legislator 
to look out for, to study, and to cure ^. 

XXV. The eleventh and last gf all the properties that seem Property 11. 

. ... Kemissi- 

to be requisite in a lot of punishment, is that of remissibility^, biiity. 
The general presumption is, that when punishment is applied, 
punishment is needful : that it ought to be applied, and there- 
fore cannot^ want to be remitted. But in very particular, and 
those always very deplorable cases, it may by accident happen 
otherwise. It may happen that punishment shall have beeu 

* See ch. xiii. [Cases unmeet], § v. 

* See ch. xiiL [Cases unmeet], § iv. par. iv. 
" See View of the Hard Labour Bill, p. 109. 



200 Of the Properties to he given to [chap. 

inflicted, where, according to the intention of the law itself, it 
ought not to have been inflicted : that is, where the sufi^erer is 
innocent of the offence. At the time of the sentence passed he 
appeared guilty : but since then, accident has brought his inno- 
cence to light. This being the case, so much of the destined 
punishment as he has suffered already, there is no help for. The 
business is then to free him from as much as is yet to come. 
But U there any yet to come ? There is very little chance of 
there being any, unless it be so much as consists of chronical 
punishment: such as imprisonment, banishment, penal labour, 
and the like. So much as consists of acute punishment, to wit 
where the penal process itself is over presently, however per- 
manent the punishment may be in its effects, may be considered 
as trremissible. This is the case, for example, with whipping, 
branding, mutilation, and capital punishment. The most perfectly 
irremissible of any is capital punishment. For though other 
punishments cannot, when they are over, be remitted, they may 
be compensated for; and although the unfortunate victim cannot 
be put into the same condition, yet possibly means may be found 
of putting him into as good a condition, as he would have been in 
if he had never suffered. This may in general be done very effec- 
tually where the punishment has been no other than pecuniary. 

There is another case in which the property, of remissibility 
may appear to be of use : this is, where, although the offender 
has been justly punished, yet on account of some good behaviour 
of his, displayed at a time subsequent to that of the commence- 
ment of the punishment, it may' seem expedient to remit a part 
I of it. But this it can scarcely be, if the proportion of the pun- 
ishment is, in other respects, what it ought to be. The purpose 
of example is the more important object, in comparison of that 
of reformation*. It is not very likely, that less punishment 
should be •required for the former purpose than for the latter. 
For it must be rather an extraordinary case, if a punishment, 
which is sufficient to deter a man who has only thought of it 
for a few moments, should not be sufficient to deter a man who 

^ See ch. xiii. [Cases unmeet], ii. note. 



XV.] a Lot of Punishment, 20 1 

has been feeling it all the time. Whatever, then, is required 
for the purpose of example^ must abide at all events : it is not ^ 
any reformation on the part of the offender, that can warrant 
the remitting of any part of it : if it could, a man would have 
nothing to do but to reform imnlediately, and so free himself 
from the greatest part of that punishment which was deemed 
necessary. In order, then, to warrant the remitting of any part 
of a punishment upon this ground, it must first be supposed 
that the punishment at first appointed was more than was ne- 
cessary for the purpose of example, and consequentfy that a part 1 
of it was needless upon the whole. This, indeed, is apt enough 
to be the case, under the imperfect systems that are as yet on 
foot : and therefore, during the continuance of those systems, the 
property of remissibility may, on this second ground likewise, as 
well as on the former, be deemed a useful one, But this would 
not be the case in any new-constructed system, in which the 
rules of proportion above laid down should be observed. In 
such a system, therefore, the utility of this property would rest 
solely on the former ground. 

XXVI. Upon taking a survey of the various possible modes of To obtain all 

punishment, it will appear evidently, that there is not any one projierties, 

of them that possesses all the above properties in perfection, ments must 

"^ be mixed. 

To do the best that can be done in the way of punishment, it 

will therefore be necessary, upon most occasions, to compound 
them, and make them into complex lots, each consisting of a 
number of different modes of punishment put together : the 
nature and proportions of the constituent parts of each lot being 
different, according to the nature of the offence which it is de- 
signed to combat. 

XXVII. It may not be amiss to bring together, and exhibit in The tore- 
one view, the eleven properties above established. They are as properties 

^ recapitula- 

foUows : ted. 

Two of them are concerned in establishing a proper propor- 
tion between a single offence and its punishment ; viz. 

1. Variability. 

2. Equability, 



aoa Of the Properties (o he given to [chap . 

One, in establbhing a proportion, between more offences than 
one, and more ponishments than one ; viz. 

3. Commensuraibility. 

A fourtb contributeB to place the pnniahment in that situation 
in which alone it can be efficacious ; and at the same time to be 
bestowing on it the two farther properties of exemplarity and 
popularity; viz. 



Two others are concerned in excluding all useless punish- 
ment ; the one indirectly, by heightening the efficacy of what is 
useful ; the other in a direct way ; viz. 

5. Exemplarity. 

6, Frugality. 

Three others contribute severally to the three inferior ends of 
punishment ; viz. 

f . Subserviency to reformation. 

8. Kfficacy in disabling. 

9. Subserviency to compensation. 

Another property tends to exclude a collateral miechief, which 
a particular mode of punbhment is liable accidentally to pro- 

10. Popularity. 

The remaining property tends to palliate a mischief, 
which all punishment, as such, ia liable accidentally to pro- 



[I. Bemissibility. 



lity, characteristicaJnesE, ex- 
on, and efficacy in disabling, 
augment the profit which is 
.ty, subserviency to compen- 
, to diminish the expense • 
i subservient to both those 

general survey of the syBtem 
« which, on account of the 
a natural tendency to pro- 



XT.] a Lot of PunUAment, 203 

dac^ and in tbe view of putting a stop to those coneequences, it 
may be proper to annex a certain art^tdtd conseqaence, con- 
eieting of punishmeuf , to be inflicted on the authors of such acts> 
according to the principles just eetabtished. 



CHAPTER XVI. 



DIVISION OP OFFENCES. 



§ I. Classes of Offences. 
Distinction ^ It is necessarv, at the outset, to make a distinction between 

l)6t;DFGGn 

what are such acts as a/re or may be, and such as ought to be offences. 



Method pur- 
sued in the fol* 
lowing divi- 
sions. 



^ This chapter is an attempt to put our ideas of offences into an exact 
method. The particular uses of method are vuious : but the general one 
is, to enable men to understand the things that are the subjects of it. To 
understand a thing, is to be acquainted with its qualities or properties. Of 
these properties, some are common to it with other things ; the rest, pecu- 
liar. But the qualities which are peculiar to any one sort of thing are few 
indeed, in comparison with those which are common to it with other things. 
To make it known in respect of its difference, would therefore be doing 
little, unless it were made known also by its genus. To understand it per- 
fectly, a man must therefore be informed of the points in which it agrees, 
as well as of those in which it disagrees, with iJl other things. When a 
number of objects, composing a logical whole, are to be considered together, 
all of these possessing with respect to one another a certain congruency or 
agreement denoted by a certain name, there is but one way of giving a 
perfect knowledge of their nature ; and that is, by distributing them into a 
system of parcels, each of them a part, either of some other parcel, or, at 
any rate, of the common whole. This can only be done in the way of hipar- 
titiorif dividing each superior branch into two, and but two, immediately 
subordinate ones ; beginning with the logical whole, dividing that into two 
parts, then each of those parts into two others ; and so on. These first - 
distinguished parts agree in respect of those properties which belong to the 
whole : they differ in respect of those properties which are peculiar to each. 
To divide the whole into more than two parcels at once, for example into 
three, would not answer the purpose ; for, in £fict, it is but two objects that 
the mind can compare together exactly at the same time. Thus then, let 
us endeavour to deal with offences ; or rather, strictly speaking, with acts 
which possess such properties as seem to indicate them fit to be constituted 
offences. The task is arduous ; and, as yel at least, perhaps /or eoer^ above 
our force. There is no speaking of objects but by their names : but the 
business of giving them names has always been prior to the true and perfect 
knowledge of their natures. Objects the most dissimilar have been spoken 
of and treated as if their properties were the same. Objects the most similar 
have been spoken of and treated as if they had scarce any thin? in common. 
Whatever discoveries may be made concerning them, how different soever 
their congruencies and disagreements may be found to be firom those which 
are indicated by their names, it is not without the utmost difficulty that 
any means can be found out of expressing those discoveries by a conform- 



Division of Offences. 205 

Any act may be an offence, which they whom the community offences and 
are in the habit of obe3dng shall be pleased to make one : that to be. 
is, any act which they shall be pleased to prohibit or to punish. 
But, upon the principle of utility, such acts alone ought to be 
made offences, as the good of the community requires should be 
made so. 

II. The good of the community cannot require, that any act No act ought 
should be made an offence, which is not liable, in some way or offence but 

what is 

other, to be detrimental to the community. For in the case of detrimental 
such an act, all punishment is grotrndUsa ^. community. 

III. But if the whole assemblaffe of any number of indivi- To be so, it 

. : must be 

duals be considered as constituting an imaginary compound body, detrimental 

a community or political state ; any act that is detrimental to or more of its 

any one or more of those members is, as to so much of its effects, 

detrimental to the state, 

lY. An act cannot be detrimental to a state, but by being de- These may 
trimental to some one or more of the individtuds that compose able or not. 
it. But these individuals may either be assignable^ or un- 
a^ssignable, 

y. When there is any assignable individual to whom an if assim- 
offence is detrimental, that person may either be a person other offender 
than the offen^r, or the offender himself. ^^' « 

VI. Offences that are detrimental, in the first instance, to Glass 1. 

Private 

assignable persons other than the offender, may be termed by offences, 
one common name, offences against indimduals. And of these 
may be composed the ist class^ of offences. To contrast them 

able set of names. Change the import of the old names, and you are in ^ 
perpetual danger of being misunderstood : introduce an entire new set of 
names, and you are sure not to be understood at all. Complete success, 
then, is, as yet at least, imattainable. But an attempt, though imperfect, 
may have its use : and, at the worst, it may accelerate the arrival of that 
peifect system, the possession of which will be the happiness of some ma- 
turer age. Gross ignorance descries no difficulties ; imperfect knowledge 
finds them out, and struggles with them : it must be perfect' knowledge 
that overcomes them. 

^ See ch. xiii. [Cases unmeet], § ii. i. 

' That is, either by name, or at least by description, in such manner as penons assign- 
to be sufficiently distinguished from all others ; for instance, by the circum- *^^*» **°^' 
stance of being the owner or occupier of such and such goods. See B. I. 
tit. [Personation], supra, ch. zii. [Consequences] xv. 



ao6 Division of Offences. [chap. 

with offences of the 2nd and 4th classes, it may also sometimes 
be convenient to style them private offences. To contrast them 
at the same time with offences of the 3rd class, they may be styled 
private extrorregarding offences. 
Class 2. Vn. When it appears, in general, that the're are persons to 

offences. whom the act in question may be detrimental, but such persons 
cannot be individually assigned, the circle within which it appears 
that they may be founds is either of less extent than that which 
comprises the whole community, or not. If of less, the persons 
comprised within this lesser circle may be considered for this 
purpose as composing a body of themselves ; comprised within, 
but distinguishable from, the greater body of the whole com- 
munity. The circumstance that constitutes the union between 
the members of this lesser body, may be either their residence 
within a particular place, or, in short, any other less explicit 
principle of union, which may serve to distinguish them from 
the remaining members of the community. In the first case, 
the act may be styled an offence against a neighbowrhood : in the 
second, an offence against a particular class of persons in the 
community. Offences, then, against a class or neighbourhood, 
may, together, constitute the 2nd class of offences^. To contrast 
them with private offences on the one hand, and public on the 
other, they may also be styled semi-public offences, 
ciaas 8. YIII. Offences, which in the first instance are detrimental to 

ing offences, the offender himself, and to no one else, unless it be by their 
being detrimental to himself, may serve to compose a third class. 
To contrast them the better with offences of the first, second, 

. Limitsbetween ^ With regard to offences against a class or neighbourhood, it is evident, 
pubUc?'anT*" *^** *^® fewer the iodivlduals are, of which such class is composed, and the 
public offences, narrower that neighbourhood is, the more likely are the persons, to whom 
speaK!^f un- ^^^ offonce is detrimental, to' become assignable ; insomuch . that, in some 
^stinguish- cases, it may be difficult to determine concerning a given offence, whether 
it be an offence against individuals, or against a class or neighbourhood. It 
is evident also, that the larger the class or neighbourhood is, the more it 
approaches to a coincidence with the great body of the state. The three 
classes, therefore, are liable, to a certain degree, to run into one another^ 
and be confounded. But this is no more than what is the case, more or 
less, with all those ideal compartments under which men are wont to dis- 
tribute objects for the convenience of discourse. ' 



XVI.] Division of Offences. 207 

and fourth classes, all which are of a [transitwe nature, they l 
might be styled intransitive^ offences ; but still better, self' I 
regarding. 

IX. The fourth class may be composed of such acts as ought ciau 4. 
to be made offences, on account of the distant mischief which offences, 
they threaten to bring upon an unassignable indefinite multitude I 
of the whole number of individuals, of which the community is 
composed : although no particular individual should appear more 
likely to be a sufferer by them than another. These may be 
called public offences, or offences against the state, 

X. A fifth class, or appendix, may be composed of such acts Glass 6. 
as, according to the circumstances in which they are committed, offendesilyiz. 
and more particularly according to the purposes to which they byfiiisehoocU 
are applied, may be detrimental in any one of the ways in which against 
the act of one man can be detrimental to another. These may 
be termed mvUiform, or heterogeneous offences^. Offences that 



trust. 



* See cb. vii. [Actions], xiii. 

* I. OQejiQ&A hy faUtikood : 2. Offences against ^rt^f. See also par. xx. The imperfec- 
to XXX. and par. Ixvi. Maturer views have suggested the feasibility, and ^Sl^e^^an" 
the means, of ridding the system of this anomalous excrescence. Instead ^^'^^^^^^gnt. 
of considering these as so many divisions of offences, divided into genera, 
correspondent and collateral to the several genera distinguished by other 
appellations, they may be considered as so many specific differences, re- 
spectively applicable to those generd. Thus, in the case of a simple personal 
injury f in the operation of which a plan of falsehood has been employed : it 
seems more simple and more natural, to consider the offence thus committed 
as a particular species or modification of the genus of offence termed a simple 
personal injury, than to consider the simple personal injury, when effected 
by such means, as a modification of the division of offences entitled Offences 
through falsehood. By this means the circumstances of the intervention of 
falsehood as an instrument, and of the existence of a particular obligation 
of the nature of a trust, will be reduced to a par with various other classes 
of circumstances capable of affording grounds of modification, commonly of 
aggravation or extenuation, to various genera of offences : instance. Pre- 
meditation^ and conspiracy, on the one hand ; Provocation received, and 
intoxication, on the other. This class will appear, but too plainly, as a 
kind of botch in comparison of the rest. But such is the tskte of science, 
and more particularly of the moral branch ; the distribution of things must 
in a great measure be dependent on their names : arrangement, the work 
of mature reflection, must be ruled by nomenclature, the work of popular 
caprice. 

In the book of the laws, offences must therefore be treated of as much as 
possible under their accustomed names. Generical terms, which are in 
continual use, and which express ideas for which there are no other terms 
in use, cannot safely be discarded. When any such occur, which cannot 



ao8 Division of Offences. [chap. 

tare in this case may be reduced to two great heads : i. Offences 
hj falsehood: and 2. Offences against trust 

§ 2. Divisions cmd sub-divisions. 
Divisionfl of XI. Let US see by what method these classes may be farther 

Class 1 •• •• •• 

(I) Offences sub-divided. First, then, with regard to offences against indi- 
^on; (a) vidnals. 

(3) ^^ta- Ii^ the present period of existence, a man's being and well- 

ConditKm; ^^^g> ^^ happiness and his security; in a word, his pleasures 

and pro^^ ^^^ ^^ immunity from pains, are all dependent, more or less, in 

fSSn wd *^® ^^^^ place, upon his ovm person ; in the next place, upon 

reputation, ^j^g exterior objects that surround him. These objects are either 

things, or other persons. Under one or other of these classes 

must evidently be comprised every sort of exterior object, by 

means of which his interest can be affected. If then, by means 

of any offence, a man should on any occasion become a sufferer, 

it must be in one or other of two ways: i. absolutely, to wit, 

m 

be brought to quadrate with such a plan of classification as appears to be 
most convenient upon the whole, what then is to be done ? There seems 
to be but one thing; which is, to retain them, and annex them to the 
regular part of the system in the form of an appendix. Though they can- 
not, when entire, be made to rank under any of the classes established in 
the rest of the system, the divisions to which they give title may be broken 
down into lesser divisions, which may not be alike intractable. By this 
means, how discordant soever with the rest of the system they may appear 
to be at first sight, on a closer inspection they may be found conformable, 
irregraiarity This must inevitably be the case with the names of offences, which are 

of this class. gQ various and universal in their nature, as to be capable, each of them, 
of doing whatever mischief can be done by any other kind or kinds of 
offences whatsoever. Offences of this description may well be called 
anomalous. 
— which could Such offeuces, it is plain, cannot but show themselves equally intractable 
Sn MySw*^ under every kind of system. Upon whatever principle the system be con- 
pian. structed, they cannot, any of them, with any degree of propriety, be con- 

fined to any one division. If, therefore, they constitute a blemiidi in the 
present system, it i%Buch a blemish as could not be avoided but at the ex- 
pense of a greater. The class they are here thrown into will traverse, in 
its subordinate ramifications, the other classes and divisions of the present 
system : true, but so would they of any other. An irregularity, and that 
but a superficial one, is a less evil than continual error and contradiction. 
But even this slight deviation, which the £Mhion of language seemed to 
render unavoidable at the outset, we shall soon find occasion to correct as 
we advance. For though the first great parcels into which the offences of 
this class are divided are not referable, any of them, to any of the former 
classes, yet the subsequent lesser subdivisions are. 



XVI.] Division of Offences. ^09 

immediately in his own person ; in which case the offence mskf 
be said to be an offence against his person : or, 2. relatively by 
reason of some material ^ relation which he bears to the before-^ 
mentioned exterior objects may happen to bear, in the way of 
causality (see ch. vii. Actions, par. 24) to his happiness. Now in as 
far as a man is in a way to derive either happiness or security from 
any object which belongs to the class of things^ such thing is said 
to be his property, or at least he is said to have a property or an 
interest therein : an offence, therefore, which tends to lessen the 
facility he might otherwise have of deriving happiness or security 
from an object which belongs to the class of things, may be styled 
an offence against his property. With regard to persons, in as 
far as, from objects of this class, a man is in a way to derive 
happiness or security, it is in virtue of their services : in virtue 
of some services, which, by one sort of inducement or another, 
they may be disposed to render him^. Now, then, take any man, 

^ See ch. vii. [Actions] ill. and xxiv. 

If, by reason of the word relation, this part of the division should appear in what manner 
obscure, the unknown term may be jjot rid of in the following manner. jJSJi'depend 
Our ideas are derived, all of them, from the senses ; pleasurable and painful upon the reia- 
ones, therefore, among the rest : consequently, from the operation of sensible bean to »• 
objects upon our senses. A man's happiness, then^ may be said to depend ^^'^'^ objects 
more or less upon the relation he bears to any sensible object, when such 
object is in a way that stands a chance, greater or less, of producing to 
him^ or averting from him, pain or pleasure. Now this, if at all, it must 
do in one or other of two ways ; i. In an cmiive way, properly so called ; 
via. by motion : or, 2. In a passive or quiescent way, by being moved to, or 
acted upon : and in either case, either, i. in an immediate way, by acting 
upon, or being acted on by, the organs of sense, without the intervention 
of any other external object : or, 2. in a more or less remote way, by acting 
upon, or being acted on by, some other external object, which (with the 
intervention of a greater or less number of such objects, and at the end of 
more or less considerable intervals of time) will come at length to act upon, 
or be acted upon by, those organs. And this is equally true, whether the 
external objects in question be things or persons. It is also equally true 
of pains and pleasures of the mind, as of those of th^ body : all the dif- 
ference is, that in the production of these, the pleasure or pain may result 
immediately from the perception which it accompanies : in the production 
of those of the mind, it cannot result from the action of an object of sense, 
any otherwise than by association ; to wit, by means of some connection 
which the perception has contracted with certain prior ones, lodged already 
in the memory ^. 

' See ch. x. [Motives]. 



> See ch. v. [Pleasures and Pains] xv. xxxi Ch. x. [Motives] xxxix. note. 

P 



1(10 Division of Offences* [chap. 

by way of example, and the disposition, whatever it tnay be, 
which he may be in to render you ^rvice, either has no other 
connection to give birth or support to it, than the general one 
which binds him to the whole species, or it has some other con- 
nection more particular. In the latter case, such a connection 
may be spoken of as constituting, in your favour, a kind of ficti- 
tious or incorporeal object of property, which is styled your 
condition. An offence, therefore, the tendency of which is to 
lessen the facility you might otherwise have of deriving happi- 
ness from the services of a person thus specially connected with 
you, may be styled an offence against your condition in life, or 
simply against your condition. Conditions in life must evidently 
be as various as the relations by which they are constituted. 
This will be seen more particularly farther on. In the mean 
time, those of husband, wife, parent, child, master, servant, 
citizen of such or such a city, natural-born subject of such or 
such a country, may answer the purpose of examples. 

Where there is no such particular connection, or (what comes 
to the same thing) where the disposition, whatever it may be, 
which a man is in to render you service, is not considered as 
depending upon such connection, but simply upon the good-will 
he bears to you ; in such case, in order to express what chance 
you have of deriving a benefit from his services, a kind of ficti- 
tious object of property is spoken of, as being constituted in your 
favour, and is called your reputation. An offence, therefore, the 
tendency of which is to lessen the facility you might othermse 
have had of deriving happiness or security from the services of 
persons at large, whether connected with you or not by any 
special tie, may be styled an offence against your repiUation, It 
appears, therefore, that if by any offence an individual becomes 
a sufferer, it must be in one or other of the four points above 
mentioned ; viz. his person, his property, his condition in life, or 
his reputation. These sources of distinction, then, may serve to 
form so many subordinate divisions. If any offences should be 
found to affect a person in more than one of these points at the 
isame time, such offences may respectively be put under so many 



rvi.] Divifton cf Offtnee*^ an 

aeparate divisions ; and such oompcmnd divisions may be sub- 
joined to the preceding simple ones. The several divisions (simple 
and compound together) which are hereinafter established, stand 
as follows : i. Offences against person. 2. Offences against ropu- 
tation. 3. Offences against property. 4. Offences against con- 
dition. 5. Offences against person and property together. 6. 
Offences against person and reputation together^. 

XII. Next with regard to semi-public offences. Pain, con- Divisions of 
sidered with reference to the time of the act from which it is i. Offenooi 
liable to issue, must, it is evident, be either present, past, or calamity, 
future. In as far as it is either present or past, it cannot be the 
result of any act which comes under the description of a semi- 
public offence : for if it be present or past, the individuals who 
experience, or who have experienced, it are assignable^. There 
remains that sort of mischief, which, if it ever come to exist at 
all, is as yet but future : mischief, thus circumstanced, takes the 
name of danger^. Now, then, when by means of the act of any 
person a whole neighbourhood, or other class -of persons, are 
exposed to danger, this danger must either be intentioncbl on his 
part, or unintentional^ If unintentional, such danger, when it 
is converted into actual mischief, takes the name of a calamity: 
offences, productive of such danger, may be styled semi-pvblic 
offences operating through calamity; or, more briefly, offm^es 
through calamity. If the danger be intentional, insomuch that 
it might be produced, and might convert itself into actual mis- 
chief, without the concurrence of any calamity, it may be said to 
originate in mere delvnqueney : offences, then, which, without 
the concurrence of any calamity, tend to produce such danger 

' Subsequent consideration has here suggested several alterations. The 
necessity of adding, to property, powerf in the character of a distinguishable 
as well as valuable object or subject-matter of possession, has presented 
itself to view : and in regard to the fictitious entity here termed condition 
(for shortness instead of saying condition in life), it has been observed to 
be a sort of composite object, compounded of property, reputation^ power, 
and right to aervioes. For this eom/posite object the more proper place was 
therefore at the tail of the several Hmple ones. — N<fte by the Editor, July, 
1822. 

^ Supra, iv. note. ' See ch. xii. [Oonsequences]. 

* See ch. viii. [IntentionaUty}. 

P 2 



11^ Bivmon of Offeneei. [chap» 

as disturbs the secnritj of a local, or other sabordinate class of 

persons, may be styled semi-^public offences operaiing merely hy 

delinqueney, or more briefly, offences of mere delinquency. 

8ab«. XIII. With regard to any fiEu-ther sub-divisions, offences 

oflBBnoes against calamity will depend upon the nature of the seyeral 

iSaSty, calamities to which man, and the several things that are of use 

to him, stand exposed. These will be considered in another 

placed 

9.0ffenoea XlV. Semi-public offences of mere delinquency will follow 

deUn^ncj; the method of division applied to offences against individuals. 

id It will easily be conceived, that whatever pain or inconvenience 



divisionf of ^^7 given individual may be made to suffer, to the danger of 
cS^m, that pain or inconvenience may any number of individuals, as- 
signable or not assignable, be exposed. Now there are four 
points or articles, as we have seen, in respect to which an indi- 
vidual may be made to suffer pain or inconvenience. If then, 
with respect to any one of them, the connection of causes and 
effects is such, that to the danger of suffering in that article a 

■ 

number of persons, who individually are not assignable, may, 

by the delinquency of one person, be exposed, such article will 

form a ground of distinction on which a particular sub-division 

of semi-public offences may be established : if, with respect to 

any such article, no such effect can take place, that ground of 

distinction will lie for the present unoccupied : ready, however, 

upon any change of circumstances, or in the manner of viewing 

the subject, to receive a correspondent subdivision of offences, if 

ever it should seem necessary that any such offences should be 

created. 

Divisions of ^^* ^^ come next to self-regarding offences ; or, more pro- 

co^ide P^rly, to acts productive in the first instance of no other than 

with those of ^ self-regarding mischief: acts which, if in any instance it be 

* See B. I. tit. [Semi-public offences]. In the mean time that of pesti^ 
lence may serve as an example. A man, without any intention of giving 
birth to such a calamity, may expose a neis^bbourhood to the danger of it» 
by breaking quarantine or viohiting any of those other preventive regula« 
tions which governments, at certain conjunctures, may find it expedient to 
have recourse to, for the purpose of guarding against such danger. 



XVI.] Diviaion of Offences. a 13 

thought fit to constitute them offences, will come under the 
denomination of offences against one's self. This class will not 
for the present give us much trouble. For it is evident, that in 
whatever points a man is vulnerable by the hand of another, in 
the same points may he be conceived to be vulnerable by his 
own. "Whatever divisions therefore will serve for the first class, 
the same will serve for this. As to the questions, "What acte are 
productive of a mischief of this stamp 1 and, among such as are, 
which it may, and which it may not, be worth while ^ to treat 
upon the footing of offences 1 these are points, the latter of 
which at least is too unsettled, and too open to controversy, to 
be laid down with that degree of confidence which is implied in 
the exhibition of properties which are made use of as the ground* 
work of an arrangement. Properties for this purpose ought to 
be such as show themselves at first glance, and appear to belong 
to the subject beyond dispute. 

XVI. Public offences may be distributed under eleven divi- Diyiaons of 
sions^ I. Offences against external security. 2. Offences 
di^^m^ justice, 3. Offences against the "preventive branch of the 

* See ch. xiii. [Cases unmeet], § iv. 

' In this part of the analysis, I have found it necessaiy to deviate in Exhaastive 
some degree from the rigid rules of the exhaustive method I set out with. p^ed*frcm. 
By me, or by some one else, this method may, perhaps, be more strictly 
pursued at some maturer pmod of the science. At present, the benefit 
that might result from the unrelaxed observance of it, seemed so precarious, 
that I could not help doubting whether it would pay for the delay and 
trouble. Doubtless such a method is eminently instructive : but the fatigue 
of following it out is so great, not only to the author, but probably also to 
the reader, that if carried to its utmost length at the first attempt, it might 
perhaps do more disservice in the way of disgust, than service in the way 
of information. For knowledge, like physic, how salutary soever in itself, 
becomes no longer of any use, when made too unpalatable to be swallowed. 
Mean time, it cannot but be a mortifying drcumstauce to a writer, who is 
sensible of the importance of his subject, and anxious to do it justice, to 
find himself obliged to exhibit what he perceives to be fibulty, with any 
view, how indistinct soever, of something more perfect before his eyes. If 
there be any thing new and origiucal in this work, it is to the exhaustive 
method so often aimed at that I am indebted for it. It will, therefore, be 
no great wonder if I should not be able to quit it without reluctance. On 
the other hand, the marks of stiffiiess which will doubtless be perceived in 
a multitude of places, are chiefly owing to a solicitous, and not perfectly 
successful, pursuit of this same method. New instrmuents are seldom 
handled at first with perfect ease. 



ai4 Divmon of Off&iice^ [chaf. 

fKjliee, 4. Offences against the public /or^. 5. Offences against 
the positive increase of the national /e/ici^l^. 6. Offences against 
the public t^76a/^A. 7. Offences against j'ojp^a^^^* 8. Offences 
against the national wealth, 9, Offences against the ao'oereignty, 
to. Offences against religion, 11. Offences against the national 
interest in general. The way in which these several sorts of 
offences cooinect with one another, and with the interest of the 
public, that is, of an unassignable multitude of the individuals 
of which that body is composed, may be thus conceived. 
SfThe^e XVII. Mischief by which the interest of the public as above 
Jrs* j^^^^^ defined may be affected, must, if produced at all, be produced 
^^th cither by means of an influence exerted on the operations of 

government, or by other means, without the exertion of such in* 
fluence \ To begin with the latter case : mischief, be it what it 
will, and let it happen to whom it will, must be produced either 
by the unassisted powers of the agent in question, or by the in- 
strumentality of some other agents. In the latter case, these 
agents will be either persons or things. Persons again must be 
either not members of the community in question, or members. 
Mischief produced by the instrumentality of persons, may accord- 
ingly be produced by the instrumentality either of external or 
of internal adversaries. Now when it is produced by the agent's 
own unassisted powers, or by the instrumentality of internal 
adversaries, or only by the instrumentality of things^ it is seldom 
that it can show itself in any other shape (setting aside any 
influence it may exert on the operations of government) than 
either that of an offcDce against assignable individuals, or that of 
an offence against a local or other subordinate class of persons. 
If there should be a way in which mischief can be produced, by 
any of these means, to individuals altogether unassignable, it 
will scarcely be found conspicuous or important enough to 

^ ^he idea of government, it oofty be observed, is introduced here without 
aoy preparation. The fact of its being established, I assume as notorious, 
and the necessity of it as alike obvious and incontestable. Observations 
indicating that necessity, if any such should be thought worth looking at in 
this view, may be found by turning to a passage in a former chapter, where 
they were incidentally adduced for the purpose of illustratioo. See ch. xii. 
[Consequences], § xvii. 



XVI.] JHvision of (^em^t. 215 

occupy a title by itself : it may accordingly be r^erred to tbe 
miscellaneous liead of offences against the nati(mcd interest in 
general ^. The only mischief, of any considerable account, which 
can be made to impend indiscriminately over the whole number 
of members in the community, is that complex kind of mischief 
which results from a state of war, and is produced by the instaru- 
mentality of external adversaries ; by their being provoked, for 
instance, or invited, or eucouraged to invasion. In this way 
may a man very well bring down a mischief, and that a very 
heavy one, upon the whole commtCnity in general, and that with-* 
out taking a part in any of the injuries which came in conse- 
quence to be offered to particular individuals. 

Next with regard to the mischief which an offence may bring 
upon the public by its influence on the operations of the govern-, 
ment. This it may occasion either, i. In a more immediate 
way, by its influence on those operations themselves : 2. In a 
more remote way, by its influence on the instruments by or by 
the help of which those operations should be performed : or \ 3. 
In a more remote way still, by its influence on the sources from 
whence such instruments are to be derived. First then, as to. 
the operations of government, the tendency of these, in as far as 
it is conformable to what on the principle of utility it ought to 
be, is in every case either to avert mischief from the community, 
or to make an addition to the sum of positive good*. Now 

^ See 'mfn^, liv. note. Even this head, ample as it is, and vague as it 
m»j se^u to he, will not, when examined hy the principle of utility, aerye, 
any more than another, to secrete any offence which has no title to be 
placed there. To show the pain or loss of pleasure which is likely to eoaue, 
is a, problem, which before a legislator can justify himself in adding the act 
to the catalogue of o^fi^nces, he may in this case, as in every other, be called 
upon to solve. 

^ ^or examples, see infra, liv. note, Thia branch of the business of 
government, a sort of work of supererogation, as it may be called, in the 
calendar of pQUtical duty, is comparatively but of recent date. It is not 
for this that the untutored many oould have originally submitted themselves 
to the dominion of the few. It was the dread of evil, not the hc^ of good, 
that first cemented societies together. Necessaries come always before 
luxuries. The state of language marks the progress of ideas. Time out of 
mind the military department has had a name : so has that of justice : the 
power which occupies itself in preventing mischief, not till lately, and that 
but a I00S9 one, the police : toe the power which takes for its object the 



ai6 Division of Offences. [chap. 

mischief, we liave seen, must come either from external adver- 
saries, from internal adversaries, or from calamities. With regard 
to mischief from external adversaries, there requires no farther 
division. As to miscliief from internal adversaries, the expe- 
dients employed for averting it may be distinguished into such as 
may be applied hefore the discovery of any mischievous design 
in particular, and such as cannot be employed but in consequence 
of the discovery of some such design : the former of these are 
commonly referred to a branch which may be styled the preveiv- 
tive branch of the jpolice: the latter to that of justice ^. Secondly, 
As to the inatrumenta which government, whether in the avert- 
ing of evil or in the producing of positive good, can have to 
work with, these must be either persons or things. Those which 
are destined to the particular function of guarding against mis- 
chief from adversaries in general, but more particularly from 
external adversaries ', may be distinguished from the rest under 

introduction of positive good, no peculiar name, however inadequate, seems 
yet to have been devised. 

^ The functions of justice, and those of the police, must be apt in many 
points to run one into another : especially as the business would be very 
badly managed if the same persons, whose more particular duty it is to act 
as officers of the police were not upon occasion to act in the capacity of 
officers of justice. The ideas, however, of the two functions may still be 
kept distinct : and I see not where the line of separation can be drawn, 
unless it be as above. 

As to the word 'police, though of Greek extraction, it seems to be of 
French growth : it is from France, at least, that it has been imported into 
Great Britain, where it still retains its foreign garb : in Germany, if it did 
not originate there, it has at least been naturalized. Taken all together, 
the idea belonging to it seems to be too multifarious to be susceptible of 
any single definition . Want of words obliged me to reduce the two branches 
here specified into one. Who would have endured in this place to have 
seen two such words as the phtJiaiw-paranomic or crime-preventing, and the 
phthano-symphoric or codamity -preventing, branches of the police ? the incon- 
veniences of uniting the two branches under the same denomination, are, 
however, the less, inasmuch as the operations requisite to be performed for 
the two purposes will in many cases be the same. Other functions, com- 
monly referred to the head of police, may be referred either to the head of 
that power which occupies itself in promoting in a positive way the increase 
of the national felicity, or of that which eniploys itself in the management 
of the public wealth. See infra, liv. note. 

' It is from abroad that those pernicious enterprises are most apt to 
originate, which come backed with a greater quantity of physical force 
than the persons who are in a more particular sense the officers of justice 
are wont to have at their command. Mischief the perpetration of which is 



XVI.] Divmon of Offences. 217 

the collective appellation of the public military force, and, for con- 
ciseness' sake, the military force. The rest may be characterised 
by the collective appellation of the public weaUK Thirdly, with 
regard to the sources or funds from whence these instruments, 
howsoever applied, must be derived, such of them as come under 
the denomination of persona must be taken out of the whole 
number of persons that are in the community, that is, out of the 
total population of the state : so that the greater the popula- 
tion, the greater may casteris paribus be this branch of the public 
wealth; and the less, the less. In like manner, such as come 
under the denomination of things may be, and most of them 
commouly are, taken out of the sum total of those things which 
are the separate properties of the several members of the com- 
munity: the sum of which properties maybe termed the national 
wealth^ : so that the greater the national wealth, the greater cceteris 
paribus may be this remaining branch of the public wealth ; and 
the less, the less. It is here to be observed, that if the influence 
exerted on any occasion by any individual over the operations of 
the government be pernicious, it must be in one or other of two 
ways: i. By causing, or tending to cause, operations not to be 
performed which ought to be performed; in other words, by 
impeding the operations of government. Or, 2. By causing 
operations to be performed which ought not to be performed ; 
in other words, by misdirecting them. Lastly, to the total 

ensured by a force of sacli magnitude, may therefore be looked upon in 
general as the work of external adversaries. Accordingly, when the persons 
by whom it is perpetrated are in such force as to bid defiance to the ordi- 
nary efforts of justice, they loosen themselves from their original denonuna- 
tion in proportion as they increase in force, tUl at length they are looked 
upon as being no longer members of the state, but as standing altogether 
upon a footing with external adversaries. Give force enough to robbery, 
and it swells into rebellion : give permanence enough to rebellion, and it 
Bettles into hostility. 

^ It must be confessed, that in common speech the distinction here 
established between the public wealth and the national wealth is but 
indifferently settled : nor is this to be wondered at ; the ideas themselves, 
though here necessary to be distinguished, being so frequently convertible. 
But I am mistaken if the language will fiimish any other two words that 
would express the distinction better. Those in question will, I imagine, 
be allowed to be thus &r well chosen, that if they were made to change 
their places, the import given to them would not appear to be quite so 
proper as that which is given to them as they stand at present. 



ai8 Divmon of Offences^ [chap. 

assemblage of the persons by whom the several political operations 
above mentioned come to be performed, we set out with apply- 
ing the collective appellation of the government. Among thesa 
persons there commonly ^ is some one person, or body of persons, 
whose office it is to assign and distribute to the rest their several 
departments^ ta determine the conduct to be pursued by each in 
the performance of the particular set of operations that belongs 
to him^ and even upon occasion to exercise his function in hi9 
stead. "Where there is any such person, or body of persons, h9 
or it may, according as the turn of the phrase requires, be termed 
the tovereign, or the sovereignty, Now it is evident, that to im-i 
pede or misdirect the operations of the sovereign, as here de- 
s^ihed, may be to impede or misdirect the operations of the 
several departments of government as described above. 

From this analysis, by which the connection between the 
several above-mentioned heads of offences is exhibited, we may 
now collect a definition for each article. By offences against 
external security, we may understand sueh offences whereof the 
tendency is to bring upon the public a mischief resulting from 
the hostilities of foreign adversaries. By offences against justice, 
such offences whereof the tendency is to impede or misdirect the 
operations of that power which is employed in the business of 
guarding the public against the mischiefs resulting from the de-^ 
Unquency of internal adversaries, as far as it is to be done by 
expedients, which do not come to be applied in any ease till <tfter 
the discovery of some particular design of the sprt of those which 
they are calculated to prevent. By offences agamst the preventive 
branch of the police, such offences whereof the tendency is to 
impede or misdirect the operations of that power which is em- 
ployed in guarding against mischiefs resulting from the delin- 
quency of internal adversaries, by expedients that come to be 
applied heforehaiid; or of that which is employed in guarding 

' I should have been afraid to have said necessarily. In the United 
Provinces, in the Helvetic, or even in the Germanic budy» where is that 
one assembly in which an absolute power over the whole resides ? where 
was there m the Boman Commonwealth T I would not undertake for 
certain to find an answer to all these questiona. 



XVI.]' Dividon of Offences. 219 

against the mischiefs that might be occasioned hj pbysici^ cala- 
mities. By offences against the public foree^ such offences whereof 
the tendency is to impede or misdirect the operations of that 
power which is destined to goard the public from the mischiefs 
which may result from the hostility of foreign adversaries, and, 
in case of necessity, in the capacity of ministers of justice, from 
mischiefs of the number of those which result from the delin- 
quency of internal adversaries. 

By offences against ^ increase of the national felicity, such 
offences whereof the tendency is to impede or misapply the ope- 
rations of those powers that are employed in the conducting of 
yarious establishments, which are calctdated to make, in so many 
different ways, a positive addition to the stock of public happi^ 
ness. By offences against the public toealth, such offences whereof 
the tendency is to diminish the amount dt misdirect the applica- 
tion of the money, and other articles of wealth, which the go^ 
vernment reserves as a fund, out of which the stock of instruments 
employed in the service above mentioned may be kept up. By 
offences against pofndation, such offences whereof the tendency 
is to diminish the numbers or impair the political value of the 
sum total of the members of the community. By ojffenus against 
the national wealthy such offences whareof the tendency is to di- 
minish the quantity, or impair the value, of the things which 
compose the separate propertiea or estates of the several mem- 
bers of the community. 

XVIII. In this deduction, it may be asked, what place is left Connection 

•^ • of offences 

for religion f This we shall see presently. For combating the against 

_,,_^_ t 1 » t> li. religion with 

various kinds of offences above enumerated, that is, for combatmg the fore- 
all the offences (those not excepted which we are now about oon- 
sidering) which it is in man's nature to commit, the state has 
two great engines, punishment and reward : punishment, to be 
applied to all, and upon all ordinary occasions: reward, to be 
applied to a few, for particular purposes, and upon extraordinary 
occasions. But whether or no a man has done the act which 
renders him an object meet for punishment or reward, the eyes 
of those, whosoever they be, to whom the management of these 



7,20 Division of Offences, [chap. 

engines is entrusted cannot always see, nor, where it is punish- 
ment that is to be administered, can their hands be always sure 
to reach him. To supply these deficiencies in point of power, it 
is thought necessary, or at least tisefid (without which the truth 
of the doctrine would be nothing to the purpose), to inculcate 
into the minds of the people the belief of the existence of a power 
applicable to the same purposes, and not liable to the same de* 
ficiencies : the power of a supreme invisible being, to whom a 
disposition of contributing to the same ends to which the several 
institutions already mentioned are calculated to contribute, must 
for this purpose be ascribed. It is of course expected that this 
power will, at one time or other, be employed in the promoting 
of those ends : and to keep up and strengthen this expectation 
among men, is spoken of as being the employment of a kind of 
allegorical personage, fftgned, as before ^, for convenience of dis* 
course, and styled religion. To diminish, then, or misapply the 
influence of religion, is pro tanto to diminish or misapply what 
power the state has of combating with effect any of the before- 
enumerated kinds of offences ; that is, all kinds of offences what- 
soever. Acts that appear to have this tendency may be styled 
offences against religion. Of these then may be composed the 
tenth division of the class of offences against the state ^. 



* See par. xvii. with regard to justice, 

^ It may be observed, that upon this occasion I consider religion in no 
other light, than in respect of the influence it may have on the happiness 
of the present life. Ajb to the effects it may have in assuring us of and 
preparing us for a better life to come, this is a matter which comes not 
within the cognizance of the legislator. See tit. [Offences against religion]. 

I say offences against religion, the fictitious entity : not offences against 
God, the real being. For, what sort of pain should the act of a feeble 
mortal occasion to a bein^ unsusceptible of pain ? How should an offence 
affect him t Should it be an offence against his person, his property, his 
reputation, or his condition ? 

It has commonly been the way to put offences against religion foremost. 
The idea of precedence is naturally enough connected with that of reverence. 
'Ek Albs dpxwfifoOa, But for expressing reverence, there are other methoda 
enough that are less equivocal. And in point of method and perspicuity, 
it is evident, that with regard to offences against religion, neither the nature 
of the mischief which it is their tendency to produce, nor the reason there 
may be for punishing them, can be understood, but from the consideration 
of the several mi8chie& which result from the several other sorts of offences. 



XVI,] Division of O^ences. aai 

XIX. If there be any acts which appear liable to affect the Comiection 
state in any one or more of the above ways, by operating in a^jnst the 
prejudice of the estemal security of the state, or of its internal interest in 

* •* . . . general with 

security ; of the public force ; of the increase of the national the rest, 
felicity; of the public wealth; of the national population; of the 
national wealth ; of the sovereignty ; or of religion ; at the same 
time that it is not clear in which of all these ways they will 
affect it most, nor but that, according to contingencies, they may 
affect it in one of these ways only or in another ; such acts may 
be collected together under a miscellaneous division by them- 
selves, and styled offences against the national interest in general. 
Of these then may be composed the eleventh and last division of 
the class of offences against the state. 

XX. We come now to class the fifth : consisting of multiform Sub- 
offences. These, as has been already intimated, are either of- Class 5 
fences by falsehoody or offences concerning trust. Under the Divisions 

of offences 

head of offences by falsehood, may be comprehended, i. Simple byfoisehood. 
falsehoods. 2. Forgery. 3. Personation. 4. Perjury ^ Let 
us observe in what particulars these four kinds of falsehood 
agree, and in what they differ. 

XXI. Offences by falsehood, however diversified in other par- Offences by 

ftklsehoocl in 

ticulars, have this in common, that they consist in some abuse of what they 
the faculty of discpurse, or rather, as we shall see hereafter, of one another. 

In a political view, it is only because those others are mischievous, that 
offences against religion are so too. 

^ This division of falsehoods, it is to be observed, is not regularly drawn 
out : that being what the nature of the case will not here admit of. False- 
hood may be infinitely diversified in other ways than these. In a particular 
case, for instance, simple falsehood when uttei*ed by writing, is distinguished 
from the same falsehood when uttered by word of mouth ; and has had a 
particular name given to it accordingly. I mean, where it strikes against 
reputation ; in which case, the instrument it has been uttered by has been 
called a lihd. Now it is obvious, that in the same manner it might have 
received a distinct name in all other cases where it is uttered by writing. 
But there has not happened to be any thing in particular that has disposed 
mankind in those cases to give it such a name. The case is, that among 
the infinity of circumstances by which it might have been diversified, those 
which constitute it a libel, happen to have engaged a peculiar share of 
attention on the part of the institutors of language ; either in virtue of the 
influence which these circumstances have on the tendency of the act, or in 
virtue of any particular degree of force with which on any other account 
they may have disposed it to strike upon the imagination. 



aaa IHmsion of Offences. [chap, 

the faculty of inflaencing the sentiment of belief in other men \ 
whether by discourse or otherwise. The use of discourse is to 
influence belief, and that in such manner as to give other men 
to understand that things are as they are really. Falsehoods, of 
■vdiatever kind they be, agree in this: that they gire men to 
understand tiuit things are otherwise than as in reality they are* 
— in what XXIL Personation, forgery, and perjuiy, are each of thean 
t ey d er. ^g^inguished from other modes of uttering falsehood by certaiii 
special circumstances. When a falsehood is not accompanied 
by any of those circumstances, it may be styled simple falsehood. 
These circumstances are, i. The form in which the falsehood is 
uttered. 2. The circumstance of its relating or not to the iden- 
tity of the ^person of him who utters it, 3. The solemnity of the 
occasion on which it is uttered ^. The particular application of 
these distinctive characters may more comm odiously be reserved 
for another place *. 
Sub- XXlll. We come now to the sub-divisions of offences by 

oSnSs^y falsehood. These will bring us back into the regular track of 
aredeter- analysis, pursued, without deviation, through the four preceding 

mined by •• 

the divisions Classes. 

preening ^7 whatever means a mischief is brought about, whether 
*^^**®®** falsehood be or be not of the number, the individuals liable to 
be affected by it must either be assignable or unassignable. If 
assignable, there are but four material articles in respect to which 
they can be affected : to wit, their persons, their properties, their 
reputations, and their conditions in life. The case is the same, 
if, though unassignable, they are comprisable in any class subor- 
dinate to that which is composed of the whole number of mem- 
bers of the state. If the falsehood tend to the detriment of the 
whole state, it can only be by operating in one or other of the 

^ See B. I. tit. [Falsehoods]. 

^ There are two other circumstances still more material; viz. i. The 
parties whose interest is affected by the falsehood : 2. The point or article 
in which that interest is affected. These circumstances, however, enter not 
into the composition of the generical character. Their use is, as we shall 
see, to characterize the several spedes of each genus. See B. I. tit, 
[Falsehoods]. 

« Ibid. 



XVI,] Division af Offences^, A 23 

obanicters, which every act that is an offence against the state 
must assume ; yiz. that of an offence against external security, 
against justice, against the preventive branch of the police, 
against the public force, against the increase of the national 
feHeity, against the public wealth, against the national popula- 
tion, against the national wealth, against the sovereignty of the 
state, or against its religion^ 

XXIV. It is the common property, then, of the offences that Offences of 
belong to this division, to run over the same ground that is some in- 
occupied by those of the preceding classes. But some of them, change their 
as we shall see, are apt, on various occasions, to drop or change others not. 
the names which bring them under this division : this is chiefly 
the case with regard to simple falsehoods. Others retain their 
names unchanged ; and even thereby supersede the names which 
would otherwise beloug to the offences which they denominate : 
this is chiefly the case. with regard to personation, forgery, and 
peijury. When this circumstance then, the circumstance of 
falsehood, intervenes, in some cases the name which takes the 
lead is that which indicates the offence by its effect ; in other 
cases, it is that which indicates the expedient or instrument as it 
were by the help of which the offence is committed. Falsehood, 
take it by itself, consider it as not being accompanied by any 
other material circumstances, nor therefore productive of any 
material effects, can never, upon the principle of utility, consti- 
tute any offence at all. Combined with other circumstances, 
there is scarce any sort of pernicious effect which it may not 
be instrumental in producing. It is therefore rather in com- 
pliance with the laws of language, than in consideration of the 
nature of the things themselves, that falsehoods are made sepa- 
rate mention of under the name and in the character of distinct 
offences. All this would appear plain enough, if it were now a 
time for entering into particulars : but that is what cannot be 
done, consistently with any principle of order or convenience, 
until the inferior divisions of those other classes shall have been 
previously exhibited. 

:XXV^ "We come now to offences against trust. A trust i% ^^J^*^^ 



224 



Division of Offences. 



[chap. 



where there is any particular act which one party, in the exercise 
of some power, or some rightly which is conferred on him, is 

Ptmer and ^ Powers, though Dot a species of rights (for the two sorts of fictitious 

compiete^cfi- ' ciitities, termed a 'power and a rights are altogether disparate) are yet so far 
nition is here included uuder rights, that wherever the word power may be employed, the 
given o them. ^^^ right may also be employed : The reason is, that wherever you may 
speak of a person as having a power, you may also speak of him as having 
a right to such power : but the converse of this proposition does not hold 
good : there are cases in which, though you may speak of a man as having 
a right, you cannot speak of him as having a power, or in any other way 
make any mention of that word. On various occasions you have a right, 
for instance, to the services of the magistrate : but if you are a private per- 
son, you have no power over him : all the power is on his side. This being 
the case, as the word right was employed, the word power might perhaps, 
without any deficiency in the sense, have been omitted. On the present 
occasion however, as in speaking of trusts this word is commonly made 
more use of than the word right, it seemed most eligible, for the sake of 
perspicuity, to insert them both. 

It may be expected that, since the word trust has be«n here expounded, 
the words power and right, upon the meaning of which the exposition of 
the word trust is made to depend, should be expounded also : and certain 
^ it is, that no two words can stand more in need of it than these do. Such 
exposition I accordingly set about to give, and indeed have actually drawn 
up : but the details into which I found it necessary to enter for this pur* 
pose, were of such length as to take up more room than could consistently 
be allotted to them in this place. With respect to these words, therefore, 
and a number of others, such as possession, title, and the like, which in point 
of import are inseparably connected with them, instead of exhibiting the 
exposition itself, I must content myself with giving a general idea of the 
plan which I have pursued in framing it : and as to every thing else, I 
must leave the import of them to rest upon whatever footing it may happen 
to stand upon in the apprehension of each reader. Power and right, and 
the whole tribe of fictitious entities of this stamp, are all of them, in the 
sense which belongs to them in a book of jurisprudence, the results of some 
manifestation or other of the legislator's will with respect to such or such 
an act. Now every such manifestation is either a prohibition, a conmiand, 
' or their respective negations ; viz. a permission, and the declaration which 
the legislator makes of his will when on any occasion he leaves an act un- 
commanded. Now, to render the expression of the rule more concise, the 
commanding of a positive act may be represented by the prohibition of the 
negative act which is opposed to it. To know then how to expound a 
right, carry your eye to the act which, in the circumstances in question, 
would be a violation of that right : the law creates the right by prohibiting 
that act. Power, whether over a man's own person, or over other persons^ 
or over things, is constituted in the first instance by permission : but in as 
&r as the law takes an active part in corroborating it, it is created by pro" 
hibition, and by command : by prohibition of such acts (on the part of 
other persons) as are judged incompatible with the exercise of it ; and upon 
occasion, by conomand of such acts as are judged to be necessary for the 
removal of such or such obstacles of the number of those which may occur 
to impede the exercise of it. For every right which the law confers on 
one party, whether that party be an individual, a subordinate class bf 



XVI.] Division of Offences. 225 

bound to perform for the benefit of another. Or, more fiilly, 
thus : A party is said to be invested with a trust, when, being 
invested with a power, or with a righty there is a certain be- 
haviour which, in the exercise of that power, or of that right, he 
is bound to maintain for the benefit of some other party. In 
such case, the party first mentioned is styled a trustee : for the. 
other party, no name has ever yet been found : for want of a 

individuals, or the public, it thereby imposes on some other party a dv;ty or 
obligation. But there may be hiws which command or prohibit acts, that 
is, impose duties, without any other view than the benefit of the agent : 
these generate no rights : duties, therefore, may be either extra-regarding 
or adf-regarding : extra-regarding have rights to correspond to them : self- 
regarding, none. 

That the exposition of the words power and right must, in order to be 
correct, enter into a great variety of details, may be presently made appear. 
One branch of the system of right? and powers, and but one, are those of 
which property is composed : to be correct, then, it must, among other 
things, be appUcable to the whole tribe of modifications of which property 
is susceptible. But the commands and prohibitions, by which the powers 
and rights that compose those several modifications are created, are of 
many different forms : to comprise the exposition in question within the 
compass of a single paragraph, would therefore be impossible : to take as 
many paragraphs for it as would be necessary, in order to exhibit these 
different forms, would be to engage in a detail so ample, that the analjrsis 
of the several possible species of property would compose only a part of it. 
This labour, uninviting as it was, I have accordingly undei^ne : but the 
result of it, as may well be imagined, seemed too voluminous and minute to 
be exhibited in an outline like the present. Happily it is not necessary, 
except only for the scientific purpose of arrangement, to the understanding 
of any thing that need be said on the penal branch of the art of legislation. 
In a work which should treat of the civil branch of that art, it would find 
its proper place : and in such a work, if conducted upon the plan of the 
present one, it would be indispensable. Of the limits which seem to sepa- 
rate the one of these branches firom the other, a pretty ample description 
will be found in the next chapter : from which some further lights respect- 
ing the course to be taken for developing the notions to be annexed to the 
words right and power, may incidentally be collected. See in particular, 
§ 3 and 4. See also par. Iv. of the present chapter. 

I might have cut this matter veiy short, by proceeding in the usual 
strain, and saying, that a power was a faculty, and that a right was a privi- 
lege, and so on, following the beaten track of definition. But the inanity 
of such a method, in cases like the present, has been already pointed out ^ : 
a power is not a — ^any thing : neither is a right a — any thing : the case is, 
they have neither of them any superior genus : these, together with dvly, 
obligation, and a multitude of others of Uie same stamp, being of the num- 
ber of those fictitious entities, of which the import can by uo other means 
be illustrated than by showing the relation which they bear to real ones. 

«»— — ^— ■— — ■ — — ^ 

1 See Fragment of Government, ch. v, $ 6, note, 

9 



27,6 Divimn of Ofences. [chap. 

name, there seems to be no other resource than to give a new 
and more extensive sense to the word beneficiary , or to say at 
length the pa/rty to be benefited ^. 

The trustee is also said to have a trust conferred or imposed 
upon him, to be invested with a trust, to have had a trust given 
him to execute, to perform, to discharge, or to fulfil The party 
to be benefited, is said to have a trust established or created in 
his favour : and so on through a variety of other phrases. 
Ofltencee XXVI. Now it may occur, that a trust is oftentimes spoken 

trust, con- of as a species of condition ^ : that a trust is also spoken of as a 



^ The first of these parties is styled in the law language, as well as in 
common speech, by the name here given to him. The other is styled, in 
the technical language of the English law, a cestuy que trust : in common 
speech, as we have observed, there is, unfortunately, no name for him. As 
to the law phrase, it is antiquated French, and though complex, it is still 
elliptical, and to the highest degree obscure. The phrase in full length 
would run in some such manner as this : cestuy al use de qui le trust est 
dcii : he to whose use the trust or benefit is created. In a particular case, 
a cestuy que trust is called by the Boman law, jidei-commissarius. In imi- 
tation of this, I have seen him somewhere or other called in English a fide* 
committee. This term, however, seems not very expressive. A fide-com- 
mittee, or, as it should have been, a/c^ei-committee, seems, literally speak- 
ing, to mean one who is committed to the good faith of another, (rood 
faith seems to consist in the keeping of a promise. But a trust may be 
created without any promise in the case. It is indeed common enough to 
exact a promise, in order the more effectually to oblige a man to do that 
which he is made to promise he will do. But this is merely an accidental 
circumstance. A trust may be created without any such thing. What is 
it that constitutes a legal obligation in any case ? A conmiand, express or 
virtual, together with punishment appointed for the breach of it. By the 
same means may an obligation be constituted in this case as well as any 
other. Instead of the word henfifi,ciaryt which I found it necessary to 
adopt, the sense would be better expressed by some such word as bene" 
ficiendary (a word analogous in its formation to referendary), were it such 
an one as the ear could bring itself to endure. This would put it more 
effectually out of doubt, that the party meant was the party who (yught to 
receive the benefit, whether he actually receives it or no : whereas the word 
beneficiary might be understood to intimate, that the benefit was a^tially 
received : while in offences against trust the mischief commonly i^, that 
such benefit is reaped not by the person it was designed for, but by some 
other : for instance, the trustee. 

^ It is for shortness^ sake that the proposition is stated as it stands in 
the text. If critically examined, it might be found, perhaps, to be scarcely 
justifiable by the laws of language. For the fictitious entities, charac- 
terised by the two abstract terms, trust and condition, are not subaltern ate 
"but disparate. To speak with perfect precision, we should say that he who 
18 invested with a trust is, on that account, spoken of as being invested 



XVI.] IHmsion of Offences, 327 

species of property: and that a condition itself is also spoken of dition,and 
in the same light. It may be thought, therefore, that in the first why ranked 
class, the division of offences against condition should have been separate 
included under that of the offences against property : and that 
at any rate, so much of the fifth class now before us as contains 
offences against trust, should have been included under oue or 
other of those two divisions of the first class. But upon exami- 
nation it will appear, that no one of these divisions could with 
convenience, nor even perhaps with propriety, have been included 
under either of the other two. It will appear at the same time, 
that there is an intimate connection subsisting amongst them 
all : insomuch that of the lists of the offences to which they are 
respectively exposed, any one may serve in great measure as a 
model for any other. There are certain offences to which all 
trusts as such are exposed : to all these offences every sort of 
condition will be found exposed: at the same time that par- 
ticular species of the offences against trust will, upon their 
application to particular conditions, receive different particular 
denominations. It will appear also, that of the two groups of 
offences into which the list of those against trust will be found 
naturally to divide itself, there is one, and but one, to which 
property, taken in its proper and more confined sense, stands 
exposed : and that these, in their application to the subject of 
property, will be found susceptible of distinct modifications, to 
which the usage of language, and the occasion there is for dis- 
tinguishing them in point of treatment, make it necessary to 
find names. 

In the first place, as there are, or at least may be (as we shall 
see) conditions which are not trusts^, so there are trusts of which 
the idea would not be readily and naturally understood to be 
included under the word condition : add to which, that of those 
conditions which do include a trust, the greater number include 
other ingredients along with it : so that the idea of a condition, 

with a condition : viz. the condition of a trustee. We speak of the condi- 
tion of a trustee as we speak of the condition of a husband or a Mher. 
* Infra, Iv. 

Q2 



%28 Bivimn of Ofences. [chap. 

if on the one hand it stretches beyond the idea of a trust, does 
on the other hand fall short of it. Of the several sorts of trusts, 
by far the most important are those in which it is the public 
that stands in the relation of beneficia/ry. Now these trusts, it 
should seem, would hardly present themselves at first view upon 
the mention of the word condition. At any rate, what is more 
material, the most important of the offences against these kinds 
of trust would not seem to be included under the denomina- 
tion of offences against condition. The offences which by this 
latter appellation would be brought to view, would be such 
only as seemed to affect the interests of an individual: of 
him, for example, who is considered as being invested with 
that condition. But in offences against public trust, it is the 
influence they have on the interests of the public that constitutes 
by much the most material part of their pernicious tendency : 
the influence they have on the interests of any individual, the 
only part of their influence which would be readily brought to 
view by the appellation of offences against condition, is com- 
paratively as nothing. The word trust directs the attention at 
once to the interests of that party for whom the person in ques- 
tion is trustee : which party, upon the addition of the epithet 
public^ is immediately understood to be the body composed of 
the whole assemblage, or an indefinite portion of the whole as- 
semblage of the members of the state. The idea presented by 
the words public trust is clear and unambiguous : it is but an 
obscure and ambiguous garb that that idea could be expressed 
in by the words public condition. It appears, therefore, that the 
principal part of the offences, included under the denomination 
of offences against trust, could not, commodiously at least, have 
been included under the head of offences against condition. 

It is evident enough, that for the same reasons neither could 
they have been included under the head of offences against 
property. It would have appeared preposterous, and would 
have ai^ed a total inattention to the leading principle of the 
whole work, the principle of utility, to have taken the most 
mischievous and alarming part of the offences to which the 



XVI.] Division of Offences* aay 

public Biande exposed, and forced them into the list of offences 
against the property of an individual : of that individual, to wit, 
who in that case would be considered as having in him the 
property of that public trust, which by the offences in question 
is affected. 

Nor would it have been less improper to have included con- 
ditions, all of them, under the head of property: and thereby 
the whole catalogue of offences against condition, under the 
catalogue of offences against property. True it is, that there are 
offences against condition, which perhaps with equal propriety, 
and without any change in their nature, might be considered in 
the light of offences against property: so extensive and so vague 
are the ideas that are wont to be annexed to both these objects* 
But there are other offences which though with unquestionable 
propriety they might be referred to the head of offences against 
condition, could not, without the utmost violence done to lan^ 
guage, be forced under the appellation of offences against 
property. Property, considered with respect to the proprietor, 
implies invariably a benefit, and nothing else : whatever obliga> 
tions or burthens may, by accident, stand annexed to it, yet in 
itself it can never be otherwise than beneficial. On the part of 
the proprietor, it is created not by any commands that are laid 
on him, but by his being left free to do with such or such an 
article as he likes. The obligations it is created by, are in every 
instance laid upon other people. On the other hand, as to con- 
ditions, there are several which are of a mixed nature, importing 
as well a burthen to him who stands invested with them as a 
benefit : which indeed is the case with those conditions which we 
hear most of under that name, and which make the greatest 
figure. 

There are even conditions which import nothing but burthen, 
without any spark of benefit. Accordingly, when between two 
parties there is such a relation, that one of them stands in the 
place of an object of property with respect to the other ; the word 
property is applied only on one side ; but the word condition is 
applied alike to both : it is but one of them that is said on that 



ay) Division of Offences. [chap. 

account to be possessed of a property; but both of them are alike 
spoken of as being possessed of or being invested with a con- 
dition : it is the master alone that is considered as possessing a pro- 
perty, of which the servant, in virtue of the services he is bound 
to render, is the object : but the servant, not less than the master, 
is spoken of as possessing or being invested with a condition. 

The case is, that if a man's condition is ever spoken of as 
constituting an article of his jpro'perty, it is in the same loose and 
indefinite sense of the word in which almost every other offence 
that could be imagined might be reckoned into the list of 
offences against property. If the language indeed were in every 
instance, in which it made use of the phrase, object of proj^erty, 
perspicuous enough to point out under that appellation the 
material and really existent body, the person or the thing in 
which those acts terminate, by the performance of which the 
property is said to be enjoyed; if, in short, in the import given 
to the phrase object of property, it made no other use of it than 
the putting it to signify what is now called a corporeal object, 
this difficulty and this confusion would not have occurred. But 
the import of the phrase object of property, add in consequence 
the import of the word property, has been made to take a much 
wider range. In almost every case in which the law does any 
thing for a man's benefit or advantage, men are apt to speak of 
it, on some occasion or other, as conferring on him a sort of 
property. At the same time, for one reason or other, it has in 
several cases been not practicable, or not agreeable, to bring to 
view, under the appellation of tJie object of his property, the thing 
in which the acts, by the performance of which the property is 
said to be enjoyed, have their termination, or the person in 
whom they have their commencement. Yet something which 
could be spoken of under that appellation was absolutely requi- 
site^. The expedient then has been to create, as it were, on 

* It is to be observed, that in common speech, in the phrase tJie object of 
a marCs propei^f/f the words the object of are commonly left out ; and by an 
ellipsis, which, violent as it is, is now become more familiar than the phrase 
at length, they have made that part of it which consists of the words a 
man's property perform the office of the whole. In some cases then ii 



XVI.] Biv'mon of Offences. aji 

every occasion, an ideal beings and to assign to a man this ideal 
being for the object of his property : and these are the sort of 
objects to which men of science, in taking a view of the opera- 
tioDis of the law in this behalf, came, in process of time, to give 
the name of incorporeal. Now of these incorporeal objects of 
property the variety is prodigious. Fictitious entities of this 
kind have been fabricated almost out of every thing : not conr 
ditions only (that of a trustee included), but even reputation 
have been of the number. Even liberty has been considered in 
this same point of view : and though on so many occasions it is 
conUtisted with property, yet on other occasions, being reckoned 
into the catalogue of possessions, it seems to have been con- 
sidered as a branch of property. Some of these applications of 
the words property ^ object of property (the last, for instance), are 
looked upon, indeed, as more figurative, and less proper than 
the rest : but since the truth is, that where the immediate object, 
is incorporeal, they are all of them imi)roper, it is scarce prac- 
ticable any where to draw the line. 

Notwithstanding all this latitude, yet, among the relations in 

was only ou a paH of the object that the acts in question might be per-' 
formed : and to say, on this account, that the object was a man's property, 
was as much as to intimate that they might be performed on any part. In. 
other cases it was only certain particular acts that might be exercised on 
the object : and to say of the object that it was his property, was as much 
as to intimate that any acts whatever might be exercised on it. Some- 
times the acts in question were not to be exercised but at a future timef 
nor then, perhaps, but in the case of the happening of a particular event, 
of which the happening was uncertain : and to say of an object that it was 
his property, was as much as to intimate that the acts in question might 
be exercised on it at any time. Sometimes the object on which the acts in 
question were to have their termination, or their commencement, was a 
human creature : and to speak of one human creature as being the property 
of another is what would shock the ear every where but where slavery is 
established, and even there, when applied to persons in any other condition 
than that of slaves. Among the first Romans, indeed, the wife herself was 
the property of her husband ; the child, of his father ; the servant, of his 
master. In the civilised nations of modem times, the two first kinds of 
propert}' are altogether at an end : and the last, unhappily not yet at an 
end, but however verging, it is to be hoped, towards extinction. The hus- 
band's property is now the company ^ of his wife ; the father's the guardian- 
ship and service of his child ; the master's, the service of his servant. 
-— — - — — ■ - - . ■ ■■ ■ -■■■.. 

1 Hie eofMortitim, nys the ^^iah Law. 



23^ Division of Offences, [cha?. 

virtue of wbicli you are said to be possessed of a condition, there 
is one at least which can scarcely^ by the most forced construc- 
tion, be said to render any other man, or any other thing, the 
object of your property. This is the right of persevering in a 
certain course of action ; for instance, in the exercising of a 
certain trade. Now to confer on you this right, in a certain 
degree at least, the law has nothing more to do than barely to 
abstain from forbidding you to exercise it. Were it to go 
farther, and, for the sake of enabling you to exercise your trade 
to the greater advantage, prohibit others from exercising the 
like, then, indeed, persons might be found, who in a certain sense, 
and by a construction rather forced than otherwise, might be 
spoken of as being the objects of your property : viz. by being 
made to render you that sort of negative service which consists 
in the forbearing to do those acts which would lessen the profits 
of your trade. But the ordinary right of exercising any such 
triide or profession, as is not the object of a monopoly, imports 
no such thing; and yet, by possessing this right, a man is 
said to possess a condition : and by forfeiting it, to forfeit his 
condition. 

After all, it will be seen, that there must be cases in which, 
according to the usage of language, the same offence may, with 
more or less appearance of propriety, be referred to the head of 
offences against condition, or that of offences against property, 
indifferently. In such cases the following rule may serve for 
drawing the line. Wherever, in virtue of your possessing a 
property, or being the object of a property possessed by another, 
you are characterised, according to the usage of language, by a 
particula r name, such as master, servant, husband, wife, steward, 
agent, attorney, or the like, there the word condition may be 
employed in exclusion of the word property : and an offence in 
which, in virtue of your bearing such relation, you are con- 
cerned, either in the capacity of an offender, or in that of a party 
injured, may be referred to the head of offences against condition, 
and not to that of offences against property. To give an ex- 
ample : Being bound, in the capacity of land steward to a certain 



XVI.] Division of Offences. ^33 

person, to oversee the repairing of a certain bridge, you forbear 
to do so : in this case, as the services you are bound to render 
are of the number of those which give occasion to the party, 
from whom they are due, to be spoken of under a certain gene- 
rical name, viz. that of land steward, the offence of withholding 
them may be referred to the class of offences against condition. 
But suppose that, without being engaged in that general and 
miscellaneous course of service, which with reference to a par- 
ticular person would denominate you his land steward, you were 
bound, whether by usage or by contract, to render him that single 
sort of service which consists in the providing, by yourself or by 
others, for the repairing of that bridge : in this case, as there is 
not any such current denomination to which, in virtue of your 
being bound to render this service, you stand aggregated (for 
that of architect, mason, or the like, is not here in question), the 
offence you commit by withholding such service cannot with 
propriety be referred to the class of offences against condition : 
it can only therefore be referred to the class of offences against 
property. 

By way of further distinction, it may be remarked, that where 
a man, in virtue of his being bound to render, or of others being 
bound to render him, certain services, is spoken of as possessing 
a condition, the assemblage of services is generally so consider- 
able, in point of duration, as to constitute a course of con- 
siderable length, so as on a variety of occasions to come to be 
varied and repeated : and in most cases, when the condition is 
not of a domestic nature, sometimes for the benefit of one per- 
son, sometimes for that of another. Services which come to be 
rendered to a particular person on a particular occasion, espe- 
cially if they be of short duration, have seldom the effect of 
occasioning either party to be spoken of as being invested with 
a condition. The particular occasional services which one man 
may come, by contract or otherwise, to be bound to render to 
another, are innumerably various : but the number of conditions 
which have names may be counted, and are, comparatively, but 
few. 



234 Division of Offhice^. [chap. 

If after all, notwithstanding the rule here given for separating 
conditions from articles of property, any object should present 
itself which should appear to be referable, with equal propriety, 
to either head, the inconvenience would not be material ; since 
in such cases, as will be seen a little farther on, whichever appel- 
lation were adopted, the list of the offences, to which the object 
stands exposed, would be substantially the same. 

These difRculties being cleared up, we now proceed to ex- 
hibit an analytical view of the several possible offences against 
trust. 
Offences XXVII. Offences against trust may be distinguished, in the 

against trost «,,, ., 

—their first place, mto such as concern the existence of the trust m the 

connection 

with each hands of such or such a person, and such as concern the exercise 
of the functions that belong to it ^. First then, with regard to 
such as relate to its existence. An offence of this description, 

' We shall have occasion, a little farther on, to speak of the person in 
whose hands the trust exists, under the description of the person who pos- 
sesses, or is in possession of it, and thence of the possession of the trust 
abstracted from the consideration of the possessor. However different the 
expression, the import is in both cases the same. So irregular and imper- 
fect is the structure of language on this head, that no one phrase can be 
made to suit the idea on all the occasions on which it is requisite it should 
be brought to view : the phrase must be continually shifted, or new modi-r 
fied : so likewise in regard to conditions, and in regard to property. The 
being invested with, or possessing a condition ; the being in possession of 
an article of property, that is, if the object of the property be corporeal ; 
the having a legal title (defeasible or indefeasible) to the physical possession 
of it, answers to the being in possession of a trust, or the being the person 
in whose hands a trust exists. lu like manner, to the exercise of the func- 
tions belonging to a trust, or to a condition, corresponds the enjoyment of an 
article of property ; that is, if the object of it be corporeal, the occupation. 
These verbal discussions are equally tedious and indispensable. Striving 
to cut a new road through the wilds of jurisprudence, I find myself con- 
tinually distressed, for want of tools that are fit to work with. To frame a 
complete set of new ones is impossible. All that can be done is, to make 
here and there a new one in cases of absolute necessity, and for the rest, to 
patch up from time to time the imperfections of the old. 

Ab to the bipartition which this paragraph sets out with, it must be 
acknowledged not to be of the nature of those which to a first glance afford 
ft sort of intuitive proof of their being exhaustive. There is not that 
marked connection and opposition between the terms of it, which subsists 
between contradictory terms and between terms that have the same conmion 
genus. I imagine, however, that upon examination it would be found to 
be exhaustive notwithstanding : and that it might even be demonstrated so 
to be. But the demonstration would lead us too far out of the ordinary 
ti^k of language. 



XVI.] Division of Offences. 235 

like one of any other description, if an offence it ought to be, 
must to some person or other import a prejudice. This prejudice 
may be distinguished into two branches : i. That which may fall 
on such persons as are or should be invested with the trust : 
2. That which may fall on the persons for whose sake it is or 
should be instituted, or on other persons at large. To begin 
with the former of these branches. Let any trust be conceived. 
The consequences which it is in the nature of it to be productive 
of to the possessor, must, in as far as they are material ^, be 
either of an advantageous or of a disadvantageous nature : in as 
far as they are advantageous, the trust may be considered as a 
benefit or privilege : in as far as they are disadvantageous, it may 
be considered as a burthen^. To consider it then upon the 
footing of a benefit. The trust either is of the number of those 
which ought by law to subsist*; that is, which the legislator 

* See ch. vii. [Actions], iii. 

^ If advantageous, it will naturally be on account of the powers or rights 
that are annexed to the trust : if disadvantageous, on account of the duties. 

' It may seem a sort of anachronism to speak on the present occasion of 
a trust, condition, or other possession, as one of which it may happen that 
a man ought or ought not to have had possession given him by the law, 
fur, the plan here set out upon is to give such a view all along of the laws 
that are proposed, as shall be taken from the reasons which there are for 
making them : the reason then it would seem Bhr)uld subsist before the 
law : not the law before the reason. Nor is this to be denied : for, unques- 
tionably, upon the principle of utility, it may be said with equal truth of 
those operations by which a trust, or any other article of property, is insti- 
tuted, as of any other operations of the law, that it never can be expedient 
they should be performed, unless some reason for performing them, deduced 
from that principle, can be assigned. To give property to one man, you 
must impose obligation on another : you must oblige him to do sometMng 
which he may have a mind not to do, or to abstain from doing something 
which he may have a mind to do : in a word, you must in some way or 
other expose him to inconvenience. Every such law, therefore, must at 
any rate be mischievous in the first instance ; and if no good effects can be 
produced to set against the bad, it must be mischievous upon the whole. 
Some reasons, therefore, in this case, as in every other, there ought to be. 
The truth is, that in the case before us, the reasons are of too various and 
complicated a nature to be brought to view in an analytical outline like the 
present. Where the offence is of the number of those by which person or 
reputation are affected, the reasons for prohibiting it lie on the surface, and 
a>pply to every man alike. But property, before it can be offended against, 
must be created, and at the instant of its creation distributed, as it were, 
into parcels of different sorts and sizes, which require to be assigned, some 
to one man and some to another, for reasons, of which many lie a little out 
of sight, and which being different in different oases, would take up more . 



2^6 Division of Offences, [chap. 

meant should be established ; or is not. If it is, the possession 
which at any time you may be deprived of, with respect to it, 
must at that time be either present or to come : if to come (in 
which case it may be regarded either as certain or as contingent), 
the investitive event, or event from whence your possession of it 
should have taken its commencement, was either an event in the 
production of which the will of the offender should have been 
instrumental, or any other event at large: in the former 
case, the offence may be termed wrongful non-investment of 
trust : in the latter case, tvrongful interception of trust *. If at 
the time of the offence whereby you are deprived of it, you 
were already in possession of it, the offence may be styled 
wrongful divestment of trust In any of these cases, the effect of 
the offence is either to put somebody else into the trust, or not : 
if not, it is wrongful divestment, wrongful interception, or 
wrongful divestment, and nothing more : if it be, the person put 
in possession is either the wrong-doer himself, in which case it 
may be styled usurpation of trust ; or some other person, in 
which case it may be styled wrongful investment, or attribution, 



room than could consistently be allotted to^them here. For the present 
purpose, it is sufficient if it appear, that for the carrying on of the several 
purposes of life, there are trusts, and conditions, and other articles of pro* 
perty, which must be possessed by somebody : and that it is not every 
article that can, nor every article that ought, to be possessed by every 
body. What articles ought to be created, and to what persons, and in 
what cases they ought to be respectively assigned, are questions which 
cannot be settled here. Nor is there any reason for wishing that they 
could, since the settling them one way or another is what would make no 
difference in the nature of any offence whereby any party may be exposed, 
on the occasion of any such institution, to sustain a detriment. 

^ In the former case, it may be observed, the act is of the negative kind : 
in the latter, it will commonly be of the positive kind. 

As to the expression Tumrinveatmerd of trust, I am sensible that it is not 
perfectly consonant to the idiom of the language : the usage is to speak of 
a person as being invested (that is clothed) with a trust, not of a trust as 
of a thing that is itself invented, or put on. The phrase at length would 
be, the non-investment of a person with a trust: but this phrase is by 
much too long-winded to answer the purpose of an appellative. I saw, 
therefore, no other resource than to venture upon the ellipsis here employed. 
The ancient lawyers, in the construction of their appellatives, have indulged 
themselves in much harsher ellipsises without scruple. See above, xxv. 
note. It is already the usage to speak of a trust as a thing that vests^ and 
as a thing that may be divested. 



XVI.] Division of Offences. 237 

0/ trust. If the trust in question is not of the nun^ber of those 
which ought to subsist, it depends upon the manner in which 
one man deprives another of it, whether such deprivation shall 
or shall not be an oflFence, and, accordingly, whether non-invest- 
ment, interception, or divestment, shall or shall not be wrongful. 
But the putting any body into it must at any rate be an offence : 
and this offence may be either usurpation or wrongful invest- 
ment, as before. 

In the next place, to consider it upon the footing of a burthen. 
In this point of view, if no other interest than that of the persons 
liable to be invested with it were considered, it is what ought 
not, upon the principle of utility, to subsist : if it ought, it can 
only be for the sake of the persons in whose favour it is estab- 
lished. If then it ought not on any account to subsist, neither 
non-investment, interception, nor divestment, can be wrongful 
with relation to the persons first mentioned, whatever they may 
be on any other account, in respect of the manner in which they 
happen to be performed : for usurpation, though not likely to be 
committed, there is the same room as before : so likewise is there 
for wrongful investment ; which, in as far as the trust is con- 
sidered as a burthen, may be styled lorongful imposition of trust. 
If the trust, being still of the burthensome kind, is of the 
number of those which ov^ht to subsist, any offence that can be 
committed, with relation to the existence of it, must consist 
either in causing a person to be in possession of it, who ought 
ru)t to be, or in causing a person not to be in possession of it who 
ought to be : in the former case, it must be either usurpation or 
wrongful divestment, as before : in the latter case, the person 
who is caused to be not in possession, is either the wrong-doer 
himself, or some other : if the wrong-doer himself, either at the 
time of the offence he was in possession of it, or he was not : if 
he was, it may be termed wrongful abdication of trust ; if not, 
wrongftU detrectation^ or non-assumption : if the person, whom 

^ I do not find that this word has yet been received into the English 
language. In the Latin, however, it is very expressive^aand is used in a 
sense exactly suitable to the sense here givpn to it. MilUiam detrectarct 



238 Division of Offences. [chap. 

the offence causes not to be in the trust, is any other person, the 
offence must be either wrongful divestment, wrongful non-invest- 
ment, or wrongful interception, as before : in any of which cases, 
to consider the trust in the light of a burthen, it might also be 
styled wrongful exemption from trust. 

Lastly, with regard to the prejudice which the persons for 
whose benefit the trust is instituted, or any other persons whose 
interests may come to be affected by its existing or not existing 
in such or such hands, are liable to sustain. Upon examination 
it will appear, that by every sort of offence whereby the persons 
who are or should be in possession of it are liable, in that respect, 
to sustain a prejudice, the persons now in question are also liable 
to sustain a prejudice. The prejudice, in this case, is evidently 
of a very different nature from what it was of in the other : but 
the same general names will be applicable in this case as in that., 
If the beneficiaries, or persons whose interests are at stake upon 
the exercise of the trust, or any of them, are liable to sustain a 
prejudice, resulting from the quality of the person by whom it 
may be filled, such prejudice must result from the one or the 
other of two causes: i. From a person's having the possession 
of it who ought not to have it : or 2. From a person's not having 
it who ought : whether it be a benefit or burthen to the possessor, 
is a circumstance that to this purpose makes no difference. In 
the first of these cases the offences from which the prejudice takes 
its rise are those of usurpation of trust, wrongful attribution of 
trust, and wrongful imposition of trust : in the latter, wrongful 
non-investment of trust, wrongful interception of trust, wrongful 
divestment of trust, wrongful abdication of trust, and wrongful 
detrectation of trust. 

So much for the offences which concern the existence or pos- 
session of a trust : those which concern the exercise of the func- 
tions that belong to it may be thus conceived. You are in 
possession of a trust : the time then for your acting in it must, 
on any given occasion, (neglecting, for simplicity's sake, the then 

to endeavour to avoid seiriiig in the army, is a phrase not unfrequently 
met with in the Roman writers. 



XVI.] Division of Offences. 2^g 

present instant) be cither past or yet to come. If past, your 
conduct on that occasion must have been either conformable to 
the purposes for which the trust was instituted, or unconform- 
able : if conformable, there has been no mischief in the case : if 
unconformable, the fault has been either in yourself alone, or in 
some other person, or in both : in as far as it has lain in yourself, 
it has consisted either in your not doing something which you 
ought to do, in which case it may be styled negative breach of 
trust ; or in your doing something which you ought not to do : 
if in the doing something which you ought not to do, the party 
to whom the prejudice has accrued is either the same for whose 
benefit the trust was instituted, or some other party at large : 
in the former of these cases, the offence may be styled positive 
breach of trust ; in the other, aimse of trusi^. In as far as 
the fault lies in another person, the offence on his part may 
be styled disturbance of trust. Supposing the time for your 
acting in the trust to be yet to come, the effect of any act which 
tends to render your conduct unconformable to the purposes 
of the trust, may be either to render it actually and eventually 
unconformable, or to produce a chance of its being so. In the 
former of these cases, it can do no otherwise than take one or 
other of the shapes that have just been mentioned. In the latter 
case, the blame must lie either in yourself alone, or in some 
other person, or in both together, as before. If in another person, 
the acts whereby he may tend to render your conduct uncon- 

* What is here meant by abuse of trust, is the exercise of a power 
usurped over strangers, under favour of the powers properly belonging to 
the trust. The distinction between what is here meant by breach of trust* 
and what is here meant by abuse of trust, is not very steadily observed in 
common speech : and in regard to public trusts, it will even in many cases 
be imperceptible. The two offences are, however, in themselves perfectly 
distinct : since the persons, by whom the prejudice is suffered, are in many 
cases altogether different. It may be observed, perhaps, that with regard 
to abuse of trust, there is but one species here mentioned ; viz. that which 
corresponds to positive breach of trust : none being mentioned as corre- 
sponding to negative breach of trust. The reason of this distinction will 
presently appear. In favour of the parties, for whose benefit the trust was 
created, the trustee is bound to act ; and therefore merely by his doing 
nothing they may receive a prejudice : but in fevour of other persons at 
large he is not bound to act : and therefore it is only from some positive 
act on his part that any prejudice can ensue to tbem» 



240 Division of Offences. [chap. 

formable, must be exercised either on yourself, or on other objects 
at large. If exercised on yourself, the influence they possess 
must either be such as operates immediately on your body, or 
such as operates immediately on your mind. In the latter 
case, again, the tendency of them must be to deprive you 
either of the knowledge, or of the power, or of the inclina- 
tion*, which would be necessary to your maintaining such a 
conduct as shall be conformable to the purposes in question. If 
they be such, of which the tendency is to deprive you of the in- 
clination in question, it must be by applying to your will the 
force of some seducing motive *. Lastly, This motive must be 
either of the coercive, or of the aUti/ring kind ; in other words, 
it must present itself either in the shape of a mischief or of an 
advantage. Now in none of all the cases that have been men- 
tioned, except the last, does the offence receive any new denomi- 
nation ; according to the event it is either a disturbance of trust, 
or an abortive attempt to be guilty of that offence. In this last 
it is termed bribery ; and it is that particular species of it which 
may be termed active bribery, or bribe-giving. In this case, to 
consider the matter on your part, either you accept of the bribe, 
or you do not : if not, and you do not afterwards commit, or go 
about to commit, either a breach or an abuse of trust, there is 
no offence, on your part, in the case : if you do accept it, whether 
you eventually do or do not commit the breach or the abuse 
which it is the bribe-giver's intention you should commit, you 
at any rate commit an offence which is also termed bribery : and 
which, for distinction sake, may be termed passive bribery, or 
bribe-taking \ As to any farther distinctions, they will depend 

^ See infra, liv. note ; and ch. xviii. [Indirect Legislation]. 

' See ch. xi. [Dispositions] xxix. 

' To bribe a trustee, as such, is in ieyct neither more nor less than to 
mibom him to be guilty of a breach or an abuse of trust. Now subornation is 
of the number of those accessory offences which every principal offence, one as 
well as another, is liable to be attended with. See infira, xxxi. note ; and B. I. 
tit. [Accessory offences]. This particular species of subornation however 
being one that, besides its having a specific name framed to express it, is 
apt to engage a peculiar share of attention, and to present itself to view 
in company with other offences against trust, it would have seemed an 
omission not to have included it in that catalogue. 



XVI.] Division of Offences. 241 

upon the nature of the particular sort of trust in question, and 
therefore belong not to the present place. And thus we have 
thirteen sub-divisions of offences against trust : viz. i. "Wrongful 
non-investment of trust. 2. "Wrongful interception of trust. 
3. Wrongful divestment of trust. 4. "Usurpation of trust, 
g. Wrongful investment or attribution of trust. 6. "Wrongful 
abdication of trust. 7. Wrongful detrectation of trust. 8. Wrong- 
ful imposition of trust. 9. Negative breach of trust. 10. Posi- 
tive breach of trust. 11. Abuse of trust, 12. Disturbance of 
trust. 13. Bribery. 

XXVIII. From what has been said, it appears that there Prodigality 

rt» 1 f t-L-'L*'* trustees 

cannot be any other offences, on the part of a trustee, by which dismissed to 
a beneficiary can receive on any particular occasion any assign- 
able specific prejudice. One sort of acts, however, there are by 
which a trustee may be put in some danger of receiving a pre- 
judice, although neither the nature of the prejudice, nor the 
occasion on which he is in danger of receiving it, should be 
assignable. These can be no other than such acts, whatever they 
may be, as dispose the trustee to be acted upon by a given bribe 
with greater effect than any with which he could otherwise be 
acted upon : or in other words, which place him in such circum- 
stances as have a tendency to increase the quantum of his sensi- 
bility to the action of any motive of the sort in question *. . Of 
these acts, there seem to be no others, that will admit of a de- 
scription applicable to all places and times alike, than acts of 
prodigality on the part of the trustee. But in acts of this nature 
the prejudice to the beneficiary is contingent only and unliqui- 
dated ; while the prejudice to the trustee himself is certain and 
liquidated. If therefore on any occasion it should be found 
advisable to treat it on the footing of an offence, it will find its 
place more naturally in the class of self-regarding ones. 

XXIX. As to the subdivisions of offences against trust, these The sub- 
are perfectlv analogous to those of offences by falsehood. The offences 

X 5 i ' \ • i,v i_v -i. against trust 

trust may be private, semi-public, or public : it may concern are^iso 

. , ,. T.^. . determined 

property, person, reputation, or condition ; or any two or more by the 

' See ch. vi. [Sensibility] ii. ^ 

a 



2,42 Division of Offences. [chap. 

divisions of of those articles at a time: as will be more particularly ex- 
TOdin^ plained in another place. Here too the offence, in running over 
®^**"®*' the ground occupied by the three prior classes, will in some 

instances change its name, while in others it will not. 
Connection XXX. Lastly, if it be asked. What sort of relation there sub- 
offences by sists between falsehoods on one hand, and offences concerning 
and offences trust on the other hand j the answer is, they are altogether dis- 
trust, parate. Falsehood is a circumstance that may enter into the 
composition of any sort of offence, those concerning trust, as well 
as any other : in some as an accidental, in others as an essen* 
tial instrument. Breach or abuse o£ trust are circumstances 
which, in the character of accidental concomitants, may enter 
into the composition of any other offences (those against falsehood 
included) besides those to which they respectively give name. 

§ 3. Genera of Class /. 

^Q^ra XXXI. Eetuming now to class the first, let us pursue the 
^X^^than distribution a step farther, and branch out the several divisions 
Class 1. of that class, as above exhibited, into their respective generay 
that is, into such minuter divisions as are capable of being cha- 
racterised by denominations of which a great part are already 
current among the people^. In this place the analysis must 
stop. To apply it in the same regular form to any of the other 
classes seems scarcely practicable : to semi-public, as also to 
public offences, on account of the interference of local circum- 
stances : to self-regarding ones, on account of the necessity it 
would create of deciding prematurely upon points which may 
appear liable to controversy: to offences by falsehood, and 
effences against trust, on account of the dependence there is 
between this class and the three former. What remains to 
be done in this way, with reference to these four classes, will 

' In the enumeration of these genera, it is all along to be observed, 
that offences of an accessory nature are not mentioned ; unless it be here 
and there where they have obtained current names which seemed too much 
in vogue to be omitted. Accessory offences are those which, without being 
the very acts from which the mischief in question takes its immediate rise, 
are, in the way of causality, connected with those acts. See ch. vii. 
[Actions] xxiv. and B. I. tit. [Accessoiy offenoes]. 



XVI.] Bimaion of Offences. i43 

require discussion, and will therefore be introduced with more 
propriety in the body of the work, than in a preliminary part, of 
which the business is only to draw outlines. 

XXXII. An act, by which the happiness of an individual Oflfenoea 
is disturbed, is either simple in its effects or complex. It individual 
may be styled simple in its effects, when it affects him in one simple in 
only of the articles or points in which his interest, as we have or complex, 
seen, is liable to be affected : complex, when it affects him in 
several of those points at once. Such as are simple in their 
effects must of course be first considered. 

XXXTTT. In a simple way, that is in one way at a time, a Oflfenoes 
man's happiness is liable to be disturbed either i. By actions person- 
referring to his own person itself; or 2. By actions referring to 
such external objects on which his happiness is more or less de- 
pendent. As to his own person, it is composed of two different 
parts, or reputed parts, his body and his mind. Acts which 
exert a pernicious influence on his person, whether it be on the 
corporeal or on the mental part of it, will operate thereon either 
immediately, and without affecting his will, or mediately, through 
the intervention of that faculty : viz. by means of the influence 
which they cause his will to exercise over his body. If with the 
intervention of his will, it must be by mental coercion : that is, 
by causing him to wiU to maintain, and thence actually to main^ 
tain, a certain conduct which it is disagreeable, or in any other 
way pernicious, to him to maintain. This conduct may either be 
positive or negative * : when positive, the coercion is styled com* 
pulsion or constraint : when negative, restraint. Now the way 
in which the coercion is disagreeable to him, may be by pro- 
ducing either pain of body, or only pain of mind. If pain of 
body is produced by it, the offence will come as well under this 
as under other denominations, which we shall come to presently. 
Moreover, the conduct which a man, by means of the coercion, is 
forced to maintain, will be determined either specifically and 
originally,, by the determination of the particular acts them- 
selves which he is forced to perform or to abstain from, or 

* Ch. vii. [Actions] viii. 
B 2 



a44 Divimn of Offences, [chap, 

generally and incidentally, by means of his being forced to be or 
not to be in sucli or such a place. But if he is prevented from 
being in one place, he is confined thereby to another. For the 
whole surface of the earth, like the surface of any greater or 
lesser body, may be conceived to be divided into two, as well as 
into any other number of parts or spots. If the spot then, which 
he is confined to, be smaller than the spot which he is excluded 
from, his condition may be called confinsTnent : if larger, banish" 
ment\ Whether an act, the effect of which is to exert a per- 
nicious influence on the person of him who suffers by it, operates 
with or without the intervention of an act of his will, the mis- 
chief it produces will either be mortal or not mortal. If not 
mortal, it will either be reparahley that is temporary ; or irre- 
parable, that is perpetual. If reparable, the mischievous act 
may be termed a simple corporal injwry ; if irreparable, an 
irreparable corporal injury^ Lastly, a pain that a man experi- 
ences in his mind will either be a pain of actual sufferance, or a 
pain of apprehension. If a pain of apprehension, either the 
offender himself is represented as intending to bear a part in the 
production of it, or he is not. In the former case the offence 
inay be styled menacemsnt «* in the latter case, as also where the 
pain is a pain of actual sufferance, a simple mental injury. And 
thus we have nine genera or kinds of personal injuries ; which, 
when ranged in the order most commodious for examination, 
will stand as follows; viz. i. Simple corporal injuries. 2. Ir- 
reparable corporal injuries. 3. Simple injurious restrainment. 
4. Simple injurious compulsion^. 5. Wrongful confinement. 

^ Of these, and the several other leading expressions which there is occa- 
sion to bring to view in the remaining part of this analysis, aigple defini- 
tions will be found in the body of the work, conceived in terminis Ugia. To 
give particular references to these definitions, would be encumbering the 
page to little purpose. 

* Injurious restrainment at large, and injurious compulsion at large, are 
here styled simple, in order to distinguish them from confinement, banish- 
ment, robbery, and extortion ; all which are, in many cases, but so many 
modifications of one or other of the two first-mentioned offences. 

To constitute an offence an act of simple injurious restrainment, or simple 
injurious compulsion, it is sufficient if the influence it exerts be, in the first 
place, pernicious ; in the next place, exerted on the person by the medium 



XVI.] Division of Offences. 4545 

6. Wrongful banishment. 7. Wrongful homicide. 8. Wrongful 
menacement *. 9. Simple mental injuries \ 

of the will : it is not necessary that that part of the person on which it is 
exerted be the part to which it is pernicious : it is not even necessary that 
it should immediately be pernicious to either of these parts, though to one 
or other of them it must be pernicious in the long-run, if it be pernicious at 
aU. An act in which the body, for example, is concerned, may be very 
disagreeable, and thereby pernicious to him who performs it, though neither 
disagreeable nor pernicious to his body; for instance, to stand or sit in 
public with a label on his back, or imder any other circumstances of 
ignominyr 

^ It may be observed, that wrongful menacement is included as weU in 
simple injurious restrainment as in simple injurious compulsion, except in 
the rare case where the motives by which one man is prevented by another 
firom doing a thing that would have been materially to his advantage, or 
induced to do a iMng that is materially to his prejudice, are of the aUurvng 
kind. 

' Although, for reasons that have been already given (supra xxxi), no 
complete catalogue, nor therefore any exhaustive view, of either semi-public 
or self-regarding offences, can be exhibited in this chapter, it may be a 
satis&ction, however, to the reader, to see some sort of list of them, if it 
were only for the sake of having examples before his eyes. Such lists can- 
not any where be placed to more advantage than und^ the heads of the 
several divisions of private extra-regarding offences, to which the semi- 
public and self-regarding offences in question respectively correspond. 
Concerning the two latter, however, and the last more particularly, it must 
be understood that all I mean by inserting them here, is to exhibit the 
mischief, if any, which it is of the nature of them respectively to produce, 
without deciding upon the question, whether it would be vH>rth nohile [see 
ch. xiii. Gases unmeet] in every instance, for the sake of combating that 
mischief^ to introduce the evil of punishments In the course of this detail, 
it will be observed, that there are several heads of extra-regarding private 
offences, to which the correspondent heads, either of semi-public or self- 
regarding offences, or of both, are wanting. The reasons of these deficien- 
cies will probably, in most instances, be evident enough upon the ia/ce of 
them. Lest they should not, they are however specified in tiie body of the 
work. They would take up too much room were they to be inserted 
here. 

I. Semi-fublio offences through calamity. Calamities, by which the 
persons or pn^erties of men, or both, are liable to be affected, seem to be 
as follows: i. Pestilence or contagion. 2, Famine, and other kinds of 
scarcity. 3. Mischiefs producible by persons deficient in point of under- 
standing, such as infants, idiots, and maniacs, for want of their being 
properly taken care of. 4. Mischief producible by the ravages of noxious 
animals, such as beasts of prey, locusts, &c. &c. 5. CoUapsion, or fall of 
large masses of solid matter, such as decayed buildings, or rocks, or masses 
of snow. 6. Inundation or submersion. 7* Tempest. 8. Blight. 9. Con- 
flagration. 10. Explosion. In as far as a man may contribute, by any 
imprudent act of his, to give birth to any of the above calamities, such act 
may be an offence. In as far as a man may fail to do what is incumbent on 
him to do towards preventing them, such failure may be an offence. 

II. Semi-fublio offences of mere delinquency. A whole neighboutv 



24^ Jiividon of Offences. [chap. 

Offences XXXIV. "We come now to offences against reputation merely. 

reputation. These require but few distinctions. In point of reputation there 
is but one way of suffering, which is by losing a portion of the 
good-will of others. Now, in respect of the good-will which 
others bear you, you may be a loser in either of two ways : i. By 
the manner in which you are thought to behave yov/rsdf; and 
2. By the manner in which others behave, or are thought to be* 
have, towards you. To cause people to think that you yourself 
have so behaved, as to have been guilty of any of those acta 
which cause a man to possess less than he did before of the 
good-will of the community, is what may be styled defamation. 
But such is the constitution of human nature, and such the force 
of prejudice, that a man merely by manifesting his own want of 
good-will towards you, though ever so unjust in itself, and ever 
80 unlawfully expressed, may in a manner force others to with- 
draw from you a part of theirs. When he does this by words, 
or by such actions as have no other effect tban in as far as they 

hood may be made to ERiffer, i. Simple corporal injuries : in other words, 
they may be made to suffer in point of health, by offensive or dangerous 
trades or manufactures : by selling or falsely puffing off imwholesome medi- 
cines or provisions : by poisoning or drying up of springs, destroying of 
aqueducts, destroying woods, walls, or other fences against wind and rain : 
by any kinds of a^ficial scarcity ; or by any other calamities intentionally 
produced, a. and 3. Simple injurious restrainment, and simple injurious 
compulsion : for instance, by obliging a whole neighbourhood, by dint of 
threatening hand-bills, or threatening discourses, publicly delivered, to join, 
or forbear to join, in illuminations, acclamations, outcries, invectiyes, sub- 
scriptions, undertakings, processions, or any other mode of expressing joy or 
grief, displeasure or approbation ; or, in short, in any other course of conduct 
whatsoever. 4. and 5. Confinement and banishment : by the spoiling of 
roads, bridge , or ferry-boats : by destroying or unwarrantably pre- occupy- 
ing public carriages, or houses of acconunodation. 6. By menacement : as 
by incendiary letters, and tumultuous assemblies : by newspapers or hand- 
bills, denouncing vengeance against persons of particular denominations : 
for example, against Jews, Catholics, Protestants, Scotchmen, Gascons, 
Oatalonians, &c. 7. Simple mental injuries : as by distressful, terrifying, 
obscene, or irreligious exhibitions ; such as exposure of "sores by beggars, 
exposure of dead bodies, exhibitions or reports of counterfeit witchcrs^ or 
Apparitions, exhibition of obscene or blasphemous prints : obscene or blas- 
phemous discourses held in public : spreading fedse news of public defeats in 
battle, or of other misfortunes. 

III. Self-regarding offences against person, i. Fasting. Abstinence 
firom venery, self-flagellation, self- mutilation, and other sSf-denying and 
self-tormenting practices. 2. Gluttony, drunkenness, excessive venery, and 
other spedefl of intemperance. 3, Suicide. 



XVI.] Division of Offenets. 1247 

stand in the place of words, the offence may be styled vi^^a- 
twn. When it is done by such actions as, besides their having 
this effect, are injuries to the person, the offence may be styled 
a 'personal insvU : if it has got the length of reaching the body, a 
corporal insult: if it stopped short before it reached that length, 
it may be styled insuUing menacemerU. And thus we have two 
genera or kinds of offences against reputation merely ; to wit, 
I. Defamation: and, 2. Vilification, or Bevilement^ As to 
corporal insults, and insulting menacement, they belong to the 
compound title of offences against person and reputation both 
together. 

XXXV. If the property of one man suffers by the delinquency Offences 
of another, such property either was in trust with the offender, property. 
or it was not : if it was in trusty the offence is a breach of trust, 
and of whatever nature it may be in other respects, may be 
styled dissipation in breach of trust, or dissipation 0/ property in 
trust. This is a particular case : the opposite one is the more 
common : in such case the several ways in which property may, 
by possibility, become the object of an offence, may be thus con- 
ceived. Offences against property, of whatever kind it be, may 
be distinguished, as hath been already intimated ^, into such as 
concern the legal possession of it, or right to it, and such as con- 
cern only the enjoyment of it, or, what is the same thing, the 
exercise of that right. Under the former of these heads come, 
as hath been already intimated ', the several offences of wrongful 
non- investment, wrongful interception, vyr&ngful divestment, 
usurpation, and wrongful attribution. "When in the commission 
of any of these offences a falsehood has served as an instrument, 
and that, as it is commonly called, a wUful, or as it might more 
properly be termed, an advised* one, the epiihei fraudtUent may 
be prefixed to the name of the offence, or substituted in the 
room of the word wrongful. The circumstance of fraudulency 
then may serve to characterise a particular species, comprisable 

^ I. Semi-publio offences. I. Calumniation and vilification of pa^ 
ticnlar denominations of persons ; such as Jews, Catholics, &c. 

II. SELF-BEOARDiNa OFFENCES. I. Incontinence in females. 2. Incest. 
' Supra xzvii. ' lb. * See oh. ix. [Conaciousaess] ii. ■ 



^4^ Division of Offences. [chap. 

under each of those generic heads : in like manner the circum- 
stance of force, of which more a little farther on, may serve to 
characterise another. With respect to wrongful interception in 
particular, the investitive event by which the title to the thing 
in question should have accrued to you, and for want of which 
such title is, through the delinquency of the offender, as it were, 
intercepted, is either an act of his own, expressing it as his will, 
that you should be considered by the law as the person who is 
legally in possession of it, or it is any other event at large : in the 
former case, if the thing, of which you should have been put into 
possession, is a sum of money to a certain amount, the offence is 
that which has received the name of insolvency ; which branch 
of delinquency, in consideration of the importance and extent 
of it, may be treated on the footing of a distinct genus of itself*. 

Payment, what * The light in which the offence of insolvency is here exhibited, may 
perhaps at first consideration be apt to appear not only novel but im- 
proper. It may naturally enough appear, that when a man owes you a 
sum of money, for instance, the right to the money is yours already, 
and th^t what he withholds from you by not paying you, is not the legal 
title to it, possession of it, or power over it, but the physical possession 
of it, or power over it, only. But upon a more accurate examination 
this will be found not to be the case. What is meant by payment, is 
always an act of investitive power, as above explained ; an expression of 
an act of the will, and not a physical act : it is an act exercised with 
relation indeed to the thing said to be paidt but not in a physical sense 
exercised upon it. A man who owes you ten pounds, takes up a handful 
of silver to that amount, and lays it down on a table at which you are 
sitting. If then by words, or gestures, or any means whatever, addressing 
himself to you, he intimates it to be his will that you should take up the 
money, and do with it as you please, he is said to have paid you : but if 
the case was, that he laid it down not for that purpose, but for some other, 
for instance, to count it and examine it, meaning to take it up again him- 
self, or leave it for somebody else, he has not paid you : yet the physical 
acts, exercised upon the pieces of money in question, are in both cases the 
same. Till he does express a will to tluit purport, what you have is not, 
properly speaking, the legal possession of the money, or a right to the 
money, but only a right to have him, or in his default perhaps a minister of 
justice, compelled to render you that sort of service, by the rendering of 
which he is said to pay you : that is, to express such will as above- 
mentioned, with regard to some corporeal article, or other of a certain 
species, and of value equal to the amount of what he owes you : or, in other 
words, to exercise in your favour an act of investitive power with relation 
to some such article. 

True it is, that in certain cases a man may perhaps not be deemed, 
according to common acceptation, to have paid you, without rendering you 
a further set of services, and those of another sort : a set of services, which 



XVI.] Division of Offences, 249 

Next, with regard to such of the offences against property 
as concern only the enjoyment of the object in question. This 
object must be either a service, or set of services \ which should 
have been rendered by some person, or else an article belonging 
to the class of things. In the former case, the offence may be 
styled wrongful wiMolding of services ". In the latter case it may 
admit of farther modifications, which may be thus conceived : 
When any object which you have had the physical occupation or 
enjoyment of, ceases, in any degree, in consequence of the act of 
another man, and without any change made in so much of that 
power as depends upon the intrinsic physical condition of your 
person, to be subject to that power; this cessation is either 
owing to change in the intrinsic condition of the thiug itself, 
or in its exterior situation with respect to you, that is, to its 
being situated out of your reach. In the former case, the nature 
of the change is either such as to put it out of your power to 
make any use of it at all, in which case the thing is said to be 
destroyed, and the offence whereby it is so treated may be termed 

are rendered by the exercising of certain acts of a physical nature upon the 
veiy thing with which he is said to pay you : to wit, by transferring the 
thing to a certain place where you may be sure to find it, and where it may 
be convenient for you to receive it. But these services, alUiough the 
obligation of rendering them should be annexed by law to the obligation of 
rendering those other services in the performance of which the operation of 
payment properly consists, are plainly acts of a distinct nature : nor are they 
essential to the operation : by themselves they do not constitute it, and it 
may be performed without them. It rrntst be performed without them 
wherever the thing to be transferred happens to be already ks much within 
the reach, physically speaking, of the creditor, as by any act of the debtor 
it can be made to be. 

This matter would have appeared in a clearer light had it been prac- 
ticable to enter here into a full examination of the nature of property, and 
the several modifications of which it is susceptible : but every thing cannot 
be done at once. 

* Supra xxvi. 

* Under wrongful withholding of services is included breach of contract : 
for the obligation to render services may be grounded either on contract, or 
upon other titles : in other words, the event of a man's engaging in a 
contract is one out of many other investitive events from which the right of 
receiving them may take its conmiencement. See ch. xvii. [Limits], § iv. 

Were the word services to be taken in its utmost latitude (negative in- 
cluded as well as positive) this one head would cover the whole law. To 
this place then are to be referred such services only, the withholding of 
which does not coincide with any of the other offences, for which separate 
denominations have been provided. 



250 Division of Offences. [chap. 

wrongful destruction : or such only as to render the uses it is 
capable of being put to of less value than before, in which case 
it is said to be damaged^ or to have sustained damage, and the 
offence may be termed wrongful endamagement. Moreover, in 
a& far as the value which a thing is of to you is considered as 
being liable to be in some degree impaired, by any act on the 
part of any other person exercised upon that thing, although on 
a given occasion no perceptible damage should ensue, the exer- 
cise of any such act is commonly treated on the footing of an 
offence, which may be termed torongful using or occupation. 

If the cause of the thing's failing in its capacity of being of 
use to you, lies in the exterior situation of it with relation to 
you, the offence may be styled wrongful detainment ^. Wrongful 
detainment, or detention, during any given period of time, may 
either be accompanied with the intention of detaining the thing 
for ever (that is for an indefinite time), or not : if it be, and if 
it be accompanied at the same time with the intention of. not 
being amenable to law for what is done, it seems to answer to 
the idea commonly annexed to the word embezzlement, an offence 
which is commonly accompanied with breach of trust \ In the 
case of wrongful occupation, the physical faculty of occupying 
may have been obtained with or without the assistance or consent 
of the proprietor, or other person appearing to have a right to 

^ In the English law, detinue and detainer : detinue applied chiefly to 
movables; detainer, to immovables. Under detinue and detainer cases 
are also comprised, in which the ofPence consists in forbearing to transfer 
the legal possession of the thing : such cases may be considered as coming 
under the head of wrongful non-investment. The distinction between 
mere physical possession and legal possession, where the latter is short- 
lived and defeasible, seems scarcely hitherto to have been attended to. In 
a multitude of instances they are confounded under the same expressions. 
The cause is, that probably under all laws, and frequently for very good 
reasons, the legal possession, with whatever certainty defeasible upon the 
event of a trial, is, down to the time of that event, in many cases annexed 
to the appearance of the physical. 

' In attempting to exhibit the import belonging to this and other names 
of offences in common use, I must be understood to speak all along with 
the utmost diffidence. The truth is, the import given to them is commonlv 
neither determinate nor uniform : so that in the nature of things, no defi- 
nition that can be given of them by a private person can be altogether an 
exact one. To fix the sense of them belongs only to the legislator. 



XVI.] Division of Offences, 351 

afford such assistance or consent. If without such assistance or 
consent, and the occupation he accompanied with the intention 
of detaining the thing for ever, together with the intention of 
not heing amenahle to law for what is done, the offence seems to 
answer to the idea commonly annexed to the word theft or stealing. 
If in the same circumstances a force is put upon the bod j of any 
person who uses, or appears to be disposed to use, any endeavours 
to prevent the act, this seems to be one of the cases in which 
the offence is generally understood to come under the name of 
robbery. 

If the physical faculty in question was obtained with the as- 
sistance or consent of a proprietor or other person above spoken 
ofy and still the occupation of the thing is an offence, it may have 
been either because the assistance or consent was not fairly or 
because it was not freely obtained. If not fairly obtained, it 
was obtained by falsehood, which, if advised, is in such a case 
termed ^a2^ .* and the offence, if accompanied with the intenr 
tion of not being amenable to law, may be termed fraudulent 
obtainment or defraudmevU ^. If not freely obtained, it was ob- 
tained by force : to wit, either by a force put upon the body, 
which has been already mentioned, or by a force put upon the 
mind. If by a force put upon the mind, or in other words, by 
the application of coercive motives^, it must be by producing 
the apprehension of some evil : which evil, if the act is an offence, 
must be some evil to which on the occasion in question the one 
person has no right to expose the other. This is one case in 
which, if the offence be accompanied with the intention of de- 
taining the thing for ever, whether it be or be not accompanied 
with the intention of not being amenable to law, it seems to 
agree with the idea of what is commonly meant by extortion. 
Now the part a man takes in exposing another to the evil in 

^ The remaining cases come under the head of usurpation, or wrongful 
investment of property. The distinction seems hardly hitherto to have 
been attended to : it turos like another, mentioned above, upon the dis- 
tinction between legal possession and physical. The same observatioiji 
may be applied to the case of extortion hereafter following. 

* Vide supra^ zxvii. 




25^ Division of Offences. [chap. 

question, must be either a positive or a negative part. In the 
former case, again, the evil must either be present or distant. 
In the case then where the assistance or consent is obtained by 
a force put upon the body, or where, if by a force put upon the 
mind, the part taken in the exposing a man to the apprehension 
of the evil is positive, the evil present, and the object of it his 
person, and if at any rate the extortion, thus applied, be accom- 
panied with the intention of not being amenable to law, it seems 
to agree with the remaining case of what goes under the name 
of robbery. 

As to dissipation in breach of trust, this, when productive of 
a pecuniary profit to the trustee, seems to be one species of what 
is commonly meant by peculaiion. Another, and the only re- 
maining one, seems to consist in acts of occupation exercised by 
the trustee upon the things which are the objects of the fiduciary 
property, for his own benefit, and to the damage of the benefi- 
ciary. As to robbery, this offence, by the manner in which the 
a,ssistance or consent is obtained, becomes an offence against pro- 
perty and person at the same time. Dissipation in breach of 
trust, and peculation, may perhaps be more commodiously treated 
of under the head of offences against trust *. After these excep- 
tions, we have thirteen genera or principal kinds of offences 
against property, which, when ranged in the order most commo- 
dious for examination, may stand as follows, viz. t. Wrongful 
non-investment of property. 2. Wrongful interception of pro* 
J)erty. 3. Wrongful divestment of property. 4. Usurpation of 
property. 5. Wrongful investment of property. 6. Wrongful 
withholding of services. 7. Wrongful destruction or endamage- 
ment. 8. Wrongful occupation. 9. Wrongful detainment. 
10. Embezzlement. 11. Theft. 12. Defraudment. 13. Ex- 
tortion 2. 

* Usury, which, if it must be an offence, is an offence committed with 
consent, that is, with the consent of the party supposed to be injured, can- 
not merit a place in the catalogue of offences, unless the consent were 
either unfairly obtained or unfreely : in the first case, it coincides with 
defraudment ; in the other, with extortion. 

* I. Semi-fublic Offences, i. Wrongful divestment, interception, usur- 
pation, &c. of valuables, which are the property of a corporate body ; or 



XVI.] Division of Offences, 253 

"We proceed now to consider offences which are complex in 
their effects. Kegiilarly, indeed, we should come to offences 
against condition; but it will be more convenient to speak 
first of offences by which a man's interest is affected in two of 
the preceding points at once. 

XXXVI. First, then, with regard to offences which affect Offences 
person and reputation together. When any man, by a mode of person and 
treatment which affects the person, injures the reputation of 
another, his end and purpose must have been either his own im- 
mediate pleasure, or that sort of reflected pleasure, which in 
certain circumstances may be reaped from the suffering of another. 
Now the only immediate pleasure worth regarding, which any 
one can reap from the person of another, and which at the same 
time is capable of affecting the reputation of the latter, is the 
pleasure of the sexual appetite \ This pleasure, then, if reaped at 
all, must have been reaped either against the consent of the 
party, or with consent. If with consent, the consent must have 
been obtained either freely and fairly both, or freely but not 
fairly, or else not even freely ; in which case the fairness is out 
of the question. If the consent be altogether wanting, the offence 
is called ra'pe : if not fairly obtained, seduction simply : if not 
freely, it may be called forcible seduction. In any case, either 
the offence has gone the length of consummation, or has stopped 
short of that period ; if it has gone that length, it takes one or 
other of the names just mentioned : if not, it may be included 
alike in all cases under the denomination of a simple lascivious 
injury. Lastly, to take the case where a man injuring you in 
your reputation, by proceedings that regard your person, does it 

which are in the indiscriminate occupation of a neighbourhood ; such as 
parish churches, altars, relics, and other articles appropriated to the pur- 
poses of religion : or things which are in the indiscriminate occupation of 
the public at large ; such as mile-stones, market-houses, exchanges, public 
gardens, and cathedrals. 2. Setting on foot what have been called hubhles, 
or fraudulent partnership, or gaming adventures ; propagating fiUse news, 
to raise or sink the value of stocks, or of any other denomination of 
property. 

II. SELF-BEGABDiva Offbnces. I. Idleness. 2. Gaming. 3. Other 
ifpeoiea of prodigality. 

^ See ch. v. [Pleasures and Pains]. 



i54 Division of Offences. [chap. 

for the sake of that sort of pleasure which will sometimes result 
from the contemplation of another's pain. Under these circum- 
stances either the offence has actually gone the length of a cor- 
poral injury, or it has rested in menacement : in the first case it 
may be styled a corporal insult ; in the other, it may come under 
the name of insulting menacement. And thus we have six genera^ 
or kind of offences, against person and reputation together ; which, 
when ranged in the order most commodious for consideration, 
will stand thus: i. Corporal insults. 2. Insulting menacement. 
3. Seduction. 4. B>ape. 5. Forcible seduction. 6. Simple 
lascivious injuries *. 
Offences XXXVII. Secondly, with respect to those which affect person 

against •'.•»• ■■• 

person and and property together. That a force put upon the person of a 
man may be among the means by which the title to property 
may be unlawfully taken away or acquired, has been already 
Stated*. A force of this sort then is a circumstance which may 
accompany the offences of wrongful interception, wrongful divest- 
ment, usurpation, and wrongful investment. But in these cases 
the intervention of this circumstance does not happen to have 
given any new denomination to the offence'. In all or any of 
these cases, however, by prefixing the epithet forcible, we may 
have so many names of offences, which may either be considered 
as constituting so many species of the genera belonging to the 
division of offences against property, or as so many genera be- 
lon^ng to the division now before us. Among the offences that 
concern the enjoyment of the thing, the case is the same with 
wrongful destruction and wrongful endamagement ; as also with 
wrongful occupation and wrongful detainment. As to the offence 
of wrongful occupation, it is only in the case where the thing 
occupied belongs to the class of immovables, that, when accom- 
panied by the kind of force in question, has obtained a particular 

* I. Semi-public Oppences — ^none. 

II. Selp-eegarding Oppencbs. I. Sacrifice of virginity. 2. Inde- 
cencies not public. 

' Sapra. 

' In the technical language of the English law, property so acquired 19 
said to be acquired by duress. 



XVI.] JHvision of Offences. 255 

name which is in common use : in this case it is called forcible 
entry : forcible detainment, as applied also to immovables, but 
. only to immovables, has obtained, among lawyers at least, the 
name of forcible detainer^. And thus we may distinguish ten 
genera, or kinds of ofPences, against person and property together, 
which, omitting for conciseness* sake the epithet wrongful, will 
stand thus : i. Forcible interception of property. 2. Forcible 
divestment of property. 3. Forcible usurpation. 4. Forcible 
investment. 5. Forcible destruction or endamagement. 6. For- 
cible occupation of movables. 7. Forcible entry. 8. Forcible 
detainment of movables. 9. Forcible detainment of immov- 
ables. 10. Bobbery*. 

XXXYIII. "We come now to offences against condition, A ^^^ 
man's condition or station in life is constituted by the legal coadhSaT 
relation he bears to the persons who are about him ; that is, as qJ ^^^® 
we have already had occasion to show', by dtUies, which, by 
being imposed on one side, give birth to rigJUs or jpowera on the 
other. These relations, it is evident, may be almost infinitely 
diversified. Some means, however, may be found of circum- 
scribing the field within which the varieties of them are dis- 
played. In the first place, they must either be such as are 
capable of displaying themselves within the circle of a private 
family, or such as require a larger space. The conditions con- 
stituted by the former sort of relations may be styled doinestic : 
those constituted by the latter, civil, 

XXXIX. As to domestic conditions, the legal relations by Domestic 
which they are constituted may be distinguished into i. Such as groimded"on 

^ Applied to movables, the circumstance of force has never, at least by 
the technical part of the language, been taken into account : no such com- 
bination of terms as forcible occupation is in current use. The word detinue 
is applied to movables only : and (in the language of the law) the word 
forcible has never been combined with it. The word applied to immov* 
ables is detainer: this is combined with the word forchble: and what is 
singular, it is scarcely in use without that word. It was impossible to 
steer altogether clear of this technical nomenclature, on account of the 
influence which it has on the body of the language. 

^ I. Sjsmi-publio Offbnces. I. Incendiarism, a. Criminal inundation. 
II. Self-rboabdino Offbnges — ^none. 

* Supra, zzY. note. 



2^6 Division of Offences, [chap, 

natinal are superadded to relations purely natural : and 2. Such as, 
ships. without any such natural basis, subsist purely by institution. 

By relations purely natural, I mean those which may be said to 
subsist between certain persons in virtue of the concern which 
they themselves, or certain other persons, have had in the process 
which \a necessary to the continuance of the species. These 
relations may be distinguished, in the first place, into contiguous 
and uncontiguous. The uncontiguous subsist through the inter- 
vention of such as are contiguous. The contiguous may be dis- 
tinguished, in the first place, into conmtbicU, ajii post-conmihiaP^ 
Those which may be termed connubial are two : i. That whick 
the male bears towards the female : 2. That which the female 
bears to the male^. The post-connubial are either prodiictive or 
derivative. The productive is that which the male and female 
above-mentioned bear each of them towards the children who are 
the immediate fruit of their xmion ; this is termed the relation of 
parentcUity. Now as the parents must be, so the children may 
be, of different sexes. Accordingly the relation of parentality 
may be distinguished into four species: i. That which a father 
bears to his son : this is termed paternity. 2. That which a 

' By the terms connvbial and post-connvhialt all I mean at present to 

bring to view is, the mere physical union, apart from the ceremonies and 

legal engagements that will afterwards be considered as accompanying it. 

Rdations— ' The vague and undetermined nature of the fictitious entity, called a 

eJerJ^two **^°™ relation, is, on occasions like the present, apt to be productive of a good 

objects. deal 'of confusion. A relation is either said to be borne by one of the 

objects which are parties to it, to the other, or to subgiet betteeen them. 

The latter mode of phraseology is, perhaps, rather the more common. 

In such case the idea seems to be, that from the consideration of the two 

objects there results but one relation, which belongs as it were in common 

to them both. In some cases, this perhaps may answer the purpose very 

well : it will not, however, in the present case. For the present purpose it 

will be necessary we should conceive two relations as resulting from the 

two objects, and bomCt since such is the phrase, hp the one of them to or 

towards the other : one relation borne by the first object to the second : 

another relation borne by the second object to the first. This is necessary 

on two accounts : i. Because for the relations themselves there are in 

many instances separate names : for example, the relations of guardianship 

and wardship : in which case, the speaking of them as if they were but 

one, may be productive of much coniiision. a. Because the two different 

relationships give birth to so many conditions : which conditions are so far 

different, that what is predicated and will hold good of the one, will, in 

various particulars, as we shall see, not hold good of the other. 



XVI.] Mvision of Offences. ^57 

father bears to his daughter: this also is termed paternity. 
3. That which a mother bears to her son : this is called mater^ 
nity, 4. That which a mother bears to her daughter : this also 
is termed maternity. Uncontiguous natural relations may be 
distinguished into irrmiediate and remote. Such as are imme- 
diate, are what one person bears to another in consequence of 
their bearing each of them one simple relation to some third 
person. Thus the paternal grandfather is related to the paternal 
grandson by means of the two different relations, of different 
kinds, which together they bear to the father : the brother on 
the father's side, to the brother, by means of the two relations of 
the same kind, which together they bear to the father. In the 
same manner we might proceed to find places in the system for 
the infinitely diversified relations which result from the combi- 
nations that may be formed by mixing together the several 
sorts of relationships by ascent^ relationships by descent, col- 
lateral relationships, and relationships by affinity: which 
latter, when the union between the two parties through whom 
the affinity takes place is sanctioned by matrimonial solemnities, 
are termed relationships by marriage. But this, as it would be 
a most intricate and tedious task, so happily is it, for the pre- 
sent purpose, an unnecessary one. The only natural relations 
to which it will be necessary to pay any particular attention, 
are those which, when sanctioned by law, give birth to the con- 
ditions of husband and wife, the two relations comprised under 
the head of parentality, and the corresponding relations com- 
prised under the head of filiality or filiation. 

"What then are the relations of a legal kind which can be 
superinduced upon the above-mentioned natural relations ? They 
must be such as it is the nature of law to give birth to and 
establish. But the relations which subsist purely by institution 
exhaust, as we shall see, the whole stock of relationships which 
it is in the nature of the law to give birth to and establish. 
The relations then which can be superinduced upon those which 
are purely natural, cannot be in themselves any other than what 
are of the number of those which subsist purely by institution : 

s 



25S 



division of Offences, 



[chap. 



Domestic 
relations 
which are 
purely of 

institutioEL 



(90 that all die difference there can be between a legal relation 
of the one sort, and a legal relation of the other sort, is, that 
in the former case the circumstance which gave birth to 
the natural relation serves as a mark to indicate where the 
legal relation is to fix: in the latter case, the place where 
the legal relation is to attach is determined not by that cir- 
cumstance but by some other. From these considerations it 
will appear manifestly enough, that for treating of the several 
sorts of conditions, as well natural as purely conyentional, in 
the most commodious order, it will be necessary to give the 
precedence to the latter. Proceeding throughout upon the same 
principle, we shall all along giye the priority, not to those which 
are first by nature, but to those which are most simple in point 
of description. There is no other way of avoiding perpetual 
anticipations and repetitions. 

XL. We come now to consider the domestic or family rela- 
tions, which are purely of legal institution. It is to these in 
effect, that both kinds of domestic conditions, considered as the 
work of law, are indebted for their origin. When the law, no 
matter for what purpose, takes upon itself to operate, in a matter 
in which it has not operated before, it can only be by imposing 
chligation^. Now when a legal obligation is imposed on any 
man, there are but two ways in which it can in the first instance 
be enforced. The one is by giving the power of enfotcing it to 
the party in whose favour it is imposed : the other is by reservino" 
that power to certain third persons, who, in virtue of their pos- 
sessiug it, are styled ministers of justice. In the first case, the 
party favoured is said to possess not only a right as against the 
party obliged, but also a power over him : in the second case, a 
right only, uncorroborated by power. In the first case, the party 
favoured may be styled a superior, and as they are both members 
of the same family, a domestic superior, with reference to the 
party obliged : who, in the same case, may be styled a domestic 
inferior, with reference to the party favoured. Now in point 
of possibility, it is evident, that domestic conditions, or a kind 

^ See ch. xvii. [Limits], § iii. 



XVI.] Divinon of Offences. 259 

of fictitious possession analogous to domestic conditions,, might 
have been looked upon as constituted, as well by rights alone, 
without powers on either side, as by powers. But in point of 
utility * it does not seem expedient : and in point of fect,^ pro- 

* Two persons, who by any means stand engaged to live together, can 
never live together long, but one of them will choose that some act or other 
should be done which the other will choose should not be done. When 
this is the case, how is the competition to be decided ? Laying aside gene- 
rosity and good-breeding, which are the tardy and uncertain fruits of long- 
established laws, it is evident that there can be no certain means of deciding 
it but physical power : which indeed is the very means by which family as 
well as other competitiona^must have been decided, long before any such 
office as that of legislator had existence. This then being the order of 
things which the legislator finds established by nature, how should he do 
better than to acquiesce in it ? The persons who by the influence of causes 
that prevail every where, stand engaged to live together, are, i. Parent and 
child, during the infancy of the latter : 2. Man and wife : 3. Children of 
the same parents. Parent and child, by necessity: since, if the child did 
not live with the parent (or with somebody standing in the place of the 
parent) it could not live at all : husband and wife, by a choice approaching 
to necessity : children of the same parents, by the necessity of their living 
each of them with the parents. As between parent and child, the necessity 
there is of a power on the part of the parent for the preservation of the 
child supersedes all farther reasoning. As between man and wife, that 
necessity does not subsist. The only reason that applies to this case is the 
necessity of putting an end to competition. The man would have the meat 
roasted, the woman boiled : shall they both fast till the judge comes in to 
dress it for them ? The woman would have the child dressed in green ; the 
man, in blue : shall the child be naked till the judge comes in to clothe it ? 
This affords a reason for giving a power to one or other of the parties : but 
U affords none for giving the power to the one rather than to the other. 
How then shall the legislator determine? Supposing it equally easy to 
give it to either, let him look ever so long for a reason why he should give 
it to the one rather than to the other, and he may look in vain. But how 
does the matter stand already ? for there were men and wives (or, what 
comes to the same thing, male and female living together as man and wife) 
before there were legislators. Looking round him then, he finds almost 
every where the male the stronger of the two ; and therefore possessing 
already, by purely physical means, that power which he is thinking of 
bestowing on one of them by means of law. How then can he do so well 
as by placing the legal power in the same hands which are beyond compari- 
son the more likely to be in possession of the physical ? in this way, few 
transgressions, and few calls for punishment : in the other way, perpetual 
transgressions, and perpetual calls for punishment. Solon is said to have 
transferred the same idea to the distribution of state powers. Here then 
was genercUieation : here was the work of genius. But in the disposal of 
domestic power, every legislator, without any effort of genius, has been a 
Solon. So much for reasons^ : add to which, in point of motives^ that legis- 

1 Social motives : sympathy for the public : love of reputation, &e. 
3 Self-regarding motives: or social motives, which are social in a less extent : sympatiliy 
for persons ot a particular description : persons of the same sex. 



8 2 



a6o Division of Offences. [chaf. 

bably owing to the invariable perception which men nmst have 
had of the inexpediency, no such conditions seem ever to have 
been constituted by such feeble bands. Of the legal relation- 
ships then, which are capable of being made to subsist within 
the circle of a family, there remain those only in which the obli- 
gation is enforced by power. Now then, wherever any such 
power is conferred, the end or purpose for which it was con- 
ferred (unless the legislator can be supposed to act without a 
motive) must have been the producing of a benefit to somebody : 
in other words, it must have been conferred for the sake of some- 
body. The person then, for whose sake it is conferred, must 
either be one of the two parties just mentioned, or a third party: 
if one of these two, it must be either the superior or the inferior. 
If the superior, such superior is conmionly called a master; and 
the inferior is termed his servant: and the power may be termed 
a beneficial one. If it be for the sake of the inferior that the 
power is established, the superior is termed a giMrdia/n; and 
the inferior his ward : and the power, being thereby coupled with 
a trust, may be termed a fiducia^ one. If for the sake of a 
third party, the superior may be termed a superintendent/ and 
the inferior his svhordinate. This third party will either be an 
assignable individual or set of individuals, or a set of unassign- 
able individuals. In this latter case the trust is either a public 
or a semi-public one : and the condition which it constitutes is 
not of the domestic, but of the civil kind. In the former case, 
this third party or princij[Kil, as he may be termed, either has 
a beneficial power over the superintendent, or he has not : if he 
has, the superintendent is his servant, and coilsequently so also 
is the subordinate : if not, the superintendent is the master of 
the subordinate ; and all the advantage which the principal has 
over his superintendent, is that of possessing a set of rights, un- 
corroborated by power ; and therefore, as we have seen \ not fit 



latoiB seem all to have been of the male sex, down to the days of Catherine. 
I speak here of those who frame laws, not of those who touch them with a 
sceptre. 

^ Supra, note, page 259. 



XVI.] JDivmon of Offences. 261 

to constitute a condition of the domestic kind. But be tlie con- 
dition what it may which is constituted by these rights, of what 
nature can the obligations be, to which the superintendent is 
capable of being subjected by means of them 1 They are neither 
more nor less than those which a man is capable of being sub- 
jected to by powers. It follows, therefore, that the functions of 
a pidncipal and his superintendent coincide with those of a 
master and his servant ; and consequently that the offences rela- 
tive to the two former conditions will coincide with the offences 
relative to the two latter. 

XLI. Offences to which the condition of a master, like any ^SSiSicthe 
other kind of condition, is exposed, may, as hath been already oondition of 

ft TflftHiiOr. 

intimated^, be distinguished into such as concern the existence 
of the condition itself, and such as concern the performance of 
the functions of it, while subsisting. First then, with regard to 
such as affect its existence. It is obvious enough that the ser- 
vices of one man may be a benefit to another : the condition of 
a master may therefore be a beneficial one. It stands exposed, 
therefore, to the offences of wr<yngfuL nonrinvestment, wrongful 
interception, uswrptUiony wrongful investment, and wrongful di- 
vestment. But how should it stand exposed to the offences of 
wrongful abdication, wrongful detrectation, and turongful im^si- 
tion ? Certainly it cannot of itself ; for services, when a man 
has the power of exacting them or not, as he thinks fit, can never 
be a burthen. But if to the powers, by which the condition of 
a master is constituted, the law thinks fit to annex any obliga- 
tion on the part of the master; for instance, that of affording 
maintenance, or giving wages, to the servant, or paying money 
to anybody else ; it is evident that in virtue of such obligation 
the condition m>ay become a burthen. In this case, however, 
the condition possessed by the master will not, properly speaking, 
be the pure and simple condition of a master : it will be a kind 
of complex object, resolvable into the beneficial condition of a 
master, and the burthensome obligation which is annexed to it. 
Still however, if the nature of the obligation lies within a narrow 

^ Vide supra, zxvii. 



262 Division of Offences, [chap. 

eompass, and does not, in the manner of that which constitutes 
« trust, interfere with the exercise of those powers hj which the 
condition of the superior is constituted, the latter, notwithstanding 
this foreign mixture, will still retain the name of mastership ^. 
In this case therefore, but not otherwise, the condition of a 
master may stand exposed to the offences of wrongftd ahdieatiouy 
wrongful detrectation, and wrongful imposition. Next as to the 
behaviour of persons with reference to this condition, while con- 
sidered as subsisting. In virtue of its being a benefit, it is ex- 
posed to distu/rbance. This disturbance will either be the offence 
of a stranger, or the offence of the servant himself. Where it is 
the offence of a stranger, and is committed l^j taking the person 
of the servant, in circumstances in which the taking of an object 
belonging to the class of things would be an act of theft, or 
(what is scarcely worth distinguishing from theft) an act of em- 
bezzlement, it may be termed servcmt'Steciling, Where it is the 
offence of the servant himself, it is styled breach of dvMj. Now 
the most flagrant species of breach of duty, and that which in- 
cludes indeed every other, is that which consists in the servant's 
withdrawing himself from the place in which the duty should be 
performed. This species of breach of duty is termed elopement. 
Again, in virtue of the power belonging to this condition, it is 
liable, on the part of the master, to abuse. But this power is 
not coupled with a trust. The condition of a master is there- 
fore not exposed to any offence which is analogous to breach of 
trust. Lastly, on account of its being exposed to abuse, it may 
be conceived to stand, in point of possibility, exposed to bribery. 
But considering how few, and how insignificant, the persons are 
who are liable to be subject to the power here in question, this 
is an offence which, on account of the wsmt of temptation, there 
will seldom be any example of in practice. We may therefore 

^ In most civilized nations there is a sort of domestic condition, in which 
the superior is termed a master, while the inferior is termed sometimes 
indeed a servant, but more particularly and more frequently an apprenHce. 
In this case, though the superior is, in point of usage, known by no other 
name than that of a master, the relationship is in point of fact a mixed one, 
compounded of that of master and that of giM/rdian, 



XVI.] Division of Offences. %6^ 

reckon thirteen sorts of offences to which the condition of a 
master is exposed ; viz. i. Wrongful non-investment of master- 
ship. 2. Wrongful interception of mastership. 3. Wrongful 
divestment of mastership. 4. Usurpation of mastership. 5. Wrong- 
ful investment of mastership. 6. Wrongful abdication of master- 
ship. 7. Wrongful detrectation of mastership. 8. Wrongful 
imposition of mastership. 9. Abuse of mastership. 10. Dis- 
turbance of mastership. 11. Breach of duty in servants. 
12. Elopement of servants. 13. Servant-stealing. 

XLII. As to the power by which the condition of a master is Various 
constituted, this may be either limited or unlimited. When it servitude. 
is altogether unlimited, the condition of the servant is styled 
jpure slavery. But as the rules of language are as far as can 
be conceived from being steady on this head, the term slavery is 
conmionly made use of wherever the limitations prescribed to 
the power of the master are looked upon as inconsiderable. 
Whenever any such limitation is prescribed, a kind of fictitious 
entity is thereby created, and, in quality of an incorporeal object 
of possession, is bestowed upon the servant : this object is of the 
class of those which are called rights : and in the present case is 
termed, in a more particular manner, a liberty; and sometimes a 
privilege, an immimityf or an exemption. Now those limitations 
on the one hand, and these liberties on the other, may, it is evi- 
dent, be as various as the acts (positive or negative) which the 
master may or may not have the power of obliging the servant 
to submit to or to perform. Correspondent then to the infini- 
tude of these liberties, is the infinitude of the modifications 
which the condition of mastership (or, as it is more common to 
say in such a case, that of servitude) admits of. These modifi- 
cations, it is evident, may, in different countries, be infinitely 
diversified. In different countries, therefore, the offences charac- 
terised by the above names will, if specifically considered, admit 
of very different descriptions. If there be a spot upon the earth 
so wretched as to exhibit the spectacle of pure and absolutely 
unlimited slavery, on that spot there will be no such thing as 
any abuse of mastership; which means neither more nor less 



2,6^ Division of Offences. [chap. 

than that no abuse of mastership will there be treated on the foot- 
ing of an offence. As to the question, "Whether any, and what, 
- modes of servitude ought to be established or kept on foot 1 this 
is a question, the solution of which belongs to the civil branch of 
the art of legislation. 
Offences "^ XLIII. Next, with regard to the offences that may concern 

touchmg tne ■, . . . , 

condition of the condition of a servant. It might seem at first sight, that a 
condition of this kind could not have a spark of benefit belong- 
ing to it: that it could not be attended with any other con- 
sequences than such as rendered it a mere burthen. But a 
burthen itself may be a benefit, in comparison of a greater bur- 
then. Conceive a man's situation then to be such, that he must, 
at any rate, be in a state of pure slavery. Still may it be mate- 
rial to him, and highly material, who the person is whom he has 
for his master. A state of slavery then, under one master, may 
be a beneficial state to him, in comparison with a state of slavery 
under another master. The condition of a servant then is ex- 
posed to the several offences to which a condition, in virtue of 
its being a beneficial one, is exposed ^. More than this, where 
the power of the master is limited, and the limitations annexed 
to it, and thence the liberties of the servant, are considerable, 
the servitude may even be positively eligible. For amongst those 
limitations may be such as are sufficient to enable the servant 
to possess property of his own : being capable then of possessing 
property of his own, he may be capable of receiving it from his 
master : in short, he may receive wages, or other emoluments, 
from his master; and the benefit resulting from these wages 
may be so considerable as to outweigh the burthen of the servi- 

^ It may seem at first, that a person who is in the condition of a slave, 
could not have it in his power to engage in such course of proceeding as 
would be necessary, in order to give him an apparent title to be reckoned 
among the slaves of another master. But though a slave in point of right, 
it may happen that he has eloped for instance, and is not a slave in point 
of fact : or, suppose him a slave in point of fjEbct, and ever so vigilantly 
guarded, still a person connected with him by the ties of sympathy, might 
do that for him which, though willing and assenting, he might not be able 
to do for himself : might forge a deed of donation, for example, from the 
one master to the other. 



XVI.] Division of Offences. 265 

tude, and, by that means, render that condition more beneficial 
upon the whole, and more eligible, than that of one who is not 
in any respect under the control of any such person as a master. 
Accordingly, by these means the condition of the servant may 
he so eligible, that his entrance into it, and his continuance in it, 
may have been altogether the result of his own choice. That 
the nature of the two conditions may be the more clearly under- 
stood, it may be of use to show the sort of correspondency there 
is between the offences which affect the existence of the one, and 
those which affect the existence of the other. That this cor- 
respondency cannot but be very intimate is obvious at first sight. 
It is not, however, that a given offence in the former catalogue 
coincides with an offence of the same name in the latter cata- 
logue : usurpation of servantship with usurpation of mastership, 
for example. But the case is, that an offence of one denomina- 
tion in the one catalogue coincides with an offence of a different 
denomination in the other catalogue. Nor is the coincidence 
constant and certain : but liable to contingencies, as we shall see. 
First, then, wrongful non-investment of the condition of a ser- 
vant, if it be the offence of one who should have been the master, 
coincides with wrongful detrectation of mastership : if it be the 
offence of a third person, it involves in it non-investment of 
mastership, which, provided the mastership be in the eyes of him 
who should have been master a beneficial thing, but not other- 
wise, is wrongful. 2. Wrongful interception of the condition of 
a servant, if it be the offence of him who should have been 
master, coincides with wrongful detrectation of mastership : if it 
be the offence of a third person, and the mastership be a bene- 
ficial thing, it involves in it wrongful interception of master- 
ship. 3. Wrongful divestment of servantship, if it be the offence 
of the master, but not otherwise, coincides with wrongful ab- 
dication of mastership : if it be the offence of a stranger, it 
involves in it divestment of mastership, which, in as far as the 
mastership is a beneficial thing, is wrongful. 4. TJsurpation of 
servantship coincides necessarily with wrongful imposition of 
mastership : it will be apt to involve in it wrongful divestment 



2,66 Division of Offences. [chap. 

of mastership : but this only in the case where the usurper, pre- 
Tiouslj to the usurpation, was in a state of servitude under some 
other master. 5. Wrongful investment of servantship (the ser- 
vantship being considered as a beneficial thing) coincides with 
imposition of mastership ; which, rf in the eyes of the pretended 
master the mastership should chance to be a burthen, will be 
wrongful. 6. Wrongful abdication of servantship coincides with 
vrrongfiil divestment of mastership. 7. Wrongful detrectation 
of servantship, with wrongful non-investment of mastership. 
8. Wrongful imposition of servantship, if it be the offence of the 
pretended master, coincides with usurpation of mastership: if 
it be the offence of a stranger, it involves in it imposition of 
mastership, which, if in the eyes of the pretended master the 
mastership should be a burthen, will be wrongful. As to abuse 
of mastership, disturbance of mastership, breach of duty in 
servants, elopement of servants, and servant-stealing, these are 
offences which, without any change of denomination, bear equal 
relation to both conditions. And thus we may reckon thirteen 
sorts of offences to which the condition of a servant stands ex- 
posed: viz. I. Wrongful non-investment of servantship. 2. 
Wrongful interception of servantship. 3. Wrongful divestment 
of servantship. 4. Usurpation of servantehip. 5. Wrongful 
investment of servantship. 6. Wrongful abdication of servant- 
ship. 7. Wrongful detrectation of servantship. 8. Wrongful 
imposition of servantshi{». 9. Abuse of mastership. 10. Dis- 
turbance of masteisfaip. 11. Breach of duty in servants. 
12. Elopemeot of servants. 13. Servant-stealing. 
Guardian- XLIV. We now come to the offences to which the condition 

snip, whalt-* 

Neottn^oT of a guardian is exposed. A guardian is one who is invested 
tion. with power over another, living within the compass of the same 

&.mily, and called a ward ; the power being to be exercised for 
the benefit of the ward. Now then, what are the cases in which 
it can be for the benefit of one man, that another, living within 
the compass of the same family, should exercise power over him) 
Consider either of the parties by himself, and suppose him, in 
point of understanding, to be on a level with the other, it seems 



XVI.] Division of Offences. 267 

evident enough that no such cases can ever exist ^ To the pro- 
duction of happiness on the part of any given person (in like 
manner as to the production of anj other effect which is the re- 
sult of human agency) three things it is necessary should concur : 
knowledge, inclination, and physical power. Now as there is no 
man who is so sure of heing iricltned, on all occasions, to promote 
your happiness as you yourself are, so neither is there any man 
who upon the whole can have had so good opportunities as you 
must have had of knovnng what is most conducive to that pur- 
pose. For who should know so well as you do what it is that 
gives you pain or pleasure ^ 1 Moreover, as to power, it is mani- 
fest that no superiority in this respect, on the part of a stranger, 
could, for a constancy, make up for so great a deficiency as he 
must lie under in respect of two such material points as know- 
ledge and inclination. If then there be a case where it can be 
for the advantage of one man to be under the power of another, 
it must be on account of some palpable and very considerable 
deficiency, on the part of the former, in point of intellects, or 
(which is the same thing in other words) in point of knowledge 
or understanding. Now there are two cases in which such pal- 
pable deficiency is known to take place. These are, i. Where a 
man's intellect is not yet arrived at that state in which it is 
capable of directing his own inclination in the pursuit of happi- 
ness : this is the case of infancy '. 2. Where by some particular 
known or unknown circumstance his intellect has either never 
arrived at that state, or having arrived at it has fallen from it : 
which is the case of insanity. 

By what means then is it to be ascertained whether a man's 
intellect is in that state or no ? For exhibiting the quantity of 
sensible heat in a human body we have a very tolerable sort of 
instrument, the thermometer ; but for exhibiting the quAotitj 

^ Oonnder them iogetker indaedy take the eum of the two interests, 
aasd the tam^ as wa bare aeen (supra, xT), is tlien the reverse. That case, 
it is to be remembered, proceeds only apon the supposition that the two 
parties are obliged to live together ; for suppose it to be at their option to 
part, the necessity of establishing the power ceases. 

' Ch. xvii. [Limits], § i. 

' See ch. xiii. [Cases unmeet], | iii. 



a68 Division of Offences. [chap. 

of intelligence, we have no such instrument. It is evident, 
therefore, that the line which separates the quantity of intelli- 
gence which is sufficient for the purposes of self-government 
from that which is not sufficient, must be, in a great measure, 
arbitrary. Where the insufficiency is the result of want of age, 
the sufficient quantity of intelligence, be it what it may, does 
not accrue to all at the same period of their lives. It becomes 
therefore necessary for legislators to cut the gordian knot, and 
fix upon a particular period, at which and not before, truly or 
not, every person whatever shall be deemed, as far as depends 
upon age, to be in possession of this sufficient quantity^. In 
this case then a line is drawn which may be the same for every 
man, and in the description of which, such as it is, whatever 
persons are concerned may be certain of agreeing : the circum- 
stance of time affording a mark by which the line in question 
may be traced with the utmost degree of nicety. On the other 
hand, where the insufficiency is the result of insanity, there is 
not even this resource : so that here the legislator has no other 
expedient than to appoint some particular person or persons to 
give a particular determination of the question, in every in- 
stance in which it occurs, according to his or their particular 
and arbitrary discretion. Arbitrary enough it must be at any 
rate, since the only way in which it can be exercised is by 
considering whether the share of intelligence possessed by the 
individual in question does or does not come up to the loose 
and indeterminate idea which persons so appointed may chance 
to entertain with respect to the quantity which is deemed 
sufficient. 

' In certain nations, women, whether married or not, have been placed 
in a state of perpetual wardship : this has been evidently founded on the 
notion of a decided inferiority in point of intellects on the part of the female 
sex, analogous to that which is the result of in&ncy or insanity on the part 
of the male. This is not the only instance in which tyranny has taken 
advantage of its own wrong, alleging as a reason for the domination it 
exercises, an imbecility, which, as far as it has been real, has been produced 
by the abuse of that very power which it is brought to justify. Aristotle, 
fskscinated by the prejudice of the times, divides mankind into two distinct 
species, that of freemen, and that of slaves. Certain men were bom to be 
slaves, and ought to be slaves. — ^Why ? Because they are so. 



XVI.] Dimmii of Offences. 269 

XLV. The line then being drawn, or supposed to be so, it is iHirafcionto 

, be givGii to 

expedient to a man who cannot, with safety to himself, be left in it. 
his own power, that he should be placed in the power of another. 
How long then should he remain so ? Just so long as his in- 
ability is supposed to continue : that is, in the case of infancy, 
till he arrives at that period at which the law deems him to be 
of full age : in the case of insanity, till he be of sound mind and 
understanding. Now it is evident, that this period, in the case 
of infancy, may not arrive for a considerable time : and in the 
case of insanity, perhaps never. The duration of the power be- 
longing to this trust must therefore, in the one case, be very 
Considerable ; in the other case, indefinite. 

XLYL The next point to consider, is what maybe the extent Powers that 
of it % for as to what ought to be, that is a matter to be settled, duties that 
not in a general analytical sketch, but in a particular and cir- annexed 
cumstantial dissertation. By possibility, then, this power may 
possess any extent that can be imagined : it may extend to any 
acts which, physically speaking, it may be in the power of the 
ward to perform himself, or be the object of if exercised by the 
guardian. Conceive the power, for a moment, to stand upon 
this footing: the condition of the ward stands now exactly 
upon a footing with pure slavery. Add the obligation by which 
the power is turned into a trust : the limits of the power are 
now very considerably narrowed. What then is the purport of 
this obligation? Of what nature is the course of conduct it 
prescribes ? It is such a course of conduct as shall be best cal- 
culated for procuring to the ward the greatest quantity of hap- 
piness which his faculties, and the circumstances he is in, will 
admit of: saving always, in the first place, the regard which the 
guardian is permitted to show to his own happiness ; and, in the 
second place, that which he is obliged, as well as permitted, to 
show to that of other men. This is, in fact, no other than that 
course of conduct which the ward, did he but know how, ought, in 
point oi^prvdence, to maintain of himself: so that the business 
of the former is to govern the latter precisely in the manner in 
which this latter ought to govern himself. Now to instruct 



370 Division of Ofefices, [chap. 

each iDdividnal in what manner to govern his own conduct in 
the details of* life, is the particular business of private ethics : 
to instruct individuals in what manner to govern the conduct 
of those whose happiness, during nonage, is committed to their 
charge, is the business of the art of private education. The 
details, therefore, of the rules to be given for that purpose, any- 
more than the acts which are capable of being committed in 
violation of those rules, belong not to the art of legislation : 
since, as will be seen more particularly hereafter ^, such details 
could not, with any chance of advantage, be provided for by the 
legislator. Some general outlines might indeed be drawn by 
his authority: and, in point of fact, some are in every civilized 
state. But such regulations, it is evident, must be liable to 
great variation: in the first place, according to the infinite 
diversity of civil conditions which a man may stand invested 
with in any given state : in the next place, according to the 
diversity of local circumstances that may influence the nature of 
the conditions which may chance to be established in different 
states. On this account, the offences which would be constituted 
by such regulations could not be comprised under any concise 
and settled denominations, capable of a permanent and extensive 
application. No place, therefore, can be allotted to them here. 
Offences XLYII. By what has been said, we are the better prepared 

condition of for taking an account of the offences to which the condition in 
question stands exposed. Guardianship being a private trust, 
is of course exposed to those offences, and no others, by which a 
private trust is liable to be affected. Some of them, however, 
on account of the special quality of the trust, will admit of some 
further particularity of description. In the first place, breach 
of this species of trust may be termed mismanagement of 
guardianship : in the second place, of whatever nature the 
duties are which are capable of being annexed to this condition, 
it must often happen, that in order to fulfil them, it is necessary 
the guardian should be at a certain particular place. Mis- 
management of guardianship, when it consists in the not being, 

^ See ch. xvii. [limitB], $ i. 



XVI.] Divmoft of Ofenees. 271 

on the occaaion in question, at the place in question, may be 
termed desertion of guardianship. Thirdly, It is manifest enough, 
that the object which the guardian ought to propose to himself, 
in the exercise of the powers to which those duties are annexed, 
is to procure for the ward the greatest quantity of happiness 
which can be procured for him, consistently with the regard 
which is due to the other interests that have been mentioned : 
for this is the object which the ward would have proposed to 
himself and might and ought to have been allowed to propose 
to himself, had he been capable of governing his own conduct. 
Now, in order to procure this happiness, it is necessary that he 
should possess a certain power over the objects on the use of 
which such happiness depends. These objects are either the 
person of the ward himself, or other objects that are extraneous 
to him. These other objects are either things or persons. As 
to things, then, objects of this class, in as far as a man's happiness 
" depends upon the use of them, are styled his property. The 
case is the same with the services of any persons over whom he 
may happen to possess a beneficial power, or to whose services he 
may happen to possess a beneficial right. Now when property 
of any kind, which is in trust, sufiers by the delinquency of him 
with whom it is in trust, such offence, of whatever nature it is 
in other respects, may be styled dissipation in breach of trust : 
and if it be attended with a profit to the trustee, it may be 
styled peculation^. Fourthly, For one person to exercise a power 
of any kind over another, it is necessary that the latter should 
either perform certain acts, upon being commanded so to do by 
the former, or at least should suffer certain acts to be exercised 
upon himself. In this respect a ward must stand upon the 
footing of a servant : and the condition of a ward must, in this 
respect, stand exposed to the same offences to which that of a 
servant stands exposed : that is, on the part of a stranger, to 
distwrhance, which, in particular circumstances, will amount to 
th4ft: on the part of the ward, to breach of duty: which, in 
particular circumstances, may be effected by dopemefrU, Fifthly, 

^ Supra, xzxy. 



2y2 Division of Offences. [chap. 

There does not seem to be anj offence concerning guardianship 
that corresponds to abuse of trust: I mean in the sense to which 
the last<4nentioned denomination has been here confined ^. The 
reason is, that guardianship, being a trust of a private nature, 
does not, as such, confer upon the trustee any power, either over 
the persons or over the property of any party, other than the 
beneficiary himself. If by accident it confers on the trustee a 
power over any persons whose services constitute a part of the 
property of the beneficiary, the trustee becomes thereby, in 
certain respects, the master of such servants'. Sixthly, Bribery 
also is a sort of offence to which, in this case, there is not com- 
monly much temptation. It is an offence, however, which by 
possibility is capable of taking this direction : and must there- 
fore be aggregated to the number of the offences to which the 
condition of a guardian stands exposed. And thus we have in 
all seventeen of these offences : viz. i. Wrongful non-investment 
of guardianship. 2. Wrongful interception of guardianship. 
3. Wrongful divestment of guardianship. 4. Usurpation of 
guardianship. 5. Wrongful investment of guardianship. 6. 
Wrongful abdication of guardianship. 7. Detrectation of 
guardianship. 8. Wrongful imposition of guardianship. 9. 
Mismanagement of guardianship. 10. Desertion of guardian- 
ship. II. Dissipation in prejudice of wardship. 12. Peculation 
in prejudice of wardship. 13. Disturbance of guardianship. 14. 
Breach of duty to guardians. 15. Elopement from guardians.* 
16. Ward-stealing. 17. Bribery in prejudice of wardship. 
Offences XLVIII. Next, with regard to offences to which the con- 

oonditionof dition of wardship is exposed. Those which first affect the 
existence of the condition itself are as follows: i. Wrongful 
non-investment of the condition of a ward. This, if it be the 
offence of one who should have been guardian, coincides with 
wrongful detrectation of guardianship: if it be the offence of 
a third person, it involves in it non-investment of guardian- 
ship, which, provided the guardianship is, in the eyes of him 
who should have been guardian, a desirable thing, is wrongful. 

^ Vide supra^ zzv. ' Vide supra, zL 



XVI.] Division of Offences. 273 

2. Wrongfdl interception of wardship. This, if it be the offence 
of him who should have been guardian, coincides with wrongful 
detrectation of guardianship: if it be the offence of a third 
person, it involves in it interception of guardianship, which, 
provided the guardianship is, in the eyes of him who should 
have been guardian, a desirable thing, is wrongful. 3. Wrongful 
divestment of wardship. This, if it be the offence of the 
guardian, but not otherwise, coincides with wrongful abdication 
of guardianship ; if it be the offence of a third person, it in- 
volves in it divestment of guardianship, which, if the guardian- 
ship is, in the eyes of the guardian, a desirable thing, is wrongful. 
4. Usurpation of the condition of a ward : an offence not very 
likely to be committed. This coincides at any rate with wrong- 
ful imposition of guardianship ; and if the usurper were already 
under the guardianship of another guardian, it will involve in 
it wrongful divestment of such guardianship *. 5. Wrongful 
investment of wardship (the wardship being considered as a 
beneficial thing) : this coincides with imposition of guardianship, 
which, if in the eyes of the pretended guardian the guardianship 
should be a burthen, will be wrongful. 6. Wrongful abdication 
of wardship. This coincides with wrongful divestment of 
guardianship. 7. Wrongful detrectation of wardship. This coin- 
cides with wrongful interception of guardianship. 8. Wrongful 
imposition of wardship. This, if the offender be the pretended 
guardian, coincides with usurpation of guardianship : if a stranger, 
it involves in it wrongful imposition of guardianship. As to 
such of the offences relative to this condition, as concern the 
consequences of it while subsisting, they are of such a nature 
that, without any change of denomination, they belong equally 
to the condition of a guardian and that of a ward. We may 

^ This effect it may be thought will not necessarily take place : since a 
ward may have two guardians. One man then is guardian by right : 
another man comes and makes himself so by usurpation. This may very 
well be, and yet the former may continue guardian notwithstanding. How 
then (it may be asked) is he divested of his guardianship ? — ^The answer 
is — Certainly not of the whole of it : but, however, of a part of it : of such 
part as is occupied, if one may so say, that is, of such part of the powers 
and rights belonging to it as are exercised, by the usurper. 



274 Division of Ojenoes^ [chap. 

therefore reckon seventeen sorts of offences relative to the con- 
dition of a ward : i. Wrongful non-investment of wardship, 
2. Wrongful interception of wardship. 3. Wrongful divestment 
of wardship. 4. Usurpation of wardship. 5. Wrongful invest- 
ment of wardship. 6. Wrongful abdication of wardship. 7. 
Wrongful detrectation of wardship. 8. Wrongful imposition of 
wardship. 9. Mismanagement of guardianship. 10. Desertion 
of guardianship. 11. Dissipation in prejudice of wardship. 
■12. Peculation in prejudice of wardship. 13. Disturbance of 
guardianship. 14. Breach of duty to guardians. 15. Elope- 
ment from guardians. 16. Ward-stealing. 17. Bribery in 
prejudice of wardship. 
Offences XLIX. We come now to the offences to which the condition 

condition of of a parent Btands exposed : and first, with regard to those by 
a paren . ^j^icj^ ^^ very existence of the condition is affected. On this 
occasion, in order to see the more clearly into the subject, it will 
be necessary to distinguish between the natural relationship, and 
the legal relationship which is superinduced as it were upon the 
natural one. The natural one being constituted by a particular 
event, which, either on account of its being already past, or on 
some other account, is equally out of the power of the law, 
neither is, nor can be made, the subject of an offence. Is a man 
your father ^ It is not any offence of mine that can make you 
not his son. Is he Tiot your father 1 It is not any offence of 
mine that can render him so. But although he does in fact bear 
that relation to you, I, by an offence of mine, may perhaps so 
manage matters, that he shall not be thought to bear it : which, 
with respect to any legal advantages which either he or you 
could derive from such relationship, will be the same thing as if 
be did not. In the capacity of a witness, I may cause the 
judges to believe that he is not your father, and to decree 
accordingly : or, in the capacity of a judge, I may myself decree 
him not to be your father. Leaving then the purely natural 
relationship as an object equally out of the reach of justice and 
injustice, the legal condition, it is evident, will stand exposed to 
the same offences, neither more nor less, as every other condition. 



XVI.] Division qf Offences, %J^ 

-that is capable of being either beneficial or bnrthensome^ stands 
exposed to. Next, with regard to the exercise of the functions 
belonging to this condition, considered as still subsisting. ]ii 
parentality there must be two persons concerned, the father and 
the mother. The condition of a parent includes, therefore, two 
conditions ; that of a father, and that of a mother, with respect 
to such or such a child. Now it is evident, that between these 
two parties, whatever beneficiary powers, and other rights, as 
also whatever obligations, are annexed to the condition of a 
parent, may be shared in any proportions that can be imagined. 
But if in these several objects of legal creation, each of these two 
parties have severally a share, and if the interests of all these 
parties are in any degree provided for, it is evident that each of 
the parents will stand, with relation to the child, in two several 
capacities : that of a master, and that of a guardian. The con- 
dition of a parent then, in as far as it is the work of law, m»y 
be considered as a complex condition, compounded of that of a 
guardian, and that of a master. To the parent then, in quality 
of guardian, results a set of duties, involving, as necessary to 
the discharge of them, certain powers : to the child, in the 
character of a ward, a set of rights corresponding to the parent's 
duties, and a set of duties corresponding to his powers. To the 
parent again, in quality of master, a set of beneficiary powers, 
without any other necessary limitation (so long as they last) 
than what is annexed to them by the duties incumbent on him 
in quality of a guardian : to the child, in the character pf a 
servant, a set of duties corresponding to the parent's beneficiary 
powers, and without any other necessary limitation (so long as 
they last) than what is annexed to them by the rights which 
belong to the child in his capacity of ward. The condition of a 
parent will therefore be exposed to all the offences to which 
either that of a guardian or that of a master are exposed : and, 
as each of the parents will partake, more or less, of both those 
characters, the offences to which the two conditions are exposed 
may be nominally, as they will be substantially, the same. Taking 
ihem then all together, the offences to which the condition. ,o£ 

T 2 



276 Division of Offences, [chap. 

a parent is exposed will stand as follows : i. Wrongful non- 
investment of parentality^, 2. Wrongful interception of parent- 
Ality. 3. Wrongfiir divestment of parentality, 4. Usurpation 
of parentality^ g. Wrongful investment of parentality. 6. Wrong- 
ful abdication of parentality. 7. Wrongful detrectation of 
parentality. 8. Wrongful imposition of parentality. 9. Mis- 
management of parental guardianship. 10. Desertion of parental 
guardianship. 11, Dissipation in prejudice of filial wardship. 
12. Peculation in prejudice of filial wardship. 13. Abuse of 
parental powers. 14. Disturbance of parental guardianship. 
15. Breach of duty to parents. 16. Elopement from parents. 
17. Child-stealing. 18. Bribery in prejudice of filial wardship. 
OfTences L. Next with regard to the offences to which the Jilial con- 

fiiiai con- dition ^, the condition of a son or daughter, stands exposed. The 
principles to be pursued in the investigation of offences of this 
description have already been sufficiently developed. It will be 
sufficient, therefore, to enumerate them without further dis- 
cussion. The only peculiarities by which offences relative to 
the condition in question stand distinguished from the offences 
relative to all the preceding conditions, depend upon this one 

^ At first view it may seem a solecism to speak of the condition of 
parentality as one which a man can have need to be invested with. The 
reason is, that it is not common for any ceremony to be required as neces- 
sary to a man's being deemed in law the father of such or such a child. 
But the institution of such a ceremony, whether advisable or not, is at 
least perfectly conceivable. Not are there wanting cases in which it has 
actually been exemplified. By an article in the Roman law, adopted by 
many modern nations, an illegitimate child is rendered legitimate by the 
subsequent marriage of his parents. If then a priest, or other person whose 
office it was, were to refuse to join a man and woman in matrimony, such 
refusal, besides being a wrongful non-investment with respect to the two 
matrimonial conditions, would be a wrongful non-investment of parentality 
and filiation, to the prejudice of any children who should have been 
legitimated. 

* In English we have no word that will serve to express with propriety 
the person who bears the relation opposed to that of parent. The word 
child is ambiguous, being employed in another sense, perhaps more fre- 
quently than in this : more frequently in opposition to a person of fuU age^ 
an adulty than in correlation to a parent. For the condition itself we have 
no other word than filiation: an ill-contrived term, not analogous to 
paternity and maternity : the proper term would have been filiality : the 
word filiation is as frequently, perhaps, and more consistently, put for the 
»ct of establishing a person in the possession of the condition of filialily. 



XVI,] Division of Offences. 277 

circunastance ; viz. that it is certain every one must have had a 
father and a mother : at the same time that it is not certain that 
every one must have had a master, a servant, a guardian, or a 
ward. It will he ohserved all aloug^ that where a person, from 
whom, if alive, the henefit would be taken, or on whom the 
burthen would be imposed, be dead, so much of the mischief is 
extinct along with the object of the offence. There still, how- 
ever, remains so much of the mischief as depends upon the 
advantage or disadvantage which might accrue to- persons related, 
or supposed to be related, in the several remoter degrees, to him 
in question. The catalogue then of these offences stands as 
follows : I. Wrongful non-investment of filiation. This, if it be 
the offence of him or her who should have been recognised as the 
parent, coincides with wrongful detrectation of parentality: if it 
be the offence of a third person, it involves in it non-investment 
of parentality, which, provided the parentality is, in the eyes of 
him or her who should have been recognised as the parent, a 
desirable thing, is wrongful. 2. "Wrongful interception of filia- 
tion. This, if it be the offence of him or her who should have 
been recognised as the parent, coincides with wrongful detrecta- 
tion of parentality: if it be the offence of a third person, it 
involves in it interception of parentality, which, provided the 
parentality is, in the eyes of him or her who should have been 
recognised as parent, a desirable thing, is wrongful. 3. Wrongful 
divestment of filiation. This, if it be the offence of him or her 
who should be recognised as parent, coincides with wrongful 
abdication of parentality: if it be the offence of a third person, 
it involves in it divestment of parentality ; to wit, of paternity, 
or of maternity, or of both ; which, if the parentality is, in the 
eyes of him or her who should be recognised as parent, a desir- 
able thing, are respectively wrongful, 4. Usurpation of filiation. 
This coincides with wrongful imposition of parentality; to wit, 
either of paternity, or of maternity, or of both : and necessarily 
involves in it divestment of parentality, which, if the parentality 
thus divested were, in the eyes of him or her who are thus 
divested of it, a desirable thing, is wrongful. 5. Wrongful in* 



2j8 JHvision cf Offencei, [chap; 

▼estment of filiation : (the filiation being considered as a bene- 
fixoal thing.) This coincides with imposition of parentality, which, 
if in tihe ejes of the pretended father or mother the parentality 
should be an undesirable thing, will be wrongful. 6. Wrongful 
abdication of filiation. This necessarily coincides with wrongful 
divestment of parentalitj; it also is apt to involve in it wrongful 
imposition of parentality; though not necessarily either to the 
advantage or to the prejudice of any certain person. For if a 
man, supposed at first to be your son, appears afterwards not to 
be yours, it is certain indeed that he is the son of some other 
man, but it may not appear who that other man is. 7. Wrongful 
detredation of filiation. This coincides with wroi^ful non- 
investment or wrongfiil interception of parentality. 8. Wrongful 
imposition of filiation. This, if it be the offence of the pretended 
parent, coincides necessarily with usurpation of parentality: if it 
be the offence of a third person, it necessarily involves imposition 
of parentality; as also divestment of parentality: either or both 
of which, according to the circumstance above mentioned, may or 
may not be wrongful. 9. Mismanagement of parental guardian- 
ship. 10. Desertion of parental guardianship. 11. Dissipation 
in prejudice of filial wardship. 1 2. Peculation in prejudice of 
filial wardship. 13^ Abuse of parental power. 14. Disturbance 
of parental guardianship. 15. Breach of duty to parents. 
16. Elopement from parents. 17. Child-stealing. 18. Bribery 
in prejudice of parental guardianship. 
Ck>ndition of LI. We shall now be able to apply ourselves with some 
—Powers, advantage to the examination of the several offences to which 
rightWthat the marital condition, or condition of a husband, stands exposed, 
nexed to it. A hudband is a man, between whom and a certain woman, who 
iu this case is called his wife, there subsists a legal obligation for 
the purpose of their living together, and in particular for the 
purpose of a sexual intercourse to be carried on between them. 
This obligation will naturally be considered in four points of 
view: i. In respect of its commencement. 2. In respect of the 
placing of it. 3. In respect of the nature of it. 4. In respect of 
itd duration. First then, it is evident, that in point of possibility, 



XVI.] Bivimn <f Offanc^^^ ^79 

one method of oommencement is aa conceivable as another : the 
time of its commencement might have been marked by one sort 
of event (by one sort of signal^ as it may here be called) aa well 
as by pother. But in practice the signal has usually been, aa 
in point of utility it ought constantly to be, a contract ejiitered 
into by the parties : that is, a set of signs, pitched upon by the 
law, as expressive of their mutaal consent, to take upon them thia 
condition. Secondly^ and thirdly, with regard to the placisag' of 
the obligations which are the result of the contract, it is evident 
that they must rest either solely on one side, or mutually on both. 
On the first supposition, the condition is not to be distinguished 
from pure slavery. In this case, either the wife must be the 
slave of the husband, or the husband of the wife. The first of 
these suppositions has perhaps never bean exemplified; the 
opposing influence of physical causes being too universal to have 
ever been surmounted : the latter seems to have been exemplified 
but too often ; perhaps among the first Romans ; at any rate, in 
many barbarous nations. Thirdly, with regard to the nature 
of the obligations. If they are not suffered to rest all on one 
side, pertain rights are thereby given to the oth^r. There must, 
therefore, be rights on both sidea. Now, where there are mutual 
rights possessed by two persons, aa against each other, either 
there are powers annexed to those rights, or not. But the 
persons in question are, by the supposition, to live together : in 
which case we have shown ^, that it is not only e3s;pedient, but in 
a manner necessary, that on one side there should be powers. 
Now it is only on one side that powers can be : for suppose them 
on both sides, and they destroy one another. The question is 
then, In which of the parties these powers shall be lodged 1 we 
have shown, that an the principle of utility they ought to be 
lodged in the husband. The powers then which subsist being 
lodged in the husband, the next question is. Shall the interest of 
one party only, or of both, be consulted in the exercise of them \ 
it is evident, that on the principle of utility the interests of both 
ought alike to be consulted: since in two persons^ taken to- 

^ Supra, zli note.. 



28o Division of Offences. [chap. 

gether, more happiness is producible than in one. This being 
the case, it is manifest, that the legal relation which the husband 
will bear to the wife will be a complex one : compounded of 
that of master and that of guardian. 
Offences LII. The offences then to which the condition of a husband 

condition of will be exposed, will be the sum of those to which the two con- 
ditions of master and guardian are exposed. Thus far the 
condition of a husband, with respect to the general outlines of it, 
stands upon the same footing as that of a parent. But there are 
certain reciprocal services, which being the main subject of the 
matrimonial contract, constitute the essence of the two matri- 
monial relations, and which neither a master nor guardian, as 
such, nor a parent, at any rate, have usually been permitted to 
receive. These must of course have been distinguished from the 
indiscriminate train of services at large which the husband in 
his character of master is empowered to exact, and of those 
which in his character of guardian he is bound to render. Being 
thus distinguished, the offences relative to the two conditions 
have, in many instances, in as far as they have reference to these 
peculiar services, acquired particular denominations. In the first 
place, with regard to the contract, from the celebration of which 
the legal condition dates its existence. It is obvious that in 
point of possibility, this contract might, on the part of either 
sex, subsist with respect to several persons of the other sex at 
the same time : the husband might have any number of wives : 
the wife might have any number of husbands : the husband 
might enter into the contract with a number of wives at the 
same time : or, if with only one at a time, he might reserve to 
himself a right of engaging in a similar contract with any num- 
ber, or with only such or such a number of other women after- 
wards, during the continuance of each former contract. This 
latter accordingly is the footing upon which, as is well known, 
marriage is and has been established in many extensive countries: 
particularly in all those which profess the Mahometan religion. 
In point of possibility, it is evident that the like liberty might be 
reserved on the part of the wife : though in point of practice no 



XVI.] Division of Offences. a8i 

examples of such an arrangement seem ever to have occurred. 
Which of all these arrangements is in point of utility the most 
expedient, is a question which would require too much dis- 
cussion to answer in the course of an analytical process like the 
present, and which belongs indeed to the civil branch of legisla- 
tion, rather than to the penal ^. In Christian countries, the 
solemnization of any such contract is made to exclude the 
solemnization of any subsequent one during the continuance of a 
former : and the solemnization of any such subsequent contract 
is accordingly treated as an offence, under the name of Polygamy. 
Polygamy then is at any rate, on the part of the man, a par- 
ticular modification of that offence which may be styled usurpa- 
tion of the condition of a husband. As to its other effects, they 
will be different, according as it was the man only, or the woman 
gnly, or both, that were in a state of matrimony at the time of 
the commission of the offence. If the man only, then his offence 
involves in it pro tanto that of wrongful divestment of the con- 
dition of a wife, in prejudice of his prior wife ^. If the woman 
only, then it involves in it pro tanto that of wrongful divestment 
of the condition of a husband, in prejudice of her prior husband. 
If both were already married, it of course involves both the 
wrongful divestments which have just been mentioned. And on 
the other hand also, the converse of all this may be observed 
with regard to polygamy on the part of the woman. Secondly, As 
the engaging not to enter into any subsequent engagement of the 
like kind during the continuance of the first, is one of the con- 
ditions on which the law lends its sanction to the first; so 
another is, the inserting as one of the articles of this engagement, 
an undertaking not to render to, or accept fix)m, any other 
person the services which form the characteristic object of it : 
the rendering or acceptance of any such services is accordingly 
treated as an offence, under the name of adultery : under which 
name is also comprised the offence of the stranger, who, in the 

* See ch. xvii. [Limits], § iv. 

^ In this case also, if the woman knew not of the prior marriage, it is 
besides a species of seduction ; and, in as far as it affects her, belongs to 
another division of the offences of this class. Vide supra, xzxvi. 



a 8a Division of Offences-. [chaK 

commission of the above offence, is the necessary accomplice. 
Thirdly, Disturbing either of the parties to this engagement, in 
the possession of these characteristic services, may, in like man- 
ner, be distinguished from the offence of disturbing them in the 
enjo3rment of the miscellaneous advantages derivable from the 
same condition ; and on whichever side the blame rests, whether 
that of the party, or that of a third person, may be termed 
wrongful tvithholding of connubial services. And thus we have 
one-and-twenty sorts of offences to which, as the law stands at 
present in Christian countries, the condition of a husband stands 
exposed : viz. i. Wrongful non-investment of the condition of a 
husband. 2. "Wrongful interception of the condition of a hus- 
band. 3. Wrongful divestment of the condition of a husband. 
4. Usurpation of the condition of a husband. 5. Polygamy. 
6. Wrongful investment of the condition of a husband. 7. 
Wrongful abdication of the condition of a husband. 8. Wrong- 
ful detrectation of the condition of a husband. 9. Wrongful 
imposition of the condition of a husband. la. Mismanagement 
of marital guardianship. 11. Desertion of marital guardianship. 
12. Dissipation in prejudice of matrimonial wardship. 13. Pecu- 
lation in prejudice of matrimonial wardship. 14. Abuse of 
marital power. 15. Disturbance of marital guardianship. 
1 6. Wrongful withholding of connubial services. 17. Adultery. 
18. Breach of duty to husbands. 19. Elopement from husbands. 
20. Wife-stealing. 21. Bribery in prejudice of marital guardian- 
ship^. 
Offences UH. Next with regard to the offences to which the condition 

cond^n*of ^^ * ^^® stands exposed. From the patterns that have been 
a wife. exhibited already, the coincidences and associations that take 
place between the offences that concern the existence of this con- 
dition and those which concern the existence of the condition of 
a husband, may easily enough be apprehended without farther 

' I. Semi-public offences. — Fabehoods contesting, or offences against jus- 
tice destroying, the validity of the marriages of people of certain deaorip- 
tions : sueli aa Jews, Quakers, Hugonots, &c. &c. 

II. SjELF-SEaABDiNG offenceQ.— Improvident marriage on the part of 
minors. 



XVI.] JKvidon of Offences, 283 

repetitions. The catalogue of those now nnder conBideration 
will be precisely the same in eyeiy article as the catalogue last 
exhibited. 

LIV. Thus much for the several s<Mi» of offences relative to 
the several sorts of domestic conditions : those which are consti- 
tuted by such natural relations as are contiguous being included. 
There remain those which are uncontiguous : of which, after 
so much afi has been said of the others, it will naturally be ex- 
pected that some notice should be taken. These, however, do 
not afford any of that matter which is necessary to constitute a 
condition.. In point of fact, no power seems ever to be annexed 
to any of them. A grandfather, perhaps, may be called by the 
law to take upon him the guardianship of his orphan grand- 
son : but then the power he has belongs to him not as grand- 
father, but as guardian. In point of possibility, indeed, power 
might be annexed to these relations^ just as it nnght to any 
other. But still no new sort of domestic condition would result 
from it : since it has been shown that there can be no others, 
that, being constituted by power, shall be distinct from those 
which haye been already mentioned. Such as they are, how- 
ever, they have this in common with the before-mentioned rela< 
tions, that they are capable of importing either benefit or 
burthen: they therefore stand exposed to the several offences 
whereby those or any other relations are liable to be affected in 
point of existence. It might be expected, therefore, that in 
virtue of these offences, they should be added to the list of the 
relations which are liable to be objects of delinquency. But the 
fact is, that they already stand included in it : and although not 
expressly named, yet. as effectually as if they were. On the 
one hand, it is only by affecting such or such a contiguous rela- 
tion that any offence affecting uncontiguous relations can take 
place. On the other hand, neither can any offence affecting the 
existence of the contiguous relations be committed, without 
affecting the existence of an indefinite multitude of such as are 
uncontiguous. A false witness comes, and causes it to be be- 
lieved that you are the son of a woman, who, in truth, is not 



284 Division of Offences. [chap, 

your mother. What follows ? An endless tribe of other false 
persuasions — ^that you are the grandson of the father and of the 
mother of this supposed mother : that you are the son of some 
husband of hers, or, at least, of some man with whom she has 
cohabited : the grandson of his father and his mother ; and so 
on : the brother of their other children, if they have any : the 
brother-in-law of the husbands and wives of those children, if 
married : the uncle of the children of those children : and so on. 
— On the other hand, that you are not the son of your real 
mother, nor of your real father : that you are not the grandson 
of either of your real grandfathers or grandmothers ; and so on 
without end : all which persuasions result from, and are included 
in, the one original false persuasion of your being the son of this 
your pretended mother. 

It should seem, therefore, at first sight, that none of the 
offences against these uncontiguous relations could ever come 
expressly into question : for by the same rule that one ought, so 
it might seem ought a thousand others : the offences against the 
uncontiguous being merged as it were in those which affect 
the contiguous relations. So far, however, is this from being 
the case, that in speaking of an offence of this stamp, it is not 
uncommon to hear a great deal said of this or that uncontiguous 
relationship which it affects, at the same time that no notice at 
all shall be taken of any of those which are contiguous. How 
happens this? Because, to the uncontiguous relation are an- 
nexed perhaps certain remarkable advantages or disadvantages, 
while to all the intermediate relations none shall be annexed 
which are in comparison worth noticing. Suppose Antony or 
Lepidus to have contested the relationship of Octavius (after- 
wards Augustus) to Caius Julius Csesar. How could it have 
been done ? It could only have been by contesting, either Oc- 
tavius's being the son of Atia, or Atia*s being the daughter of 
Julia, or Julia's, being the daughter of Lucius Julius Csesar, or 
Lucius Julius Caesar's being the father of Caius. But to have 
been the son of Atia, or the grandson of Julia, or the great 
grandson of Lucius Julius Csesar, was, in comparison, of small 



XVI.] Division of Offences. ^85 

importance. Those intervening relationships were, comparatively 
speaking, of no other use to him than in virtue of their being so 
mahy necessary links in the genealogical chain which connected 
him with the sovereign of the empire. 

As to the advantages and disadvantages which may happen to 
be annexed to any of those uncontiguous relationships, we have 
seen already that no powers over the correlative person, nor any 
corresponding obligations, are of the number. Of what nature 
then can they be ] They are, in truth, no other than what are 
the result either of local and accidental institutions, or of ^ome 
spontaneous bias that has been taken by the moral sanction. It 
would, therefore, be to little purpose to attempt tracing them 
out a priori by any exhaustive process : all that can be done is, 
to pick up and lay together some of the principal articles in each 
catalogue by way of specimen. The advantages which a given 
relationship is apt to impart, seem to be referable chiefly to the 
following heads : i. Chance of succession to the property, or a 
part of the property, of the correlative person. 2. Chance of 
pecuniary support, to be yielded by the correlative person, either 
by appointment of law, or by spontaneous donation. 3. Ac- 
cession of legal rank ; including any legal privileges which may 
happen to be annexed to it : such as capacity of holding such 
and such beneficial offices; exemption &om such and such 
burthensome obligations ; for instance, paying taxes, serving 
burthensome offices, &c. &c. 4, Accession of rank by courtesy; 
including the sort of reputation which is customarily and spon- 
taneously annexed to distinguished birth and family alliance : 
whereon may depend the chance of advancement in the way of 
marriage, or in a thousand other ways less obvious. The dis- 
advantages which a given relation is liable to impart, seem to be 
referable chiefly to the following heads: i. Chance of being 
obliged, either by law, or by force of the moral sanction, to yield 
pecuniary support to the correlative party, 2. Loss of legal 
rank : including the legal disabilities, as well as the burthensome 
obligations, which the law is apt to annex, sometimes with in- 
justice enough, to the lower stations^ 3. Loss of rank by 



a86 Mvmon of Offences. [chap. 

vourtesy : including the loss of the advantages annexed by custom 
to such rank. 4. Incapacity of contracting matrimony with the 
correlative person, where the supposed consanguinity or affinity 
lies within the prohibited degrees K 

^ In pursuance of the plan adopted with relation to eemi^public and sel^ 
regarding offences, it m«y here be proper to exhibit such a catalogue as the 
nature of the design will admit, of the several genera or inferior divisionB 
of public offences. 

I. Offencbs against the external securitt of the state, i. Treason 
(in favour of foreign enemies). It may be positive or negative (negative 
consisting, for example, in the not opposing the commission of positive). 
2. Espionage (in favour of foreign rivals not yet enemies). 3. Injuries to 
foreigners at large (including piracy). 4. Injuries to privileged foreigners 
(such as ambassadors). 

II. Offences against Justice. Offences against judicial trust : viz. 
* Wrongful non -investment of judicial trust, wrongful interception of judicial 
trust, wrongful divestment of judicial trust, usurpation of judicial trust, 
wrongful investment of judicial trust, wrongful abdication of judicial trust, 
wrongful detrectation of judicial trust, wrongful imposition of judicial trust, 
breach of judicial trust, abuse of judicial trust, disturbance of judicial 
trust, and bribery in prejudice of judicial trust. 

Breach and abuse of judicial trust may be either intentional or uninten- 
tional. Intentional is culpable at any rate. Unintentional will proceed 
either from inadvertence, or from mis-supponal : if the inadvertence be 
coupled with heedlessness, or tiie mis-supposal with rashness, it is culpable : 
if not, blameless. For the particular acts by which the exercise of judicial 
trust may be disturbed see B. i. tit. [Offences against justice]. They are too 
multi£etrious, and too ill provided with names, to be exhibited here. 

If a man fails in fulfilling the duties of this trust, and thereby comes 
either to break or to abuse it, it must be through some deficiency in the 
three requisite and only requisite endowments, of knowledge, indiuation, 
and power. [See supra, xxvii.] A deficiency in any of those points, if 
any person be in fault, may proceed either from his own fault, or from the 
fault of those who should act with or under him. If persons who are in 
fault are persons invested with judicial trust, the offence comes under the 
head of breach or abuse of trust : if other persons, under that of disturb- 
ance of trust. 

The ill efiSscts of any breach, abuse, or disturbance of judicial trust, will 
consist in the production of some article or articles in the list of the mia* 
chie& which it ought to be the original purpose of judicial procedure to 
remedy or avert, and of those which it ought to be the incidental purpose 
of it to avoid producing. These are either primary (that is immediate) or 
z<emote : remote are of the 2nd, 3rd, or 4th order, and so on. The primary 
are those which import actual pain to persons assignable, and are therefore 
mischievous in themselves : the secondary are mischievous on account of 
the tendency they have to produce some article or articles in the catalogue 
of those of the first order ; and are therefore mischievous in their effects. 
Those of the 3rd order are mischievous only on account of the connection 
they have in the way of productive tendency, as before, with those of the 
2nd order : and so on. 
> Primary inconveniences, which it ought to be the object of procedure Ui 



XVI.] Division of Offences, 287 

LV. We come now to civil conditions : these, it may well be Ciyii con- 
imagined^ may be infinitely various : as various as the acts which 

provide against, are, i. The continuance of the individual ofiPence itself, 
and thereby the increase as well as continuance of the mischief of it. 3. 
The continuance of the whole mischief of the individual offence. 3. The 
continuance of a part of the mischief of tiie individual offence. 4. Total 
want of amends on the part of persons injured by the offence. 5. Partial 
want of amends on the part of persons injured by the offence. 6. Super- 
fluous punishment of delinquents. 7. Unjust punishment of persons 
accused. 8. Unnecessary labour, expense, or other suffering or danger, on 
the part of superior judicial officers. 9. Unnecessary labour, expense, or 
other suffering or danger, on the part of ministerial or other subordinate 
judicial officers. 10. Unnecessary labour, expense, or other suffering or 
danger, on the part of persons whose co-operation is requisite pro re nata, 
in order to make up the necessary complement of knowledge and power 
on the part of judicial officers, who are such by profession. 11. Unneces- 
sary labour, expense, or other suffering or danger, on the part of persons at 
large, coming under the sphere of the operations of the persons above- 
mentioned. 

Secondary inconveniences are, in the consultative, pre-interpretative (or 
purely civil) branch of procedure, i. Misinterpretation or adjudication. 
In the executive (including the penal) branch. 2. Total impunity of de- 
linquents : (as favouring the production of other offences of the like 
nature). 3. Partial impunity of delinquents. 4. Application of punish- 
ment improper in specie, though perhaps not in degree (this lessening the 
beneficial efficacy of the quantity employed). 5. Uneconomical applica- 
tion of punishment, though proper, perhaps, as well in specie as in d^ree. 
6. Unnecessary pecuniary expense on the part of the state. 

Inconveniences of the 3rd order are, i. Unnecessary delay. 2. Unneces- 
sary intricacy. 

Inconveniences of the 4th order are, i. Breach, 2. Abuse, 3. Disturb- 
ance, of judicial trust, as above : viz. in as far as these offences are pre- 
liminary to and distinct firom those of the 2nd and 3rd orders. 

Inconveniences of the 5th order are, Breach of the several regulations of 
procedure, or other regulations, made in the view of obviating the incon- 
veniences above enumerated : viz. if preliminary Mid distinct, as before. 

III. Offences against the preventive branch of the police, i. 
Offences against phthariO'Tparartornic trust : (<ff$6yw, to prevent ; vapaafofj^a, 
an offence). 2. Offences against pJUhano-symphoric trust : avfipopd, a 
calamity. The two trusts may be termed by the common appellation of 
prophylactic : (irpo, beforehand, and <fw\6.TTWf to guard against). 

IV. Offences against the public force, i. Offences against military 
trust, corresponding to those against judicial trust. Military desertion is 
a breach of military duty, or of military trust. Favouring desertion is a 
disturbance of it. 2. Offences against that branch of public trust which 
consists in the management of the several sorts of things appropriated to 
the purposes of war : such as arsenals, fortifications, dock-yards, ships of 
war, artillery, ammunition, military magazines, and so forth. It might be 
termed pclemo-tamieittie : from v6\(fio», war ; and rafAtevt, a steward K 

1 A number of diflf^rent branches of public trust, none of which have yet been provided 
Vith appellatives, have here been brought to view : which then were best ? to coin new names 
for them out of the Greek; or, iBstead of a word,- to make use of a whole sentence? In 



sj88 Division of Offences^ [chap; 

a man may be either commanded or allowed, whether for his 
own benefit, or that of others, to abstain from or to perform. 

V. Offences against the positivb incbbasb of the national felicitt. 
I . Offences against epistemo-threptic trust : {iviar^ftrj, knowledge ; and 
rpiipcUf to nourish or promote). 2. Offences against eupadagogic trust : 
cS, well; and vcuSayuyim, to educate. 3. Offences against noso-comial 
trust : voffos, a disease ; and KOfjU{oa, to take care of. 4. Offences against 
moro-comial trust : (am$/>o», an insane person). 5. Offences against ptocho' 
comial trust : (vrooxoi, the poor). 6. Offences against antembletic trust : 
(dyTCfjLfiaKXWf to bestow in reparation of a loss). 7* Offences against hedo- 
narchic trust : (^5ova^, pleasures ; and dpxofuu, to preside over). The 
above are examples of the principal establishments which should or might 
be set on foot for the purpose of makincf, in so many different ways, a 
positive addition to the stock of national felicity. To exhibit an exhaustive 
analysis of the possible total of these establishments would not be a very 
easy task : nor on the present occasion is it a necespary one : for be they 
of what nature and in what number they may, the offences to which they 
stand exposed will, in as far as they are offences against trust, be in point 
of denomination the same : and as to what turns upon the particular nature 
of each trust, they will be of too local a nature to come within the present 
plan. 

All these trusts might be comprised under some such general name aa 
that of agatho-poieutic trust : {dyaOovoieoa, to do good to any one). 

VI. Offences against the public wealth, i. Non-payment of for- 
feitures. 2. Non-payment of taxes, including smuggling. 3. Breach of 
the several regulations made to prevent the evasion of taxes. 4. Offences 
against fiscal trust : the same as offences against judicial and military 
trusts. Offences against the original revenue, not accruing either from 
taxes or forfeitures, such as that arising from the public demesnes, stand 
upon the same footing as offences against private property. 5. Offences 
against demosio-tamieutie trust : {^qfuxria^ things belonging to the public : 
and rafiievs, a steward) viz. against that trust, of which the object is to 
apply to their several destinations such articles of the public wealth as are 
provided for the indiscriminate accommodation of individuals : such as 
public roads and waters, public harbours, post-offices, and packet boats, and 
the stock belonging to them ; market-places, and other such public build* 
ings ; race-grounds, public walks, and so forth. Offences of this description 
will be apt to coincide with offences against agatJio-poieutic trust as above, 
or with offences against ethno-plutistic trust hereafter mentioned, according 
as the benefit in question is considered in itself, or as resulting from the 
application of such or such a branch or portion of the public wealth. 

VII. Offences against population, i. Emigration. 2. Suicide. 3. 
Procurement of impotence or barrenness. 4. Abortion, 5. Unprolific 
coition. 6. Celibacy. 

VIII. Offences against the national wealth, i. Idleness. 2. 
Breach of the regulations made in the view of preventing the application 
of industry to purposes lees profitable, in prejudice of purposes more pro- 
fitable. 3. Offences against ethno-plviistic trust ; (J[$yo$, the nation at 
lai^ ; irAovTi^o;, to enrich.) 

English, and in French, there is no other alternative ; no more than in any of the other 
southern languages. It rests with the reader to determine. 



XVI.] Division of Offences, 289 

As many di£Pereiit denominations as there are of persons distin- 
guished with a view to such commands and allowances (those 

IX. Offences against the sovebeigntt. i. Offences against sovereign 
trust : corresponding to those against judicial, prophylactic, military, and 
fiscal trusts. Offensive rebellion includes wrongful iuterceptiony wrongful 
divestment, usurpation, and wrongful investment, of sovereign trust, with 
the offences accessory thereto. Where the trust is in a single person, 
wrongful interception, wrongful divestment, usurpation, and wrongful in- 
vestment cannot, any of them, be committed without rebellion : abdication 
and detrectation can never be deemed wrongful: breach and abuse of 
sovereign trust can scarcely be punished : no more can bribe-taking : 
wrongful imposition of it is scarce practicable. When the sovereignty is 
shared among a number, wrongful interception, wrongful divestment, 
usurpation, and wrongful investment, may be committed without rebellion : 
none of the offences against this trust are impracticable : nor ia there any 
of them but might be punished. Defensive rebellion is disturbance of this 
trust. Political tumults, political defamation, and political vilification, are 
offences accessory to such disturbance. 

Sovereign power (which, upon the principle of utility, can never be other 
than fiduciary) is exercised either by rule or without rule : in the latter 
case it may be termed av/tocratic : in the former case it is divided into two 
branches, the legislative and the executive^. In either case, where the 
designation of the person by whom the power is to be possessed, depends 
not solely upon mere physical events, such as that of natural succession, 
but in any sort upon the will of another person, the latter possesses an 
investitive power, or right of investiture, with regard to the power in ques- 
tion : in like manner may any person also possess a divestitive power. The 
powers above enumerated, such as judicial power, military power, and so 
forth, may therefore be exercisable by a man, either directly> propria 
manu ; or indirectly, marm cdiend ^. Power to be exercised manu aliend 
is investitive, which may or may not be accompanied by divestitive. Of 
sovereign power, whether autocratic, legislative, or executive, the several 
public trusts above mentioned form so many subordinate branches. Any 
of these powers may be placed, either, I. in an individual; or, 2. in a body 
politic : who may be either supreme or subordinate. Subordination on the 
part of a magistrate may be established, i. By the person^s being punish- 
able : 2. By his being removable : 3. By the orders being reversible. 

X. Offences against belioion. i. Offences tending to weaken the 
force of the religious sanction : including blasphemy and profaneness. 2. 
Offences tending to misapply the force of the religious sanction : including 
&lse prophecies, and other pretended revelations ; also heresy, where the 
doctrine broached is pernicious to the temporal interests of the community. 
3. Offences against religious trust, where any such is thought fit to be 
established. 

XI. Offences against the national intebest in general, i. Immoral 
publications. 2. Offences against the trust of an ambassador; or, as it 
might be termed, presheutic trust. 3. Offences against the trust of a 
privy-counsellor; or, as it might be termed, symbouleutic trust. 4. In 

1 See ch. xvii. [Limits] , § iii. 

3 In the former case, the power might be termed in one woT6,aidocMr<ms : in the latter^ 
heterochirmu : (avrds, a man's own ; x*H^* ^ ^^^^ » crepog, another's^. 

U 



290 Division of Offences. [chap. 

denominations only excepted which relate to the conditions 
above spoken of under the name of domestic ones) so many civil 
conditions one might enumerate. Means however, more or less 
explicit, may be found out of circumscribing their infinitude. 

What the materials are, if so they may be called, of which 
conditions, or any other kind of legal possession, can be made 
up, we have already seen : beneficial powers, fiduciary powers, 
beneficial rights, fiduciary rights, relative duties, absolute duties. 
But as many conditions as import a power or right of the 
fiduciary kind, as possessed by the person whose condition is 
in question, belong to the head of trusts. The catalogue 
of the offences to which these conditions are exposed, coincides 
therefore exactly with the catalogue of offences against trust : 
under which head they have been considered in a general point 
of view under the head of offences against trust : and such of 
them as are of a domestic nature, in a more particular manner 
in ,the character of offences against the several domestic condi- 
tions. Conditions constituted by such duties of the relative 
kind, as have for their counterparts trusts constituted by fidu- 
ciary powers, as well as rights on the side of the correlative 
party, and those of a private nature, have also been already dis- 
cussed under the appellation of domestic conditions. The same 
observation may be applied to the conditions constituted by such 
powers of the beneficial kind over persons as are of a private 
nature: as also to the subordinate correlative conditions con- 
stituted by the duties corresponding to those rights and powers., 
As to absolute duties, there is no instance of a condition thus 
created, of which the institution is upon the principle of utility 
to be justified ; unless the several religious conditions of the 
monastic kind should be allowed of as examples. There remain, 
as the only materials out of which the conditions which yet re- 
main to be considered can be composed, conditions constituted 
by beneficial powers over things; conditions constituted by 

pure or mixed monarchies* prodigality on the part of persons who are about 
the person of the sovereign, though without being invested with any specific 
trust. 5. Excessive gaming on the psft of the same persons. €, Taking 
presents from rival powers without leave. 



XVI.] MnUion ^ Offe/mcei. 2^91 

beneficial rights to things (that is, rights to powers over things) 
or by rights to those rights, and so on ; conditions constituted 
by rights to services ; and conditions constituted by the duties 
corresponding to those respective rights. Out of these are to be 
taken thoae of which the materials are the ingredients of the 
several modifications of property, the several conditions of pro- 
prietorship. These are the conditions, if such for a moment 
they may be styled, which having but here and there any specific 
names, are not commonly considered on the footing of condi- 
tions : so that the acts which, if such conditions were recognised, 
might be considered as offences against those conditions, are not 
wont to be considered in any other light than that of offences 
against property. 

Now the case is, as hath been already* intimated ^ that of 
these civil conditions, those which are wont* to be considered 
under that name, are not distinguished by any uniform and 
explicit line from those of which the materials are wont to be 
carried to the head of property: a set of rights shall, in one 
instance, be considered as constituting an article of property 
rather than a condition: while, in another instance, a set of 
rights of the same stamp is considered as constituting rathw a 
condition than an article of property. This will probably be 
found to be the ease in all languages : and the usage is dif- 
ferent again in one language £rom what it is in Miother. From 
these causes it seems to be impracticable to subject the class of 
civil conditions to any exhaustive method : so that for making 
a complete collection of them there seems to be no other ex- 
pedient than that of searching the language through for them, 
and taking them as they come. To exemplify this observation, 
it may be of use to lay open the structure as it were of two or 
three of the principal sorts or classes of conditions, comparing 
them with two or three articles of property which appear to 
be nearly of the same complexion : by this means the nature 
and generation, if one may so call it, of both these classes of 
ideal objects may be the more clearly understood. 

^ Supra, xvii. 
U3 



29JJ Division of Offences, [chap. 

The several sorts of civil conditions that are not fiduciary may 
all, or at least the greater part of them, be comprehended under 
the head of ranky or that of profession ; the latter word being 
taken in its most extensive sense, so as to include not only what 
are called the liberal professions, but those also which are exer- 
cised by the several sorts of traders, artists, manufacturers,' and 
other persons of whatsoever station, who are in the way of 
making a profit by their labour. Among ranks then, as well as 
professions, let us, for the sake of perspicuity, take for examples 
such articles as stand the clearest from any mixture of either 
fiduciary or beneficial power. The rank of knighthood is con- 
stituted, how 'i by prohibiting all other persons from performing 
certain acts, the performance of which is the symbol of the 
order, at the same time that the knight in question, and his 
companions, are permitted : for instance, to wear a ribbon of a 
certain colour in a certain manner : to call himself by a certain 
title : to use an armorial seal with a certain mark on it. By 
laying all persons but the knight under this prohibition, the 
law subjects them to a set of duties : and since from the dis- 
charge of these duties a benefit results to the person in whose 
favour they are created, to wit, the benefit of enjoying such a 
share of extraordinary reputation and respect as men are wont 
to yield to a person thus distinguished, to discharge them is to 
render him a service : and the duty being a duty of the negative 
class, a duty consisting in the performance of certain acts of the 
negative kind *, the service is what may be called a service of 
forbearance. It appears then, that to generate this condition 
there must be two sorts of services : that which is the imme- 
diate cause of it, a service of the negative kind, to be rendered 
by the community at large : that which is the cause again of 
this service, a service of the positive kind, to be rendered by 
the law. 

The condition of a professional man stands upon a narrower 
footing. To constitute this condition there needs nothing more 
than a permission given him on the part of the legislator to 

^ See ch. vii., [Actions] viii. 



XVI.] Division of Offences. 293 

perform those acts, in the perfonnance of which consists the 
exercise of his profession : to give or sell his advice or assistance 
in matters of law or physic : to give or sell his servicei as em* 
ployed in the executing or overseeing of a manufacture or piece 
of work of such or such a kind : to- sell a commodity of such or 
such a sort. Here then we see there is but one sort of service 
requisite ; a service which may be merely of the negative kind, 
to be rendered by the law: the service of permitting him to 
exercise his profession : a service which, if there has been no 
prohibition laid on before, is rendered by simply forbearing to 
prohibit him. 

Now the ideal objects, which in the cases above speciiied are 
said to be conferred upon a man by the services that are re- 
spectively in question, are in both cases not articles of property 
but conditions. By such a behaviour on the part of the law, 
as shall be the reverse of that whereby they were respectively 
produced, a man may be made to forfeit them : and what he is 
then said to forfeit is in neither case his property ; but in one 
case, his rank or dignity: in the other case, his trade or hi& 
profession : and in both cases, his condition. 

Other cases there are again in which the law, by a process of 
the same sort with that by which it constituted the former of 
the two above-mentioned conditions, confers on him an ideal 
object, which the laws of language have placed under the head 
of property. The law permits a man to sell books : that is, all 
sorts of books in general. Thus far all that it has done is to 
invest him with a condition : and this condition he would 
equally possess, although everybody else in the world were to 
sell books likewise. Let the law now take an active part in his 
favour, and prohibit all other persons from selling books of a 
certain description, he remaining at liberty to sell them as 
before. It therefore confers on him a sort of exclusive privilege 
or monopoly, which is called a cojpy-right. But by investing 
him with this right, it is not said to invest him with any new 
sort of condition : what it invests him with is spoken of as 
an article of property ; to wit, of that sort of property which is 



2^94 Division of Offemees^ [chai^ 

tezmed incorporeal ^ : and so on in the case of an engrayii^ a 
mechanical engine, a medicine ; or, in short, of a saleable article 
of any other sort. Tet when it gave him an exclusive right of 
wearing a particular sort of ribbon, the object which it was then 
considered as conferring on him was not an article of propai;y 
but a condition. 

By forbearing to subject you to certain disadvantages, to 
which it subjects an alien, the law confers on you the condition 
of a natural-bom subject : by subjecting him to them, it imposes 
on him the condition of an alien : by conferring on you certain 
privileges or rights, which it denies to a rotvrier, the law con- 
fers on you ihe condition of a gentilhotMne; by forbearing to 
eonfer on him those privileges, it imposes on him the condition 
of a rotuaier '. The rights, out of which the two advantageous 
conditions here exempMed are both of them as it were com- 
posed, have for their coimterpart a sort of s^-vices of forbear- 
ance, rendered, ias we have seen, not by private individuals, but 
by the law itself. As to the duties which it creates in rendering 
yoa these services, they are to be considered as duties imposed 
by the legislator on the ministers of justice. 

It may be observed, with regard to the greater part of the 
conditions here comprised under the general appellation of eiml, 
that the relations corresponding to those by which they are re- 
spectively constituted, are not provided with appellatives. The 
relation which has a name, is that which is borne by the party 
fitvoured to the party bound : that which is borne by the party 
bound to the party favoured has not any. This is a circum- 
stance that may help to distinguish them from those conditions 
which we have termed domestic. In the domestic conditions, if 
on the one side the party to whom the power is given is called a 
master; on the other side, the party over whom that power is 

^ The teason probably why an object of the sort here in question is re- 
ferred to the head of property, is, that the chief value of it arises from its 
being capable of being made a source of property in the more ordinary 
acceptations of the word ; that is, of money, CQnsumable commodities, and 
so forth. 

' The conditions themselves having nothing that corresponds to them in 
England, it was necessary to make use of foreign terms. 



XVI.] Divisuyii of Offences. 295 

given, the party who is the object of that pdw^r, is termed a 
servant. In the civil conditions this is not the case. On the 
one side, a man, in virtue of certain services of forbearance, 
which the rest of the community are bound to render himi, is 
denominated a knight of such or such an order : but on the 
other side, these services do not bestow any particular denomi* 
nation on the persons from whom such services are due. Another 
man, in virtue of the legislator's rendering that sort^of negative 
service which consists in t^e not prohibiting him from exercising 
a trade, invests him at his option with the condition of a trader : 
it accordingly denominates him a farmer, a baker, a weaver, and 
so on : but the ministers of the law do not, in virtue of their 
rendering the man this sort of negative service, acquire for 
themselves any particular name. Suppose even that the trade 
you have the right of exercising happens to be the object of a 
monopoly, and that the legislator, besides rendering you himself 
those services which you derive from the permission he bestows 
on you, obliges other persons to render you those farther services 
which you receive from their forbearing to follow the same 
trade ; yet neither do they, in virtue of their bdng thus bound, 
acquire any particular name. 

After what has been said of the nature of the several sorts of 
civil conditions that have names^ the offences to which they are 
exposed may, without much difficulty, be imagined. Taken by 
itself, every condition which is thus constituted by a permission 
granted to the possessor, is of course Of a beneficial nature : it 
is, therefore, exposed to all those offences to which the possession 
of a benefit is exposed. But either on account of a man's being 
obliged to persevere when once engaged in it, or on account of 
such other obligations as may stand annexed to the possession 
of it, or on account of the comparative degree of disrepute 
which may stand annexed to it by the moral sanction, it may 
by accident be a burthen : it is on this account liable to stand 
exposed to the offences to which, as hath been seen, every thing 
that partakes of the nature of a burthen stands exposed. As to 
any offences which may concern the exercise of the functions 



296 Sivmon of Offences, [chap. 

belonging to it, if it happens to have any duties annexed to it, 
such as those, for instance, which are constituted by regulations 
touching the exercise of a trade, it will stand exposed to bo 
many breaches of duty; and lastly, whatsoever are the func- 
tions belonging to it, it will stand exposed at any rate to 
distarhomce. 

In the forming however of the catalogue of these offences, 
exactness is of the less consequence, inasmuch as an act, if it 
should happen not to be comprised in this catalogue, and yet is 
in any respect of a pernicious nature, will be sure to be found 
in some other division of the system of offences : if a baker sells 
bad bread for the price of good, it is a kind of fraud upon the 
buyer ; and perhaps an injury of the simple corporal kind done 
to the health of an individual, or a neighbourhood : if a clothier 
sells bad cloth for good at home, it is a fraud ; if to foreigners 
abroad, it may, over and above the fraud put upon the foreign 
purchaser, have pernicious effects perhaps in the prosperity of 
the trade at home, and become thereby an offence against the 
national wealth. So again with regard to distwrbance : if a man 
be disturbed in the exercise of his trade, the offence will pro- 
bably be a wrongful interception of the profit he might be pre- 
sumed to have been in a way to make by it : and were it even 
to appear in any case that a man exercised a trade, or what is 
less unlikely, a liberal profession, without having profit in his 
view, the offence will still be reducible to the head of simple in^ 
juriotts restratnment, or simple injwrious compulsion* 

§ 4. Advantages of the present method. 

General idea LVI. A few words, for the purpose of giving a general view 
method here of the method of division here pursued, and of the advantaires 

pursued. , . , . ■• j.i • mi 1 1 

which it possesses, may have their use. The whole system of 
offences, we may observe, is branched out into five classes. In 
the three first, the subordinate divisions are taken from the same 
source; viz. from the consideration of the different points, in 
respect whereof the interest of an individual is exposed to suffer. 
By this uniformity, a considerable degree of light seems to be 



Xvi.] Division of Offences. 2g7 

thrown upon the whole system ; particularly upon the offences 
that come under the third class : objects which have never 
hitherto been brought into any sort of order. With regard to 
the fourth class, in settling the precedence between its several 
Subordinate divisions, it seemed most natural and satisfactory to 
place those first, the connection whereof with the welfare of in- 
dividuals seemed most obvious and immediate. The mischievous 
effects of those offences, which tend in an immediate way to 
deprive individuals of the protection provided for them against 
the attacks of one another, and of those which tend to bring 
down upon them the attacks of foreign assailants, seem alike 
obvious and palpable. The mischievous quality of such as tend 
to weaken the force that is provided to combat those attacks, 
but particularly the latter, though evident enough, is one link 
farther off in the chain of causes and effects. The ill effects of 
such offences as are of disservice only by diminishing the par- 
ticular fund from whence that force is to be extracted, such 
effects, I say, though indisputable, are still more distant and out 
of sight. The same thing may be observed with regard to such 
as are mischievous only by affecting the universal fund. Offences 
against the sovereignty in general would not be mischievous, 
if offences of the several descriptions preceding were not mis- 
chievous. Nor in a temporal view are offences against religion 
mischievous, except in as far as, by removing, or weakening, or 
misapplying one of the three great incentives to virtue, and 
checks to vice, they tend to open the door to the several mis- 
chiefs, which it is the nature of all those other offences to pro- 
duce. As to the fifth class, this, as hath already been observed, 
exhibits, at first view, an irregularity, which however seems to 
be unavoidable. But this irregularity is presently corrected, 
when the analysis returns back, as it does after a step or two, 
into the path from which the tyranny of language had forced it 
a while to deviate. 

It was necessary that it should have two purposes in view : 
the one, to exhibit, upon a scale more or less minute, a syste- 
matical enumeration of the several possible modifications of de- 



^9^ Division of Offencen, [chaf. 

linquency, denominated or undenommated ; the other, to find 
places in the list for such named of offences as were in current 
use : for the first purpose, natuve was to set the law ; for the 
other, custom. Had the nature of the things themselves been 
the only guide, every such difference in the manner of perpetra- 
tion, and such only, should have served as a ground for a different 
denomination, as was attended with a difference in point of effect. 
This however of itself would never have been sufficient \ for as 
on one hand the new language, which it would have been neces- 
sary to invent, would have been uncouth, and in a manner unin^ 
telligible : so on the other hand the names, which were before 
in current use, and which, in spite of all systems, good or bad, 
must have remained in current use, would have continued unex- 
plained. To have adhered exclusively to the current language, 
would have been as bad on the other side ; for in that case the 
catalogue of offences, when compared to that of the mischiefs 
that are capable of being produced, would have been altogether 
broken and uncomplete. 

To reconcile these two objects, in as far as they seemed to be 
reconcilable, the following course has therefore been pursued. 
The logical whole, constituted by the sum total of possible offencesi 
hi» been bisected in ^ many different directions aa were neces- 
aary, and the process in each direction carried down to that 
stage at which the particular ideas thus divided found names in 
current use in readiness to receive them. At that period I have 
stopped ; leaving any minuter distinctions to be enumerated iu 
^e body of the work, as so many species of the genus character- 
ised by such or such a name. If in the course of any such 
process I came to a mode of conduct which, though it required to 
be taken notice of, and perhaps had actually been taken notice 
of, under all laws, in the character of an offence, had hitherto 
been expressed under different laws, by different circumlocutions^ 
without ever having received any name capable of occupying the. 
place of a substantive in a sentence, I have frequently ventured 
80 &r as to fabricate a new name for it, sudi an one as the idiom 
of the language, and the acquaintance I happened to have with 



XYi.] Dividon of Offences. flt99 

it, would admit of. These names consisting in most instances, 
and that unavoidably, of two or three words brought together, in 
a language too which admits not, like the German and the Greek, 
of their being melted into one, can nerer be upon a par, in point 
of oommodiou£aiess, with those univocal appellatiTcs which make 
part of the established stock. 

In the choice of names in current use, care has been taken io 
aroid all such as have been grounded on local distinctions, ill 
founded perhaps in the nation in which they received their 
birth, and at any rate not applicable to the circumstances of 
other countries. 

The analysis, as far as it goes, is as applicable to the legal con- 
cerns of one country as of another : and where, if it had descended 
into further details, it would have ceased to be so, there I have 
taken care always to stop : and thence it is that it has come to 
be so much more particular in the class of offences against indi- 
viduals, than in any of the other classes. One use then of this 
arrangement, if it should be found to have been properly con- 
ducted, will be its serving to point out in what it is that the 
legal interests of all countries agree, and in what it is that they 
are liable to differ : how for a rule that is proper for one, will 
serve, and how far it will not serve, for another. That the legal 
interests of different ages and countries have nothing in common, 
and that they have every thing, are suppositions equally distant 
from the truth ^. 

LYII. A natural method, such as it hath been here attempted Its advan- 
to exhibit, seems to possess four capital advantages ; not to men- — i. it is 
ticm others of inferior note. In the first place, it affords such fcnr the ap- 
assistance to the apprehension and to the memory, as those facul- and the 
ties would in vain look for in any technical arrangement^. That ^^^^^'y* 
arrangement of the objects of any science may, it should seem, 

' The above hints are offered to the consideration of the few who may 
be disposed to bend their minds to disquisitions of this uninviting nature : 
to sift the matter to the bottom, and engage in the details of illustration, 
would require more room than could in this place be consistently allowed. 
- ' See Fragment on Government, pref. p. xl7. edit. 1776. — ^pref. p. xlvH. 
edit. 1823. 



y>o Bivision of Offences. [chaf, 

be termed a natural one, which takes snch properties to charac- 
terise them by, as men in general are, by the common constitu- 
tion of man's nature, independently of any accidental impressions 
they may have received from the influence of any local or other 
particular causes, accustomed to attend to : such, in a word, as 
naturally^ that is readily and at first sight, engage, and firmly 
fix, the attention of any one to whom they have once been 
pointed out. Now by what other means should an object engage 
or fix a man's attention, unless by interesting him ] and what 
circumstance belonging to any action can be more interesting, 
or rather what other circumstance belonging to it can be at all 
interesting to him, than that of the influence it promises to have 
on his own happiness, and the happiness of those who are about 
him ) By what other mark then should he more easily find the 
place which any oflence occupies in the system, or by what other 
clue should he more readily recall it ? 
—2. It gives LVm. In the next place, it not only gives at first glance a 

general pro- general intimation of the nature of each division of offences, in 
positions. 

as far as that nature is determined by some one characteristic 

property, but it gives room for a number of general propositions 
to be formed concerning the particular offences that come under 
that division, in such manner as to exhibit a variety of other 
properties that may belong to them in common. It gives room, 
therefore, for the framing of a number of propositions concern- 
ing them, which, though very general, because predicated of a 
great number of articles, shall be as generally true ^. 

^ Imagine what a condition a science must be in, when as yet there shall 
be no such thing as forming any extensive proposition reUtive to it, that 
shall be at the same time a true one : where, if the proposition shall be 
true of some of the particulars contained under it, it shall be false with 
regard to others. What a state would botany, for example, be in, if the 
classes were so contrived, that no common characters could be found for 
them ? Yet in this state, and no better, seems every system of penal law 
to be, authoritative or unauthoritative, that has ever yet appeared. Try if 
it be otherwise, for instance, with the adicta privaia et publica, and with 
the pMica ordinaria, and puhlica extra-ordinaria of the Boman law \ 
All this for want of method : and hence the necessity of endeavouring to 
strike out a new one. 

1 See Heinecc. Elem. p. vii. § 79, 80. 



XVI.] Division of Offences. 301 

LIX. In the third place, it is so contrived, that the very place — 8.ltpointa 
which any offence is made to occupy, suggests the reason of its reason of the 
being put there. It serves to indicate not only that such and such 
acts a/re made offences, but why they ought to be. By this means, 
while it addresses itself to the understanding, it recommends itself 
in some measure to the affections. By the intimation it gives of 
the nature and tendency of each obnoxious act, it accounts for, 
and in some measure vindicates, the treatment which it may be 
thought proper to bestow upon that act in the way of punish- 
ment. To the subject then it is a kind of perpetual apology: 
showing the necessity of every defalcation, which, for the se- 
curity and prosperity of each individual, it is requisite to make 
from the liberty of every other. To the legislator it is a kind 
of perpetual lesson : serving at once as a corrective to his pre- 
judices, and as a check upon his passions. Is there a mischief 
which has escaped him ? in a natural arrangement, if at the 
same time an exhaustive one, he cannot fail to find it. Is he 
tempted ever to force innocence within the pale of guilt % the 
difficulty of finding a place for it advertises him of his error. 
Such are the uses of a map of universal delinquency, laid down 
upon the principle of utility : such the acfvantages, which the 
legislator as well as the subject may derive from it. Abide by 
it, and every thing that is arbitrary in legislation vanishes. An 
evil-intentioned or prejudiced legislator durst not look it in the 
face. He would proscribe it, and with reason : it would be a 
satire on his laws. 

LX. In the fourth place, a natural arrangement, governed as —4. it is 
it is by a principle which is recognised by all men, will serve cable to the 

Nor is this want of method to be wondered at. A science so new as 
that of penal legislation, coald hardly have been in any better state. Till 
objects are distin^ished, they cannot be arranged. It is thus that tndh 
and order go on hand in hand. It is only in proportion as the former is 
discovered, that the latter can be improved. Before a certain order is 
established, truth can be but imperfectly announced : but until a certain 
proportion of truth has been developed and brought to light, that order 
cannot be established. The discovery of truth leads to the establishment 
of order : and the establishment of order fixes and propagates the discovery 
of truth. 



3Q» 



Division, of Offences. 



[caiAP. 



laws of bU 
natdoni. 



ChAracters 
of the 

classes, how 
deducible 
from the 
above 
^ method. 



Characters 
of Class 1. 



alike for the jurisprudence of all nations. In a system of pro- 
posed law, framed in pursuance of such a method, the language 
will serve as a glossary by which all systems of positive law 
might be explained, while the matter serves as a standard by 
which they might be tried. Thus illustrated, the practice of 
every nation might be a lesson to every other : and mankind 
might carry on a mutual interchaoge of experiences and im- 
provements as easily in this as in every other walk of science. If 
any one of these objects should in any degree be attained, the 
labour of this analysis, severe as it has been, will not have been 
thrown away. 

§ 5. (JharcLcters of thefwe classes. 

LXI. It has been mentioned ^ as an advantage possessed by 
this method, and not possessed by any other, that the objects 
comprised under it are cast into groups, to which a variety of 
propositions may be applied in common. A collection of these 
propositions, as applied to the several classes, may be considered 
a^ exhibiting the distinctive characters of each class. So many 
of these propositions as can be applied to the offences belonging 
to any given class, qo many properties are they found to have 
in conmion: so many of these common properties as may 
respectively be attributed to them, so many properties may be 
set down to serve as cTiaracters of the class. A collection of 
these characters it may here be proper to exhibit. The more of 
them we can bring together, the more clearly and fully will the 
nature of the several classes, and of the offences they are com- 
posed of, be understood. 

LXII. Characters of Class i ; composed of private offences, 
or offences against assignable individuals, 

1. When arrived at their last stage (the stage of constMnma" 
tt<m^) they produce, all of them, a primary mischief as well 
as a secondary ^ 

2. The individuals whom they affect in the first instanee^ 



* Snpra, Iviii. ' Ch. vU. [Actions] xiv. 

' See ch. xii. [Consequences] ill. * That is, by their primary rniachifff. 



XVI.] IHvmon of Offences, 303 

are constantly msignahle. This extends to all ; to attempta and 
jprejpa^aiions, as well as to such as have arrived at the stage of 
consummation ^. 

3. Consequently they admit of compensation '; in which they 
differ from the offences of all the other classes, as such. 

4. They admit ^ also of retaliation*^; in which also they 
differ from the offences of all the other classes. 

5. There is always some person who has a natural and pe- 
culiar interest to prosecute them. In this they differ from 
self-regarding offences : also from semi-puhlic and public ones ; 
except in as far as the two latter may chance to inyolve a private 
mischief 

6. The mischief they produce is obvious : more so than that 
of semi-public offences: and still more so than that of self- 
regarding ones, or even public. 

7. They are every where, and must ever be, obnoxious to the 
censure of the world : more so than semi-public offences as such ; 
and still more so than public ones. 

8. They are more constantly obnoxious to the censure of the 
world than self-regarding offences : and would be so universally, 
were it not for the influence of the two false principles; the 
principle of asceticism, and the principle of antipathy ^ 

9. They are less apt than semi-public and public offences to 
require different descriptions^ in different states and countries: 
in which respect they are much upon a par with self-regarding 
ones. 

10. By certain circumstances of aggravation, they are liable 

^ See supra, zzxi note, and B. I. tit. [Accessoiy offences]. 

^ See ch. ziii. [Cases unmeet] ii. note. 

' I mean, that retaliation is capable of being applied in the cases in 
question ; not that it ought always to be employed. Nor is it capable of 
being applied in every individual instance of each offence, but only in some 
individual instance of each species of offence. 

* See ch. xv. [Properties] viii. 
' Ch. ii. [Principles adverse]. 

* It seems to be from their possessing these three last properties, that 
the custom has arisen of speaking of them, or at least of many of them, 
under the name of offences against the law of nature : a vague expression, 
and productive of a multitude of inconveniences. See oh. iL [Principles 
adverse] xiv. note. 



304 Division of Offences, [chap. 

to be transformed into semi-public offences : and by certain 
others, into public. 

u. There can be no ground for punishing them, until they 
can be proved to have occasioned, or to be about to occasion, 
some particular mischief to some particular individual. In this 
they differ from semi-public offences, and from public. 

12. In slight cases, compeTisation given to the individual 
affected by them may be a suflScient ground for remitting 
punishment : for if the primary mischief has not been sufficient 
to produce any alarm, the whole of the mischief may be cured 
by compensation. In this also they differ from semi-public 
offences, and from public ones. 
Characters LXIII. Characters of Class 2 : composed of semi-public 

of Class 2. ^ r . 7 <? 

offences, or offences affecting a whole subordinate class of 
persons. 

1. As such, they produce no primary mischief. The mischief 
they produce consists of one or other or both branches of the 
secondary mischief produced by offences against individuals, 
without the primary. 

2. In as far as they are to be considered as belonging to this 
class, the persons whom they affect in the first instance are not 
individually assignable. 

3. They are apt, however, to involve or terminate in some 
primary mischief of the first order ; which when they do, they 
advance into the first class, and become private offences. 

4. They admit not, as such, of compensation. 

5. Nor of retaliation. 

6. As such, there is never any one particular individual whose 
exclusive interest it is to prosecute them: a circle of persons 
may, however, always be marked out, within which may be found 
some who have a greater interest to prosecute than any who are 
out of that circle have. 

7. The mischief they produce is in general pretty obvious : 
not so much so indeed as that of private offences, but more so 
upon the whole than that of self-regarding and public ones. 

8. They are rather less obnoxious to the censure of the world 



XVI.] , JHmion of Offencei. 305 

than private ofiPences; but they are more bo than public ones : 
they would also be more so than self-regarding ones, were it not 
for the influence of the two false principles, the principle of 
sympathy and antipathy, and that of asceticism. 

9. They are more apt than private and self-r^^arding offences 
to require different descriptions in different countries : but less 
so than public ones. 

10. There may be ground for punishing them before they have 
been proved to have occasioned, or to be about to occasion, mis- 
chief to any particular individual ; which is not the case with 
private offences. 

11. In no cases can satisfaction given to any particular indi- 
vidual affected by them be a sufficient ground for remitting 
punishment: for by such satisfaction it is but a part of the 
mischief of them that is cured. In this they differ from private 
offences ; but agree with public. 

LXiy. Characters of Class 3 ; consisting of self-beoabdino ^'^^P 
offences : offences against one's self, 

1. In individual instances it will often be questionable, whether 
they are productive of any primary^ mischief at all : secondary, 
they produce none. 

2. They affect not any other individuals, assignable or not 
assignable, except in as far as they affect the offender himself; 
unless by possibility in particular cases; and in a very slight 
and distant manner the wliole state. 

3. They admit not, therefore, of tompenscition. 

4. Nor of retaliation, 

5. No person has naturally any peculiar interest to prosecute 
them : except in as far as in virtue of some connection he may 
have with the offender, either in point di sympathy or of inUrssi^^ a 
mischief of the derivative kind' may happen to devolve upon him^. 

^ Because the person, who in general is most likely to be sensible to tbm 
mischief (if there is any) of any offence, viz. the person whom it most 
affects, shows by his conduct that he is not sensible of it. 

* See ch. vi. [Sensibility] xxv. xxvi. 
' See ch. xii. [Consequences] iv. 

* Among the offences, however, which belong to this daaa, there art 



3o6 Division of Offences^ [chap, 

6. The mischief they produce is apt to be unobvioas, and in 
general more questionable than that of any of the other classes ^ 

7. They are however apt, many of them, to be more obnoxious 
to the censure of the world than public offences ; owing to the 
influence of the two fiilse principles ; the principle of asceticism, 
and the principle of antipathy. Some of thpm more even than 
semi-public, or even than private offences. 

8. They are less apt than offences of any other class to require 
different descriptions in different states and countries'. 

9. Among the inducements^ to punish them, antipathy against 
the offender is apt to have a greater share than sympathy for 
the public. 

10. The best plea for punishing them is founded on a faint 
probability there may be of their being productive of a mischief, 
which, if real, will place them in the class of public ones : chiefly 
in those divisions of it which are composed of offences against 

" population, and offences against the national wealth. 

Gtaaraoten LXY. Characters of Class 4 : consisting of public offences, or 
of Glass 4. , 

offences against the state in general. 

1. As such, they produce not any primary mischief; and the 
secondary mischief they produce, which consists frequently of 
danger without alarm, though great in vdlite, is in specie very 
indeterminate. 

2. The individuals whom they affect, in the first instance, are 
constantly unassignable; except in as far as by accident they 
happen to involve or terminate in such or such offences against 
individuals. 

3. Consequently they admit not of compensation. 

4. Nor of retaliation. 

Boine which in certain countries it is not nnconunon for persons to be dis- 
posed to' prosecute without any artificial inducement* and merely on aooount 
of an antipathy f which such acts are apt to excite. See ch. ii. [Principles 
adverse] zi. 

^ See note i in the preceding page. 

' Accordingly, most of them are apt to be ranked among offences against 
the law of nature. Vide supra, Characters of the ist class, bdi. note. 

' I mean the considerations, right or wrong, which induce or dispose the 
legislator to treat them on the footing of offences. 



XVI.] Division of Offences. 307 

5. Nor is there any person who has naturally any particular 
interest to prosecute them ; except in as far as they appear to 
affect the power, or in any other manner the private interest, of 
some person in authority. 

6. The mischief they produce, as such, is comparatively un- 
obvious ; much more so than that of private offences, and more 
so likewise, than that of semi-public ones. 

7. They are, as such, much less obnoxious to the censure of 
the world, than private offences ; less even than semi-public, or 
even than self-regarding offences; unless in particular cases^ 
through sympathy to certain persons in authority, whose private 
interests they may appear to affect. 

8. They are more apt than any of the other classes to admit 
of different descriptions, in different states and countries. 

9. They are constituted, in many cases, by some circumstances 
of aggravation superadded to a private offence : and therefore; 
in these cases, involve the mischief and exhibit the other cha- 
racters belonging to both classes. They are however, even in 
such cases, properly enough ranked in the 4th class, inasmuch 
as the mischief they produce in virtue of the properties which 
aggregate them to that class, eclipses and swallows up that which 
they produce in virtue of those properties which aggregate them 
to the 1st. 

10. There may be sufficient ground for punishing them, with- 
out their being proved to have occasioned, or to be about to- 
occasion, any particular mischief to any particular individual. In 
this they differ from private offences, but agree with semi-public 
ones. Here, as in semi-public offences, the extent of the mischief 
makes up for the uncertai/nty of it. 

11. In no case can satisfaction, given to any particular indi- 
vidual affected by them, be a sufScient ground for remitting 
punishment. In this they differ from private offences ; but agree 
with semi-public. 

LXYI. Characters of Class 5, or appendix : composed of mitl- Characten 
TiFORM or ANOMALOUS offcuccs ; and containing offences by 
FALSEHOOD; and offences concerning tbust. 

X 2 



3o8 DwUion qf Offences. 

1. Taken coUectiyely, in the parcels marked out by their 
popular appellations, they are incapable of being aggregated to 
any systematical method of distribution, grounded upon the 
mischief of the offence. 

2. They may, however, be thrown into sub-divisions, which 
may be aggregated to such a method of distribution. 

3. These sub-divisions will naturally and readily rank under 
the divisions of the several preceding classes of this system. 

4. Each of the two great divisions of this class spreads itself 
in that manner over all the preceding classes. 

g. In some acts of this class, the distinguishing circumstance 
which constitutes the essential character of the offence, will in 
some instances enter necessarily, in the character of a criminative 
circumstance, into the constitution of the offence ; insomuch that, 
without the intervention of this circumstance, no offence at all, 
of that denomination, can be committed^. In other instances, 
the offence may subsist without it ; and where it interferes, it 
comes in as an accidental independent circumstance, capable of 
constituting a ground of aggravation^ 

^ Instanoe, offences by fitlflehood, in the case of defrandment. 
* Instance, offences by fedsehood, in the caoe of simple corporal injuries, 
jod other offonces against person. 



CHAPTES XVIL 



OF THE LIMITS OF THE PENAL BRANCH OF JUBISPB0DEKCE. 

§ I. Limits between Private Ethics a/nd the Art of Legislation, 

L So much for the diyision of ofPences in general. Now an 5jj£*^^ 
offence is an act prohibited, or (what comes to the same thing) 
an act of which the contrary is commanded, by the law : and 
what is it that the law can be employed in doing, besides pro- 
hibiting and commanding ? It should seem then, according to 
this view of the matter, that were we to have settled what may 
be proper to be done with relation to offences, we should thereby 
have settled every thing that may be proper to be done in the 
way of law. Yet that branch which concerns the method of 
dealing with offences, and which is termed sometimes the criminal, 
sometimes the penal, branch, is universally understood to be but 
one out of two branches which compose the whole subject of the 
art of legislation ; that which is termed the civil being the 
other^. Between these two branches then, it is evident enough, 
there cannot but be a very intimate connection ; so intimate is 
it indeed, that the limits between them are by no means easy to 
mark out. The case is the same in some degree between the 
whole business of legislation (civil and penal branches taken 
together) and that of private ethics. Of these several limits 

^ And the corutitutioncLl branch, what is become of it ? Such is the ques- 
tion which many a reader will be apt to put. An answer that might be 
given is — that tiie matter of it might without much violence be distributed 
under the two other heads. But, as &r as recollection aerveB, that branch, 
notwithstanding its importance, and its capacity of being lodged separately 
from the other matter, had at that time scarcely presented itself to my view 
in the character of a distinct one : the thread of my enquiries had not as 
yet reached it. But in the concluding note of this same chapter, in para- 
graphs zxiL to the end, the omission may be seen in some measure supplied. 



310 0^ the Limits of the [chap. 

however it will be in a maimer necessary to exhibit some idea : 

lest, on the one hand, we should seem to leave any part of the 

subject that does belong to us untouched, or, on the other hand, 

to deviate on any side into a track which does not belong to us. 

In the course of this enquiry, that part of it I mean which 

concerns the limits between the civil and the penal branch of 

law, it will be necessary to settle a number of points, of which 

the connection with the main question might not at first sight 

be su£{)ected. To ascertain what sort of a thing a law is ; what 

the 'parts are that are to be found in it ; what it must contain 

in order to be com^^iete; what the connection is between that 

part of a body of laws which belongs to the subject oijprocedure 

and the rest of the law at large : — all these, it will be seen, are 

so many problems, which must be solved before any satisfactory 

$mswer can be given to the main question above mentioned. 

Nor is this their only use : for it is evident enough, that the 

notion of a complete law must first be fixed, before the legislator 

can in any case know what it is he has to do, or when his work 

is done. 

Bthics XQ !!• Ethics at large may be defined, the art of directing men's 

S^^ actions to the production of the greatest possible quantity of 

happiness, on the part of those whose interest is in view. . 

Private lU. What then are the actions which it can be in a man's 

ethics. 

power to direct 1 They must be either his own actions, or those 
of other agents. Ethics, in as far as it is the art of directing a 
man's own actions, may be styled the art of sdf-govemToent, or 
private ethics, 
The^of lY. What other agents then are there, which, at the same 
^t is, of time that they are under the influence of man's direction, are 
and admini- susceptible of happiness? They are of two sorts: i. Other 
human beings who are styled persons. 2. Other animals, which, 
on account of their interests having been neglected by the in- 
sensibility of the ancient jurists, stand degraded into the class of 
things ^. As to other human beings, the art of directing their 

Interests of^ . I Under the Gentoo and Mahometan religions, the interests of the rest 
improperly of the animal creation seem to have met with some attention. Why 



XVII.] Penal Brand of Jurisprudence. 311 

actions to the above end is what we mean, or at least the only 
thing which, upon the principle of utility, we ought to mean, by 
the art of government : which, in as far as the measures it dis- 
pla3rs itself in are of a permanent nature, is generally distin- 
guished by the name of legislation: as it is by that of adminis-' 
tration, when they are of a temporary nature, determined by the 
occurrences of the day. 

V. Now human creatures, considered with respect to the ma- Artofedtt- 
turity of their faculties, are either in an adulty or in a non-adult 
state. The art of government, in as far as it concerns the 
direction of the actions of persons in a non-adult state, may be 

have they not, universally, with as much as those of human creatures, neglected in 
allowance made for the difference in point of sensibility? Because the ^s*^"®"* 
laws that are have been the work of mutual fear ; a sentiment which the 
less rational animals have not had the same means as man has of turning 
to account. Why ought they not ? No reason can be given. If the being 
eaten were all, there is very good reason why we should be suffered to eat 
such of them as we like to eat : we are the better for it, and they are never 
the worse. They have none of those long-protracted anticipations of future 
misery which we have. The death they suffer in our hands conmionly is, 
and always may be, a speedier, and by that means a less painful one, than 
that which would await them in the inevitable course of nature. If the 
being killed were all, there is very good reason why we should be suffered 
to kiU such as molest us : we should be the worse for their living, and they 
are never the worse for being dead. But is there any reason why we 
should be suffered to torment them ? Not any that I can see. Are there 
any why we should not be suffered to torment them ? Yes, several. See 
B. I. tit. [Cruelty to animals]. The day has been, I grieve to say in numy 
places it is not yet past, in which the greater part of the species, under 
the denomination of slaves, have been treated by the law exactly upon the 
same footing as, in England for example, the inferior races of animals are 
still. The day may come, when the rest of the animal creation may ac- 
quire those rights which never could have been withholden from them but 
by the hand of tyranny. The French have already discovered that the 
blackness of the skin is no reason why a human being should be abandoned 
without redress to the caprice of a tormentor ^. It may come one day to be 
recognised, that the number of the legs, the villosity of the skin, or the 
termination of the 08 sacrum, are reasons equally insufiBcient for abandon- 
ing a sensitive being to the same fate. What else is it that should trace 
the insuperable line ? Is it the faculty of reason, or, perhaps, the faculty 
of discourse ? But a full-grown horse or dog is beyond comparison a more 
rational, as well as a more conversable animal, than an in&nt of a day, or a 
week, or even a month, old. But suppose the case were otherwise, what 
would it avail ? the question is not, Can they reason f nor. Can they talk t 
but, Can they suffer? 

1 See Lewis XlVth's Code Noir. 



312 Of the UmiU of the [chap. 

termed the art of education. In as far as this business is entrusted 
with those who, in virtue of some private relationship, are in the 
main the best disposed to take upon them, and the best able to 
discharge, this office, it may be termed the art of private education : 
in as far as it is exercised by those whose province it is to super- 
intend the conduct of the whole community, it may be termed 
the art oi public education, 
BthiOB 6aLhi- YI. Afl to ethics in general, a man's happiness will depend, 
rules of. in the first place, upon such parts of his behaviour as none but 
2.' Probity, himself are interested in ; in the next place, upon such parts of 
oenoe. it as may affect the happiness of those about him. In as &r as 

his happiness depends upon the first-mentioned part of his be- 
haviour, it is said to depend upon his duty to himself. Ethics 
then, in as far as it is the art of directing a man's actions in this 
respect, may be termed the art of discharging one's duty to one's 
self : and the quality which a man manifests by the discharge of 
this branch of duty (if duty it is to be called) is that oi prudence. 
In as far as his happiness, and that of any other person or per- 
sons whose interests are considered, depends upon such parts of 
his behaviour as may affect the interests of those about him, it 
may be said to depend upon his duty to others ; or, to use a 
phrase now somewhat antiquated, his duX,y to his neighbour. 
Ethics then, in as far as it is the art of directing a man's actions 
in this respect, may be termed the art of discharging one's duty 
to one's neighbour. Now the happiness of one's neighbour may 
be consulted in two ways : i. In a negative way, by forbearing 
to diminish it. 2. In a positive way, by studying to increase it. 
A man's duty to his neighbour is accordingly partly negative 
and partly positive : to discharge the negative branch of it, is 
probity : to discharge the positive branch, ben^ence. 
Probity and VII. It may here be asked, How it is that upon the prin- 
how t^*^ ciple of private ethics, legislation and religion out of the question, 
^^^J^*^ a man's happiness depends upon such parts of his conduct as 
affect, immediately at least, the happiness of no one but himself: 
this is as much as to askf What motives (independent of such as 
legislation and religion may chance to furnish) can one man have 



XVII.] Penal Branch of Jtmsprudenee. 313 

to consult the happiness of another ? by what motives, or, which 
comes to the same thing, by what obligations, can he be bound to 
obey the dictates of probity and hen^lcence ? In answer to this, 
it cannot but be admitted, that the only interests which a man 
at all times and upon all occasions is sure to find adequate mo- 
tives' for consulting, are his own. Notwithstanding this, there 
are no occasions in which a man has not some motives for con- 
sulting the happiness of other men. In the first place, he has, 
on all occasions, the purely social motive of sympathy or benevo- 
lence : in the next place, he has, on most occasions, the semi- 
social motives of love of amity and love of reputation. The mo- 
tive of sympathy will act upon him with more or less effect, 
according to the bias of his sensibility ^ : the two other motives, 
according to a variety of circumstances, principally according to 
the strength of his intellectual powers, the firmness and steadi- 
ness of his mind, the quantum of his moral sensibility, and the 
characters of the people he has to deal with. 

VIII. Now private ethics has happiness for its end : and legis- ^l^^ 

lation can have no other. Private ethics concerns every member, proper ob; 

•^ ' ject of ethics 

that is, the happiness and the actions of every member, of jany js not of 
community that can be proposed ; and legislation can concern 
no more. Thus far, then, private ethics and the art of legisl^-| 
tion go hand in hand. The end they have, or ought to have, in 1 
view, is of the same nature. The persons whose happiness they 
ought to have in view, as also the persons whose conduct they 
ought to be occupied in directing, are precisely the same. The 
very acts they ought to be conversant about, are even in a great 
measure the same. Where then lies the difference ? In that the 
acts which they ought to be conversant about, though in a great 
measure, are not perfectly and th/roughout the same. There is 
no case in which a private man ought not to direct his own con- 
duct to the production of his own happiness, and of th^tt of his 
fellow-creatures : but there are cases in which the legislator 
ought not (in a direct way at least, and by means of punishment 
applied immediately to particular individual acts) to attempt to 

* Ch. vi. [Sensibility] ill. 



314 Of the Limits of tie [chap. 

direct the conduct of the several other members of the commu- 
nity. Every act which promises to be beneficial upon the whole 
to the community (himself included) each individual ought to 
perform of himself : but it is not fevery such act that the legis- 
lator ought to compel him to perform. Every act which promises 
to be pernicious upon the whole to the community (himself in- 
cluded) each individual ought to abstain from of himself : but it 
is not every such act that the legislator ought to compel him to 
abstain from. , 
The limits IX. "Where then is the line to be drawn ] — ^We shall not have 

betweentne . . • 1 «. 1 

provinces of far to seek for it. The business is to give an idea of the cases 

private ... .... 

ethics and in which ethics ought, and in which legislation ought not (in a 
marked out direct manner at least) to interfere. If legislation interferes in 

bv the cases / 

unmeet for a direct manner, it must be by punishment \ Now the cases in u 
punishment. ,.■, ., . ., ., i%i i*«-i I 

which punishment, meaning the punishment of the political sanc- 
tion, ought not to be inflicted, have been already stated^. If 
then there be any of these cases in which, although legislation 
ought not, private ethics does or ought to interfere, these cases 
will serve to point out the limits between the two arts or branches 
of science. These cases, it may be remembered, are of four sorts : 
I. Where punishment would be groundless. 2. "Where it would 
be inefficacious. 3. "Where it would be unprofitable. 4. Where 
it would be needless. Let us look over all these cases, and see 
whether in any of them there is room for the interference of 
private ethics, at the same time that there is none for the direct 
interference of legislation. 
1. Neither X. I. First then, as to the cases where punishment would 
p?y where be groundless. In these cases it is evident, that the restrictive 
S^ounittS*. interference of ethics would be groundless too. It is because, 
upon the whole, there is no evil in the act, that legislation ought 
not to endeavour to prevent it. No more, for the same reason, 
ought private ethics. 

' I say nothing in this place of reward : because it is only in a few ex- 
traordinary cases that it can be applied, and because even where it is 
applied, it may be doubted perhaps whether the application of it can, pro* 
perly speaking, be termed an act of legislation. See infra, § 3. 

• Ch. xiii. [Cases unmeet]. 



XVII.] Penal Brand of Jurisprudence. 315 

XI. 2. As to the cases in which punishment would be ineffl- 2. Howfer 

Dirivftlio 

eaei<ms. These, we may observe, may be divided into two sets ethics can 

, -1 1 i n ii X apply in the 

or classes. The first do not depend at all upon tlie nature cases where 
of the act : they turn only upon a defect in the timing of the would be 
punishment. The punishment in question is no more than what, 
for any thing that appears, ought to have been applied to the ^ 

act in question. It ought, however, to have been applied at a 
different time ; viz. not till after it had been properly denounced. 
These are the cases of an ex-post-facto law; of a judicial sen-, 
tence beyond the law; and of a law not sufficiently promulgated. 
The acts here in question then might, for anything that appears, 
come properly under the department even of coercive legislation : 
of course do they under that of private ethics. As to the other set 
of cases, in which punishment would be inefficacious ; neither do 
these depend upon the nature of the act, that is, of the sort of 
act : they turn only upon some extraneous circumstances, with 
which an act of any sort may chance to be accompanied. These, 
however, are of such a nature as not only to exclude the appli- 
cation of legal punishment, but in general to leave little room 
for the influence of private ethics. These are the cases where 
the will could not be deterred from any act, even by the extra- 
ordinary force of artificial punishment : as in the cases of ex-^ 
treme infancy, insanity, and perfect intoxication: of course, 
therefore, it could not by such slender and precaiious force as 
could be applied by private ethics. The case is in this respect 
the same, under the circumstances of unintentionality with re- 
spect to the event of the action, unconsciousness with regard to 
the circumstances, and mis-supposal with regard to the existence 
of circumstances which have not existed ; as also where the 
force, even of extraordinary punishment, is rendered inoperative 
by the superior force of a physical danger or threatened mis- 
chief. It is evident, that in these cases, if the thunders of the 
law prove impotent, the whispers of simple morality can have 
but little influence. 

/XII. 3. As to the cases where punishment would be unpro- 3. Howfiur, 
fitdbU, These are the cases which constitute the great field for would be un- 
" ° proJUabU, 



3i6 Of the Limits of the [chap. 

the exclusive interference of private ethics. When a punish- 
ment is unprofitable, or in other words too expensive, it la 
because the evil of the punishment exceeds that of the offence. 
Now the evil of the punishment, we may remember^, is distin- 
guishable into four branches : i. The evil of coercion, including 
constraint or restraint, according as the act commanded is of the 
positive kiod or the negative. 2. The evil of apprehension. 
3. The evil of sufferance. 4. The derivative evils resulting to 
persons in cowM/otion with those by whom the three above-men- 
tioned original evils are sustained. Now with respect to those 
original evils, the persons who lie exposed to them may be two 
very different sets of persons. In the first place, persons who 
may have actually committed, or been prompted to commit, the 
acts really meant to be prohibited. In the next place, per- 
sons who may have performed, or been prompted to perform, 
such other acts as they fear may be in danger of beiug involved 
in the punishment designed only for the former. But of these 
two sets of acts, it is the former only that are pernicious : it is, 
therefore, the former only that it can be the business of private 
ethics to endeavour to prevent. The latter being by the sup- 
position not mischievous, to prevent them is what it can no 
more be the business of ethics to endeavour at, than of legisla- 
tion. It remains to show how it may happen, that there should 
be acts really pernicious, which, although they may very pro- 
perly come under the censure of private ethics, may yet be no 
fit objects for the legislator to control. 
Which it XIII. Punishment then, as applied to delinquency, may be 

1. Aithougl unprofitable in both or either of two ways : i. By the expense 

confined to .,, . t-i. .i.*. .1 

the guilty, it would amount to, even supposmg the application of it to be 
confined altogether to delinquency : 2. By the danger there may 
be of its involving the innocent in the fate designed only for the 
guilty. First then, with regard to the cases in which the ex- 
pense of the punishment, as applied to the guilty, would out- 
weigh the profit to be made by it. These cases, it is evident, 
depend upon a certain proportion between the evil of the 

^ See eh. ziii. [Oases unmeet], § iv. 



XVII.] 



Penal Branch of Jurisprudence. 



317 



punishment and the evil of the offence. Now were the offence of 
fiuch a nature, that a punishment which, in point of magnitude, 
should l)ut just exceed the profit of it, would be sufficient to 
prevent it, it might be rather difficult perhaps to find an in- 
stance in which such punishment would clearly appear to be 
unprofitable. But the fact is, there are many cases in which a 
punishment, in order to have any chance of being efficacious, 
must, in point of magnitude, be raised a great deal above that 
level. Thus it is, wherever the danger of detection is, or, what 
comes to the same thing, is likely to appear to be, so small, as 
to make the punishment appear in a high degree uncertain. In 
this case it is necessary, as has been shown ^, if punishment be 
at all applied, to raise it in point of magnitude as much as it 
fells short in point of certainty. It is evident, however, that all 
this can be but gues»-work : and that the effect of such a pro- 
portion will be rendered precarious, by a variety of circum- 
stances : by the want of sufficient promulgation on the part of 
the law ^ : by the particular circumstances of the temptation ' : 
and by the circumstances influencing the sensibility of the 
several individuals who are exposed to itl Let the seditcing 
motives be strong, the offence then will at any rate be frequently 
committed. Now and then indeed, owing to a coincidence of 
circumstances more or less extraordinary, it will be detected, 
and by that means punished. But for the purpose of example, 
which is the principal one, an act of punishment, considered in 
itself, is of no use : what use it can be of, depends altogether 
upon the expectation it raises of similar punishment, in future 
cases of similar delinquency. But this future punishment, it is 
evident, must always depend upon detection. If then the want 
of detection is such as must in general (especially to eyes fasci- 
nated by the force of the seducing motives) appear too impro- 
bable to be reckoned upon, the punishment, though it should be 
inflicted, may come to be of no use. Here then will be two 
opposite evils running on at the same time, yet neither of them 

* Ch. xiv. [Proportion] xviii. Kule 7. 

' Ch. ziii. [Gases unmeet], § iii. Append, tit. [Promulgation]. 

^ Ch. li. [Disposition] zxxv. &c. ^ Ch. yi. [SensibiKty]. 



3x8 



Cf the Limits of tie 



[chap. 



reducing the quantum of the other : the evil of the disease and 
the evil of the painful and inefficacious remedy. It seems to be 
partly owing to some such considerations, that fornication, for 
example, or the illicit commerce between the sexes, has com- 
monly either gone altogether unpunished, or been punished in a 
degree inferior to that in which, on other accounts, legislators 
might have been disposed to punish it. 
2. By en- XIV. Secondly, with regard to the cases in which political 

innocent, punishment, as applied to delinquency, may be unprofitable, in 
virtue of the danger there may be of its involving the innocent 
in the fate designed only for the guilty. Whence should this 
danger then arise 1 From the difficulty there may be of fixing 
the idea of the guilty action : that is, of subjecting it to such a 
definition as shall be clear and precise enough to guard effec- 
tually against misapplication. This difficulty may arise from 
either of two sources : the one permanent, to wit, the nature of 
the actions themselves : the other occasional, I mean the qualities 
of the men who may have to deal with those actions in the way 
of government. In as far as it arises from the latter of these 
sources, it may depend partly upon the use which the legislator 
may be able to make of language ; partly upon the use which^ 
according to the apprehension of the legislator, the judge may 
be disposed to make of it. As far as legislation is concerned, 
it will depend upon the degree of perfection to which the arts 
of language may have been carried, in the first place, in the 
nation in general ; in the next place, by the legislator in par- 
ticular. It is to a sense of this difficulty, as it should seem, that 
we may attribute the caution with which most legislators have 
abstained from subjecting tj censure, on the part of the lawj 
such actions as come under the notion of rudeness, for example^ 
or treachery, or ingratitude. The attempt to bring acts of so 
vague and questionable a nature under the control of law, will 
argue either a very immature age, in which the difficulties 
which give birth to that danger are not descried ; or a very 
enlightened age, in which they are overcome \ 

*■ In certain countries, in which the voice of the people has a more 



xvii.] P&tial Branch of Jurisprudence. 319 

XY. For the sake of obtaining the clearer idea of the limits LegiBistion 

how ftw Tift» 

between the art of legislation and private ethics, it may now be oessary for 
time to call to mind the distinctions above established with mentofthe 
regard to ethics in general. The degree in which private ethics prudence. 
stands in need of the assistance of legislation, is different in the 
three branches of duty above distinguished. Of the rules of 
moral duty, those which seem to stand least in need of the as- 
sistance of legislation are the rules of prudence. It can only be 
through some defect on the part of the understanding, if a man 
be ever deficient in point of duty to himself. If he does wrong, 
there is nothing else that it can be owing to but either some in- 
advertence^ or some mis-supposal^ with regard to the circum- 
stances on which his happiness depends. It is a standing topic 
of complaint, that a man knows too little of himsel£ Be it so : 
but is it so certain that the legislator must know more ' ? It is 
plain, that of individuals the legislator can know nothing : con. 
cerning those points of conduct which depend upon the parti- 
cular circumstances of each individual, it is plain, therefore, 
that he can determine nothing to advantage. It is only with 
respect to those broad lines of conduct in which all persons, or 
very large and permanent descriptions of persons, may be in a 
way to engage, that he can have any pretence for interfering ; 
and even here the propriety of his interference will, in most 

especial control over the hand of the legislator^ nothing cao exceed the 
dread which they are under of seeing any effectual provision made against 
the offences which come under the head of drfamationt particularly that 
branch of it which may be styled the political. This dread seems to de- 
pend partly upon the apprehension they may think it prudent to entertain 
of a defect in point of ability or integrity on the part of the legislator, 
partly upon a similar apprehension of a defect in point of integrity on the 
part of Uie judge. 

^ See ch. ix. [Consciousness]. 

^ Ch. xvi. [Division] lii. 

On occasions like this, the legislator shoidd never lose sight of the 
well-known story of the oculist and the sot. A countryman who had hurt 
•his eyes by drinking, went to a celebrated oculist for advice. He foimd 
him at table, with a glass of wine before him. ' You must leave off drink- 
ing/ said the oculist. * How so f says the countryman. ' Tou don*t, and 
yet methinks your own eyes are none of the b^.' — 'That's very true, 
friend,' replied the oculist: *but you are to know, I love my bottle 
better than my eyes.' 



320 



Of the Idmits of the 



[chap. 



instances, lie very open to dispute. At any rate, he must never 
expect to produce a perfect compliance by the mere force of the 
sanction of which he is himself the author. All he can hope to 
do, is to increase the efficacy of private ethics, by giving strength 
and direction to the influence of the moral sanction. "With 
what chance of success, for example, would a legislator go 
about to extirpate drunkenness and fornication by dint of legal 
punishment ? Not all the tortures which ingenuity could invent 
would compass it : and, before he had made any progress worth 
regarding, such a mass of evil would be produced by the punish- 
ment, as would exceed, a thousand-fold, the utmost possible 
mischief of the ofience. The great difficulty would, be in the 
procuring evidence; an object which could not be attempted, 
with any probability of success, without spreading dismay 
through every family \ tearing the bonds of sympathy asunder *, 
and rooting out the influence of all the social motives. All that 
he can do then, against oflences of this nature, with any pros- 
pect of advantage, in the way of direct legislation, is to subject 
I them, in cases of notoriety^ to a slight censure, so as thereby to 
cover them with a slight shade of artificial disrepute. 
— Apt to go XVI. It may be observed, that with regard to this branch of 
this respect duty, legislators have, in general, been disposed to carry their 
interference full as far as is expedient. The great difficulty here 
is, to persuade them to confine themselves within bounds. A 
thousand little passions and prejudices have led them to narrow 
the liberty of the subject in this line, in cases in which the 
punishment is either attended with no profit at all, or with 
none that will make up for the expense. 

XVII. The mischief of this sort of interference is more par- 
ticularly conspicuous in the article of religion. The reasoning, 
in this case, is of the following stamp. There are certain errors, 
in matters of belief, to which all mankind are prone : and for 
these errors in judgment, it is the determination of a Being of 

^ Evil of apprehension : third branch of the evil of a pimishment 
Ch. xiii. § iy. 

^ Derivatiye evils : fourth branch of the evil of a punishment. lb. 



— Particu- 
larly in 
matters of 
religion. 



xvn.] Penal Branch of Jurisprudence. 521 

infinite benevolence, to punish them with an infinity of tonnents. 
But from these errors the legislator himself is necessarily free : 
for the men, who happen to be at hand for him to consult with*, 
being men perfectly enlightened, unfettered, and unbiassed, have 
such advantages over all the rest of the world, that when they 
sit down to enquire out the truth relative to points so plain and 
so familiar as those in question, they cannot fail to find it. This 
being the case, when the sovereign sees his people ready to 
plunge headlong into an abyss of fire, shall he not stretch out a 
hand to save them ? Such, for example, seems to have been the 
train of reasoning, and such the motives, which led Lewis the 
XlVth into those coercive measures which he took for the con- 
version of heretics and the confirmation of true believers. The 
ground-work, pure sympathy and loving-kindness : the super- 
structure, all the miseries which the most determined malevo- 
lence could have devised ^. But of this more fully in another 
placed 

XVin. The rules of probity are those, which in point of ex — ^How far 
pediency stand most in need of assistance on the part of the for the en- 
legislator, and in which, in point of fact, his interference has the dictates 
been most extensive. There are few cases in which it would be 
expedient to punish a man for hurting himself: but there are 
few cases, if any, in which it would not be expedient to punish a 

^ I do not mean but that other motives of a less social nature might 
have introduced themselves, and probably, in point of &ct, did introduce 
themselves, in the progress of the enterprise. But in point of possibility, 
the motive above mentioned, when accompanied with such a thread of rea- 
soning, is sufficient, without any other, to account for all the effects above 
alluded to. If any others interfere, their interference, how natural soever, 
may be looked upon as an accidental and inessential circumstance, not ne- 
cessary to the production of the effect. Sympathy, a concern for the 
danger they appear to be exposed to, gives birth to the wish of freeing 
them from it : tiiat wish shows itself in the shape of a command : this com- 
mand produces disobedience : disobedience on ^e one part produces disap- 
pointment on the other: the pain of disappointment produces ill-will 
towards those who are the authors of it. The affections will often make 
this progress in less time than it would take to describe it. The sentiment 
of wounded pride, and other modifications of the love of reputation and the 
love of power, add fuel to the flame. A kind of revenge exasperates the 
severities of coercive policy. 

' See B. I. tit. [Self-regarding offences.] 




^22 Of the Limits of the [chap. 

man for injuring his neighbour. With regard to that branch of 
probity which is opposed to offences against property, private 
ethics depends in a manner for its very existence upon legis- 
lation. Legislation must first determine what things are to be 
regarded as each man's property, before the general rules of 
ethics, on this head, can have any particular application. The 
case is the same with regard to offences against the state. With- 
out legislation there would be no such thing as a state : no par- 
ticular persons invested with powers to be exercised for the 
benefit of the rest. It is plain, therefore, that in this branch the 
interference of the legislator cannot any where be dispensed with. 
We must first know what are the dictates of legislation, before 
we can know what are the dictates of private ethics *. 
-7 of the XIX. As to the rules of beneficence, these, as far as concerns 

benefioenoe. matters of detail, must necessarily be abandoned in great mea- 
sure to the jurisdiction of private ethics. In many cases the 
beneficial quality of the act depends essentially upon the dis- 
position of the agent; that is, upon the motives by which he 
appears to have been prompted to perform it : upon their be- 
longing to the head of sympathy, love of amity, or love of repu- 
tation ; and not to any head of self-regarding motives, brought 
into play by the force of political constraint : in a word, upon 
their being such as denominate his conduct free and vohintary, 
according to one of the many senses given to those ambiguous 
expressions^. The limits of the law on this head seem, how- 

^ But suppose the dictates of legislation are not what they (yu^ht to be : 
what are then, or (what in this case comes to the same thing) what ought 
to be, the dictates of private ethics ? Do they coincide with the dictates 
of legislation, or do they oppose them, or do they remain neuter ? a very 
interesting question this, but one that belongs not to the present subject. 
It belongs exclusively to that of private ethics. Principles which may lead 
to the solution of it may be seen in A Fragment on G-ovemment, p. 150, 
Lend. edit. 1776 — ^and p. 114, edit. 1833. 

* If we may believe M. Voltaire \ there was a time when the French 
ladies who thought themselves neglected by their husbands, used to petition 
pour Ure embewignees : the technical word, which, he says, was appropriated 
to this purpose. These sort of law-proceedings seem not very well calcu- 
lated to answer the design : accordingly we hear nothing of them now-a* 

^ Qnest. 8ur I'Enqrdop. torn. 7. art. ImpuiMaiioe. 



1 



Bcapii 
ited. 



XVII.] Penal Branch of Jv/mprudenee, 323 

ever, to be capable of being extended a good deal farther than \ 
they seem ever to have been extended hitherto. In particular, 
in cases where the person is in danger, why should it not be 
made the duty of every man to save another from mischief, when 
it can be done without prejudicing himself, as well as to abstain 
from bringing it on him % This accordingly is the idea pursued \ 
in the body of the work ^. 

XX. To conclude this section, let us recapitulate and bring to Differanoe 
a point the difference between private ethics, considered as an private^ 
art or science, on the one hand, and that brancj^ of jurisprudence the^"!^ 
which contains the art or science of legislation, on the other, l^^t^ 
Private ethics teaches how each man may dispose himself to 
pursue the course most conducive to his own happiness, by means 
of such motives as offer of themselves : the art of legislation 
(which may be considered as one branch of the science of juris- 
prudence) teaches how a multitude of men, composing a com- 
munity, may be disposed to pursue that course which upon the 
whole is the most conducive to the happiness of the whole com- 
munity, by means of motives to be applied by the legislator. 

We come now to exhibit the limits between penal and civil 
jurisprudence. For this purpose it may be of use to give a dis- 
tinct though sunmiary view of the principal branches into which 
jurisprudence, considered in its utmost extent, is wont to be 
divided. 

§ 2. Jumj^ruc^ence, its hranohea. 

XXI. Jurisprudence is a fictitious entity : nor can any mean- JuiBpni- 
ing be found for the word, but by placing it in company with podtoiy— 
some word that shall be significative of a real entity. To know 

days. The French ladies of the present age seem to be under no such 
difficulties. 

^ A woman's head-dress catches fire : water is at hand : a man, instead 
of assisting to quench the fire, looks on, and laughs at it. A drunken man, 
foiling with his &ce downwards into a puddle, is in danger of suffocation : 
lifting his head a little on one side woald save him : another man sees this 
and lets him lie. A quantity of gunpowder lies scattered about a room :^ a 
man is going into it with a lighted candle : another, knowing this, lets him 
go in without warning. Who is there that in any of these cases would 
think punishment misapplied ? 

T 2 



3^4 Of the Limits of the [chap. 

what is meant by jurisprudence, we must know, for example, 
what is meant by a book of jurisprudence. A book of jurispru- 
dence can have but one or the other of two objects : i. To ascer- 
tain what the law^ is : 2. to ascertain what it ought to be. In the 
former case it may be styled a book of expository jurisprudence ; 
in the latter, a book of censorial jurisprudence : or, in other 
words, a book on the art of legislation. 
Expository XXII. A book of expository jurisprudence is either aufhori- 
dexioQ, au- totive or una/uthorita^ive. It is styled authoritative, when it is 
imauthori- composed by him who, by representing the state of the law to be 
so and so, causeth it so to be ; that is, of the legislator him- 
self : imauthoritative, when it is the work of any other person 
at large. 
Sources of XXIII. Now law, or the law. taken indefinitely, is an abstract 

thedistinc- . ' , ' , "^ . 

tions yet re- and collective term : which, when it means any thing, can mean 

maiiiing. , . . 

neither more nor less than the sum total of a number of indi- 
vidual laws taken together \ It follows, that of whatever other 
modifications the subject of a book of jurisprudence is sus- 
ceptible, they must all of them be taken from some circumstance 
or other of which such individual laws, or the assemblages into 
which they may be sorted, are susceptible. The circumstances 
that have given rise to the principal branches of jurisprudence 
we are wont to hear of, seem to be as follow: r. The eoctent of 
the laws in question in point of dominion. 2. The political 
quality of the persons whose conduct they undertake to regulate. 

^ The word law itself, which stands so much in need of a definition, must 
wait for it awhile (see § 3) : for there is no doing every thing at once. In 
the mean time e.very reader will understand it according to the notion he 
has been jetccustomed to annex to it. 

' In most of the European languages there are two different words for 
distinguishing the abstract and the concrete senses of the word law : which 
words are so wide asunder as not even to have any etymological affinity. 
In Latin, for example, there is lex for the concrete sense. Jus for the 
abstract : in Italian, . %^e and diritto : in French, lot and droit : in Spanish, 
ley and derecho : in German, gesetz and rec&t. The English is at present 
destitute of this advantage. 

In the Anglo-Saxon, besides lage, and several other words, for the con- 
crete sense, there was the word right, answering to the Grerman recht, for 
the abstract ; as may be seen in the compound folc-HglU, and in other in- 
stances. But the word right haying long ago lost this sense, the modem 
English no longer possesses this advantage. 



XVII.} Penal Branch of Jwrisprudence. 325 

3. The time of their being in force. 4. The manner in which 
they are expressed. 5. The concern which they have with the 
article oi purdshment. 

XXIV. In the first place, in point of extent, what is delivered Jnrispru- 

, , , denoe, local 

concerning the laws in question, may have reference either to —universal. 

the laws of such or such a nation or nations in particular, or to 

the laws of all nations whatsoever : in the first case, the book 

may be said to relate to local, in the other, to universal, jwris- 

pnjtdenee. 

Now of the infinite variety of nations there are upon the 
earth, there are no two which agree exactly in their laws : cer- 
tainly not in the whole ; perhaps not even in any single article : 
and let them: agree to-day, they would disagree to-morrow. This 
is evident enough with regard to the stihstanoe of the laws : and 
it would be still more extraordinary if they agreed in point of 
form; that is, if they were conceived in precisely the same 
strings of words. What is more, as the languages of nations are 
commonly different, as well as their laws, it is seldom that, 
strictly speaking, they have so much as a single vnyrd in com- 
mon. However, among the words that are appropriated to the 
subject of law, there are some that in all languages are pretty 
exactly correspondent to one another : which comes to the same 
thing nearly as if they were the same. Of this stamp, for ex- 
ample, are those which correspond to the words power, right, 
obligation, liberty, and many others. 

It follows, that if there are any books which can, properly 
speaking, be styled books of universal jurisprudence, they must 
be looked for within very narrow limits. Among such as are 
expository, there can be none that are authoritative : nor even, 
as far as the substance of the laws is concerned, any that are un- 
authoritative. To be susceptible of an universal application, all 
that a book of the expository kind can have to treat of, is the 
import of words : to be, strictly speaking, universal; it must con- 
fine itself to terminology. Accordingly the definitions wluch 
there has been occasion here and there to intersperse in the 
course of the present work, and particularly the definition here- 



^ 



3^6 Of the Limits of tie [chap, 

eftier given of the word law, may be considered as matter be- 
longing to the head of universal jurisprudence. Thus far in 
strictness of speech : though in point of usage, where a man, in 
laying down what he apprehends to be the law, extends his 
views to a few of the nations with which his own is most con- 
nected, it is common enough to consider what he writes as 
relating to uniyerBal jurisprudence. 

It is in the censorial line that there is the greatest room for 
disquisitions that apply to the circumstances of all nations alike : 
and in this line what regards the substance of the laws in ques- 
tion is as susceptible of an universal application, as what regards 
the words. That the laws of all nations, or even of any two 
nations, should coincide in all points, would be as ineligible as it 
is impossible : some leading points, however, there seem to be, 
in respect of which the laws of all civilised nations might, with- 
out inconvenience, be the same. To mark out some of these 
points will, as far as it goes, be the business of the body of this 
work. 
— mtomal XXY. In the second place, with regard to the political quality 
nationaL of the persons whose conduct is the object of the law. These 
may, on any given occasion, be considered either as members of 
the same state, or as members of different states : in the first 
case, the law may be referred to the head of vntemaly in the 
second case, to that of international ^ jurisprudence. 

Now as to any transactions which may take place between in- 
dividuals who are subjects of different states, these are regulated 
by the internal laws, and decided upon by the internal tribunals, 
of the one or the other of those states : the case is the same where 
the sovereign of the one has any immediate transactions with a 

^ The word intemational, it must be acknowledged, is a new one ; 
though, it is hoped, sufficienUy analogous and intelligible. It is calculated 
to express, in a more significant way, the branch of law which goes com- 
monly under the name of the law of naiiont : an appellation so uncharac- 
teristic, that, were it not for the force of custom, it would seem rather to 
refer to internal jurisprudence. The chancellor D'Aguesseau has already 
made, I find, a similar remark : he says that what is commonly called dr<nt 
des gens, ought rather to be termed droit entre lee gens ^. 

1 (EuvroB, Tom. U. p. 337, «dtt. 1773, lamo. 



XVII.] Penal Branch of Jurisprudence, 327 

private member of the other : the sovereign reducing himself, 

pro re natd, to the condition of a private person, as often as he 

submits his cause to either tribunal; whether by claiming a 

benefit, or defending himself against a burthen. There remain 

then the mutual transactions between sovereigns, as such, for the , 

subject of that branch of jurisprudence which may be properly 

and exclusively termed international ^. 

With what degree of propriety rules for the conduct of per- 
sons of this description can come under the appellation of laws, 
is a question that must rest till the nature of the thing called a 
law shall have been more particularly unfolded. 

It is evident enough, that international jurisprudence may, 
as well as internal, be censorial as well as expository, unauthori- 
tative as well as authoritative. 

XXVI. Internal jurisprudence, again, may either^concem all the internal ju- 
members of a state indiscriminately, or such of them only tis are national and 
connected in the way of residence, or otherwise, with a particular local or par- 
district. * Jurisprudence is accordingly sometimes distinguished 
into national and jprovindal. But as the epithet provincial is 
hardly applicable to districts so small as many of those which 
have laws of their own are wont to be, such as towns, parishes, 
and manors; the term local (where universal jurisprudence is 
plainly out of the question) or the term particular, though this 

^ In the times of James I. of England and Philip III. of Spain, certain 
merchants at London happened to have a claim upon Philip, which his 
ambassador Grondemar did not think fit to satisfy. They applied for coun- 
sel to Selden, who advised them to sue the Spanish monarch in the court of 
King*s Bench, and prosecute him to an outlawry. They did so : and the v^ 
sheriffs of London were accordingly commanded, in the usual form, to take 
the body of the defendant Philip, wherever it was to be found within their 
bailiwick. As to the sheriffs, Philip, we may believe, was in no great rs 
fear of them : but, what answered the same purpose, he happened on his 
part to have demands upon some other merchants, whom, so long as the s^ 
outlawry remained in force, there was no proceeding against. Gondemar ^ 
paid the money ^. This was internal jurisprudence : if the dispute had 
been betwixt Philip and James himself, it would have been international. 

As to the word intemcUiofialy from this work, or the first of the works 
edited in French by Mr. Dumont, it has taken root in the language. 
Witness reviews and newspapers. 

1 Selden's Table-Talk, tit. Law. 



3^8 Qf^ the Limits of the [chap. 

latter is not very characteristic, might either of them be more 
commodious ^. 
Jurispru- XXVII, Thirdly, with respect to time. In a work of the 

anoient— expository kind, the laws that are in question may either be 
^*"** such as are still in force at the time when the book is writing, 

or such as have ceased to be in force. In the latter case the 
subject of it might bd termed cmcierU ; in the former, preserU or 
living jurisprudence : that is, if the substantive jiunsjprudence, 
and no other, must at any rate be employed, and that with an 
epithet in both cases. But the truth is, that a book of the former 
kind is rather a book of history than a book of jurisprudence ; 
and, if the word jurisprudence be expressive of the subject, it is 
only with some such words as history or antiquities prefixed. 
And as the laws which are any where in question are supposed, 
if nothing appears to the contrary, to be those which are in force, 
no such epithet as that of present or living commonly appears. 

Where a book is so circumstanced, that the laws which form 
the subject of it, though in force at the time of its being written, 
are in force no longer, that book is neither a book of living juris- 
prudence, nor a book on the history of jurisprudence : it is no 
longer the former, and it never was the latter. It is evident 
that, owing to the changes which from time to time must take 
place, in a greater or less degree, in every body of laws, every 
book of jurisprudence, which is of an expository nature, must, in 
the course of a few years, come to partake more or less of this 
condition. 

The most common and most useful object of a history of juris- 
prudence, is to exhibit the circumstances that have attended the 
establishment of laws actually in force. But the exposition of 
the dead laws which have been superseded, is inseplEirably inter- 
woven with that of the living ones which have superseded them. 

% 

^ The term municipal seemed to answer the purpose yery well, till it 
was taken by an English author of the first eminence to signify internal 
law in general, in contradistinction to international law, and the imaginary 
law of nature. It might still be used in this sense, without scruple, in any 
other language. 



XVII.] Penal. Branch of Jurisprudence, 329 

The great use of both these brances of science, is to furnish ex- 
amples for the art of legislation ^. 

XXVin. Fourthly, in point of ^ayyression, the laws in question jimspru- 

may subsist either in the form of statute or in that of customary tutory— 
1 customary. 

As to the diiference between these two branches (which re- 
spects only the article of form or expression) it cannot properly 
be made appear till some progress has been made in the defini- 
tion of a law. 

XXIX. Lastly, The most intricate distinction of all, and that Jurispni- 
which comes most frequently on the carpet, is that which is —penal- 
made between the civU branch of jurisprudence and the penal, 
which latter is wont, in certain circumstances, to receive the name 
of criminal. 

What is a penal code of laws ? What a civil code ? Of what Question, 

, , ooncernuig 

nature are their contents ? Is it that there are two sorts of the distinc- 
tion between 
laws, the one penal the other civil, so that the laws in a penal the civil 

code are all penal laws, while the laws in a civil code are all the penal, 

stated, 
civil laws ? Or is it, that in every law there is some matter 

which is of a penal nature, and which therefore belongs to the 

penal code; and at the same time other matter which is of a civil 

nature, and which therefore belongs to the civil code 1 Or is 

it, that some laws belong to one code or the other exclusively, 

while others are divided between the two ? To answer these 

questions in any manner that shall be tolerably satisfactory, it 

will be necessary to ascertain what a la/w is ; meaning one entire 

but single law : and what are the parts into which a law, as such, 

^ Of what stamp are the works of Grotius, Paffendorf, and Burlamaqui ? 
Are they political or ethical^ historical or juridical, expository or censorial ? 
— Sometimes one thing, sometimes another : they seem hardly to have 
settled the matter with themselves. A defect this to which aU books must 
almost unavoidably be liable, which take for their subject the pretended 
law of nature ; an obscure phantom, which, in the imaginations of those 
who go in chase of it, pointo sometimes to manners, sometimes to laws; 
sometimes to what law is, sometimes to what it ought to be ^. Montesquieu 
sets out upon the censorial plan : but long before the conclusion, as if he 
had forgot his first design, he throws off the censor, and puts on the anti- 
quarian. The Marquis Beccaria's book, the first of any account that is 
imiformly censorial, concludes, as it sets out, with penal jurisprudence. 

^ See Cbap. U. [Prindplea advene] xiv. 



330 Of the Limits of the [chap. 

is capable of being distinguished : or, in other words, to ascer- 
tain what the properties are that are to be found in every object 
which can with propriety receive the appellation of a law. 
This then will be the business of the third and fourth sections : 
what concerns the import of the word criminal, as applied to 
law, will be discussed separately in the fifth *. 



Occasion and ' Here ends the original work, in the state into which it was brought in 

JSSul^*"* November, 1780. What follows is now added in January, 1789. 

i^ote. The third, fourth, and fifth sections intended, as expressed in the text, 

to have been added to this chapter, will not here, nor now be given; 
because to give them in a manner tolerably complete and satis&etory, 
might require a considerable volume. This volume will form a work of 
itself, closing the ^eries of works mentioned in the preface. 

What follows here may serve to give a slight intimation of the nature of 
the task, which such a work will lu^ve to achieve : it will at the same time 
furnish, not anything like a satisfactory answer to the questions mentioned 
in the text, but a slight and general indication of the course to be taken 
for giving them such an answer. 

By a. law here What is a law ? What the parts of a law ? The subject of these ques- 

fenot meant a tions, it is to be observed, is the hgiccU, the ideals the intdlectiLal whole, 
not the physical one : the law^ and not the stcUvte, An enquiry, directed to 
the latter sort of object, could neither admit of difficulty nor afford instruc- 
tion. Tn this sense whatever is given for law by the person or persons 
recognised as possessing the power of making laws, is law. The Meta- 
morphoses of Ovid, if thus given, would be law. So much as was embraced 
by one and the same act of authentication, so much as received the touch 
of the sceptre at one stroke, is one law : a whole law, and nothing more. 
A statute of George II. made to substitute an or instead of an and in a 
former statute is a complete law ; a statute containing an entire body of 
laws, perfect in all its parts, would not be more so. By the word law then, 
as often as it occurs in the succeeding pages, is meant that ideal object, of 
which the part, the whole, or the multiple, or an assemblage of parts, 
wholes, and multiples mixed together, is exhibited by a statute ; not the 
statute which exhibits them. 

Every law is Every law, when complete, is either of a coercive or an imcoerdve nature. 

eith«r a com- A coercive law is a commaaid, 

v^ation^oV^' An uncoercive, or rather a discoercive, law is the revocation, in whole or 

o"^ in part, of a coercive law. 

A declaratory What has been termed a declaratory law, so fur as it stands distinguished 

law is noM"*^ from either a coercive or a discoercive law, is not properly speaking a law. 

ataw.^'^ "^* It is not the expression of an act of the will exercised at the time : it is a 
mere notification of the existence of a law, either of the coercive or the dis- 
coercive kind, as already subsisting : of the existence of some document 
expressive of some act of the will, exercised, not at the time, but at some 
former period. If it does any thing more than give infi>rmation of this &ct, 
viz. of the prior existence of a law of either the coercive or the discoercive 
kind, it ceases pro tarUo to be what is meant by a declaratory law, and 
assuming either the coercive or the discoercive quality. 
V. Every coercive law creates an offence, that is, converts an act of some 

Every coercive ^ m * > 



xvti.] Penal Branch of Jurisprudence. 331 

sort or other into an offence. It is only by so doing that it can impose law creates an 
obligation, that it can produce coercion, offence. 

A law confining itself to the creation of an offence, and a law com- vi. , 
manding a punishment to be administered in case of the commission of i!li^ffen^^^ 
such an offcDce, are two distinct laws; not parts (as they seem to have been one appointing 
generally accounted hitherto) of one and the same law. The acts they Sistinct laws. 
command are altogether different ; the persons they are addressed to are 
altogether different. Instance, Let no man steed ; and, Let the judge cwuse 
whoever is conmcted of stealing to be hanged. 

They might be styled ; the former, a simply imperative law ; the other, a 
punitory : but the pimitory, if it commands the punishment to be inflicted, 
and does not merely permit it, is as truly imperative as the other : only it is 
punitory besides, which the other is not. 

A law of the discoercive kind, considered in itself, can have no punitory ^ dfacoircive 
law belonging to it : to receive the assistance and support of a punitory law can have 
law, it must first receive that of a simply imperative or coercive law, and it one^aroartain- 
18 to this latter that the punitory law will attach itself, and not to the dis- [°ier to it but 
coercive one. Example ; discoercive law. The sheriff has power to hang all intervuition of 
such as the judge^ proceeding in dtte cotvrse of law, shall order him to hang, * co^^w^e <>"«• 
Example of a coercive law, made in support of the above discoercive one. 
Let no man hinder the sheriff from hanging such as the judge, proceeding in 
due course of law, shall order him to hang. Example of a punitory law, 
made in support of the above coercive one. Let the judge cause to be 
imprisoned whosoever attempts to hinder the sheriff from hanging one, whom 
the judge, proceeding in due course of law, has ordered him to hang. 

But though a simply imperative law, and the punitory law attached to ^^^ a^unltory 
it, are so fiir distinct laws, that the former contains nothing of the latter, law invoiv^ 
and the latter, in its direct tenor, contains nothing of the former; yet per^eonei't 
by implication, and that a necessaxy one, the punitory does involve and belongs ta 
include the import of the simply imperative law to wMch it is appended. 
To say to the judge. Cause to be hanged whoever in due form of law is 
convicted of stealing, is, though not a direct, yet as intelligible a way of 
intimating to men in general that they must not steal, as to say to them 
directly, I)o not steal : and one sees, how much more likely to be efficacious. 

It should seem then, that, wherever a simply imperative law is to have a ^^^ s£^iy 
punitory one appended to it, the former might be spared altogether : in perative one 
which case, saving the exception (which naturally should seem not likely to ^^ be sp^s^d. 
be a firequent one) of a law capable of answering its purpose without such p"JiJj[!i** **' 
an appendage, there should be no occasion in the whole body of the law for matter. 
any other than punitory, or in other words than penal, laws. And this, 
perhaps, would be the case, were it not for the necessity of a large 
quantity of matter of the expository kind, of which we come now to speak. 

It will happen in the instance of many, probably of most, possibly of all Natia-irfsuch 
commands endued with the force of a public law, that, in the expression expository 
given to such a command, it shall be necessary to have recourse to terms 
too complex in their signification to exhibit the requisite ideas, without 
the assistance of a greater or less quantity of matter of an expository 
nature. Such terms, like the symbols used in algebraical notation, are 
rather substitutes and indexes to the terms capable of themselves of ex- 
hibiting the ideas in question, than the real and immediate representatives 
of those ideas. 

Take for instance the law. Thou shali not steal. Such a command, were 
it to rest there, oould never sufficiently answer the purpose of a law. 
A word of so vagae and unexplidt a meaning can no otherwise perform this 



VOL' 



33^ Of the Limits of tie [chap. 

office, than by giving a general intimation of a variety of propoeations, each 
requiring, to convey it to the apprehension, a more pari^oular and ample 
assembl^e of terms. Stealing, for example (according to a definition not 
aocorate enough for use, but sufficiently so for the present purpose), is the 
taking of a thing which is another* s, by one who has no title so to do, and t* 
conscious of his having none. Even after this exposition, supposing it a 
correct one, can the law be regarded as completely expressed f Certainly 
not. For what is meant by a man's having a titlb to take a thing J To be 
complete, the law must have exhibited, amongst a multitude of other 
things, two catalogues : the one of events to which it has given the quality 
of conferring title in such a case ; the other of the events to which it has 
given the quality of taJdng it away. What follows ? That for a man to 
have stolen, for a man to have had no title to what he took, either no one of 
the articles contained in the first of those lists must have happened in his 
favour, or if there has, some one of the number of those contained in the 
second must have happened to his prejudice. 

XI. Such then is the nature of a genersd law, that while the imperative port 
^i^^co^^- of it, the punctvm saliens as it may be termed, of this artificial body, shall 
****i^?to °**' ^®* **^® ^P above two or three words, its expository appendage, without 
^siative which that imperative part could not rightiy perform its office, may occnpy 
commands. ^ considerable volume. 

But this may equally be the case with a private order given in a fiunily. 
Take for instance one from a bookseller to his foreman. Remove, from t&u 
shop to my new one, my whole stock, according to this printed catalogue. — 
Benvove, from this shop to my n>ew one, my whole sUxk, is the inaperathre 
matter of this order; the catalogue referred to contains the ezpositoiy 
appendage. 

XII. The same mass of expository matter may serve in common for, may 

The same mass a«- a » ^ • j* 

of expository appertam tn common to, many commands, many masses of miperative 
^*ii[Si- ™***®''- Th«8. amongst other things, the catalogue of eoUative and ablative 
mon for many cvents, with respect to titles above spoken of (see No. IX. of this note), will 
^^^ belong in common to all or most of the laws constitutive of the various 

offences against property. Thus, in mathematical diagrams, one and the 

same base shall serve for a whole cluster of triangles. 

XIII. , Such expository matter, being of a complexion so different from the im- 
^icimgrative perative, it would be no wonder if the connection of the former with the 
essential to latter should cscape the observation: which, indeed, is perhaps pretty 
beconc^ed in generally the case. And so long as any mass of legislative matter presents 
t^matt£°" iteelf> which is not itself imperative or the contrary, or of which the connec- 
tion with matter of one of those two descriptions is not apprehended, so 
long and so far the truth of the proposition, T?Mt every law is a command 
or its opposite, may remain unsuspected, or appear questionable ; so long 
also may the incompleteness of the greater part of those masses of leg^isla- 
tive matter, which wear the complexion of complete laws upon the &ce of 
them, also the method to be taken for rendering them really complete, 
remain undiscovered. 

^^Lq. -^ circumstance, that will naturally contribute to increase the difficulty 
ment is favour- of the discovcry, is the great variety of ways in which the imperation of a 
Stude of ta^^*' ^*^ ™*y ^® conveyed — ^the great variety of forms which the imperative part 
rect forms in of a law may Indiscriminately assume : some more directly, some less directly 
ti^matterls' expressivc of the imperative quality. Thmt shalt not steal. Let no man 
Sm^Muched *^^^- ^-^'o steoleth shaU be punished so and so. If any man steai, he 
' shall he punished so and so. Stealing is where a man does so and so ; the 
punishment for stealing is so and so. To jvdges, so and so named, and so 



XVII.] Penal Branch of Jurisprudence. 333 

and so constituted, belong the cognizance of such and such offences; viz. 
stealing — mid so on. These are but part of a multitude of forms of words, 
in any of which the command by which stealing is prohibited might equally 
be couched : and it is manifest to what a degree, in some of them, the 
imperative quality is clouded and concealed from ordinary apprehension. 

After this explanation, a general proposition or two, that may be laid xv. 
down, may help to afford some little insight into the structure and contents ns^re^of^e 
of a complete body of laws. — So many different sorts of offences created, so j*^ j* * J^®» 
many different laws of the coercive kind : so many exceptions taken out of mined. 
the descriptions of those offences, so many laws of the discoerdve kind. 

To class offences, as hath been attempted to be done in the preceding 
chapter, is therefore to class laws : to exhibit a complete catalogue of all 
the offences created by law, including the whole mass of expository matter 
necessary for fixing and exhibiting the import of the terms contained in the 
several laws, by which those offences are respectively created, would be tb 
exhibit a complete collection of the laws in force : in a word, a complete 
body of law ; a pam,nomion, if so it might be termed. 

From the obscurity in which the lindts of a law, and the distinction xvi. 
betwixt a law of the civil or simply imperative kind and a punitory law, SSSts'be-**'^ 
are naturally involved, results the obscurity of the limits betwixt a civil and tween a d^ 
a penal code, betwixt the civil branch of the law and the penal. ^^ ^ 

The question, What parts of the total mass of legislaJtive matter belong to 
the civil branch^and what to the penal t supposes that divers political states, 
or at least that some one such stiftte, are to be found, having as well a civil 
code as a penal code, each of them complete in Its kind, and marked out 
by certain limits. But no one such state has ever yet existed. 

To put a question to which a true answer can be given, we must sub- 
stitute to the foregoing question some such one as that which follows : 

Suppose two masses of legislative matter to be drawn up at this time of 
day, the one under the name of a civil code, the other of a penal code, each 
meant to be complete in its kind — in what general way, is it natural to 
suppose, that the different sorts of matter, as above distinguished, would be 
distributed between them ? 

To this question the following answer seems likely to come as near as 
any other to the truth. 

The civil code would not consist of a collection of civil laws, each com- 
plete in itself, as well as dear of all penal ones : ' 

Neither would the penaZ code (since we have seen that it could not) ; 
consist of a collection of pimitive laws, each not only complete in itself, but | 
dear of all dvil ones. But ' 

The civil code would consist chiefly of mere masses of expository matter. ' xvii. 
The imperative matter, to which tibose masses of expository matter re- civU^co(£.° * 
spectively appertained, would be found — not in that same code — ^not in the 
dvil code — nor in a pure state, free from all admixture of punitory laws ; 
but in the penal code — ^in a state of combination — involved, in manner as 
above explained, in so many correspondent punitory laws. 

The penal code then would consist principally of punitive laws, involving 1 xviii. 
the imperative matter of the whole number of civil laws : along with which w^^c6d& '^ 
would probably also be found various masses of expository matter, apper- T 
taining, not to the dvil, but to the punitory laws. The body of penal law, \ 
enactd by the Empress-Queen Maria Theresa, agrees pretty well with this 
account. 

The mass of legislative, matter published in French as wdl as Grerman, ^^!?^ 
under the auspices of Frederic II. of Prussia, by the name of Code Fred^cthe 



334 Q^ ^^ Limits of the [chap. 

imperatire Frederic, but never established with force of law \ appears, for example, to 

aimSt*ost*ta ^® almost whoUy composed of masses of expository matter, the relation of 

the eagiMsitory which to any imperative matter appears to have been but very imperfectly 

'"*'**'' apprehended. 

XX. In that enormous mass of confusion and inconsistency, the ancient 
Ro^m Uiw. Roman, or, as it is termed by way of eminence, the civU law, the imperative 

matter, and even all traces of the imperative character, seem at last to have 
been smothered in the expository. Esto had been the language of primsaval 
simplicity : esto had been the language of the twelve tables. By the time 
of Justinian (so thick was the darkness raised by clouds of commentators) 
the penal law had been crammed into an odd comer of the civil — the whole 
catalogue of offeoces, and even of crimes, lay buried under a heap of 
ohligaUona — loill was hid in opi/nion — and the original esto had transformed 
itself into videtvr, in the mouths even of the most despotic sovereigns. 

XXI. Among the barbarous nations that grew up out of the ruins of the 
Sn^odS^ Roman Empire, Law, emerging from under the mountain of expository 
stands conspi- rubbish, reassumed for a while the language of command : and then she had 
cuous. simplicity at least, if nothing else, to recommend her. * 

XXII. Besides the civil and the penal, every complete body of law must contain 
c^iS^ a tliird branch, the constitutional, 

nj^ion^^hthe The Constitutional branch is chiefly employed in conferring, on particular 

iwft n •« classes of persons, powers, to be exercised for the good of the whole society, 
or of considerable parts of it, and prescribing dtUies to the persons invested 
with those powers. 

The powers are principally constituted, in the first instance, by dis-' 
coercive or permissive laws, operating as exceptions to certain laws of the 
coercive or imperative kind. Instance : A taa^-gatherer^ as such, mapt on 
fswik and such an occasion, take sv^h a/nd such things, without any other 

TITLE. 

The duties are created by imperative laws, addressed to the persons on 
whom the powers are conferred. Instance : On such and such an occasion, 
such and such a tax-gatherer shall take such and such things. Such and such 
a judge shaU, in such and such a case, cause persons so and so offending to be 
hanged. 

The parts which perform the function of indicating who the individuals 
are, who, in every case, shall be considered as belonging to those classes, 
have neither a permissive complexion, nor an imperative. 

They are so many masses of expository matter, appertaining in common 
to all laws, into the texture of which, the names of those classes of persons 
have occasion to be inserted. Instance ; imperative matter : — Let the judge 
cause whoever, in due course of law, is convicted of stealing, to be hanged. 
Nature of the expository matter : — ^Who is the person meant by the word 
judge f He who has been invested with that office in such a manner : and 
in respect of whom no event has happened, of the number of those, to which 
the effect is given, of reducing him to the condition of one divested of that 
office. 

XXIII. Thus it is, that one and the same law, one and the same command, will 
matte^f one ^*^® ^*® matter divided, not only between two great codes, or main branches 
^w mav be of the wholc body of the laws, the civil and the penal ; but amongst three 
au^three^od^. s^ch branches, the civil, tiie penal, and the constitutional. 

XXIV. In countries, where a great part of the law exists in no other shape, than 
mattw^^alreat ^^* ^^ what in England is called common law but might be more express 

1 Mirabeau sur la Monarchie Prnssieime, Tom. v. Liv. 8. p. 21 j. 



no 
mon 



XVII.] Penal Branch of Jurisprudence* 335 

sively termed ^tM^tcfarj^, there must be a great multitude of laws, the im** quantity of it 
port of which camiot be sufficiently made out for practice, without referring JjJerl^in no 
to this common law, for more or less of the expository matter belonging to other form 
them. Thus in England the exposition of the word titUf that basis of the oOudiiciaz^ 
whole fabric of the laws of property, is nowhere else to be found. And, as i^^* 
uncertainty is of the veiy essence of every particle of law so denominated 
(for the instant it is clothed in a certain authoritative form of words it 
changes its nature, and passes over to the other denomination) hence it is 
that a great part of the laws in being in such countries remain uncertain 
and incomplete. What are those countries ? To this hour, eveiy one on 
the surface of the globe. 

Had the science of architecture no fixed nomenclature belonging to it— ^ xxv. 
were there no settled names for distinguishing the different sorts of buildings, piorabie state 
nor the different parts of the same building fix)m each other — what would of le^slatlSnf 
it be ? It would be what the soience of legislation, considered with respect considered in 
to its/orw, remains at present. ^^^ ^ 

Were there no architects who could distinguish a dwelling-house from a 
bam, or a side*wall from a ceiling, what would architects be ? They would 
be what all legislators are at present. 

From this very slight and imperfect sketch, may be collected not an xxvi. 
answer to the questions in the text but an intimation, and that but an im- affoMine^an 
perfect one, of the course to be taken for giving such an answer ; and, at *£ fJJ'dfficuky 
any rate, some idea of the difficulty, as well as of the necessity, of the as weu as 

jy»Hl_ importance of 

"***'*^* , , this branch of 

If it were thought necessary to recur to experience for proofs of this science ;— 
difficulty, and this necessity, they need not be long wanting. fim1t%e 

Take, for instance, so many wdl-meant endeavours on the part of popular \^^^ 
bodies, and so many well-meant reconmiendations in ingenious books, to representative 
restrain supreme representative assemblies from making laws in such and ^«8»s**'"'**' 
such cases, or to such and such an effect. Such laws, to answer the intended 
purpose, require a perfect mastery in the science of law considered in respect 
of its form — in the sort of anatomy spoken of in the preface to this work : 
but a perfect, or even a moderate insight into that science, would prevent 
their being couched in those loose and inadequate terms, in which they may 
be observed so frequently to be conceived ; as a perfect acquaintance with 
the dictates of utility on that head would, in many, if not in most, of those 
instances, discounsel the attempt. Keep to the letter, and in attempting 
to prevent the making of bad laws, you will find them prohibiting the making 
of the most necessary laws, perhaps even of all laws : quit the letter, and 
they express no more than if each man were to say. Your laws shall become 
ipso facto void, as often as they contain amy thing which is not to my mind. 

Of such unhappy attempts, examples may be met with in the legislation 
of many nations : but in none more frequently than in that newly-created 
nation, one of the most enlightened, if not the most enlightened, at this day 
on the globe. 

Take for instance the Declaration of Mights, enacted by the State of xxvii. 
North Carolina, in convention, in or about the month of September, 1788, Amencwi* 
and said to be copied, with a Eonall exception, from one in like manner declarations 
enacted by the State of Virginia*. o r g ts. 

The following, to go no farther, is the first and fundamental article : 

' That there are certain natural rights, of which men, when they form a 
social compact, cannot deprive or divest their posterity, among which are 

1 Recherches sur les Etats UdJs, 8vo. 1988, vol. i. p. i j8. 




33^ Lifn^ita of the Penal Branch of Jurisprudence. 

the enjoyment of life and liberty, with the means of acquiring, possessiii^, 
and protecting property, and pursuing and obtaining happiness and safety,* 

Not to dwell on the oversight of confining to posterity the benefit of the 
rights thus declared, what follows ? That— as against those whom the pro- 
tection, thus meant to be afiforded, includes — every law, or other order, 
divesiing a man of the enjoyment of life or liberty, is void. 

Therefore this is the case, amongst others, with every coercive law. 

Therefore, as against ihe persons thus protected, every order, for example, 
to pay money on the score of taxation, or of debt from individual to indi- 
vidual, or otiierwise, is void : for the effect of it, if complied with> is * to 
deprive and divest him,* pro tanto,oi the enjoyment of liberty, viz. th6 liberty 
of paying or not paying as he thinks proper : not to mention the species 
opposed to imprisonment, in the event of such a mode of coercion's being 
resorted to : likewise of property, which is itself a ' means of acquiring, 
possessing, and protecting property, and ofpwrsui/ng and obtaimmg happiness 
and safety* 

Therefore also, as against such persons, every order to attack an armed 
enemy, in time of war, is also void : for, the necessary effect of such an. 
order is, * to deprive some of them of the enjoym>ent of life.* 

The above-mentioned consequences may suffice for examples, amongst an 
endless train of similar ones'. 

Leaning on his elbow, in an attitude of profound and solemn meditation, 
' What a multitude of things there are* (exclaimed the dancing-master 
Marcel) 'in a minuet/* — ^May we now add ? — and vn a law, 

1 The Virginian Declaration of Rights, said, in the French work above quoted, to have 
been enacted the ist of Jane, 1776, is not inserted in the publication entitled * The Constitu- 
turns of the several independent states of America, 4rc,* Published by order €f Congress : 
Philadelphia printed. Reprinted for Stockdale and Walker , London, 1982 : though that 
publication contains the form of government enacted in the same convention, between the 
6th of May and the ^th of July in the same year. 

But in that same publication is contained a Declaration of R^hts, of the province of 
Massachxuetts, dated in the years 1779 and 1780, which in its first article is a little similar : 
also one of the province of Pennsylvania^ dated between July 15th and September aSth, in 
which the similarity is rather more considerable. 

Bloreover, the famous Declaration of Independence, published by Congress July 5th, 1776, 
after a preambular opening, goes on in these words : ' We hold these tmths to be seif-evident : 
that all men are created equal : that they ore endued by the creator unth certain unaiienable 
rights : that amongst those are life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness.^ 

The Virginian Declaration of Rights is that, it seems, which daims the honour of having 
served as a model to those of the other Provinces ; and in respect of the above leading article, 
at least, to the above-mentioned general Declaration of Independence. See Recherches, &&, 
i. 197. 

Who can help lamenting, that so rational a cause should be rested upon reasons, so much 
fitter to beget objections, than to remove them? 

But with men who are unanimous and hearty about measures, nothing so weak but may 
pass in the character of a reason : nor is this the first instance in the world, where the con- 
clusion has supported the premises, instead of the premisee the conclusion. 



1 



C[Iai[««to Bi{m, ^jifja\L 



BOOKS 



PUBLISHED FOR THE UNIVERSITY BY 



MACMILLAN ANP CO., LONDON; 



ALSO TO BE HAD AT THE 



CLARENBON PRESS J^EPOSITORF, OXFORD. 



» ■•'» 



IiEXICONS, GBAMMAB8, &e. 

{See also Clarendon Press Series pp. 19, 20). 

A Greek-English Iiexicon, by Henry George Liddell, D.D., 
and Robert Scott, D.D. Sixth Edition, Revised and Augmented. 
1870. 4to. clotb, i/. 165. 

A Greek-English Ijezicoii, abridged from the above, chiefly 

for the use of Schools. Sixteenth Edition, Carefully Revised 
throughout. 1874. Square i2mo. cloth, 7s. 6d. 

A copious Greek7Engli8h Vocabulaar, compiled from the 
best authorities. 1850. 24010. bound, 35. 

Graeeae Grammatioae Budimenta in usum Scholarum. Auctore 
Carolo Wordsworth, D.C.L. Eighteenth Edition, 1875. 1 2mo. botind,^. 

A Gree,k Primer, in English, for the use of beginners. By the 
Right Rev. Charles Wordsworth, D.C.li., Bishop of St. Andrews. 
Fourth Edition. Extra fcap. 8vo. eloA, is. 6d. 

A Practical Introduction to Greek Accentuation, by H. W. 

Chandler, M.A. 1862. SvoJ clofb,ios, 6d. 

Etymologicon Magn&um. Ad Codd. MSS. recensuit et notis 
variorum instruxit Thomas Oaisford, S.T.P. 1848. fol. clotb, il. 12s. 

[2] B 



i 



.2 Clarendon Press, Oxford. 



Suidae Iiezioon. Ad Codd. MSS. recensuit Thomas Gaisford, 
S.T.P. Tomi III. 1854. fol. clo&, 2/. 2s. 

Scheller's Ijezicon of the Latin Tongue, with the German ex- 
planations translated into English by J. £. Riddle, M.A. 1835. fol. 
cloib, i/. IS. 

Scriptores Bei Metrieae. Edidit Thomas Gaisford, S.T.P. 
Tomi III. 8vo. dotb^ 15s. 

Sold separately: 
Hephaestion, Terentianus Maurus, Proclus, cum annotationibus, etc. 
Tomi II. i85£. Svo. dotb^ los. 
« Scriptores Latini. 1837. Svo. elotbt 5s. 

The Book of Hebrew Boots, by Abu 'L-Wal!d Marwan ibn 

Jan&h, otherwise called Rabbi Ydn&h. Now first edited, with an 
Appendix, by Ad. Neubauer. Fasc. I. 4to. 215. Fasc. II. 410. 25s. 

The Work complete, 4to. elotbt 2/. *js, 6d. 

A Treatiae on the lue of the Tenses in Hebrew. By S. R. 

Driver, MA. Extra fcap. 870. cloth, 6s, 6d, 

Thesaurus Syriaeos : collegerunt Quatremere, Bernstein, Lors- 
bach, Arnoldi, Field : edidit R. Payne Smith, S.T.P.R. 



/ Fasc. I-III. 18S8-73. sm. fol. each, \l. is. 



Iiexieon Aegyptiaeo-Ijatinum ex veteribus Linguae Aegyp- 
tiacae Monumentis, etc., cum Indice Vocum Latinarum ab H. Tattam, 
A.M. 1835. 8vo. clotb, 15s. 

A Practical Grammar of the Sanskrit Iiangnage, arranged 
with reference to the Classical Languages of Europe, for the nse of 
English Students, by Monier Williams, M.A. Third EdiHon, 1864. 
8yo. cloth, 15s. 

ISfalopdkhydnam. Story of Nala, an Episode of the Mah&- 
Bh&rata : the Sanskrit text, with a copious Vocabulary, Grammatical 
Analysis, and Introdoction, by Monier Williams, M.A. The Metrical 
Translation by the Very Re7. H. H. Mihnan, D.D. i860. 8?o. cloth, 15s. 

A Sanskrit-EnglifOi Dictionary, Etymologically and Philo- 

logically arranged, with special reference to Greek, Latin, German, 
Anglo-Saxon, English, and other cognate Indo-European Languages. 
By Monier Williams, M.A., Boden Professor of Sanskrit. 187a. 4to. 
cloth, 4/. 14s. 6d, 

An Anglo-Saxon Dictionary, by Joseph Bosworth, D.D., Pro- 
fessor of Anglo-Saxon, Oxford. New ediUon, In the Press, 

An Icelandic-English Diotionajry. Based on the MS. col- 
lections of the late Richard Cleasby. Enlarged and completed by 
G. Vigfiisson. With an Introduction, and Life of Richard Cleasby, 
by G. Webbe Daseat, D.C.L. 4to. doth, 3I, 7s. 



Clarendon Press y Oxford. 



A Handbook of the Chinese Language* Parts I and H, 

Grammar and Chrestomathy. By James Summers. 1863. 8vo. lid^ 
boundf l/. 8s. 

Cornish Drama (The Ancient). Edited and translated by £. 
Norris, Esq., with a Sketch of Cornish Grammar, an Ancient Cornish 
Vocabulary, etc. 2 vols. 1859. 8vo. clotb, i/. is. 

The Sketch of Cornish Grammar separately, stitched, as. 6 J. 



GHEEK CLASSICS, &c. 

Aeschylus : quae supersunt in Codice Laurentiano typis descripta. 
Edidit R. Merkel. 186 1. Small folio, clotb, i/. is. 

Aeschylus: Tragoediae et Fragmenta, «x recensione Guil. 
Dindorfii. Second Edition, 1851. 8vo. tloibt 5s. ^ 

Aeschylus: Annotationes Guil. Dindorfii. Partes 11. 1841. 
8vo. cloibt I OS. 

Aeschylus : Scholia Graeca, ex Codicibus aucta et emendata a 
GuiU Dindorfio. 1 851. 8vo. clotb, 5s. 

Sophocles: Tragoediae et Fjagmenta, ex recensione et cum 
commentariis Guil. Dindorfii. Third Sdititn, 2 vols. 1^60. fcap. 8vo. 
clotbt i/. IS. 

Each Play separately, Un^, 2s, 6d, 

The Text aJone, printed on miting paper, iwlh large 
margin, royal i6mo. cloth, 8s. 

The Text alone, square i6mo. clotJb, 3J. 6d, 

Each Play separately, Ump, 6d. 

Sophocles: Tragoediae et Fragmenta cum Annotatt« Quik 
Dindorfii. Tomi II. 1849. 8vo. clotb, los. 

The Text, Vol. I. 5s. 6d, The Notes, Vol.11. 4s. 6d, 

Sophocles : Scholia Graeca : 

Vol. L ed. P. Ehnsley, A.M. 18^5. -Sro. elotb, 4s. 6tf. 
Vol. II. ed. Guil. Dindorfius. 1851. 8vo. eltsth, 4s. M 

Euripides ; Tragoediae et Fragmenta, ex recensie&eOiiil.t>!h^ 

dorfii. Tomi XL 1834. ^^^' ^^<^> i^* 

Euripides: Annotationes Gail. Dindorfii. Paites II. 184a. 
8vo. cloib, 10s. 

Euripides : Scholia Graeca, ex Codicibus aucta et emendata a 
Guil. Dindorfio. Tomi IV. 1863. 8vo. clo/ib, 1/. i6s. 

Euripides : Aloestis,ex recensione Guil. Dindorfii. 1854. 8vo» 
teuted, 2s. 6d, 

B 2 



Clarendon Press y Oxford. 



4J^istophane8 : Comoediae et Fragmenta, ex recensione Guil. 

Dindorfii. Tomi II. 1835. 8vo. cloi^ lis.. 

ArlBtophanes : Annotationes Guil. Dindorfii. Partes II. 1837. 
8yo. clotht I IS. 

AriBtophanes : Scholia Graeca, ex Codicibus au(;ta et emendata 
a Gui.1. Dindorfio. Partes III. 1839. 8vo. c/o/i&, i/. 

Arlatophaneiny Index in: J. Caravellae. 1822. 8yo. eloth^ 3/. 

lletra Aeschyli SpphooUs EuripidiB et Aristophaais. De- 

scripta a Guil. Dindorfio. Accedit Chroaoiogia Sceaica. 184a. 8vo. 
clfUh^ 5s. 

^Jiecdota Graeoa Ozoniensia. Edidit J. A. Cramer, S.T.P. 
JoDcu IV. i834-]^37. 8vo. clothe iK as. 

Anecdota Graeca e Codd. MSS. Bibliothecae Regiae Parisien- 
fis. Edidit J. A. Cramer, S.T.P. Tomi IV. 1 839-1 841. 8vo. eloib, 
i/. as. 

^P0iiU8 dt Iiongini Bhetorica. E Cpdicibus MSS. recensuit 
Job. Bakius. 1849. 8vo. clotb, 3s. 

•^Lristotele^ ; ex recensione Imma^uelis Bekkeri. Accedunt' In- 
dices Sylbargiam. Tomi XI. 1837. 8vo. cloth, a/. los. 

Each volume separately, 5s. 6d. 

ChoeroboBoi Dictata in Theodosii Canones, necnon Epimerismi 
in Psalmos. £ Codjpibus MSS. edidit Thomas Gaisford, S.T.P. Tomi 

III. 184a. Svo. clotbt 15s. 

Demosthenes : ex recensione Guil. Dindorfii. Tomi I. II. III. 

IV. 1846. 8yo. efotb, i/. is. 

Demosthenes : Tomi V. VJ[. VII. Annotationes Interpretum. 
1849. 8vo. clotbt 15s. 

Demosthenes: Tomi VIII. IX. Scholia. 1851. Syo. clotb, los, 

Harpocrationis Iiexioon, ex reqensione G. Dindorfii. Tomi 
II. 1854. 8vo. clotht IDS. 6d, 

HerciiIanflTTBlum Yoluminnm Partes II. 8vo. ciotJb, loj. 

Homerus : Bias, cum brevi Annotatione C. G. Heynii. Acce- 
dunt Scholia minora. Tomi II. 1834. 8.70. clotbf i^s. 

Homerus: Bias, ex rec. Guil. Dindorfii. 1856. 8vo. ciotJb, 5s. 6d, 

Homerus : Scholia Qraeca in Iliadem. Indited by Prof. W. Din- 
dorf, after a new collation of the Venetian MSS. by D. B. Monro, 
M.A., Fellow of Oriel College. Vols. I. II. 8vo. elotk, 24s, 

Homerus : Odyssea, ex rec. Guil. Dindorfii. 8yo. clotJbf 5J. 6d, 



Clarendon Press, Oxford. 



Homerua ': Scholia Oraeca in Odysseam. Edidit Gtdl. Dfndoffiusi 
Tomi II. 1855. 8vo. clothe 15s. 6rf. 

Homerum^ Index in : Seberi. 1780. 8vo. r/o/i6, 6j. 6j/. 

Oratores Attici ex recensione Bekkeri : 

I. Antiphon, Andocides, et Lysias. 182a. 8to. chth, 7*. 
II. Isocrates. 1822. 8vo. eloibt 78. 
III. Isaeus, Aeschiaes, Lycurgas, Dinarchus, etc. 1823. 8vo. Wolfr, 7s. 

Scholia Graeoa in Aeschinem et Isocratem. Edidit G. Dindor- 
fius. 1852. 8vo. clotb^ 4s. 

Paroemiograp!hi Qraeci, quorum pars nunc primum ex Codd. 
MSS. rulgatur. Edidit T. Gaisford, S.T.P. 1836. 8vo. dotb^ 5s. <kf. 

Plato : The Apology, with a revised Text and English Notes, 
and a Digest of Platonic Idioms, by James Riddell, M.A. 1867. 8to. 
clothe 8s. (id. 

Flato : Fhilebus, with a revised Text and English I^otes, by 
Edward Poste, M.A. i860. 8vo. cloibt p* 6d, 

Plato : Sophistes and Pbliti^us, with a revised Text and Eng- 
lish Notes, by L. Campbell, M.A. 1866. 8vo. clotb, i8s. 

Plato : Theaetetus, with a revised Text and English Notes, by 
L.Campbell, M.A. 1 861. 8vo. clotb, gs, 

Plato : The Dialogues, translated into Engli^, with Analyses 
and Introductions, by B. Jowett, M.A., Master of Balliol College and 
Regius Professor of Greek. A ruto Edition in 5 volufnis, medium 
8vo. cloth, 3/. los. 

Plato: Index to. Compiled for the Second Edition of Pro- 
fessor Jowett's Translation of the Dialogues. By Evelyn Abbott, M.A., 
Fellow and Tutor of Balliol College. Demy 8vo. paper covers, 2s, 6d. 

Plato : The Bepublie, with a revised Text and English Notes, 
by B. Jowett, M.A., Master of Balliol College and Regius Professor of 
Greek. Demy 8vo. Preparing, 

Plotinus. Edidit F. Creuzer. Tomi HI. 1835. 4to. i/. Sj. 

Stobaei Florilegium. Ad MSS. fidem emendavit et supplevit 
T. Gaisford, S.T.P. Tomi IV. 8vo. clotb, il, 

Stobaei Eclogarum Physicarum et Ethicarum libri duo. Ac- 
cedit Hieroclis Commentarius in aurea carmina Pytbagoreonim. Ad 
MSS. Codd. recensuit T. Gaisford, ST.P. Tomi II. 8vo. cloth, lis. 

Xenophon : Historia Graeca, ex recensione et cum annotatio- 
nibus L. Dindorfii. Second Edition, iS ^2. 8vo. clotb, lOs. 6d. 

Xenophon : Expeditio Cyri, ex rec. et cum annotatt. L. Din- 
dorfii. Second Edition, 1855. 8vo. clotb, lOs. 6d. 



Clarendon Press, Oxford. 



Xenophon: Institutio Cyri, ex rec. et cum annotatt. L. Din- 

dorfii. 1857. Svo. elotb^ ios.6d. 

Xenophon: Memorabilia. Socratis, ex rec» et cum annotatt. L. 
Dindorfii. 1862. Svo. clotbt 'js.6d, 

Xenophon : Opuscula Politica Equestria et Venatica cum Arri- 
ani Libello de Venatione, ex rec. et cum annotatt. L. DindorfiL 1866. 
8vo. elotb, IDS. 6fL 



THE HOIiT SCItlFTTJBES, &c. 

The Holy Bible in the earliest English Versions, made from the 

Latin Vulgate by John WycliiFe and his followers : edited by the Rev. 
J. Forshall and Sir F. Madden. 4 vols. 185Q. royal 410. ^ehtbt 3/. 3s. 

The Holy Bible: an exact reprint, page for page, of the Author- 
ized Version published in the year 161 1. Demy 4to. half bounds il. is. 

Vetus Testomenttmi Oraece cum Variis Lectionibus. Edi- 
tionem a R. Hohnes, S.T.P. iochoatam coatiauavit J. Parsons, S.T.B. 
Tomi V. 1798-1S27. folio, 7/. 

Vetua TeBtaxnentum ex Versione Septuaginta Interpretum 

secundum exemplar Vaticanizm Romae editum. Accedit potior varietas 
Codicis Alexandrini. Tomi III. Editio Altera. i8mo. clotb, 1 8s. 
Just Published, 

Origenia Hexaplonun quae supersunt ; sive, Veterum Inter- 
pretum Graecorum in totum Vetus Testamentum Fragmenta. Edidit 
Fridericus Field, A.M. 2 vols. 1867-1874. 410. cloth, 5/. 5s. 

Iiibri Fsalmonun Versio antiqua Latina, cum Paraphrasi 
Anglo-Saxonica. Edidit B. Thorpe, F.A.S. 1835. Svo. clotb, los. 6d, 

Xiibrl Fsalmorum Versio antiqua Gallica e Cod. MS. in Bibl. 
Bodleiana adservato, una cum Versione Metrica aliisqne Monvimentis 
pervetustis. Nunc primum descripsit et edidit Franciscus Michel, Phil. 
Doct. i860. Svo. elotb, los. 6d. 

liibri Frophetarum Majorum, cum Lamentationibus Jere- 
miae, in Dialecto Linguae Aegyptiacae Memphitica seu Coptica. Edidit 
cum Versione Latma H. Tattam, S.T.P. Tomi II. 185a. Svo. clotb, 17s. 

Iiibri duodeeinx Frophetanun Minorum in Ling. Aegypt. 
volgo Coptica. Edidit H. Tattam, A.M. 1836. Svo. clotb, Ss. 6d, 

Novum Testamentum Graece. Antiquissimorum Codicum 

Textus in ordine parallelo dispositi. Accedit coUatio Codicis Sinaitici. 
Edidit E. H. Hansell, S.T.B. Tomi III. 1864. Svo. baff moroeco^ 
2/. I2S. 6d, 



Clarendon Press y Oxford. 



Kovum Testamenttim Graeee. Accedunt parallela S. Scrip- 

turae loca, necnon vetus capitulonira notatio et canones Eusebii. Edidit 
Carolui Lloyd, S.T.P.R., necnon Episcopos Ozoniensis. 1873. i8mo. 
' clothe 3«. 

The same on writing paper, with large margin, small 4to. 

elolh^ 105. (id. 

Novum Testamentum Graeee juxta Exemplar Millianum. 
1873. i8mo. clothe 25. 6rf. 

The same on writing paper, with large margin, small 4to. 
elothy 6s. 6d. 

Evangelia Sacra Graeoae. The Text o/MUL 1870. fcap. 8vo. 
limp, 15. td. 

The New Testament in Greek and English, on opposite 

pages, arraneed and edited by E. Cardwell, D.D. a vols. 1 83 7. crown 
8vo. dotb, 05. 

Nov! Testamenti Versio Syriaoa Fhiloxeniana. Edidit Jos. 
White, S.T.P. Tomi IV. 1778-1803. 410. elotb, i/. 85. 

Novum Testamentum Coptice, cura D. Wilkins. 17 16. 4to. 

' clotb, 125. 6</. 

Appendix ad edit. N. T. Gr. e God. MS. Alexandrino a G. G. 
Woide descripti. Subjicitur Codicis Vaticani collatio. 1799. fol. a/, as. 

Evangeliorum Versio Gk)thica, cum Interpr. et Annott. £. 
Benzelii. Edidit, et Gram. Goth, praemisit, E. Lye, A.M. 1759. 410. 
clotb, I2S. 6d, 

Diatessaron ; sive Historia Jesu Ghristi ex ipsis Evangelistarum 
. verbis apte disposttis confecta. Ed. J.White. 1856. lamo. clotb,^s,6d. 

Canon Muratorianus. The earliest Catalogue of the Books of 

the New Testament. Edited with Notes and a Facsimile of the MS. in 
the Ambrosian Library at Milan, by S.P. Tregelles, LL.D. 1868. 4to. 
eloibt I05. 6d. 

The Five Books of Maccabees, in English, with Notes and 
lilastrations by Henry Cotton, D.C.L. 1833. 8vo. clotb, los. 6d. 

The Ormulum, now first edited from the original Manuscript, 
in the Bodleian Library (Anglo-Saxon and EngKsh), by R. M. White, 
D.D. 2 vols. A new Edition in the Press. 

Horae Hebraicae et Talmudicae, a J. Lightfoot. A ne<w 
Edition, by R. Gandell, M.A. 4 vols. 1 859. 8vo. elotb, il. Is. 

FATHERS 07 THIS OHUBOH* ^o. 

Athanasius : The Orations of St. Athanasius against the Arians. 
With an Account of his Life. By William Bright, D.D., Regius Professor 
of Ecclesiastical History, Oxford. Crown 8vo. eloth, 95. 

Catenae Graecorum Patrum in Novum Testamentum. Edidit 
J. A. Cramer, S.T.P. Tomi VIIL 1 838-1 844. 8yo. clotb, tU 45. 



8 Clarendon PresSy Oxford. 



Clementid Ale^candrini Opera, ex recensione Guil. Dindorfii. 
Tomi IV. 1869. 8vo. cloOt, 3/. 

Cyrilll Afchiepiscdpi Alexandrini in XIT Prophetas. Edidit 
P. E. Pusey, A.M. Tomi II. 1868. 8vo. cloib, 2/. 2s. 

Cyrilli Archiepiscopi Alexandrini in D. Joannis Evangelium. 

Accedunt Fragmenta Varia necnon Tractatus ad Tiberium Diaconum 
Duo. Edidit post Aubertnm P. E. Pusey, A.M. Tomi III. 8vo. cloth, 
2/. 5s. 

Cyrilli Archiepiscopi Alexandrini Comihentarii in Lucae Evan- 
gelium quae supersunt Syriace. E MSS. apud Mus. Britan. edidit R. 
Payne Smitli, A.M. 1858. 4t'o. cloth, il. 2s. 

The same) translated by R. Payne Smithy M.A. 2 vols. 1859. 
8v6. clotb, 14s. 

Ephraemi Syri, Rabulae Episcopi Edesscni, Balaei, aliorumque. 
Opera Selecta. E Cqdd. Syriacis MSS. in Museo Britannico et Biblio^ 
theca Bodleiana asservatis primus edidit J. J. Overbeck. 1865. 8yo. 
clotbf i/. IS. 

A Iiatin translatioii of the above, by the same Editor. Pre-- 

paring, 

Eusebii Famphili Evangelicae Praeparationis Libri XV. Ad 
Codd. MSS. recensuit T. Gaisford, S.T.P. Tomi IV. 1843. 8vO. 
cloibt ll, IDS. 

Eusebii Famphili Evangelicae Demonstrationis Libri X. Re^ 
censiiit T. Gaisford, S.T.P. Tomi II. 1852. 8vo. clotb, 15*. 

Eufiebii Famphili contra Hieroclem et M arcellum Libri. Re- 
censuit T. Gaisford, S.T.P. 1852. 8vo. clotb, 7s. 

Eusebiiis' Ecclesiastioal History, according to the text of 
Burton. With an Introduction by William Bright, D.D. Crown 8vo. 
clotb, 85. 6d. 

Eusebii Famphili Hist. Eccl. : Ahnotationes Variorum. 
Tomi II. 1842. 8vo. clotb, 17s. 

ifivagrii Historla Ecclesiastica, ex recensione H. Valesii. 1844. 
8vo. clotb, 4s. 

Irenaeus : The Third Book of St. Irenaeus, Bishop of Lyons, 
against Heresies. With short Notes, and a Glossary. By H. Deane, 
B.D., Fellow of St. John's College, Oxford. Crown 8vo. cloth, 5s. 6d. 

OrigenisFhilosophumena; sive omnium Haeresium Refutatio. 
£ Codice Parisino nunc primum edidit Emmanuel Miller. 1 85 1. 8vo. 
clotb, IDS. 

Fatriim Apostolicorum, S. dementis Romani, S. Ignatii, S. 
Poly carpi, quae supersunt. Edidit Guil. Jacobson, S.T.P.R. Tomi II. 
Fourtb Edition, 1863. 870. clotb, i/. is. 



Clarendon PresSy Oxford. 



Beliquiae Sacrae secundi tertiique saeculi. Recensuit M. J. 
Routh, S.T.P. Tomi V. Second Edition, 1846-1848. Svo. cloth, i/. 5s. 

Scriptorum Ecdesiasticoruni Opuscula. Recensuit M. J. 
Routh, S.T.P. Tomi II. Third JSHttion, 1858. 8vo. cloth, los. 

Socratis Scholastic! Historia Ecclesiastica. Gr. et Lat. Edidit 
R. Hussey, S.T.B. Tomi III. 1853. Svo. cloth, 15s. 

Bozomeni Historia Ecclesiastica. Edidit R. Hussey, S.T.B. 
Tomi III. 1859. 8vo. c/o/i&. Price reduced to i^s, 

Theodoreti Ecclesiasticae Histpriae Libri V. Recensuit T. 
Gaisford^ S.T.P. 1854. 8vo. cloth, 7s. 6d, 

Thepdo7.9ti Graecarum Affectionum Curatio. Ad Codices MSS. 
recensuit T. Gaisford, S.T.P. 1839. 8vo. cloth, 7s. 6d, 

Powling (J. G.) Notitia Scriptorum SS. Patrum alionimque vet. 
Eccles. Mon. quae in CoUectionibus Anecdotorum post annum Christi 
HDcc. in lucem editis continentur. 1839. 8yo. Hoth, 4s. 6d, 

S;CCI^9IASTICAIi HXSTOBY, BIOaBAFHT, &c. 

Baedae Historia Eoclesiastioa. Edited, with English Notes^ 
by G. H. Moberly, M^.A. 1869. crown 8 vo. cloth, los. 6d. 

Bingham's Antiquities of the Christiai^ Chjurch, and other 
Works. ID vols. 1855. 8yo. cloth, 3/. 3s. 

Burnet's History of the Beformation of the Church of Eng- 
land. A new Edition. Carefully revised, and the Records collated 
with the originals, by N. Pocock, M.A. With a Preface by the Editor. 
7 vols. 1865. 8vo. 4/. 4s. 

Burnet's Life of Sir M. Hale, and Fellas Life of Dr. Hammond. 
1856. small 8vo. cloth, as. 6d. 

Cardwell's Two Books of Common Prayer, set forth by 
authority in tiie Reign of King Edward VI, compared with each other. 
Third Edition, 1852. 8vo. cloth, 7s. 

Cardwell's Documentanr A-minig of the Reformed Church of 
England; being a Collection of Injunctions/ Declarations, Orders^ Arti- 
cles of Inquiry, &c. from 1546 to 1 716. a vols. 1 843. 8vo. cloth, iSs. 

Cardwell's History of Conferences on the Book of Common 
Prayer from 1551 to 1690. TTtird Edition, 1^49. 8?o. cloth, 75. 6d, 

Card^rell's Synodalia. A .Collection of Articles of Religion, 
Canons, and Proceedings of Convocations in the Province of Canterbury, 
from 1547 to 1717. a vols. 184a. 8vo. cloth, 19s. 

Councils and IBcolesiastical Document^ relating tp Great 

Britain and Ireland. Edited, after Spelman and Wilkiiis, by A. W. 
Haddan, B.D., and William Stubbs, M.Am Regius Professor of Modem: 
History, Oxford. Vols. I. and III. Medium Svo. cloth, each i/, is. 

Vol. II. Part I. Medium 8vo. cloth, los. 6d, 

B 3 



10 Clarendon Press, Oxford. 



S*onnularieB t>f Faith set forth by the King's Authority during 
the Reign of Henry VIII. 1856. 8vo. clotbt 7s. 

Fuller's Churoh Htstory of Britain. Edited t;^ J. S. Brewer^ 

M.A. 6 vols. 1845. 8vo. elotb, i/. 195. 

Gibson's Synodus Anglicana. Edited by E. Cardwell, D.D^ 
1854. 8vo. clotb^ 65. 

HuBsey's Bise of the Papal FoWer traced in three Lectured 
Second Edition^ 1863. fcap. 8vo. clotb,4s.6d. 

inett's Origines Anglicanae (in continuation 0( Stillingfleet); 
Edited by J. Griffiths, M.A. 3 vols. 1855. 8vo. clotbf 15s. 

John, Bishop of Ephesus. The Third Part of his Ecclesias- 

tical History. [In Syriac] Now first edited by Williain Curetoii, 
M.A. 1853. 4to. clotbf il. 135. 

The same, translated by R. Payne Smithy M.A. i860. Sioi 
elotb, IDS. 

Knight's Life of Dean Colet. 1823. 8vo. cloth, 7/. 6d, 

lie Neve's Fasti Ecclesiae Anglicaiiae; Corrected and continued 
from 1715 /O 1853 by T. Duffus Hardy. 3 vols. 1854. 8vo. elotby 
il. Is. 

Noelli (A.) Catechismus sive prima institutio disciplinaque 
Pietatis Christianae Latine explicata. Editio nova cura Gtil. Jacobson, 
A.M. 1844. 8vo. c/o/ib, 5s. 6d, 

Frideaux's Connection of Sacred and Profane History. 2 vols. 
1 85 1. 8vo. clotby 105. 

Primers put fdrth in the Reign of Henry VIlI. 1848. 8vo; 
clotb, 55. 

Becords of the lEteformation. The Divorce, 1527 — 1533^ 
Mostly now for the first time printed from MSS. in the British Museum 
and other Libraries. Collected and arranged by N. Pocock, M.A. 
2 vols. 8vo. clotb, il, 165. 

Beformatio Iiegum Ecclesiasticarum. The Reformation of 
Ecclesiastical Laws, as attempted in the reigns of Henty VIII, Edward 
VI, and Elizabeth. Edited by E. Cardwell, D.D. 1850. 8vo. c/o/ib, 
6«. 6d. 

Shirley's ("W. Wi) Some Account of the Chtirch in the Apostolic 
Age. Second Edition^ 1874. fcap. 8vo. clotby 35. 6d. 

Shuckfbrd's Sacred and Profane History connected (in con- 
tinuation of Prid^aux). 2 vols. 1848. 8vo. cloibt 1 05. 

Stillingflec^t's Origines Britannicae, with Lloyd's Historical 
Account of Church Government. Edited by T. P. Pantin, M«A. 2 vols. 
1842. 8vo. clotb, 10s. 

Stubbs's (W.) Begistrum Sacrum Anglicanum. An attempt 
to exhibit the course of Episcopal Succession in England. 1858. small 
4to. clotb, 85. 6d, 



Clarendon Press, Oxford. ii 



Stryi^e's Works Complete, with a General Index. 27 vols» 
1821-1843. 8vo. doib^ 'jl, 15s. 6d. Sold separately as follows: — 

Memorials of Cranmer. 2 vols. 1840. 8vo. cloth, iix. 

Life of Parker. 3 vols. 1828. 8vo. cloth, i6j. 6d, 

Life of Grindal. 182 1. 8vo. cloth, sj, 6 J, 

Life of Whitgift. 3 vols. 1822. 8vo. cloth, i6j, 6d. 

Life of Aylmer. 1820. 8vo. cloth, $s, 6d, 

Life of Cheke. 1821. 8vo. cloth, 5/. 6d, 

Life of Smith. 1820. 8vo. cloth, 5J. 6d, 

Ecclesiastical Memorials. 6 vols. 1822. 8vo. cloth, i/. 13J. 

Annals of the Reformation. 7 vols. 8vo. cloth, 2/. 3J. 6d* 

General Index. 2 vols. 1828. 8vo. cloth, lu. 

SyUoge Conf^BSionmn sub tempus Reformandae Ecclesiae edi-' 

tarum. Subjiciuntur Catechismus Heidelbergensis et Canoaes Synod! 
Dordrechtanae. 1827. 8to. cloibt 8s. 

ENGIiISH THEOLOGY. 

Beveridge's Discourse upon the XXXIX Articles. Ihe third 
complete Edition^ 1847. ^^^' clotb^ 8s. 

Bilson on the Perpetual Government of Christ's Church, with a 
Biographical Notice by R.Eden, M.A. 1842. 8vo. doA, 4s. 

Bisooe's Boyle Lectures on the Acts of the Apostles. 1.840. 8vo. 
eloAt 9s. 6d. 

BiiU'B Works, with Nelson's Lif^. By E. Burton, D.D. A 
new Edition^ 1846. 8 vok. 870. clotb^ 2/. 9s. 

Burnet's Exposition of the XXXIX Articles. 8vo. cloftb, is. 

Burton's (Edward) Testimonies of the Ante-Nicene Fathers to 
the Divinity of Christ. Second Edition^ 1829. Svo. clotb^ is, 

Bttrton's (Edward) Testimonies of the Ante-Nicene Fathers to 
the Doctrine of the Trinity and of the Divinity of the Holy (%ost. 
1 831. 8vo. elotb, 5s. 6d, 

Butler's Works, with an Index to the Analogy. 2 vols. 1874. 
8vo. clotb, IIS. 

Butler's Sermons. 8vo. cloth, ss. &d, 

Butler's Analogy of Beligion. 8vo. cloth, 5j. 6^. 

Chandler's Critical History of the Life of David. 1S53. 8Vo. 
clotb^ 8s. 6d. 

Chillingworth's Works. 3 vols. 1858. 8vo. cloth, i/. is,6d. 

Clergyman's Iiurtructor. Sixth Editio», 1855. 8vo. cloth, 6j,6d. 

Comber's Companion to the Temple ; or a Help to Devotion in 

the use of the Common Prayer. 7 vols. 1 841. 8vo. clotbi il. lis. 6</. 

Cranmer's Works. Collected and arranged by H. Jenkyns^ 
M.A., Fellow of Oriel College. 4 vols. 1834. 8vo. dotht i/. loc. 



12 Clarendon Press ^ Oxford. 



Snohiridion Theologioiiiii Anti-Romanum. 

VoL I. Jeremy Taylor's Dissuasive from Popery, and Treatise on 
the Real Presoice. 1853. 8to. tHoib, 85. 

Vol. II. Barrow on the Supremacy of the Pope, with his Discourse 
on the Unity of the Church. 185 a. 8vo. «/o/&, ys. 6</. 

Vol. III. Tracts selected from Wake, Patrick, 3tilling^eet, Clagett, 
and others. 1837. 8vo. c/o£i&, lis. 

[Fell's] Paraphrase and Annotations on the Epistles of St. Paul. 
185a. 8yo. c/o<&, 7s. 

Gveswell's Harmonia Evangelioa. Fifth Edition, 1856. 8vo. 
ehtbt 95. 6d. 

Greswell's Frolegomena ad Harmoniam Evangelicam. 1840. 
8vo. elotb, ga, 6d. 

Greswell's Dissertations on the Principles and Arrangement 
of a Harmony of the Gospels. 5 vols. 1837. 8vo. clotb, 5/. 3s. 

Hall's (Bp.) Works, j4 ne<w Edition, by Philip Wynter, D.D. 
10 Yols. 1863. 8yo. elotbt 3/. 3s. 

Hammond's Paraphrase and Annotations on the New Testa- 
ment. 4 vols. 1845. 8vo. elotbt i/. 

Hammond's Paraphrase on the Book of Psalms. 2 vols. 1650. 
8vo. clotb 1 1 OS. 

Henrtley's Collection of Creeds. 1858. 8vo. clotb, 6s, 6d. 

Homilies appointed to be read in Churches. Edited by J. 
Griffiths, M.A. 1859. 8vo. clotb, *js,td. 

Hooker's Works, \dth his Life by W^ton, arranged by John 
Keble, M.A. Sixth Edition^ 1^74* 3 ▼ols. 8vo. clotbt i/. I is. 61/. 

HpQker's Works; the text as arranged by John Keble, M.A. 

2 YOls. 8V0. clod9, IIS. 

Hooper's (Bp. Qeorge) Works. 2 vok. 1855. 8yo. cloth, 8j. 

Jackson's (Dr. Thomas) Works. 12 vols. 1844. 8vo. cloth, 
•3/. 6«. 

Jewel's Works. Edited by R. W. Jelf, D.D. 8 vols. 1847. 

870. elotb^ iL IDS. 
* 

Patrick's TheologpLoal Works. 9 vols. 1859. 8vo. clofh, i/. is. 

Pearson's Exposition of the Creed. Revised and corrected by 
E. Burton, D.D. Sixth Edition, 1870. 8vo. cloAt los, 6d. 

Pearson's Minor Theological Works. Now first collected, with 
a Memoir of the Author, Notes, and Index, by Edward Churton, M.A. 
2 vols. 1844. 8vo. clotb, los. 

£fanderson'9 Workf . Edited by W. Jacobson, D.D. 6 vols. 
1854. 8vo. clotb, i/. los. 



Clarendon Press, Oxford. 13 



South's Sermons, t vols. 184^. 8vo. cloth, i/. loj. 

Staxihope's Paraphrase and Comment upon the Epistles and 
Gospels. A new EdUion. 2 vols. 1 85 1. 8vo. eloth, los. 

Stillingfleet's Origines Saorae. 2 vols. 1837. 8vo. cloth, pj. 

8tillingfleet*s Rational Account of the Grounds of Protestant 
Religion; being a vindication of Abp. Laud's Relatio^ of a Conference, 
&c. a vols. 1844. 8vo. clotb, los. 

Wall's History of Infant Baptism, with Gale's Reflections, and 
Wall's Defence. A new EdUion, by Henry Cotton^ D.C.L. i vols. 
1862. 8vo. elotb, i/. IS. 

Waterland's Works, with Life, by Bp. Van M ildert. ji new 
Edition, with copious Indexes. 6 vols. 1857. 8vo. elotb, it, lis. 

Waterland's Review of the Doctrine of the Eucharist, with a 
Preface by the present Bishop of London. 1868. crown 9v0. eltUb, 
6s. 6^. 

Wheatly's Illustration of the Book of Common Prayer. A 
new Edition, 1846. 8vo. cloth, 5s. 

Wyclif. A Catalogue of the Original Woris of John Wyclif, by 
W. W. Shirley, D.D. 1865. 8vo. cloth, 3*. 6rf. 

Wyclit Select English Works. By T. Arnold, M .A. 3 vols. 
1 8 71. 8vo. cloth, 2/. 25. 

Wycli£ Trialogus. With the Supplement now first edited. By 
Gotthardus Lechler. 1869. 8vo. doA, 145. 

ENGLISH HISTOBICAI. AND DOCTJMENTAItY 

WOBKB. 

Two of the Saxon Chronicles parallel, with Supplementary 
Extracts from the Others. Edited, with Introduction, Notes, and a 
Glossarial Index, by J. Earle, M.A. 1865. 8vo. doth, i6s. 

Magna Carta, a careful Reprint. Edited by W. Stubbs, M.A*^ 
Regius Professor of Modern History. 1868. 4to. stitched, is, 

% 

Britton, a Treatise upon the Common Law of England, com- 
posed by order of King Edward I. The French Text carefully revised, 
with an English Translation, Introduction, and Notes, by F. M. Nichols, 
M.A. 2 vols. 1865. rojral 8vo. doth, i/. i6s. 

Burnet's History of His Own Time, with the suppressed Pas- 
sages and Notes. 6 vols. 1833. 8vo. doth, 2/. los. 

Bumet*s History of James II, with additional Notes. 1852. 
8vo. cloth, 9s. od. 

Carte's Life of James Duke of Ormond. A new Edition, care- 
fully compared with the original MSS. 6 vols. 1 851. 8vo. cloth, l/. 5<. 

Casauboni Ephemerides, cum praefatione et notis J. Russell, 
S.TP. Tomi II. 1850. 8vo. doih, 15s. 



14. Clarendon Press, Oxford. 



Clarendon's (Edw. Earl of) History of the Rebellion and Civil 
Wars in England. To which are subjoined the Notes of Bishop War- 
burton. 7 vols. 1849. ™^iain 8to. clothe 2/. los. 

Clarendon's (Edw. Earl of) History of the Rebellion and Civil 
Wars in England. 7 vols. 1839. iSmo. tf/o£&, i/. is. 

Clarendon's (Edw» Earl of) History of the Rebellion and Civil 
Wars in Eneland. Also His Life, written by Himself, in which is in- 
cluded a Continuation of his History of the Grand Rebellion. With 
copious Indexes. In one volume, royal 8vo. 1842. c/o/ib, li. 2s. 

Clarendon's (Edw. Earl of) Life^ including a Continuation of 

hb History. 2 vols. 185 7. medium 8vo. clothy i/. 2s. 

Clarendon's (Edw. Earl of) Life, and Continuation of his His- 
tory. 3 vols. 1827. 8vo. dothy i6s. 6</. 

Calendar of the Clarendon State Papers, preserved in the 

Bodleian Library. 

Vol. I. From 1523 to January 1649. ^^T^- 8vo. eloib, i8«. 

Vol. n. From the death of Charles I, 1649, ^^ ^* ^°^ ^ ^^ y^** 

1654. 1869. 8vo. dothy 165. 
Vol. III. -J ynsi ready^ 

Freeman's (E. A.) History of the Norman Conquest of England : 
its Causes and Results. Vols. I. and II. ^Arom/ £</iWojf, with Index. 
8vo. dotb, \l. 1 6s. 

Vol. III. The Reign of Harold and the Interregnum. Suond 
Edition, with Index. 8vo. doHht ll. is. 

Vol. IV. The Rdgn of William. 8vo. dotb, ll. is. 

Vol. V. The Effects of the Norman Conquest. Jusi ready, 

Kennett's Parochial Antiquities. 2 vols. 1818. 4to. clotJb^ iL 
laloyd's Prices of Cwm in Oxford, 1 583-1 830. 8vo. je<wedy ij» 

Iiuttrell's (Narcissus) Diary. A Brief Historical Relation of 
State Affairs, 1678-1714. vols. 1857. 8vo. dotb, ll, 4s. 

May's History of the Long Parliament. 1854. 8vo. thtJb, 6s. 6d. 

Bogers's History of Agriculture and Prices in England, a.d. 
1 259-1400. 2 vols. 1866. 8vo. dotb, 2/. 2s. 

Sprigg's England's Recovery ; being the History of the Army 
under Sir Thomas Fairfax. A new edition. 1854. ^^^' clotb, 6s. 

Whitelock's Memorials of English Affairs from 1625 to 1660. 
4 vols. 1853. 8vo. dotb, ll. los. 

Protests of the IiOi*ds» including those which have been 

expunged, from 1624 to 1874; with Historical Introductions. Edited 
hy James £. Thorold Rogers, M.A. 3 vols. 8vo. dotb, 2/. 2s. 

XSnaetxnents in Parliament, specially concerning the Universi- 
ties of Oxford and Cambridge. Collected and arranged by J. Griffiths, 
M.A. 1869. 8vo. dotb 12s. 



Clarendon Press, Oxford. 15 



Ordinances and Statutes [for Colleges and Halls] framed or 
approved by the Oxford University Commissioners. 18(^3. 8vo. cloth ^ 

12S. 

Sold separately (except for Exeter, All Souls, Efraseno^e, Corpus, and 
Magdalen Hall) at is. each. 

Statuta Universitatis Oxoniensis. 1875. 8vo. clotJb, 5s, 

The Student's Handbook to the XTniversity and CoUegeEf 

of Oxford. TTfird Edition. Extra fcap. 8vo. clotk, 2s, 6d. 

Index to Wills proved in the Court of the Chancellor of the 
University of Oxford, &c. Compiled by J. GriiEths, M.A. 1862. 
royal 8vo. dotb, 35. 6d, 

Catalogue of Oxford Graduatec^ from 1659 tp 1850. 1851. 
8vo. clotbf 7«. 6d, 

OHBONOIiOGY, q^EOaBAFHY, &c. 

Clinton's Fasti Hellenici. The Civil and Literary Chronology 
of Greece, from the LVIth to the CXXIIIrd Olympiad. Tlfird edition, 
1 841. 4to. cloth, l/. 145. 6d, 

Clinton'i^ Fasti Hellenici. The Civil and Literary Chronology 
of Greece, from the CXXIVth Olympiad to the Death of Augustus. 
Second edition, 1 851. 4to. cloth, i/. 12s. 

Clinton's Epitome of the Fasti Hellenici. 1851. 8vp. cloth^ 
6s. 6d. 

plinton'ef Fasti Bqmani. The Civil an4 Literary Chronology 
of Rome and Constantinople, from the Death of Augustus to the Death 
of Heraclius. 2 vols. 1 845, 1850. 4to. cloth, 3/. 9s. 

Clinton's Epitome of the Fasti Romani. 1854* 8vp. cloth, yj. 

Cramer's Geographical and Historical Description of Asia 
Minor. 2 vols. 1832. 8vo. cloth, lis. 

Pramer's Map of Asia Minor, 15J. 

Cramer's Map of Ancient and Modern Italy, on two sheets, i$s, 

Cramer's Description of Ancient Greece. 3 vols. 1828. 8vo. 
ctoih, 1 6s. 6<f. 

Cramer's Map of Ancient and Modem Greece, on two sheets, 15J, 

Greswell's Fasti Temporis Catholici. 4 vols. 1852. 8yo. cloth ^ 
2/. lOS. • • 

Greswell's Tables to Fasti, 4 to., and Introduction to Tables, 

8vo. cloth, 155. 

Greswell's Origines Kalendarise Italics. 4 vols. 8vo. cloth, 

2/. 25. 

Greswell's Origines Kalendarise Hellenicie. 6 vols. 1863. 
8vo. cloth, 4/. 4s. 



1 6 Clarendon Press, Oxford. 



PfilLOSOFHICAL WOBES, ACTD GENEKAIi 

IjITERATUKB. 

The Iiogio of Heg:el; translated from the Encyclopaedia of 
the Philosophical Sciences. With Prolegomenk. By William Wallace, 
M.A. 8vo. cloth, 14*. 

Bacon's Novum Organum, edited, with English notes, by G. W. 
kitchin, M.A. 1855. 8to. elo(b, 9s. 6(/. 

Bacon's Novum Organum, translated by O. W. Kitchin, M.A. 
1855. 8vo. cloth, 9s. 6(/. 

The Works of Gteorge Berkeley, DJ)., formerly Bishop of 
Cloyne ; including many of his writings hitherto unpublished. With 
Prefaces, Annotations, and an Account of his Lif)e and Philosophy, 
by Alexander Campbell Fraser, M.A. 4 vols. 1871. 8to. cloth 
il, 1 8s. 

The Iiife« Iietters, &c. i vol. elo(by 165. See also p. 23. 

Smith's "Wealth of IN'ations. A new Edition, with Notes, 
by J. E.Thorold Rogers, M.A. 2 vols. 1870. cloth, iis. 

A Course of Iiectnres on Art, delivered before the University 
of Oxford in Hilary Tferin, 1870. By John Ruskin, M.A., Slade 
Professor of Fine Art. 8vo. cloth, 6s, 

A Critical Account of tile Drawings by Michel Angelo 

and Raffaello in the University Galleries, Oxford. By J. C. Robinson, 
F.S.A. Crown 8vo. cloth, 4s. 

MAfFHEMATICS, I^HYSICAIi SCIENCE, &c. 

Archimedis quae supersunt omnia cum Eutocii commentariis 
ex recensione Josephi Torelli, cum nova versione Latin&. 1 792. folio. 
cloth, I/. 5^* 

Bradley's Miscellaneous Works and Correspondence. With an 
Account of Harriot's Astronomical Papers. 1832. 410. doth, ijs. 

Reduction of Bradley's Observations by Dr. Busch. 1858. 4t6. 
cloth, 3s. 

Treatise on Infliiitesimal Calculus. By Bartholomew Price, 
M.A., F JI.S., Professor of Natural Philosophy, Oxford. 

Vol. I. Differential Calculus. Second Edition, 1 858. 8vo. cloth, 
145. 6d. 

Vol. II. Integral Calculus, Calculus of Variations, and Differential 

Equations. Second Edition, 1865. 8vo. cloA, iSs: 
Vol. III. Statics, including Attractions ; Dynamics of a Material 

Particle. Second Edition, 1868. 8vo. do A, i6s. 
Vol. IV. Dynamics of Material Systems ; together with a Chapter on 

Theoretical Dynamics, by W. F. Donkin, M.A., F.R.S. 1 86a. 

8vo. cloth, 16s. 



Clarendon Press, Oxford. i7 



Bigaud's Correspondence of Scientific Men of the 17th Century, 
with Index by A. de Morgan. 2 ▼ols. 1841-1862. 8vo. cloib^ i8s. td, 

Daubeny'a Introduction to the Atomic Theory. Second Edithfif 
greatly enlarged. 1850. i6mo. eloib, 6$, 

Vesuvius. By John Phillips, M.A., F.R.S., Professor of 
Geology, Oxford. 1869. Crown 8vo. clotb, ids. 6d. 

Geology of OzfoM and the Valley of the Thames. By the same 
Author. 8vo. elotb, 2 is. 

Synopsis of the Pathological Series in the Oxford Museum. 
By H. W. Adand, M.D., F.R.S., Regius P^ofessdr of Mediciiie, Oxford. 
1867. 8vo. cloth, as. 6d, 

Thesaurus Entomologieus Hopeianus, or a Description, of 
the rarest Insects in the Collection given to the University by the 
Rev. William Hope. By J. O. Westwood, M.A., Hope Professor of 
Zoology. With 40 Plates, mostly colbured. Small folio, half morocco, 
*ll. I OS. 

T^zt^Book of Botany, Morphological and Physiological. By 
Dr. Julius Sachs, Professor of Botaiiy in the University of Wurzburg. 
Translated by A. W. Bennett, M.A. Royal 8vo. hcdf morocco, 
ll,lis,6d, 

BIBLIOGtBAPHY. 

Ebert^s Bibliographical Dictionary, translated from the German. 
4 vols. 1837. ^^^' clotb, i/. los. 

Cotton's List of Editions of the Bible in English. Second Edition^ 
corrected and enlarged. 185a. 8vo. clotb, 8s. 6d. 

Cottbn'ft Typographical Gazetteer. 1831. 8v6. cloib, laj. 6d. 

Cotton's Typographical Gazetteer, Second Series. 1866. 8vo, 
elotb, I as. 6</. 

Cotton'^ Rheines ahd Doway. An attempt to shew what has 
been done by Roman Catholics for the diffusion of the Holy Scriptures 
in English. 1855. 8vo. cUUb, 9s. 

BODUBIAK IiXBBABT CATALOaUES, &o. 

Gatalogus Codd. MSS. Orientaliimi Bibliothecae Bodleianae : 

Pars I, a J. Uri. 1788. fol. 10s. 
Partis n Vol. I, ab A. Nicoll, A.M. i8ai. fol. los. 
Partis II Vol. II, Arabicos complectenS, ab E. B. I^usey, S.T.B. 1835. 
fol. I/. 

Gatalogus MSS. qui ab E; D. Clarke comparati in Bibl. Bodl. 
adservantur : 
Pars prior. Inseruntur Scholia inedita in Platonem et in Carmina 

Gregorii Naz. 18 k a. 4to. 5s. 
Pars posterior, Orientales complecteiis, ab A. Nitoll, A.M. 18 1 4. 
4to. as. 6d» 



1 



1 8 Clarendon Press ^ Oxford. 



Catalogus Codd. MSS. et Impressorum cum notis MSS. olim 
D'Onriliianorum, qui in Bibl. Bodl. adservantur. 1806. 4to. 25. (id. 

Catalogus MSS. Borealium praecipue Islandicae Originis, a Finno 

Magno Islando. 1833. 4to. 4s. 

Catalogus Codd. MSS. Bibliothecae Bodleianae : — 

Pars I. Codices Qraeci, ab H. O. Coxe, A.M. 1853. 4to. i/. 
Partis II. F%^. I. Codipes Laudiani, ab H. O. Cox«, A.M. 1858. 

4to. i/. 
Pars III. Codices Gba^eci ^t Latiai Canonicianl, ab H. O. Coze, A.M. 

1854. 4^^ i^' 
Pars IV. Codices T. Tanneri, ab A. Hackman, A.M. i860. 4to. 12s. 
Pars V. Codicum R. Rawlioson classes dnae priores, a Guil. D. 

Macray, A.M. 1862. 410. 12s. 
Pars VI. Codices Syriaci, a R. P. Smith, A.M. 1864. 410. i/. 
Pars VII. Codices Aethiopici, ab A. Dillmann, Ph. Doct. 1848. 4to. 

6s. 6</. 
Pars VIII. Codices Sanscritid, a Th. Aafrecht, A.M. 1859-1864. 

4to. ' il. los. 

Catalogo di Codici MSS. Canoniciani Italic!, coinpil9;to dal Coute 
A. Mortara. 1864. 4to. los. 6 J. 

Catalogus Librorum Impressorum Bibliothecae Bodleianae. 
Tomi IV. 1843 to 1850. fol. 4/. 

Catalogus Dissertationum Academicarum quibus nuper aucta est 
Bibliotheca Bodleiana. 1834. fol. 7s. 

Catalogue of Books bequeathed to the Bodleian Library by 
R. Gongh, Esq. 1814. 4to. 15s. 

Catalogue of Early English Poetry and other Wor|:s illustrating 
the British Drama, collected by Edmond Malone, Esq. 1835. fol. 4s. 

Catalogue of the Printed Books and Manuscripts bequeathed to 
the Bodleian Library by Francis Douce, Esq. 1 840. fol. 15s. 

Catalogue of a Collection of Early Newspfipers and Essayists pre- 
sented to the Bodleian Library by the lat^ ReF. F. W. Hope. 1865. 
8vo. *is, 6d. 



Catalogue of the Manuscripts bequeathed to the University of 
Oxford by Elias Ashmole. By W. H. Black. 1845. 4to. i/. los. 

Index to the abpve, by W. D. Macray, M.A. 1867. 4to. 

IDS. 

Catalogus Codd, MSS. qui in CoUegiis Aulisque Oxpniensibus 
hodie adseryantur. Confecit H. O. Coze, A.M. Tomi II. 1852. 4to. 

21. 

Catalogus Codd. MSS. in Bibl. Aed. Christi ap. Oxou. Curavit 
G. W. Kitphiu, A.M. 1867. 4X9, 6s. 6rf. 



Clarendon Press, Oxford. 19 



Clarmltroir Hr^ss %ttm. 




The Delegates of the Clarencton Press having undertaken 
the publication of a series of works, chiefly educational, and 
entitled the ClHrenbcir ^rtss Strips, have published, or have 
in preparation, the following. 

Those to which prices are attached are already published ; the others are in 

preparation, 

I. XiATIN ; GtBAMMAK CLASSICS, &o. 

An !EileineQ,tary Iiatin Qrammar. By John B. Allen, M.A., 
Head Master of Perse Grammar School, Cambridge. Extra fcap. 8vo. 
cloth, 25. dd, 

A First Latin Exercise Book. By the same Author. Extra 
fcap. 8vo. cloth, 2s. 6d. 

A Series of Qraduated. Latiiji Headers. 

First Latin Header. By T. J. Nunns, M.A. Second Edition, 
Extra fcap. 8vo. cloth, 2s. 

Second Latin Beader^ 

Third Latin Beader, or Specimens of Latin Literature. 
Part I, Poetry. By James McCall Marshall, M.A., Dulwich College. 

Fourth Latin Beader. 

Cicero. Selection of interesting and descriptive passages. With 
Notes. By Henry Walford, M.A., Wadham College, Oxford, Assistant 
Master at Haileybury College. In three Parts. Second Edition, Extra, 
fcap. 8vo. clotb, 4s. 6(f. 

Each Part se^rately, limp, is. 6d. 

Part I. Anecdotes from Grecian and Ro^an Histoipy* 
Part II. Omens and Preams : Beauties of Nature. 
Part III. Rome's Rule of her Provinces. 

Cic^o. Selected Letters (for Schools). With Notes. By the 
late C. £. Prichard, M.A., formerly Fellow of Balliol College, Oxford, 
and £, R.. Bernard, M.A., Fello,w of Magdalen College, Qa^Pird. Extra 
fcap. 8vo. clotk* 3s.. 

Pliny. Selected Letters (for Schods). With Notes. By 
the same Editois. Extra fcap. 8vo. elotb* 3s. 



n 



fto Clarendon Pi^ess, Oxford. 



Caesar. The Commentaries (for Schools). Part I. The Gallic 
War. With Notes and Maps. By Charles E. Moberly, M.A. Second 
Edition, Extra fbap. 8vo. cloth, 4s. td. 

Part II. The Civil War, Book I. By the same Editor. 
Extra fcap. Svo. clotbf as. 

Ck>rneliuB STepos. With Notes. By Oscar Browning, M.A., 
Fellow of King's College, Cambridge, and Assistant Master at Eton 
College. Extra fcap; Svo. dotb, 2s. 6d. 

JAvy. Selections (for Schools)* With Notes and Maps. By 
H. Lee-Warner, M.A., Assistant Master in llugby School. Extra fcap. 
Svo. In Parts, limp, each is. 6d. 

Part I. The Caudine Disaster* 

Part II. Hannibal's Campaign in Italy. 

Part III. The Macedonian War. 

Iiivy, Books I-X. By J. R. Seeley, M.A., Regius Professor 
of Modem History, Cambridge. Book L Second Edition, Svo. 
elotb, 6s. 

Also a small edition for Schools. 

Tacdtos. The Annals. Books I-VI. With Essays and Notes. 
By T. F. Dallin, M.A., Tutor of Queen's College, Oxford. Preparing. 

Passages for Translation into Iiatdn. For the use of Pass- 
men and others. Selected by J. Y. Sargent, M.A., Fellow and Tutor of 
Magdalen College, Oxford. Thitd Edition, Ekt. fbap. Svo. eloO), as. 6d. 

Cicero's Philippic Orations. With Notes. ByJ,R.King,M.A., 
formerly Fellow and Tutor of Merton College, Oxford. Demy Svo. 
clotb, los. 6d. 

Cieeto. Select Iietters. With English Introductions, Notes, 
and Appendices. By Albert Watson, M.A., Fellow and formerly Tutor 
of Brasenose College, Oxford. Second Edition. Demy Svo. clotb, iSs. 

Cicero. Select Letters. T^xtk By the same Editor. Extra 
fcap. Svo. cloth, 4s. 

Cicero pro Cluentio. With Introduction and Notes. By W. 
Ramsay, M.A. Edited by G. G. Ramsay, M.A., Professor of Humanity, 
Glasgow. Extra fcap. Svo. clotb, 3s. 6d. 

Cicero de Oratore. With Introduction and Notes. By 
A. S. Wilkins, M.A., Professor of Latin, Qwens College, Manchester. 

Catulli Veronensis Iiiber. Recognovit^ apparatum criticum 
prolegomena appendices addidit, Robinson Ellis, A.M. 1S67. Svo. 
clotb, 1 6s. 

CAtulli Veronensis Carmina Selecta, secundum recogni- 
tionem Robinson Ellif, A.M. Extra fcap. Svo. clotb, 3s. 6d, 



Clarendon Press ^ Oxford. 2j 



Horace. With a Commentary. Volume I. The Odes, Carmen 
Seculare, and Epodes. By Edward C. Wickham, M.A., Head Master 
of Wellington College. 8vo. c/o/A, I as. 

Also a small edUtonfor Schools, 

Ovid. Selections for the use of Schools. With IntrQdi|ctions 
and Notes, and an Appendix on the Roman Calendar. By W. Ramsay, 
M.A. Edited by G. O. Ram$ay, M.A,» Professor of Humanity, Glas- 
gow. Second Edition, Ext. Ccap. 8vo. cloikt S^* ^* 

Fersius. The Satives. With a Translation and Commentary. 
By John Conington, M.A., late Corpus Professor of Latin in the Unir^r* 
sity of Oxford. Edited by Henry Nettleship, M.A. 8vo. clotty *js. 6d, 

Vergil: Suggestions Introductory to a Study of the Aeneid. 
By H. Nettleship, M.A. Svo. sewed, is. 6d. 

Selections |^om the less known Latin Poets. By North 
Pinder, M.A., formerly Fellow of Trinity College, Oxford. Demy 8vp. 
clotbt 15s. 

Fragments and Specimens of Early Xiatin. With Intro- 
ductions and Notes. By John Wordsworth, M.A., Tutor of Brasenose 
College, Oxford. Demy Svo. clotb, 185. 

A Manual of Comparative Philology. By T, L. Papillon, 
M.A., Fellow of New College. Crown Svo. cloth^ 6s. Just Puhlisfted, 

The Ancient Languages of Italy. By Theodore Aufrecht, 

Phil. Doct. Preparing. 

The Boman Poets pf the Augim]tan Age, By William 
Young Sellar, M.A., Professor of Humanity in the University of 
Edinburgh. Preparing. 

T^e Boman Poets of tbe Republic. By the same Editor^ 

Preparing, 

II. aKBEE; QRAMMAKS, CLASSICS, &o. < 

A Q^reek Primer in English for the use of beginners, 
By the Right Rev. Charles Wordsworth, D.C.L., Bishop of St. Andrews. 
Fourth Edition, Extra fcap. Svo. clotb^ is. 6d, 

Qraecae Grammaticae B^idimenta in usmn Scholarum. Auctore 
Carolo Wordsworth, D.C.L. Eighteenth Edition, 1S75. 1 2mo. bound,4M. 

A Q-reek'Sngiisb Iiezicon, abridged from Liddell and Scott's 
4to. edition, chiefly for the use of Schools. Sixteenth Edition, Carefully 
Revised throughout, 1S74. Square i2mo. cloth, *js.6d, 

Qreek Verbs, Irregular ai^d Defective; their forms, mean- 
iagt and quantity; embracing all the Tenses used by Greek writers, 
with reference to the passages in which they are found. By W. Veitch. 
New Edition. Crown Svo. cloth, los. 6d, 

The Mementfi of Greek Accentuation (for Schools): abridged 

from his larger work by H. W. Chandler, M.A., WaynRete Professor of 
Moral and Metaphysical Philosophy, Oxford. Ext. fcap. %yo. cloth, as. 6</. 



fei Clarendon Press, Oxford. 



A Series of Graduated Greek Headers. 
First Greek Header. In Preparation. 

Second Greek Header. In Preparation. 

Third Greek HeiKder. In Preparation. 

Fourth Gteek Headier; bein^ Speciniens of Greek 

Dialects. With Introductions and Noties. By W. W. Merry, M.A., 
Fellow and Lecturer of Lincoln College. Extra fcap. 8vo. cloth, 45. 6</. 

Fifth Greek Header. Part I. Selections from Greek Epic 
and Dramatic Poetry, With Introductions and Notes. By Evelyn 
Abbott, M.A., Fellow and Tutor of Balliol College. Ext. fcap. 8vo. 
cloth^ 4s. ^d. 

Part ll. By the same Editof. In Preparation. 

Xenophon. Selections (for Schools). With Kotes and Maps. 
By J. S. Phillpotts, B.C.L., Head Master of Bedford School, formerly 
Fellow of New College, Oxford. Part I. Third Edition. Ext. fcap. 
8vo. chtb, 3s. 6d, 

Part II. By the same Editor, and G. S; Jerrani, M.A. 
In the Press. 

Arrian. Selections (for Schools). With Notes. By J. S. Phill- 
potts, B.C.L., Head Master of Bedford School. 

The Golden Treasury of Ancient Greek Poetry ; being a Cot- 
lection of the finest passages in the Greek Classic Poets, with Introduc- 
tory Notices and Notes. By R. S. Wright, M.A., Fellow of Oriel 
College, Oxford. Ext. fcap. 8vo. clotb, 8s. 6d, 

A G6lden Treasvdry of Greek Prose, being a collection Of the 
finest passages in the principal Ghreek Prose Writers, with Introductory 
Notices and Notes. By R. S. Wright, M.A., and J. E. L. Shadwell, M.A. 
Ext. fcap. 8vo. clothe 4s. 6d. 

Aristotle's Politics. By W. L. Newnian, M.A.j Fdlow of 
Balliol College, Oxford. 

Demosthenes and Aesehines. The Orations of Demoisthenes 
and ^schines on the Crown. With Introductory Essays and Notes. 
By G. A. Simcox, M.A., and W. H. Simcox, M.A. 8vo. clotb, 12s. 

Theocritus (for Schools). With Notes. By H. Kynaston, M.A, 
(late Snow), Head Master of Cheltenham College. Second Edition. 
Extra fcap. Svo. clotb^ 4s. 6d. 

Homer. Odyssey, Book II. With Introduction, Notes, and 
Table of Homeric Forms. By W. W. Merry, MA., Fellow and Lecturer 
of Lincoln College, Oxford. Ext. fcap. Svo. cloth, is. 6d, 

Homer. Odyssey, Books I— XII (for Schools). By W. W, 
Merry, M.A., Fellow and Lecturer of Lincoln College, Oxford. Fourth 
Edition. Extra fcap. Svo. clotb, 4s. 6d. 



Clarendon Press, Oxford. 23 



Homer. Odyssey, Books I-XII. By W. W. Merry, M.A., Fellow 
and Lecturer of Lincoln College, Oxford ; and the late James Riddell, 
M.A., Fellow of Balliol College, Oxford. In the Pres9, 

fiom^r. Odyssey, Books XIII-XXKV. By Robinson Ellis, 
M.A., Fellow of Trinity College, Oxford. 

ftomer. lUad. By D. B. Monro, M.A., Fellow and Tutor of 
Oriel College, Oxford. 

Also a small edition for Schools. 

Plato. Selectipns (for Schools). With Notes. By B. Jowett, 
M.A., Regius Professor of Greek ; and J. Purves, M.A., Fellow and 
Lecturer of Balliol College, Oxford. 

Sophocles. The Plays and Fragments. With English Notes 
and Introductions. By Lewis Campbell, M.A., Professor of Greek, St, 
Andrews, formerly Fellow of Queen's College, Oxford. 2 vols. 

Vol. I. Oedipus Tyranmis. Oedipus Coloneus. Antigone. 8vo. 
clotb, 14s. 

Sophocles; The Text of the Seven Plays. For the use of 

Students in the University of Oxford. By the same Editor. Ext. fcap. 
8vo. cloth, 45. 6d. 

Sophocles. In Single Plays, with English Notes, &c. By Lewis 
Campbell, M.A., Professor of GredE, St. Andrews, and Evelyn Abbott, 
M.A., Fellow of Balliol College, Oxford. 

Oedipus Ret. Ext. fcap. 8vo. Hmp^ is. gd, 
Oedipus Coloneus. Ext. fcap. 8vo. limp, is, gd, 
Antigone. E^tra fcap. 8vo. /imp, is. gd, 
Ajax. Just ready, 

Sophocles. Oedipus Rex : DindorTs Text, with Notes by the 
present Bishop of St. David's, formerly Fellow of University College, 
Oxford. Second Edition. Ext. fcap. 8vo. limp, is. 6d, 

in. MENTAL AND MOBAIi FHHiOSOFHY. 

The Elements of Deductive Ij^gio, designed mainly for the 

use of Junior Students in the Universities. By T. Fowler, M.A., 
Professor of Logic, Oxford. Fi/ih Edition, with a Collection of Ex^ 
amples. Extra fcap. 8vo. clotb, 3s. 6d, 

The Elements of Inductive IiOgic, designed mainly for the 
use of Students in the Universities. By the same Author. Second 
Edition, Extra fcap. 8vo. clotb, 6s. 

Selections firbm Berkeley^ with an Introduction and Notes. 
For the use of Students in the Universities. By Alexander Campbell 
Eraser, LL.D., Professor of Logic and Metaphysics in the University 
of Edinburgh. Crown 8vo. clotb, 7s. 6d, See also p. 16. 

A Manual of Political Economy^ for the use of Schools. By 
J. E. Thorold Rogers, M.A., formerly Professor of Political Economy, 
Oxford. Third Edition, Extra fcap. 8vo. clotb, 4s. 6J. 



?4 Clarendon Press, Oxford. 



rV. MATHEMATICS, &o. 

Figures Made Easy: a first Arithmetic Bopk. (Introductory 
to *The Scholar's Arithmetic.*) By Lewis Hensley, M.A., fonnerly 
Fellow and Assistant Tutor of Trinity College, Cambridge. Crown 8yo. 
cl(Ubt 6d, 

Answers to the Examples in Figures made Ea&y, together 

with tiyo thousand additional Examples fprmed from the Tables in the 
same, with Answers. By the same Ajuthor. Crown 8vo. clotb, is. 

The Scholar's Arithmetic; with Answers to the Examples. 
By the same Author. Grown 8vo. clotb, 4s. 6d, 

The Scholar's Algebra. An Introductory work on Algebra. 
By the same Author. Crown Svo. cloth, 4s. 6d, 

Book-keeping. By R. G. C. Hamilton, Financial Assistant 
Secretary to the Board of Trade, and John Ball (of the Firm of 
Quilter, Ball, & Co.), Co-Examiners in Book-keeping for the Society 
of Arts. New and enlarged Edition, Extra fcap. Svo. limp cloA, 2s. 

A Course of Iiectures op. Pure Geometry. By Henry J. 
Stephen Smith, M.A., F.R.S., Fellow o^ Corpus Chri^ti College, and 
Savilian Professor of Geometry m the University of Oxford. 

Acoustics. By W. F. IJonkin, 1VJ.A., F.R.§., Savilian Professor 
of Astrdnomy, Oxford. Crown Svo. clotb, 75. 6d, 

4- Treatise on Electricity and Magnetism. By J. Clerk 
Maxwell, M.A., F.R.S., Professor of Experimental Physics in the Uni- 
versi^ of Cambridge. 2 vols. Svo. cloth, il. iis. ^d. 

An Momentary Treatise on the same subject. By the same 
Author. Preparing, 



Y. HISTORY. 

A Constitutional History of England* in its Origin and 
Development. By W. Stubbs, M.A., Regius P^ofesisor of Modem 
History in the University of Oxford. Vol. I. Second Edition, Crown 

Svo. cloth, 125. 

Vol. II. Crown Svo. flotJb, i2f. 

Select Charters and other Illustrations of English Con- 
stitutional History, from the Earliest 'times to the Reign of Edward I. 
Arranged and Edited by W. Stubbs, M.A., Regius Professor of Modem 
History in the University of Oxford. Second Edition. Crown Svo. 
iclotb, Ss. 6d. 



Clarendon Press, Oxford. 25 



A History of Englaad^ principally in the Seventeenth Century. 
By Leopold Von Kanke. Translated by Resident ^lembers of the 
University of Oxford, under the superintendence of G. W. Kitchin, 
M.A., and C. W. Boase. M.A. 6 vols. 8vo. c/o/A, 3/. 3s. 

Gtenealogioal Tables illustrative of Modem History. By 

H. B. George, M.A. Second Edition. Revised and Corrected, Small 

4tO. cloth, 125. 

A History of France, down to the year 1433. With numerous 
Maps, Plans, and Tables. By G. W. Kitchin, M.A. Crown 8vo. 
cloth, 10s. 6d, 

A Manual of Ancient History. By George Rawlinson, M.A., 
Camden Professor of Ancient History, formerly Fellow of Exeter 
College, Oxford. Demy 8vo. cloth, 14s. 

A History of Germany and of the Empire, down to the close 
pf the Middle Ages. By J. Br/ce, D.C.L., Regius Professor of Civil 
Law in the University of Oxford. 

A mstory of British India. By S. j. Owen, M.A., Reader in 

History, Christ Church, and Teacher of Indian Law and History in 
the University of OxfoM. 

A History pf Oreeoe. By E; A. Freeman, M.A., formerly 
Fellow of Trinity College, Oxford. 



VI. iiAw. 

Elements Of Iiaw considered with reference to Principles of 
General Jurisprudence. By William Markby, M.A., Judge of the High 
Court of Judicature, Calcutta. Second Edition, with Supplement. 
Crown Svo. clotb, js. 6d. 

Supplement to tiie Elements of Lawv By the same Author. 

Crown Svo. cloth, 2s. 

An Introduction to the History of the Law of Real 

Property, with original Authorities. By Kenelm E. Digby, M.A., of 
Lincoln's Inn, Barrister-at-Law, and formerly Fellow of Corpus Christi 
College, Oxford. Crown Svo. cloth, 75. 6d. 

The Elements of Jurisprudence. By Thomas Erskine 
Holland, B.C.L., Chichele Professor of International Law and Diplo- 
macy, and formerly Fellow of Exeter College, Oxford. Preparing. 

The Institutes of Justinian, edited as a recension of the 
Institutes of Gains. By the same Editor. Extra fcap. Svo. cloth, 5s. 



26 Clarendon Press, Oxford. 



Gaii Institutionum Juris Civilis Commentarii Qjiatuor; 

or. Elements of Roman Law by Gains. With a Translation and Com- 
mentary by Edward Poste, M.A., Barrister-at-Law, and Fellow of Oriel 
. College, Oxford. Second Edition, 8vo. cloth ^ 1 8$. 

Select Titles from the Digest of Jizstinian. By T. E. 

Holland, B.C.L., Chichele Professor of International Law and Diplo- 
macy, and formerly Fellow of Exeter College, Oxford, and C. L. Shadwell, 
B.C.L., Fellow of Oriel College, Oxford. In Parts. 

Fart I. Introductory Titles. Svo, sewed, is, 6d, 

Fart IL Family Iiaw. Svo. sewed, is. 

Fart m. Froi>erty Iia^v. 8iw. sewed, zs, 6d, Just Published, 



VII. FHYSICAX. SCIBM-CB. 

Descriptive Astronomy. A Handbook for the General Reader, 
and also for practical Observatory work. With 224 iUustratioos and 
numerous tables. By G. F. Chambers, F.R.A.S., Barrister-at-Law. 
Demy &vo. 856 pp., elotb, l/. i». 

Chemistry for Students. By A. W. Williamson, Phil. Doc, 
F.R.S., Professor of Chemistry, University College, London. A new 
Edition, with Solutions, Extra fcap. Svo. clotb, 8s. 6d. 

A Treatise on Heat, with numerous Woodcuts and Diagrams. 
By Balfour Stewart, LL.D., F.R.S., Professor of Natural Philosophy in 
Owens College, Manchester. Third Edition, Extra fcap. Svo. clotb, 
*js, 6d, 

Forms of Animal Life. By G. RoUestoUy M.D., F.R.S., 

Linacre Professor of Physiology, Oxford. Illustrated by Descriptions 
and Drawings of Dissections. Demy Svo. clotb, 1 6s. 

Exercises in Fractical Chemistry (Ijaboratory Fractice). 

By A. G. Vernon Harcourt, M.A., F.R.S., Senior Student of Christ 
Church, and Lee's Reader in Chemistry; and H. G. Madan, M.A., FeDow 
of Queen's College, Oxford. 

Series I. Qualitative Exercises. Second Edition. Crown Svo.. clotb. 
7s. 6d. 

Series II. Quantitative Exercises. 

Gheology of Oxford and the Valley of the Thames. By John 
Phillips, M.A., F.R.S., Professor of Geology, Oxford. Svo. clotb, 2 is. 

Text-Book of Botany, Morphological and Physiological. By 
Dr. Julius Sachs, Professor of Botany in the University of Wurzburg. 
Translated by A. W. Bennett, M.A., Lecturer on Botany, St. Thomas' 
Hospital, assisted by W. T. Thiselton Dyer, M.A., Christ Church. 
Royal Svo. half morocco, 31s. 6d. 



Clarendon PresSy Oxford. 27 



Crystallography. By M. H. N. Story-Maskelyne, M.A.y Pro- 
fessor of Mineralogy, Oxford : and Deputy Keeper iu the Department of 
Minerals, British Museum. In the Press. 

m 

Physiologieal PhyBios. By G. Griffith, M.A., Jesus College, 
Oxford, Assistant Secretary to the British Association, and Natural 
Science Master at Harrow School. Preparing, 



Vm. SiraLIBH IiANGUAQE AND LrTBRATUBE. 

A First Beading Book. By Marie Eichens of Berlin; and 
edited by Anne J. Clough. Extra fcap. 8vo. stiff covers^ j^d, 

Ozfbrd Beading Book, Part I. For Little Children. Extra 
fcap. 8vo. stiff covers, 6d, 

Oxford Beading Book, Part II. For Junior Classes. Extra 
fcap. 8vo. stiff covers, 6rf. 

On the Principles of Qrammar. By E. Thring, M.A., Head 
Master of Uppingham School. Extra fcap. 8vo. clotb, 4s. 6d, 

Qrammatioal Analysis, designed to serve as an Exercise and 

Composition Book in the English Language. By £. Thring, M.A., 
Head Master of Ui^ingham School. Extra fcap. 8vo. elotb, 3s. 6d, 

An English Grammar and Beading Book, for Lower Forms 

in Qassical Schools. By O. W. Tancock, M.A., Assistant Master in 
Sherborne School. Second Edition. Extra fcap. 8vo. cloth, 35. 6d. 

The Philology of th^ English Tpngue. By J. Earle, M.A., 

formerly Fellow of Oriel College, and sometime Professor of Anglo-Saxon, 
Oxford. Second Edition. Extra fcap. 8vo. cloth, •js. 6d. 

An Anglo-Saxon Beadn^. By Henry Sweet, B.A. In the Press. 

Chancer. The Prioresses Tale; Sir Thopas; The Monkes 
Tale; The Clerkes Tale; The Squieres Tale, &c. Edited by 
W. W. Skeat, M.A., Editor of Piers the Plowman, &c., &c. Extra 
fcap. Svo. clotb, 4s. 6^. 

Specimens of Early English. A New and Revised Edition. 
With Introduction, Notes» and Glossarial Index. By R. Morris, LL.D., 
and W. W. Skeat, M.A. 

Part I. In the Press. 

Part II. From Robert c^ Gloucester to Gower (a.d. i 298 to A.D. 1395). 
Second Edition.. Extra fcap. Svo. clotb, 'js, 6d. 

Specimens of English Literature, from the 'Ploughmans 

Crede' to the *Shepheardcs Calender' (a.d. 1394 to A.D. 1579). With 
Introduction, Notes, and Glossarial Index. By W. W. Skeat, M.A. 
Extra fcap. 8yo. clotb, 75. 6d. 



! 



28 Clarendon Press, Oxford. 



The ViHibn of William cbnoeMing Piers thie PToWman, 

by William Langland. Edited, with Notes, by W. W. Skeat, M.A. 
Second Edition. Extra fcap. 8vo. clotb^ 4s. 6a. 

8hakie8t>eare. Hamlet. Edited by W. G. Clarl:, M.A., and 
W. Aldis Wright, MA. Extra fcap. 8vo. stiff covers^ as. 

Shakespeare. The Tempest. By W. Aldis Wright, M.A. 
Extra fcap. 8vo. stiff covers, is. 6d. 

Shakespeare. King Lear. By the same Editor. Extra fcap. 
Svo. stiff covers, is. 6d. 

Shakiespeare. As You Like It. By the same Editor. In 
the Press, (For other Plays, see p. 31.) 

MUtbn. The Arebpajgiticia. With Introduction and Notes. 
By J. W. Hales, M.A., late Fellow of Christ's College, Cambridge. 
Extra fcap. Svo. cloth, 3s. 

Addison. Selections from Papers in the Spectator. With 
Notes. By T. Arnold, MA., University College. Extra fcap. Svo. 
clotb, 4s. 6d, 

Typical Selections from the best English Writers with Intro- 
ductory Notices. Second Edition, in Two Vdlomes. Extra fcap. Svo. 
cloth. Sold separately, price 3s. 6d, each. 

Vol. I. Latimer to Berkeley. Vol. II. Pope to Macaulay. 

Specimens of Ijowlaaid Scotch and Korthem TStlgliwh. By 

J. A. H. Murray, Preparing, 

See also XIII, below for other English Classics, 

IX. FBENCH IlAEranAGE AND IiIT^BAKrOBS. 

An Etymological Dictionary of the French Language, with 
a Preface on the Principles of French Etymology. By A. Brachet. 
Translated into English by G. W. Kitchin, MA., formeriy Censor of 
Christ Church. Crown Svo. cloth, io&,6d, 

Brachet^s HistoHcal Grammar of the French Language. 
Translated into English by G. W. Kitchin, M.A. Third Edition. 
Extra fcap. Svo. cloS}, 3s. 6d, 

Comeille's Ginna, and Moliere*s Les Femmes Savantes. Edited, 
with Introduction and Notes, by Gustave Masson. Extra fcap. Svo. 
cloth, as. 6d, 

Baoine's Andromaqne, and Ck>meilLe*s Le Menteur. With 
Louis Racine*8 Life of his Father. By the same Editor. Extra fcap. 
Svo. clotb, 2s, 6d, 

IColiere's Les Fourberies de Scapin, and !Racine*s Athalie. 
With Vohaire's Life of Molifcre. By the same Editor. Extra fcap. Svo. 
clotb, 2s. 6d, 



Clarendon Press, Oxford. 29 



Selections from the Correspondence of Madame de S6Tign6 

and her chief Contemporaries. Intended more especially for GirU' 
Schools. By the same Editor. Extra fcap. 8vo.' elotb^ 35. 

Voyage autour de ma Qhambre^by Xayier dp MaiBtare ; Ourika, 
by Madame de Duras y La Dot de Suzette, by Flev^e ; Les Jumeanx 
de THdtel Corneille, by EdmQnd About ; M^sa ventures d'un £colier, 
by Bodolplie Tdpffer.^ By the same Editor. Extra fcap. Svo. clotb^ 
2s, 6d. 

Begnard's Le Joueur, and Brueys and Falaprat's Le 
Grondeur. With Notes. By the same Editor. Extra fcap. 8vo. 
cloth, 25. 6d. 

Iiouis XrVand his Coi^teinpoirctrieB ; as described in Extracts 

from the best Memoirs of the Seventeenth Century. With English 
Notes, Genealogical Tables, &c. By the same Editor. Extra fcap. 
8vo. clotb, 25. 6d. 



X. OEBMAN IiAKGUAGE A^TD I^TEBATUItE. 

New Qennan iBCethod. In Four Volumes. By Hermann Lange, 
Teacher of Modem Languages, Manchester. 

Vol. I. The Germans at Home. 8vo. cloth, 2j. 6d. 
Vols. H and HI. The German Manual. In the Press. 
Vol. IV. German Composition. In Preparation. 

Gk>ethe*8 Egmont. With a Life of Goethe, &c. By C. A. Buch- 
heim, Phil. Doc, Professor in King's College, London; sometime 
Examiner to the University of London. Extra fcap. Svo. dotb, Tfi. 

Schillep's Wilhelm Tell. With a Life of Schiller ; an historical 
and critical Introdoctiop, Arguments, and a complete Con^mentary. By 
the same Editor. Seaond Edition, ^xtra fcap. 8yo. clotb, 3s. 64. 

Iiescdng's Minna von Bamhelm. A Comedy. With a Life of 
Lessing, Critical Commentary, &c. By the same Editor. Extra fcap. 
8vo. clotb, 35. 6d, 

Goethe's Iphigenie auf Tauris. A Drama. With a Critical 
Introduction, Arguments to the Acts, and a compljCte Commentary. 
By the same Editor. In preparation. 

Seledtions from the Poems of Schiller and Qoethe. By 

the same Editor. In preparation, 

Becker's (E. F.) Friedrich der Qrosse. By the same 

Editor. In Preparation. 

Egmont's Iieben tmd Tod» and Belagenm^ von Antwerpen 
by Schiller. By the same Editor. In Preparation. 



30 Clarendon PresSy Oxford. 



XI. ABT, &c. 

A Handbook of Pictorial Art. By R. St J. Tyrwhitt, M.A. 
formerly Student aod Tutor of Christ Church, Oxford. With coloured 
Illustrations, Photographs, and a chapter on Perspective hy A. Mac- 
donald. Second Edition, 8vo. half morocco, 1 85. 

A Muaie Primer for Schools. By J. Troutbeck, M.A., Music 
Master in Westminster School, and R. F. Dale, M.A., B. Mus., Assistant 
Master in Westminster School. Crown 8vo. c/o/A, is. 6d!. 

A Treatise on Harmony. By Sir F. A. Gore Ouseley, Bart., 
Professor of Music in the University of Oxford. Second Edition, 410. 
clotbt I OS. 

A Treatise on Counterpoint, Canon, and Fugue, based upon 
that of Cherubini. By the same Author. 4to. clotht i6s. 

A Treatise on Musical Porm and General Composition. 

By the same Author. 4to. «/o/A, los. 

The Cultivation of the Speaking Voice. By John Hullah. 
Second Edition, Extra fcap. 8vo. doth, ss. ^. 



xn. idscsru^ANEons. 

Dante. Selections from the Inferno. With Introduction and 
Notes. By H.B. Cotterili, B.A. Extra fcap. Svo. doth, 4s. 6d, 

Tasso. La Qerusalemme Liberata. Cantos i, ii. With 

Introduction and Notes. By the same Editor. Extra fcap. Svo. 
cloth, 2s, 6d, 

A Treatise on the use of tiie Tenses in Hebrew. By 8. R. 

Driver, M. A., Fellow of New College. Extra fcap. 8vo. cloth, 65. 6d, 

Outlines of Textual Criticism applied to the New Testament. 
By C. E. Hammond, M A., Fellow and Tutor of Exeter College, Oxford. 
Extra fcap. 8vo. clotb, 3s. 6d, 

t 

The Modem Greek Iiang^age in its relation to Ancient Greek. 
By E. M. Geldart, B.A. Extra fcap. Svo. elotb, 4s. 6d, 

A System of Physical Education : Theoretical and Practical. 
By Archibald Maduco. Extra fcap. Svo. dotb, 7s. 6d, 



Clarendon Press, Oxford. 31 



Xni. A SEBIES OF EITaiilSH CLASSICS, 

Designed to meet the <wants of Students in English Literature, 
under the superintendence of the Rev. J. S. Brewer, M.A., of 
Queen^s College, Oxford^ and Professor of English Literature at 
King^s College, London, 

It is also especially hoped that this Series may pron}e useful to 
Ladies^ Schools and Middle Class Schools ; in ivhich English Litera- 
ture must al<u)ays be a leading subject of instruction, 

A Qeneral Intaroduotion to the Series. By Professor Brewer, 
M.A. 

1. Chaucer. The Prologue to the Canterbury Tales; The 

Knightes Talc; The Nonne Prestcs Tale. Edited by R. Morris, 
Editor of Specimens of Early English, &€., &c. Sixth Edition. Extra 
fcap. 8vo. clotb, as. 6d, (See also p. 27.) 

2. Spenser's Faery Queene. Books I and II. Designed chiefly 

for the use of Schools. With Introduction, Notes, and Glossary. By 
G. W. Kitchin, M.A., formerly Censor of Christ Church. 

Book I. Eighth Edition, Extra fcap. 8vo. elotbt 3s. 6d, 

Book II. Third Edition, Extra fcap. Svo, elotb, is, 6d. 

3. Hooker Ecclesiastical Polity, Book I. Edited by R. W. 

Church, M.A., Dean of St. Paul's ; formerly Fellow of Oriel College, 
Oxford. Second Edition, Extra fcap. 8vo. dotb, as. 

4. Shakespeare. Select Plays. Edited by W. G. Clark, M.A., 

Fellow of Trinity College, Cambridge ; and W. Aldis Wright, M.A., 
Trinity College, Cambridge. Extra fcap. 8vo. stiff covers, 

I. The Merchant of Venice, is. 

II. Richard the Second, is. 6<f. 

III. Macbeth, is. 6c/. (For other Plays, see p. aS.) 

r 

5. Baoon. 

I. Advancement of Learning. Edited by W. Aldis Wright, M.A. 
Second Edition, Extra fcap. 8vo, clothe 4s. 6^. 

II. The Essays. With Introduction and Notes. By J. R. Thursfield, 
M.A., Fellow and Tutor of Jesus College, Oxford. 

6. Hilton. Poems. Edited by R. C. Browne, M.A., and 

Associate of King's College, London, a vols. Fourth Edition, Extra 
fcap. 8vo. cloAt 6s, 6d. 

Sold separately. Vol. I. 45.; Vol. II. 3s. 



32 Clarendon Press, Oxford. 



7. Dryden. Select Poems. Stanzas on the Death of Oliver 

Cromwell ; Astraea Redux ; Annus Mirabilis ; Absalom and Achitophel ; 
Religio Laici ; The Hind and the Panther. Edited by W. D. Christie. 
Nf .A.y Trinity College, Cambridge. Second Edition. Ext. fcap. 8vo. 
elolk, 35. 6d. 

8. Bunyan. The Pilgrim's Progress ; Grace Abounding, Edited 

by E. Venables, M.A., Canon of Lincoln. In the Press. 

9. Pope. With Introduction and Notes. Py Mark Pattison, 

B.D., Rector of Lincoln College, Oxford. 

I. Essay on Man. Fifth Edition, Extra fcap. 8vo. stiff covers, 
IS. fd. 

IL Satires and Epistles. Second Edition. Extra fcap. Svo. stiff 
CO rs, 28, 

I p. Johnson. Rasselas ; Lives of Pope and Dryden. By 
T. Arnold, M.A., University College. 

11. Burke. Select Works. Edited, with Introduction and Notes, 
by E. J. Payne, M.A., of Lin^oln^s Inn, Barrister-at-Law, and Fellow of 
University College, Oxford. 

I. Thoughts on the Present Discontents; the two Speeches on 
America. Second Edition. Extra fcap. Svo. clotbt 4s. 6d. 

II. Reflections on the French Revolution. Ext|-a fcap. Svo. cloth, 55. 

12. Cowper. Edited, with Life, Introductions, and Notes, by 
H. T. Griflith, B.A., formerly Scholar of Pemb|:oke College, Oxford. 

I. The Didactic Poems of 1782, with Selections from the Minor 
Pieces, a.d. i 779-1 7S3. Extra fcap. Svo. cloth, 3s. 

II. The Task, with Tirocinium, and Selections from the Minor Poems, 
Aj). 1 784-1 799. Extra fcap. Svo. clotl>, 3s. 



Published for the University by 
MACMIIiliAN AlTD CO., IiONDON. 

Also to be had at the 
CliABENPQN PBESS DEPOSITOEY, OXFORD. 

The Delegates of the Press tnvi/e suggestions ah I 
advice from all persons interested in education; and will c 1 
thankful for hints, <kc» addressed to the Secretary to thi 
Deleqates, Clarendon Press^ Oxford. 




,*^ 



■J 
i 



%." 



STANFORD 



Tvf 




mk^ 



LIBRARY 



To avoid fine, this book should be returned on 
or before the date last stamped below 






<3f 



r 



I- 



1 



